Picture this: Clark Gable and the whole passle of MGM stars and starlets!  Spins a great story, and all this in 1947, could be today, except they  dressed better. You will not forget the characterizations, especially  Sydney Greenstreet, eat your heart out Eddie Murphy, just a marvy little  film for all ages (God I love cliches!</review_text>
"The Changeling" has become a little bit dated, however, it is still a very good ghost story. The film stars (George C. Scott) as John Russell, a composer who has lost his family in a tragic accident. He rents a large estate in order to compose his music. It is here that he encounters the ghost of a young boy. Why is the boy haunting the estate? Why is he making contact with John Russell? As the film moves forward, John Russell contacts a medium and eventually begins to investigate the mansion.From what he can gather, it was the former home of Senator Carmichael (Melvin Douglas). What ensues is the mystery of who the child is, and who is Senator Carmichael. What occurred in the mansion that is keeping this child there? This is more of a mystery than a horror film. The suspense of the film is through the nuances the director created by use of creepy sounds and effects in which the boy's wheelchair moves. The film is dated, and does not have the appeal it once had for me, however, it is still a good watch. Recommended.</review_text>
THis was the first scary movie I ever saw in the cinema, and it made a strong impression on me. The bathtub scenes were so eerie that I only took showers for a few years after I saw this movie at 15 - that is how much it scared me. I have since watched it as an adult and was able to keep it in healthier perspective, although I do have to say it is pretty scary and well done. Watching it many years later, I was surprised that it lacked a lot of the 70's cheese that you see in many films from that era. The carpet and some of the clothes were funny, but it didn't detract from the film. Glad I bought it</review_text>
This is my favorite film of all time!I am sad to say that most people have never even heard of it -It was an Acadamy Award winner, so I don't understand why it's not gotten much attention over the years...I find it  superior to other classics which seem to have withstood the test of time better than Captains Courageous.I don't know why this is the case, but I am it's biggest advocate - urging all my friends to see it...It is a wonderful and moving story, that will bring me to tears time and time again the same way as "It's a Wonderful Life Does"...If you have strong values and a warm heart - this movie is for you!Do not miss it</review_text>
Apart from the emotional content due to the fact that a grandson defends his grandfather who is going to be executed for a racist crime, the films deals with the death penalty with great sympathy and ethical enlightenment. It also reveals with some silent moments here and there that the decision to execute the murderer is not at all taken for real moral reasons but only for political reasons. The governor finally gives the go-ahead message and refuses to pardon the murderer or even to stay the execution for some new investigation in some facts that appeared at the very last minute, and this under pressure from a crowd and he even announces his decision in front of this crowd and TV cameras. This is what is particular unbeareable about the death penalty : the final decision is always taken by some elected politician who turns it into his own political campaign  Just for that reason it is unethical. The film also reveals how the grandfather is transformed in just 28 days by the energy and dedication  of his grandson. He finally realizes, as he says so well, that he was not completely black and evil and that there must have been something good in him that he transmitted to his son who transmitted it in his turn to his grandson. There was a new hope in that man. But that was too late and that could not be taken into account by the governor.Dr Jacques COULARDEAU, Universit Paris Dauphine, Universit Paris I Panthon Sorbonne</review_text>
*****I liked this film a lot.  It was entertaining, suspenseful, and made me think.  It's staying with me and I'm continuing to think about it."A Simple Plan" asks the question, "What if you found $4.4 million in a gym bag in the woods...would you keep it...what if you thought there was a reasonably good chance you'd never get caught...that no one would ever know?"  This is what happens to the central characters.  The DVD cover advertises, "Sometimes good people do evil things."  Once they make their decision, and plan their plan, the movie illustrates how consequences happen that are completely unanticipated.Bill Paxton plays the main character and is wonderful as a typical "good" middle-class accountant in a small rural town.  Bridget Fonda does an excellent job as his wife, who is very idealistic and moralistic until she realizes that the scenario is not hypothetical---in fact, she has to decide what to do, and she makes decisions different from what I would have expected.  Billy Bob Thornton is predictably great, of course, playing a rural man (the main character's brother) who has never had a chance in the town he lives in and just wants to truly have a life, and in his own way, do what is right; he is handicapped, however, by his intelligence, his eccentricity, and his background.  I felt a lot of sympathy for his character, and since I'm a person more like his brother, it was fascinating to see how he lived and thought...as the movie progressed, his middle-class brother gained empathy for the difficult life he led, too.I didn't think that any of the pacing was slow, as other reviewers have said.  I thought that the starkness and the pacing fit in beautifully with the movie and it gave me a chance to process what was going on.  One moral decision led to another, and each of them made me think "Would I do that?" and "Could I do that?"  It made me see how seductive certain crimes in certain circumstances can be to any one of us.This is a quality, very suspenseful, provocative film.  I think it would be equally enjoyable for men and women but definitely not for children at all, as the themes are very heavy and mature.There are no special features or subtitles.  I generally like subtitles, but they are not necessary in this film for hearing people, as everyone speaks very clearly.I cannot imagine how anyone would dislike this movie.  There is some violence, but none of it is gratuitous.  I generally really dislike violence in movies, but it was worth it for the experience I took away after watching it.*****</review_text>
I wasn't expecting much when I dropped this 1998 movie into the DVD player...There is a lot to commend itself. Matt Damon gives a convincing performance of a wet-behind-the-ears lawyer who finds himself with a big case on his hands just as he passes the bar exam! Danny Devito is slimy, shady, sarcastic, and sleazy (in other words, perfect Devito) as Damon's partner.The main story involves a poor family whose son is denied needed medical treatment for leukemia. The sleazy Big Insurance Company has denied his claim and betting that they will not press the matter. They bet wrong! Our hero, guided by some unlikely supporters and a sympathetic judge (Dixon from Alias), come to the rescue.The pieces fit together quite nicely. Justice is served, bad guys are taken down, and Matt Damon establishes himself as an unlikely, unwilling hero and endears himself to the pretty girl in the process.Nothing wrong with this story or this film. Very delightful and satisfying in every respect.</review_text>
I will begin by saying that this movie by no means touches on a new plot. The 'geek' boy falls in love with the alternative girl, while she's already fallen for someone else, who is a complete jerk. Of course, they end up together in the end. However, most movies are bought for the newness, the originality, and are watched once or twice and forgotten on a dusty shelf. This movie captures attention through other avenues. The characters are charming, and everyone will relate to this movie, and say 'hey, that sounds like someone I know'. Ths soundtrack is fabulous, and the movie includes a segment of a live performance by Everclear, that, although short, is very impressive. My advice: Rent this. If you like it the first time you see it, then proceed to buy it, because you always will. If you're not keen on it, then don't bother</review_text>
For those who don't know russian the title of this was (&#1055;&#1088;&#1086;&#1089;&#1084;&#1086;&#1090;&#1088;&#1077;&#1085;&#1080;&#1077; K-19 - Review of K-19, thought I'd be funny there)This movie is not so much a combat movie it's a what happened movie. The flagship of the Russian Navy though not quite ready for sea gets put underway with 2 Captians, yea that kinda don't go over so well. They have a reactor accident and it seperates the men from the boys. It is quite a gripping movie though. This is also one that needs to be bought not just rented</review_text>
Here's an "epic" movie that reminded me of those that were made in the mid 1960s such as Dr. Zhivago and Lawrence Of Arabia. Interesting to note that Omar Sharif was in this modern-day movie and Dr. Zhivago. Several younger friends that saw this film told me they were very disappointed because, thanks to the previews, they thought it would be an action-packed adventure story such as "The Mummy." Well, it wasn't and it was way too slow for them.Frankly, I thought the "slow" parts were the best and overall, thought the film had just the right amount of action, instead of overdoing it as the recent Mummy pictures did. Another big plus was the cinematography. This is a beautifully filmed movie, stunning in some parts. Another good point is the language: hardly a swear word.On the negative side, there was the usual political correctness, a la Dances With Wolves in which viewers are reminded several times of the massacre at Wounded Knee and soldiers are portrayed as the bad guys. The horse race had some credibility problems, too, as "Hidalgo" came back from the dead not once but twice to race like Secretariat!Anyway, if you are looking for a modern-day adventure story with old-fashioned storytelling and no language problems, this film is for you and the rest of the family</review_text>
This great film will finally be available on DVD on January 31st, 2006.</review_text>
This movie was excellent. I have a degree in public health so this was a smash hit to me. You can gain appreciation for it on many levels.I found the investigating of HIV and the disease course tracking to be interesting. Anyone interested in politics or history would love this movie. Anyone who has been touched by AIDS/HIV themselves or in knowing someone who suffered from the disease will gain knowledge and insight from this. Anyone who is interested in government scandals or foreign relations would be drawn to the story. And mostly, anyone who can appreciate human interaction and flaws and how our sexuality is tied or not tied to our identity would glean a lot from this.The message and information is so powerful. Of course as anything brought to tv there may be slight exaggerations to the story but for the most part it accurately chronicles the struggles both political and scientific that plagued the on-set on AIDS/HIV disease spread. The same frustrations can speak for many issues and so this is not only a piece dealing with the hard topic of AIDS but, since science doesnt often make it into Hollywood, it is representative of many struggles.Matthew Modine and Lily Tomlin are wonderful</review_text>
For me, &quot;Get a Life&quot; provided plenty of laughs in its spoofs of what often manages to pass as television comedy, from Chris' unique effort to rehabilitate a collection of street punks to his discovery of a space  alien (in home video Volume 2) which is anything but cuddly. I only wish  Rhino would expand its offerings of &quot;Get a Life&quot; episodes</review_text>
Juggernaut was more or less lumped in with the disaster movie genre when it came out in the mid-70s, possibly because the making of the film itself seemed so disastrous. Originally a Bryan Forbes film, Forbes was briefly replaced by Don Medford (who had also briefly taken over The Guns of Navarone after Alexander MacKendrick was fired and before J. Lee Thompson was hired) before Richard Lester took over. While it's easy to spot some of the typical Lester touches (such as poor offscreen jokes added during the dubbing sessions), it's so unlike most of his other films that you constantly find yourself wondering who directed what.Regardless of where the credit lies, the end result is a terrific thriller, with Richard Harris' bomb disposal team parachuted to Omar Sharif's liner with several bombs aboard while Anthony Hopkins tries to track down the extortionist in London. The bomb disposal scenes are genuinely tense, the characterisation surprisingly strong enough to undercut potential clich?s and Alan Plater's dialog quite superb, with the film offering both the required suspense and a neat little state-of-the-nation address of Britain in the early 70s. Really rather terrific.</review_text>
Once in a while, movie gem reaches out and touches your soul.  I have added this film to my collection of favorites, and those I will savor when I need a gut wrenching cry.  I was literally emotionally drained after watching it.The story is set in Hell's Kitchen, among the despair of poverty and addictions.  A young Irish couple with their two daughters move to the neighborhood to try to establish a new life....overshadowed by the loss of their son at five years old.I find myself drawn in the family, deeply sharing their anguish and triumphs.  One scene had me on the edge of my seat....at a street fair when the father is trying to win an ET doll for his youngest daughter.  I won't tell you the outcome.The youngest daughter, Ariel, has a spirit about her, a curiosity and charisma which brings caring people into the fold of the family.  She is bold and unafraid, yet she yearns for the love of her father, who is emotionally distant following the death of his son.The oldest daughter, Kristine, is wise beyond her years.  She successfully camptures life on her camcorder, which she uses constantly, almost a video diary if you will.The mother is strong and loves her husband with all her heart.  Her husband has shut her out of his emotionbal life, also, and she struggles to deal with that.  She is the glue which binds her family together.Their neighbor, the "screaming man" of the building, is a tormented young artist.  The words on his door say it all "KEEP AWAY".  I won't give away the plot with his role.A MUST SEE.....I cried, I stopped for a bit, I cried again.  I couldn't stop crying.  Okay, so I cried at Lion King, too...but that's beside the point.  I loaned this movie to my neighbor immediately after, with red puffy eyes.  She understands.</review_text>
Let's start with the negatives. This vid is too damn short. A half-an hour doesn't do justice to the title Groovy Gals. Where are the Marvellettes? Where is Brenda Holloway? Second, because the acts are taken from different  shows, Groovy Gals has no flow and a chopped quality that is only made  worse by shoddy editing. Third, host Jimmy O'Neill is really irritating and  useless on these tapes. Why not edit him out and give us more acts? On the  positive side, this tape has more rock royalty than you could shake a gold  record at! The Queen of Soul, Aretha Franklin, just nails The Shoop Shoop  Song with her gospel-spiced vocals, and mention must be made of The  Blossoms, led by the legendary and highly-underated Darlene Love. They back  up Franklin and a number of acts and look like they're really having fun  with I Like It Like That. Speaking of rock royalty, my personal faves, The  Supremes, glide through Baby Love with the style and sophistication that  made them Princesses of Pop. Ross has big hair and, with Flo and Mary, does  the slick, subtle choreography that tattooed them as Motown acts. A rare  treat is Ketty Lester torching out Love Letters. Wow! Watch her make the  word &quot;sign&quot; an eight-syllable word in song, and enounciate each  word. But the wildest was the last: The Acid Queen, Tina Turner,  electrifies with Ooh-Poo-Pah-Do. Tina in a tasteful cocktail dress and nice  pumps is jarring enough, but when she lets out the clutch and revs the song  up (Backed by The Blossoms who are clearly enjoying themselves) you will be  hard pressed to tear your eyes away. Other acts include The Toys looking  bored and jaded as they sit in a fake garden setting in Lover's Concerto;  Leslie Gore romping through Judy's Turn To Cry with Shindig's lame go-go  dancers; Fontella Bass with her one hit, Rescue Me; Great rare Shangri-La's  footage of Give Him A Great Big Kiss (such naughty shimmies!); Jackie  DeShannon's tender version of Burt Bacharach's What The World Needs Now and  Petula Clark showing too much Brit restraint with her monster hit Downtown.  Yes, the filming is b+w and strange at times, but if you love the time  period or the music this one is a necessary document for collectors and  fans. Enjoy</review_text>
My wife and I just watched this disney movie with our 8 year old son.The colors are exquisite, deeply saturated, clear crisp detail, and picture quality is incredible.Sound quality was substantially better than the original.  All 6 channels of sound were strong without being harsh, and convey a sense of beauty.The film is all about the triumph of human spririt.  I'm sure that the girls will relate to the princess, but my son was impressed as well.Thanks Disney for doing such a great job in remastering this classic.  I will keep it in my library for the princesses in my family</review_text>
Certain movies really capture the feel of their themes, and this one is the one movie that really captures the magic of Baseball like no other. Of course there is a great moral lesson to be learned. But haven't we learned by now, that the Devil has no good purpose in wanting to help us to achieve our goals? I hope so. What a great cast of performers. Nothing was lost from the Broadway stage in this production. And nothing is lost from the movie in this excellent transfer to DVD. Through the magic of Hollywood, when done to perfection, film can even enhance the story. And few have done the job with a Musical as well as this Gem. Thanks largely to the astounding talent of Bob Fosse's choreography. Tab Hunter's shining moment. Gwen Verdon's 'Whatever Lola Wants' is the showstopper, but Ray Walston steals the entire film as an extremely funny Devil. A film favorite for most of my life</review_text>
What I find so amusing from some of the one star reviews is the assertion that Mr. Moore used creative editing of this movie to somehow distort the facts, and therefore the entire premise and basis of this documentary is null and void.The man is not only making a video to entertain you (and this is wildly entertaining, in a factual and hilarious way) but it also rests in an unarguable fact, the closure of the GM plants in Flint Michigan and the devastating impact it brought with it.Whether or not you like they style of Moore's presentation, it is witty, backed by appropriately titled music and shows the almost incomprehensible response on the part of the city of Flint at this loss of future revenue (or, more bluntly, its threatened  economic survival) and in the joining the impact that corporate America can have on the lives of its citizens and the coldly calculated, dollars and cents approach to the bottom line, Moore succeeds in showing the viewer how both work with each other, as you often cannot have one without having both.</review_text>
Eventually, anyone who makes it their business to seek out quality horror movies is going to come to the conclusion that the ones that succeed in distinguishing themselves from the pack tend to fall into three distinct categories. First, you have the horror movies that are less interested in scaring you than they are seriously exploring their subject matter, and probing into the nature of evil. Sometimes, they go the supernatural route (The Exorcist, Rosemary's Baby, Don't Look Now). Sometimes, they stay grounded (Psycho, Henry: Portrait of a Serial Killer, Se7en). Either way, they are more disturbing than they are immediately frightening. You acknowledge that what you've seen has struck a kind of nerve, but you won't lose much sleep. These movies are  intellectually compelling but they do not provoke any immediate sense of terror.On the other hand, the second breed of quality horror movies has no interest in psychology, in the "nature" of their content, and do not attempt to intellectually engage you. They only want to make you feel as if you are in immediate danger. The movies that fall into this category (Halloween, Alien) do not provide food for thought, but they know how to make you uncomfortable, and they know how to push your buttons. They are manipulative in the extreme, but they are actively frightening, and provide visceral experiences that the previous category of horror films cannot.Finally, the third category of superlative horror films distinguish themselves by remaining conscious of themselves. They want to frighten you, but they also want to convince you that they are "above" merely pushing your buttons. At the same time, they don't want to go the intellectual route either. These films (Scream, Dawn of the Dead) are made by people who know the genre, know that the audience knows the genre, and toe a thin line between adhering to genre conventions and examining those conventions explicitly. These films are very effective, even if they are too cool for the room. You laugh knowingly, and then, bam, something truly frightening wipes that smirk right off your face.Bernard Rose's "Candyman" is a rarity in that it falls into all three of these categories. It is intellectually stimulating and it knows a great deal about the nature of evil, but it is also, truly, viscerally frightening. It is self-aware and yet, it is not too cool for the room, and there is no comfortable distance to be found from the nightmare that unfolds on the screen. It is as immediately frightening as the orginal Halloween, it is as thought-provoking as The Exorcist, and it is as aware as itself as the Scream trilogy. You've never seen anything quite like it before, and you probably won't see anything like it again.The plot of Candyman centers around a woman who is as much of an agnostic when it comes to the intangible world as one could imagine; she boldly pursues strides into the haunts of a malevolent spiritual force (the Cabrini Green Housing Projects in Chicago, which are dangerous enough without factoring evil spirits into the equation) in search of discovering the source of the legend of the Candyman, a man with a hook for an arm who can be summoned by repeating his name into a mirror five times. She is convinced, as any liberal pseudo-sociologist might be, that the Candyman is but a projection of the fears the urban poor have of gang/drug-related violence. The fact that there is a gang leader who has taken to calling himself the Candyman reinforces this conviction.For this woman, the idea that there is evil in the world, pure evil, unconditioned by economic/racial (most of the residents of Cabrini Green are poor and black) factors is unthinkable. She does not believe that the Candyman is anything more than an idea. She is wrong. The Candyman is real, and he doesn't much like the challenge to his authority posed by her skepticism. Furthermore, she reminds him of someone from his past whom he wishes to be reunited with, and thus he comes to view her as a conquest on more levels than one.For about half of the film, we follow the woman, played by Virginia Madsen, and her friend, played by Kasi Lemmons, as they trek through Cabrini, exchange notes, and conduct the affairs of their lives. Madsen's grad student is no different from a lot of young people. She is determined to make a mark on her field, she's a little suspicious about her husband's fidelity, she smokes, she's pretty, she's intelligent and she seems nice enough. She draws our sympathy.However, midway through the film, there is a decisive rupture, and everything in Madsen's life begins to unravel at an alarming rate. The chain of events that follow a particularly frightening scene in a parking lot take on the logic of a nightmare that one is unable to escape from. Soon, everything we have come to know about the young woman we've been following, all of the connections she has to her friends, to her husband, to humanity in general seem to be undone. It would be unfair to describe exactly what happens, but let it be said that the final fifty minutes of Candyman are as frightening as anything I've seen on film.We thought we were safe, after all. The character we'd been following had friends, family, a job, a life of her own. The possibility of coming into conflict with nothing less than pure evil was the farthest thing from her mind; she and her friend were more concerned about packing the requisite mace for their journey through the projects, more afraid of drug dealers than of demons. After all, the Candyman is an urban legend, and we know all about urban legends. They're campfire stories. There is no Boogeyman, not really.Rose plays on the self-conscious approach we take to horror films by decisively arguing that it will not save us. He engages us intellectually by toying with the idea of whether the Candyman is literally real, or only becomes literally real if enough people are afraid of him (I'll leave that up to you to decide). And he frightens us at an immediate level by pulling the rug out from under us at a crucial moment, and by never allowing us to regain our footing. It doesn't hurt that he has an uncanny eye for frightening visuals (the bees swallowing the Chicago skyline, the Candyman's self-portrait), plus the help of a terrific soundtrack from Philip Glass (whose presence reminds us that, hey, this is a serious piece of art) and compelling performances on all levels. Not to mention a great idea, and, yes, the ability to push our buttons and manipulate us when he wants to.Candyman is, as far as I'm concerned, the second most frightening film ever made; the original Halloween still remains the only movie that made me briefly fear for my own safety. But I would argue that the horror genre has produced no more complete work of art-- no other film that engages the viewer on every conceivable level they could ask to be engaged on-- than Rose's masterpiece. Halloween becomes exponentially less scary with repeated viewings, as you begin to get the sequence down and figure out what's coming. Candyman's power remains undiminished, even once you get the sequence down, because the scares give way to the ideas.Don't miss it.Rated R: Contains some very graphic gore (nothing that will  really surprise those used to the genre, but this movie does get pretty ugly by any standard-- seriously, who said this wasn't gory enough?) some language, and brief nudity (not in a sexual context)</review_text>
The Breakfast Club, one of the best movies out there. Timless no matter what's your age or what year you were born in your sure to love this movie! :-</review_text>
This movie is almost 40 years old...can you believe it? To those of you who haven't seen this classic, my only question to you is, why? Why in the world have you been depriving yourself of something so incredible, so wonderful, so fun, so beautiful. It is just one of those movies that makes you almost kind of sad that we don't have filmakers and storytellers like we used to. We have become a group of people who are more interested in constant action, that we have forgotten how to tell a story. We have become a group of people who desire to be constantly stimulated rather than allowing ourselves to get interested and involved. If this movie was created in today's market - and it pains me to say this - it would be a box office flop.But fortunately, it was made when it was made. Fortunately it had three of the most talented actors of our time in it; the always incredible Paul Newman, the likeable Robert Redford, and the stunningly gorgeous Katherine Ross. The combination of these three characters is absolutely magical. If they made this movie today it would probably have in it; Brad Pitt, Ben Affleck, and Jennifer Lopez. YUK! I better shutup before somebody gets a bright idea of remaking this classic movie. I cannot even imagine somebody having the gall to even try and redo this jewel of a movie.Everything in this movie is top notch. Every scene is just gorgeous and full. I was just a kid when I first saw it and I didn't fully understand all the layers that this movie contains. Now in my early 40s, I truly appreciate Roy Hill's vision. Everything seems so natural. There is nothing forced in this movie. There is nothing contrived. There is nothing but pure movie magic. If you've been waiting for an invitation to finally see this movie, consider this your invitation.But, I warn you...do not buy it if your attention span is less than four seconds. So if you've read this entire review without changing the television channel or talking on the cell phone or text messaging one of your "homies" then you passed the test and you are free to view this incredible piece of cinema</review_text>
Micky Dane (Robert Patrick), a paparazzo photographer, is on the run after a photo shoot that leaves him framed for murder. This movie has great action, good acting and really catchy music. Body Shot is another Robert Patrick movie that I've seen multiple times(probably about 12 so far and still counting).  You gotta love Patrick with his blond hair! I AM biased and give this a perfect 5 stars</review_text>
This film is about the battle in the Ia Drang valley in 1965 Vietnam. It begins in 1954 when a French patrol is attacked and defeated in a surprise ambush. A prophecy for the future? In one scene a wounded French soldier is killed. [Was this truth or drama?] Then in 1964 we see children in a car singing a tune based on "Sambre et Meuse", which dates to the Napoleonic Wars. Next we see a training camp where helicopters will be used in ground battles. [Wasn't this an adaption of a civilian model?] One scene shows officer's wives discussing local conditions and the laundromat. [Are the defective washing machines at the camp a symbol of failure?] One scene recalls Custer's last battle. Custer did not know the size of the enemy; he assumed about 2,500 and not three times as many. Later we hear the Intelligence officer admit they did not know the size of the enemy forces. Ominous?The mechanized cavalry lands in their helicopters, the soldiers start shooting. Some soldiers run after a lone enemy and are ambushed. The battle erupts in fierce fighting. Two helicopters bring in needed ammunition. Back in the states telegrams arrive with bad news for the families. Were they delivered impersonally? The battle continues with rising casualties on both sides. Air support arrives to drop napalm. Some lands too far from the enemy. They expect another attack at dawn. But the tide has turned, the enemy faces defeat and withdraws. The end of the battle shows a load of journalists arriving to take pictures and question the colonel. After the Seventh Cavalry is withdrawn the Vietnamese reclaim their land. The Colonel returns to his family in his land.In 1964 General Douglas MacArthur advised LBJ against getting into a land war in Asia. Could this film have been created as a warning against a war in the Middle East? Does it have a subtle anti-war message? It seems different from his earlier film based on the Revolutionary War.</review_text>
Hollywood make them, then they break them -- stars can fall as fast as they rise. Sometimes they rise again, and sometimes they disappear.And Christopher Guest casts a jaded eye on the fickle ups and downs of Hollywood in "The Big Picture," a quirky, cynical movie which focuses on what the successful should never let go of. It has a few awkward stretches, but overall it's a darkly witty cult comedy ("You're tracking failure all over my carpet!").Nick Chapman (Kevin Bacon) is the winner at an arty student movie competition, and instantly agents are chasing him all over L.A. In no time, he's the Rising Young Director, with a movie deal at a major movie corporation. But he's also starting to lose sight of his old life, as he tries to become a major success.He changes the style, plot and characters of his arty movie for demographics, turning it into a beach bums/naked ghost movie. He dumps his pretty girlfriend (Emily Longstreth) for a bimbo actress (Teri Hatcher). When the studio head gets dropped, Nick falls as quickly as he rose. But a chance encounter with an old pal gives him a second chance -- an arty music video. This time, can he get it right?Christopher Guest is best known for his brilliant mockumentaries, tackling everything from small-town musicals to folk festivals. His forthcoming one is another one about showbiz. But his talents are just as present in a "typical" movie, and Guest does a smart, quirky job of it.The lesson: Be true to yourself and your art, don't fall for empty glitz, and don't let success go to your head if you're lucky enough to get it.The story is a pretty straightforward one -- Nick gets great success, it goes to his head, he falls, and he rises again a wiser man. And the movie falls into straightforward lines, without many unpredictable plot twists. At first glance, it doesn't seem that unusual.What makes it special? Well, simply put, Guest manages to infuse it with his unique type of wit, like the oddballish Pez music video and the noir fantasies of Nick's life. Not to mention the glorious dialogue. When speaking of Nick's one'n'only music video, a studio woman announces, "It's the best one yet, and I've seen 'em ALL!"And Guest manages to show us agents, artists, students, directors and actors, but never descended to cliches. They're real people, no matter how nasty. And Bacon does a solid job as a young man who learns how empty glitz is. His best scene is the reunion with his friend Emmet, where he confesses, "I wanna be your friend again." And he's backed by good performances by Longstreth, Michael McKean and a dancing Jennifer Jason Leigh."Big Picture" treads where many movies have gone before, but it does so with an approach as fresh as a Pez People music video. A must-see</review_text>
This is a nice love story, a little dumbed down, but with a great message, the money may be the root of all evil, and what is important is the human heart.  This is a message that is badly needed in a very materialistic world.  Nicholas Cage is one of our finest commercial actors.  He proves is versatility in this picture.   What ever happened to Bridget Fonda??J</review_text>
This is the first time that I thought a movie was not worth seeing and waited until it hit a premium movie channel. This time I will admit I made a mistake. This movie was fun to watch. It is well written and the interactions of the two main actors show a great chemistry.Nicolas Cage plays the Special Agent in Charge of the Secret Service detail guarding a former First Lady. The First Lady is played well my Shirley MacLaine. The agent feels he is wasted in such a detail and wants desperately to get back on detail to the White House...and the First Lady wants him to stay. The two seem to thrive on confrontation with each other. She does her best to break every procedure the Secret Service is supposed to follow.If you pay attention in the movie you will see why the First Lady actually loves the agent so much and wants him with her. And I think the picture shows us a very accurate relationship that occurs between agent and his protectee. Though it could be seen as a comedy; there is a just enough drama and a mystery which Cage character solves. A very well directed with perfect pace and timing. I look forward to buying it and watching it again.</review_text>
I just watched the second half of Guarding Tess on TBS. It's now 11:30PM, and I am writing this review when I should be in bed 1 and half hour ago. Nicolas Cade and The old woman in the movie both turned in great performances. The story was lightly funny at first, but didn't really go anywhere. The relationship between The FBI agent and ex-first lady was strange, and though the movie tried to give their intimacy an explanation, it was still weird. The climax came at the end, and was very entertaining, for it broke a long line of fairly boring plot. There is much meaning in the movie; it tried successfully to bring the emotions of a smart first lady widow who dearly wants attention to life. I was touched by the movie. Thank you. I should go to bed now</review_text>
This movie combines two things I love in a film:The actors are able to enjoy and showcase their talents. This is animprov lover's dream.ANDIt makes fun of a topic which takes itself too seriously, in thiscase, dog shows. Only one character in the film keeps the importance of the dog's rating in context.Mainly though, it is just hilarious. Some (okay-a lot) of the humor is too crude for my kids to see unfortunately, and nearly too crude for me. Still, it fits the genre.</review_text>
Fantastic film ; memticulous and carefully built ,loaded of the highest suspense you may expect . In this clever film noir , Eastwood is an outsider . He is not a detective , but a jewel thief who watchs something he never had to see .This brutal murderer will reach the highest governement levels in which a very well planned chase will be made behind the traces of Eastwood .A great script . Hackman is absolute convincing in the best role which he has represented more than any one else ; the immoral, corrupt , decadent and perverse villain .Intelligent puzzle and artistic film prove once more than industry and craft may join .One of the best films in his career .</review_text>
Great movie, definately original and something many Chicanos living is SoCal can relate to or be familiar with</review_text>
You know how every single American English class in ever single school in America has to read at least one Mark Twain book?  Well, the same circumstance should be set for this film in relation to modern American history courses.One of the best political thrillers, in all fairness it's not a fast moving film, it's a slow, intricate film full of small details that add up to one big story, and one of the absolute best American films of the 70's All the President's Men is a story of, besides Watergate, of two small worker ants who go on to destroy what already was a disasterous affair, which if not uncovered, could have potentially gotten worse.Hoffman, as per usual, hands in a flawless performance as does Redford, an actor whose work I'm none too familiar with or a fan of, and the supporting cast all around, particularly Jason Robards, shine like flawless diamonds in this essential, and inspirational, drama</review_text>
This movie is a classic - a young(er) Nicholas Cage is fun to watch, as is the entire cast!  One of my favorites to watch over and over!!</review_text>
GUARDING TESS wouldn't be so much fun if it weren't for the presence of the unflappable Shirley MacLaine as the former first lady who gets Nicolas Cage for her secret service bodyguard.  Cage is equally effective in his role.  He hates his assignment and he and MacLaine don't get along well at all.  But when the President himself (voiced by director Hugh Wilson) insists on their pairing, what can Cage do?  Other than the expected pivotal kidnap plot, there's not a whole lot that goes on, but the film surprisingly shows what it must be like to surrender your privacy due to your notoriety and MacLaine's attempts to find such private moments is poignant.  A solid supporting cast makes it work too, although Edward Albert's character of MacLaine's son is rushed over too much to bring any significance to the role.  All in all, a pleasant enjoyable movie</review_text>
Michael Moore strikes at the Establishmewnt again!Moore's best is still his first, 'Roger And Me,,but this is the next best. Imagine my surprise asfew yrs., agao when a friend, who also votes ThirdParty, lent me the VHS of this and found out thatMoore is also a Cheap Trick fan. Nielsen's picturewith Moore is even on the back of the DVD sleeve!A good effort, though Moore's somewhat leftist oc-cational leaniings may put some Third Party typesoff...The far Middle strikes back, again! And Rockon Rick Nielsen</review_text>
Moore shows us that outsourcing was big when Clinton was president. He makes you ashamed of big corporations that value money over employees. Big One will open your eyes</review_text>
Yes this is "worth it".I took my younger brother to three movies in our teens, Apocalypse Now, The Deer Hunter and Spinal Tap. Being an older sis I can forget the near death face he wore after the first two(of course he'll never forget it) but the utter outrage of his 14 year old Zeppelin playing, Doors 24/7-loving self displayed after Tap...ah that I recall ever after. (Usually to any girlfriend that comes around). He took it all to be actual documentary, no Mockumentary concept for Ken, and while I laughed myself into the aisles with jokes I still love...he was incenced. "What the hell kind of band is that?"...he was livid. Okay you had to be there but the only thing funnier than this movie is watching it with someone who is so rockraged they are arching off the walls. So seeing this  lovely "special edition" off it went this July as his present for his 42nd birthday. "Very damn funny" was my greeting. It's a terrific present with added stuff to bring a few more laughs. Admittedly nothing tops the Stonehenge dance of the dwarves..but it's just all fun. And more fun. If I could haul this in and show it as the first of the year teacher luncheon entertainment I could watch my brother's routine all over again with most of the staff i work with just living in "what is this " land...ah that would be supremely satisfying. Send to someone today</review_text>
as an asian american, i just want to say how well this movie is made.  i'm not offended that this movie casted caucasian actors (come on people, this was in the 1930s!!)  and yes, there are a few scenes that are not in the book.  but, let's count how many hollywood movies (taken from books) that can't hold a candle to it's original masterpiece.  i love the movie 'misery' but if you've read the book, the book outshines the movie by a landslide.  so yes, the good earth movie has scenes that are different than the original book, but still a very well made movie nonetheless, particularly for the 1930s.  i saw it on tcm and am looking forward to getting the dvd</review_text>
I got the DVD in a timely manner and the quality is great.  Great service</review_text>
i expected to learn how to build a gypsy wagon so i could join a caravan. this movie did not help at all. worthless! i thought i would find a complex and riveting tapestry of deep and well-developed characters and storylines. what a disappointment! i just knew i would come away with a better understanding of cutting edge business management techniques! TOTAL WASTE OF TIME! instead, i had to sit through a long film of incredible landscapes, beautiful people, and amazing music that altogether gave me a new and wonderful understanding of gypsies, eurasia, and history. and i watched it about thirty times. it's excellent - i mean, TERRIBLE! whatever. get it and watch it</review_text>
...far more complex and feministic than the "girls and flapper fashions", would have you believe. Needs to be seen in it's entirity and revived for a modern audience as the series is now an overlooked gem. The leads are excellent and follow in the best traditions of such British historical series such as "Upstairs Downstairs". If you have never seen it you will not be dissapointed and the lead actresses are extremely good, both RADA trained and both have worked extensively with the Royal Shakespeare Company</review_text>
I caught a glimpse of this movie years ago and I could not remember the name but I did know who stared in it...so when i went online to get the name of this I was pleased to see that the sender had it at a very good price...Thanks so much for having the movie and second getting it to me so quickly!!! Thanks again!!</review_text>
This movie is great. I remember watching it when I was really young. Im 21 now and still love it. Yeah some things are corny but that is part of what makes it great. Its not suppose to be realistic. Its fiction! I just realized too that the daughter is the girl from American Pie which makes it even funnier. Overall this movie is pretty good. If you dont care for the story, atleast get it to see Kim and the other chicks in the movie. If you've never seen the movie, just buy it. Its about the same as renting it a couple times and you will be able to keep it. For all you people who rated it a 1 you have issues!</review_text>
Jack London needs to be given his proper due. He is a tremendously talented writer and his understanding of life matches his tremendous knowledge of the snow-enshrouded world of the upper latitudes. Although The Call of the Wild is a short novel and on the surface a dog's story, it contains as much truth and reality of man's own struggles as that which can be sifted from the life's work of many other respected authors.Jack London's writing is beautiful, poignant, and powerful, yet also somber, morose, and infinitely real. London doesn't paint pretty picture, nor is the story elevating or uplifting. As an animal lover, I found parts of this story heartbreaking from Buck's removal from the civilized Southland in which he reigned supreme among his animal kin to the brutal cold and even more brutal machinations of hard, weathered men who literally beat him and whipped him full of lashes.Even sadder are the stories of the dogs that fill the sled's traces around him. Good-spirited Curly never had a chance, while Dave's story is only made bearable because of his brave, undying spirit. Even Spitz, the harsh taskmaster, has to be pitied, despite his harsh nature, for the reader knows this harsh nature was forced upon him by man and his thirst for riches. Buck's travails are long and hard, but it is his nobility of his spirit that makes of him a hero, despite the primitive animal instincts and urges that dominate him. Buck not only conquers the weather, the harshness of the men, the other dogs and the wolves he comes into contact with, he thrives.Hopes for redemption with John Thornton are dashed in the end, and that's when Buck finally gives in fully to "the call of the wild," becoming a creature of nature only. While this is a sad ending, the reader also feels joy and satisfaction at Buck's refusal to surrender and his ability to find his own kind of happiness in the harsh world in which he is placed</review_text>
One of th ebest comedies of the middle 90's.  This is basically your average &quot;rich kid learns to be a man&quot; story.  It features several of my favorite gags such as the fish stick kittens and The Mermaid.  If you have never seen it this one is wel worth the look</review_text>
This is a truly funny movie. The main character is so out of her element that it is totally belivable how ridiculous she is. This is one of those movies that you buy and come back to watch and invite your friends over for movie night. It's a good buy for your DVD collectio</review_text>
This outstanding and bold director has always paid special attention respect the dark side of the state of things; like in this case where a lawyer practically out of the game due the drink, decides to assume a delicate case of unorthodox medical praxis. Please notice how Lumet works with grayish tunes in the lawyer ' s office to accent his personal drama.Go for this emblematic film, where Paul Newman makes a delirious performance.</review_text>
What do an environmentalist, a firefighter and a chain-store executive have in common?  Quite a bit according to this joy of a film.  David O. Russell and Jeff Baena have written a highly intelligent comedy about a man who's trying to make sense of his life.  That man is Albert Markovski (Jason Schwartzman), a founder of a group called the Open Space Coalition who are trying to preserve forest and marsh area's where big business want to tear it down.  In his latest attempt he's joined forces with a chain-store known as Huckabees whose exec on the way up Brad Stand (Jude Law) seems to have a hidden agenda.  All this aside, Albert is troubled by a very tall African teenager that has crossed his path on three occasions and he is convinced this coincidence has substantial meaning in his life, so he seeks out the help of Vivian & Bernard Jaffe (Tomlin and Hoffman), two existential detectives, hiring them to follow his every move to decipher how his life makes sense.Vivian and Bernard are also helping Tommy (Mark Whalberg), a firefighter with strong views on humanity's role in destroying the environment.  When Brad finds out about Albert's association with these detectives he sees this as a way to get at Albert, to diminish his credibility with Open Spaces and thus gain control of the land and marsh Huckabees wishes to tear down.  So he himself enlists the help of Vivian and Bernard in order to jab at Albert's sanity, and this affects his girlfriend Dawn (Naomi Watts in another brilliant performance) who begins to take these detectives advise seriously and this jeopardizes her relationship with Brad and with Huckabees since she is `the voice' and `the look' of the store.When Tommy and Albert meet they decide to ditch Vivian and Bernard's methods in pursuit of Caterine Vauben (Isabelle Huppert), a French existential detective who is in competition with the Jaffes.  Their methods, while similar, are actually at two separate extremes and throughout the film Albert finds the balance he needs to make sense of it all.  This film is pure joy, hilarious from start to finish thanks in part to the brilliant acting on the entire cast, Tomlin and Law are standouts to me for their comedic timing is impeccable, and Whalberg is a complete surprise, holding his own and proving he can act.  I haven't seen a film this smart in quite some time, and another probably won't come along for too long either so lap this up like a puppy and enjoy every last gulp</review_text>
We have all wondered what would happen if the Alien and Predator met...head-to-head.  This movie answers that question very well.  No cheesiness.  We have watched this movie so many times we have lost count, and we still watch it sitting on the edge of our seats or our knees to our chest.  Great Saturday evening movie</review_text>
When I first saw this film, some five years ago, it truly knocked the breath out of me.  For the first time, director Allison Anders gives us a glimpse into Mexican-American gang life in East LA's Echo Park, from the female perspective, this time.  In the past, we have seen our share of male experiences (example being Zoot Suit, written by the playwright Luis Valdez).  For once, we see the gritty side of the gang life, as young Mexicanas (or Chicanas, depending on who you ask) struggle to stay alive, amidst rampant drug dealing, the violence of gang initiation and their relationships with men who are less than honorable to them.Mi Vida Loca is actually a trilogy of stories.  (Mousie & Sad Girl, Lowrider and La Blue Eyes)  The first is the story of a life long friendship between fellow gang members, Mousie (Seidy Lopez) and Sad Girl (Angel Aviles).  These young women are best friends, until the day that Sad Girl sleeps with Mousie's boyfriend, Ernesto (Jacob Vargas), and becomes pregnant with his child.  The world they knew before is ruptured, as is their lifelong connection as friends.  The second story takes a glimpse in LowRider culture.  This culture is perpetuated by, predominantly, young Chicanos who build their lives around re-finishing and airbrushing "low rider" cars (many, old school Chevies), complete with flashy airbrush images (example being voluptuous women and gang affiliations), trick tires and rims.  This story is actually a wonderful example of modern magical realism, when the car takes on a life of its own.  The third story is centered around La Blue Eyes, a beautiful BROWN-EYED woman who is writing to a convict, that she falls in love with through the exchange of letters.  The question is, when they finally meet, will the sum of those letters even measure up to their encounter, or has the young woman ultimately been deceived, the whole time?I reccomend this film, if not for the fact that it is compelling, but that this is an important culture in society we should all learn something more about.  A very important study in gang life, and how it evolves in a neighborhood that many only hear about on the evening news, but never get to know</review_text>
This dvd brings me back to when I was growing up in the 70's. I am happy to share this with my kids.  Who can forget the baby puppets in the hospital window trying to figure out if they are boys or girls or Rosie Greer singing "It's Alright to Cry."  One of the highlights is the duet by Roberta Flack and a young Michael Jackson singing "You Don't Have to Change at All."  I am so happy I am able to have this piece of my childhood to share.</review_text>
BIG fan of 80's... music and culture, and most of all The Movies.  she's having a baby is not just a teen movie like "sweet sixteen" or "breakfast club".  Its somewhat a true newly wed story with many funny moments wishing your marriage will be like that some day.  Soundtrac is great with kate bush "the woman's work".  My girlfriend cried and as i hand her the tisue when this song played.  i told her i'll feel the same if she were the wife.  boy i got lovin that nite... i would watch over and over again and the last credit when 80's famous star show their contribution suggesting the name for the baby, i thought it was clever.</review_text>
Received my moive as quickly as promised and have had no problems</review_text>
Well, this is one of the long-waited DVDs from Pink Floyd.The video and sound are great. The extras are not so special but for the PF fan this is a must.Still waiting for the "Delicate sound of thunder" DVD</review_text>
There are a great many gay themed films available today, but when Longtime Companion was released, it was but one of a small handful of films brave enough to paint gay characters with empathetic and intelligent brushstrokes - something that continues to beset filmmakers even today.Set during the late 70's and on into the 80's the film is a bare bones and ruthlessly truthful before-and-after portrait of the devastating effects of the AIDS virus on a small group of close friends/lovers and on the wider gay community. Very funny, extremely moving, occasionally upsetting, whether you are a gay viewer or not, this film is a courageous celebration of the strength and frailty of the human spirit.</review_text>
This movie will grow on you if you like the sweet romantic comedy.The cast is great.  Ed Walters (Tim Robbins) the Garage Mechanic falls in love at first sight of Catherine(Meg Ryan) when she appears at his Gas Station with a failing car with her  pretentious fiance James Mooreland (Stephen Fry).  Ed decides to go ask her out and appears at her home and knocks on the door.  The door opens and there is Albert Einstein(Walter Matthau) "You're Albert Einstien!"  "Zank you" and thus begins the plot to break up the engagment and bring Ed and Catherine together.The subcharacters are great!  Especially Einstein's pals played by Lou Jacobi, Gene Saks, and Joseph Maher.   "Three of the greatest minds and together they can't change a light bulb."All in all a great warm funny film!   Matthau again has to mentioned as his performance was brilliant.   He should have been nominated IMHO.   You can't go wrong with this one</review_text>
I begged to see this movie in 1985! I was only 14 but I knew I had to see it and buy the soundtrack. (remember cassettes?)  Never has Rob Lowe or Emilio Estevez looked better! Hot, Hot, Hot!!  No this isn't Oscar worthy or anything, but if you are a die-hard 80's Brat packer, this is the one!</review_text>
This movie will make you laugh and cry with a who's who of hollywood.  The music alone will move you to the kleenex box.  If you have lost someone to aids, this movie will touch you deeply.  I was told not to watch this movie alone.  Watch it with someone to hug.  How right they were.  Bronson Pinchot playing comic relief was a stereotype of the obnoxious friend a lot of us have.  Eric Roberts and Gregory Harrison have a chemistry eerily familiar to many gay couples I know.  Bravo!  Get the soundtrack too for those rainy days when you just want to reflect</review_text>
Like Callanetics, this DVD concentrates on the slow movements--you really MUST tuck, you really MUST curl up, or else this DVD is ineffective.  Unless you can shut off the phone and close the door on the kids, the amount of concentration this DVD takes for getting one's posture absolutely correct, tucking just right, is not feasible.The workout is indeed effective, and the shortness of it does tend to make one say, "that was too brief to do anything!"  Surprisingly, it's not.  However, if it is not challenging enough, if you add the bonus blast AFTER doing the Lotte Berk workout, you really do see results in a short amount of time.It is worth it for the price, but if you really want an all over workout for the cost of two Lotte Berk DVD's, check out Callanetics</review_text>
Whenever people hear of Sofia Coppola they think of 2 things: her much-maligned performance in Godfather III, and her famous dad Francis Ford Coppola, director of the Godfather films and Apocalpyse Now. The latter is particular fodder for nepotism remarks, although it's not as if her dad has made some stellar movies lately. "Jack" anyone? Well this film and her next film Lost in Translation should tip the scale on her favor as she's quite perfect for this kind of material.The 5 Lisbon Sisters live extremely sheltered lives thanks to their over-protective parents, in particular their mother. After one of them commits suicide, a boy starts liking one of them prompting to bring some friends to meet the rest. An infatuation develops and pretty soon they start getting into something that when it's over, they still don't know how to make sense of it.One of the things that can sometimes happen with a film like this is that in order to explain the story, certain characters moments have to be dropped or just never filmed. While I'm certainly not faulting the film, we're never really invested enough into each girl and who they are. In fact I couldn't actually name them until someone in the film actually did. It's not that big of a knock but it's one thing I noticed.Performance-wise it's pretty solid across the board, including Kirsten Dunst and another against-type role for James Woods. Usually very manic, he's quite sedate here which is quite perfect for the dad. There's also the almost unrecognizable Kathleen Turner as the very strict mother and even a quick scene with Danny DeVito and Giovanni Ribisi as the narrator.The DVD definately needs a special edition even though what else could there be to add besides a making-of, deleted scenes and a commentary? Than again Lost in Translation seemed kinda sparse. A commentary on this disc from anyone would've been great, even Francis would've done a great one a kind of critique/overview on his daughter's first film. I mean this guy did do Godfather, surely he could've given a professional's review of this?It's hard to say which film's better but this film is quite a good one regardless and proof that one really bad performance doesn't make everything else terrible</review_text>
Being a big fan of anime comedy (the intelligent, yet lame humor) I was eager to see El Hazard "The magnificent world". Because of the high price of the set, I had some hesitation (because of some poor reviews on Amazon).Well, I have to say that the bad reviews are wrong. This DVD series was totally awesome (although I admit it started a bit slow). I promise the more you keep watching, the better it gets. The plot is highly intelligent (involving dimensional and time travel) and the characters are very interesting (with distinctive special powers).Some say the humor in El Hazard is juvenile (but I would argue no more juvenile then southpark), and seriously what good comedy isn't juvenile?Some also say that the story is sometimes too redundant (because many episodes involve a doomsday device), to which I respond "Do we call the original starwars trilogy redundant because they involve the death star"? no, ofcourse not.yes this DVD set lacks some extras, but I think Pioneer did a great job. The DVD menu presentation is beautiful, and the box is very elegant too. Hopefully you can get this set for around 40 dollars on Ebay (beware of bootlegs). It's very hard to find a good authentic set. The sequel "alternative world" which I just ordered, individually should cost around 30 dollars if you shop smart.For my fellow anime comedy fans, I also reccomend "Niea under 7" and "His and Her Circumstances".animation=5plot=4music=4characters=5comedy=4Total= 4.4 Star</review_text>
I kept passing by this one in the video store. I figured that I would have heard of it if it was any good, right?Wrong. It's almost ten years old as of this writing, and I never heard of it, and it's really good. I mean, Really Good, in lots of ways. It's got characters I can really care about. There's Leaven, for one (Nicole de Boer, aka Dax of DS9). She starts out as the stereotypical wimpy, screamy girl. Then there's Quentin, who starts out the take-charge cop, the one you're sure will get our little band out of this lethal labyrinth. Just keep two things in mind. First, everyone changes over the course of the movie. Second, wanting to see some jerk get it is also a kind of caring, just not a nice one.The way the characters change is another thing to like. This movie borders on the minimalist, and its fair to say they didn't spend a terrible lot on sets and props. The characters carry everything, and do it surprisingly well. This isn't a Great Movie in the sense of literary snobishness, but still a heck of a flick. The actors, plus the script they're given to work with, really make the movie. Another bit to like is that spending thing - they didn't do much. The actors are all good, but not in the gazillion-dollar class. Sets and props are well done, but there's not much to them. Costuming couldn't have cost more than $20 for each of seven actors. All this proves that money doesn't make a movie: artists and artistic vision do. Maybe money helps, but Cube shows that you can still get a big-budget feel on a very modest budget.What's not to like? The ending. I'll let you get there on your own. Maybe that's why this movie didn't take off and make a boatload of money for everyone involved. But, they didn't spend a lot, so I hope they all went happily to the bank anyway. They deserve every nickel they made from it.//wiredweir</review_text>
Peter Dinklage may be the one of the most unlikely sex symbols ever to assay the role of A Stranger Comes To Town, but that's part of what makes this charming character study so offbeat and unforgettable.  As Finn, a dwarf who has just inherited an abandoned train station in Newfoundland, NJ, Dinklage carries the story on his small but exceptionally sturdy back, never begging the audience's sympathy but conveying worlds of anger, hurt, bewilderment and amusement in his dark eyes.  (His rumbly, seductive voice doesn't hurt either.)  As a local resident with a tragic past, Patricia Clarkson adds to her litany of complex women characters (and provides some of the film's biggest laughs when behind the wheel of her SUV), with stellar support from a garrulous Bobby Cannavale and a luminous Michelle Williams.  Settle into the film's gracious, generous rhythms and prepare to feel absolutely wonderful</review_text>
All the positive comments you read here about this film are true.This classic western stars John Wayne, Pedro Armendariz and Harry Carey Jr, along with a great supporting cast lead by Ward Bond -- the usual John Ford suspects. Ford strikes a balance between action and sentimentality, directing this simple story in a straightforward fashion with a great sense of style. This is Ford's first color film and cinematography by Winton C. Hoch looks really, really rich and with enough sand to make you wish you had some lemonade.Duke really shines in this film -- just watch those expressions.Restored to its original pristine 1948 35mm real Technicolor glory, "3 Godfathers" is a natural for the Christmas season. This heartwarming drama is a gritty, tender, timeless classic. A film the whole family can watch.This sleeper film in the WB/MGM catalog was way, W A Y overdue on DVD in the US. But here it is, most welcomed and highly recommended!(I've revised my original 2003 review to reflect this title's availability on DVD. Released with zero fanfare, I was first aware of its release when I saw a newspaper ad for it one week before Christmas 2005.</review_text>
Many people know about John Wayne and John Ford's cavalry trilogy, three of the greatest westerns ever made, but another pairing between the two is not as well known. The Three Godfathers is a lesser-known John Wayne classic when he was at the top of his game.  Starring Harry Carey Jr. and Pedro Armendariz as the other two godfathers this classic should not be missed.  These three outlaws ride into the desert after a bungled robbery only to find a dying woman with a newborn infant.  The Duke promises to care for the baby which she names Robert William Pedro Hightower after the three outlaws.  They must then make the trek across the desert with very little supplies to get the baby to the next town.  Excellent supporting cast with many recognizable faces from other Duke movies, with Ward Bond playing the sheriff who attempts to track down the outlaws.  Truly funny scenes as Wayne, Armendariz, and Carey attempt to care for the baby.  As usual awesome scenery as is expected in John Ford westerns.  This is one classic that has to be put on DVD.  A must have for John Wayne fans</review_text>
spalding gray is stream of consiousness on speed.  Over before you know it, you'll know a lot more when it's over</review_text>
A family oriented film that is humorous, fun, exciting and very entertaining! After seeing this movie for the first time, I had to own it! It is hard to find a good comedy that is enjoyable for all ages that is clean. This is a must own for the family</review_text>
Setting & Theme(s): Castlerock, smallville, summer friends' adventure, life's lessons, solidarity found in kinsmanship and standing tall against the unknown.This 1986 instant classic of Rob Reiner's directing earns its spot on the mantle of other inimitable works of film.  The musical score is dramatic, it sets the tempo from start to finish, and it never misses a beat; each song and rhythm takes you somewhere within the movie's unfolding, and you don't forget where until it all coalesces in a fabulous concluding.  The lives of four local pals are traced from the impatient, lazy summer days of grandeur, to the oft treacherous events inherent in a trip initiated on spontaneity.  One can in Stand By Me favorably assume to watch: pie eating contests, leeches, trains, train dodging, mail ball, fancy cars, fancy footwork (i.e. Verno's beloved comb's freefall), cantenes (thought they disappeared w/ Ben Franklin's outlets), junkyard dog chases, and much much more.  The ending is the real gravy.  The narration is superb also.By far one of the favorite films of my youth.  Believe John Cusack can be seen playing the role of Gordy's football star elder brother?  Stand By Me is the childhood that big city life just doesn't afford, at least not anymore.  Everyone nowadays instead chooses to remain trapped in their offices and maniacal distresses; rustic destination spots, like the ones presented in this movie, are still out there folks.  With a smidgen of ambition toward adventure, which will take your there, the healing power of the wilderness can become appreciated.  Although movies and books alone can never fully capture the true splendor of the outdoors.Five stars for Reiners finest photoplay.</review_text>
"Splash" is without a doubt among the top romantic comedies of the 80's that has truly stood the test of time and is still as enjoyable today as it was back then. I actually saw this movie when it was first released, which is rare for me since I was only a kid back in the 80's and hardly saw any movies in the theater in those days. I first bought it on VHS, eventually upgraded to the bare-bones DVD, and now have upgraded yet again to this 20th Anniversary Edition DVD. I just can't get enough of this movie.Both Tom Hanks and Daryl Hannah have excellent chemistry together and make a great screen couple. What's also believable in this movie is Daryl Hannah's mermaid costume, which looks so authentic that one almost believes she's really a mermaid. And let's not forget the movie's ending, which is absolutely perfect. There's one thing about this movie that I've never understood though: how did it ever manage to escape a PG-13 rating? In the scene where Daryl Hannah arrives at the Statue of Liberty buck naked we get to see quite a substantial (and may I add, very nice) shot of her buns. Definitely not material for a PG rated movie. In any event, I guess that will always be a mystery.All in all, "Splash" is a true classic film that never gets old no matter how many times one sees it. Everyone is great to watch, including hilarious supporting roles by the late John Candy (R.I.P.) and Eugene Levy. Now if only they would release a special edition DVD of "Big," another Tom Hanks classic</review_text>
Spanish-born actor Javier Bardem gives a staggering performance as Cuban poet Reinaldo Arenas, which is lucky since he is in almost every frame of this film. In fact, he is the only constant in a biopic that sometimes feels disjointed and a bit long-winded, piecing together as it does the various episodes of Arenas' life sometimes sacrificing narrative flow in the process. At the same time, this is a powerfully moving film that displays the intensity of the post-revolution persecution experienced by Cubans more effectively than either Carlos Eire's memoir, "Waiting for Snow in Havana", or Hollywood confections such as Sydney Pollack's "Havana" or Richard Lester's "Cuba".Director Julian Schnabel, an artist himself who had previously directed a film about celebrity graffiti artist Jean Michael Basquiat, jumps back and forth like an abstract painter clarifying time periods by employing captions. We first see Arenas' birth in 1943 rural Cuba followed by glimpses of his poverty-stricken childhood. The story then moves forward to 1958 just before Castro rose to power and when Arenas becomes a revolutionary living in eastern Cuba. By 1964, as both an open gay and an intellectual, Arenas' writings have made him anathema to Castro's regime. For the next fifteen years, he shuttles back and forth between jail and freedom, and Arenas' story sheds much light on the difficult of living as a member of not just one but two minorities. In highly visual terms, Schnabel creates a striking tableau of life in Cuba that shows how getting out of Cuba was not an easy decision for natives to make, and Arenas, like most Cubans, makes it only begrudgingly at first. Imagine having to give up everything and fleeing. There is a vividly filmed sequence of an all-night party in an abandoned convent that houses a homemade hot-air balloon (shades of Jules Verne) by which one of them decides to escape selfishly and fatally. There are also some powerful scenes that show the humiliating torture Arenas experienced in prison ending finally with his escape and ultimately his departure from Cuba in the Mariel Harbor exodus of 1980 as one of Castro's "undesirables". Arenas then went into exile in New York living with his former lover, Lazaro. Sadly, soon after his arrival in America, he became ill with AIDS. The American sequence is short, allowing maximum time for the Cuba ordeal that makes up most of the film.The charismatic Bardem is superb capturing the emotional combustion in his character's life. There are a few guest appearances that somewhat undermine the story's realism, a nearly unrecognizable turn by Sean Penn as a Cuban peasant and in dual roles, Johnny Depp as a sadistic, closeted lieutenant and a transvestite named Bon Bon, who entertains prisoners in El Moro prison. And the use of English versus Spanish seems to be more at the director's discretion than the actual circumstances within scenes. But these are forgivable indulgences since Schnabel has made a valuable film telling a tale of Cuban struggle and hardship of a type that we surprisingly don't see that often in film. At 133 minutes, it does seem a bit overlong, but Arenas packed a full life in his 47 years. Most importantly, Schnabel successfully paints a picture depicting the influences behind Arenas' writing: his difficult childhood, his conflicted feelings for his mother, coming to terms with his sexuality, the revolution in Cuba, and the pain of being an outcast in his own country. As one might expect from a painter, Schnabel uses images as effectively as words to advance the story. Most are simple and quite beautiful, such as an early scene of a rainstorm that turns into a raging torrent of water, a later shot of countless prison inmates dangling bars of soap outside of their jail cells, or flashes of snow falling in New York as Arenas and his friend lie on a speeding convertible. Nevertheless, because Arenas, as a writer, dealt in words, it is impossible to tell his story without embracing this component, and Bardem's economical voiceovers attest to that aspect in a dramatically effective manner. Strongly recommended in spite of the relatively minor flaws. The DVD also includes an interesting French television interview with the real Arenas from 1983</review_text>
Terrific movie. Matthew Broderick makes you believe that he is a high school social studies teacher with every step he takes and every rhythm of his speech ("Good luck, there, Tracy"). Reese Witherspoon can't be accused of underacting her part, but that's the fun of it. She is hilarious as the high school overachiever who doesn't care who she steps over (or on) to succeed.Filmed on the site of a real Omaha high school, many of the other members of the cast are taken from local talent. All the extras are actual students, and one of the leads (Chris Klein of "American Pie" who plays Tracy's archrival Paul) was just the kid who had nailed the part of Tony in the school's recent production of "West Side Story." This was his break-out movie. Even the custodian was played by the real custodian. All that gives the film a kind of realism that's rare.It accordingly uses ordinary sounds and spaces brilliantly, from the rotating sprinkler that begins the film, to the noises of kids talking outside class, to the grind of the garbage truck in the early morning hours when Mr. M snoozes outside Linda Novotny's house waiting for her (never) to return home. And on the subject of garbage, watch for the number of times this becomes a motif in the film, leading up to the culminating event (which I won't spoil). Even the denouement has a rehabilitated Mr. M, turned museum docent, throwing trash at the rear window of a limo. This is not only a very funny movie; it's also an intelligent and careful one. A lot of sex too, but none of it glamorous</review_text>
I have read a number of good reviews of this DVD on this site, especially the one written by Dennis Littrel. I will thus only add a small personal impression. I remember seeing this movie when it first came out and being troubled by the sight of the 'good guy' so disturbed and unsure of himself. This is not what we were expected to see from Western heroes. Also troubling was the possibility that the good guy somehow might not win. Also troubling was the involvement of the good guy with another woman in a way which could not be understood by a very young person. If he had a fiancee then what was he doing with this elderly Mexican woman?I am only speaking about my own naivete of course.I too as a young person was troubled by the ticking clock and the whole mood of anxiety.This is to say that while I sensed somehow the movie is 'good' I could not because of the perplexity I felt , enjoy it.The good guy does not run. He does stand up and alone face the bad guys. His fiancee though she has principles of non- violence when it comes down to it does the 'realistic and necessary thing' to save the one she loves.A realistic moral Hollywood drama , and of course made haunting by the 'Do not Forsake me Oh my darling' in the background</review_text>
HA!  Great movie, plot, performances and insights!  Gotta see this one, at least once, for experiencing a truly under-rated masterpiece.  My main reason for writing is the inane comments here and fear with reality that pervades our society.  Those who can't, don't or won't appreciate (at least) the marvelous, insightful messages here are possibly the very ones that assure nothing will ever change much .  Scary to shed light on bare essence of humanity's inhumanity and its inability to rise above the systematic base obsessions of power, control and coveting; whether rationalized with all the reasons that endorse continuing to man's lower instincts or from fear of looking beyond the security of ignorance.  It is amazing that the natural order of things may be better balanced and have a wisdom beyond anything man may attain, as he seeks to control nature and fellow man while failing miserably at controlling himself, even with all his knowledge and tech, to a point equal or beyond the inherent natural wisdom of (so called)lower species.Have some fun and enjoy this movie.  It is powerful and as perfect as it gets in addressing very intriguing human societal conundrums while offering quality performances from a great cast on numerous levels.  As a species, we have come so far and grown so little! This movie will make you (oh-oh) think and feel about subliminal and covert topics o human nature that are rarely put well in words or illustrated in today's world.</review_text>
I was contemplating on getting the Director's Cut of Gone in 60 Seconds until I looked at the time length.  Usualy a director's ct has more added to it, not taken away.  Believe it or not but the Original; released version of Gone in 60 is 118 minutes long where the Director's Cut release has a minute less footage.  For those that don't care it's not a big thing, but for movie goers, a minute off takes alot away...  Unless you're in it for the new extra features</review_text>
Great movie - there isn't anything I can say that hasn't been said 100 times.</review_text>
Arnold Schwarzenegger stars as detective John Kimble, a man who has been chasing a drug dealer named Cullen Crisp. When he finally tracks Crisp down, he learns that the only way he can put Crisp away is by having his ex-wife testify against him. Kimble finds out the name of the school Crisp's son attends. He is then assigned a new partner, Phoebe O'Hara, who is going to go undercover as a kindergarten teacher, and the two travel to Astoria, Oregon. Unfortunately for Kimble, O'Hara becomes ill, and the only person who can take her place is him.</review_text>
This movie came out when I was twelve and I have been in love with it ever since. It brought me, a rural farm kid, the magic of Leonard Cohen, Concrete Blond, Was (Not Was),The Beastie Boys, and all of the other wonderful musicians who grace this film. It also brought me Christian Slater in a role that I would later relate to in a big way as a teen. In short, for reasons all sentimental, I love this film. It may not have cohesiveness in the same way "Heathers" does but it has heart and that is something that teen movies seem to lack these days. So watch this flick and be grateful that you are no longer in high school. I know I do</review_text>
this movie is about Christian Slater (Heathers, True Romance) who plays Hard Harry the pirate radio man of his pirated show. this is a movie that deals with rebellion and teen angst..kids who want to live their lives free of all the things they are imprisoned to do and they tune into Slater's show everynight to listen to him speak it loud and proud. Samantha Mathis' (Broken Arrow, That Thing Called Love) film debut...this is number 1 out of the 3 movies her and Slater star together in. Cheryl Pollack (My Best Friend Is A Vampire) is hotter then ever. Slater's flawless performance and unforgettable moments make this one a masterpiece and a movie not to be forgotten, one of the best movies of 1990. Also starring Mimi Kennedy (Tv's Dharma and Greg), Scott Paulin, Andy Romano, Ellen Greene (Talk Radio) and Billy Morrisey (Severed Ties) co-star. note: Seth Green (Tv's Buffy The Vampire Slayer, Party Monster) has a short but recognizable role in here and so does Martin Landau's daughter Juliet Landau (Tv's Buffy The Vampire Slayer, Ed Wood).</review_text>
I have to confess that I went to tears watching thIS movie, and usually I don't get emotional easily. It's so touching, a PhD professor of middle age find out that she is sick. Ovarian cancer. It was a shock for her, the doctor is talking to her and she can barely react. All through the movie, she looks at the camera from time to time and tell us all what she is thinking and suffering. There is a "brilliant" young doctor (yes, one of those who always wants to be the first and the best no matter what, with a big ego, the big shot of the class) who was her student in one of her literature classes. It made me very angry, his attitude, because he was treating her in a very cold and selfish way, only thinking in the results of the research. I want to say that most of the doctors and scientists are not that way. But once in a while you can find one of these.... weird specimen. The nurse was nice and treated her in a better way. This kind of movie makes us think about the fact that we are all just humans, not matter the title or knowledge you can have. And we are here to help each other, no taking advantadge of each other. I strongly recommend this movie...just be sure to have a box of facial tissues near you.</review_text>
Wow, let me start off by telling you that I had this video personally when I was younger.  I would ask for it constantly, and can still remember having it and watching it everyday. It really helped me learn and the drawings are great! Somewhere in the process of 'growing up,' the video was lost and I'm still upset about it. I'm not ready to have kids myself, but I know that when I do, I definitely want to re-purchase this video! It's so great to have things like this to help your children start learning at a young age and I recommend it to everyone. :</review_text>
This is a rather scary look at what could be a possible future if things continue the way they are heading. Our food supplies becoming more depleted due to unfavorable growing conditions, climatic extremes, lack of water and nutrient-poor land as well as overpopulation continuing at an uncontrollable and alarming rate.  This type of recycling may become a necessity.  Hopefully, it would at least be voluntary as the movie depicts.  An eye-opener for sure</review_text>
I knew I should have waited!  I got impatient and bought the Masterworks DVD and after watching it once could not bear to see it again, the colors were that awful.  Of course I have to get this, but it's still galling.Now if they would only release El Amour Brujo</review_text>
I cannot believe how mean and down-dirty elections can get when they get too close.  Does it tell us something about the election process.  It needs to become kinder.   Democracy can be great if we work a little harder at it.  It can be done!It would have been nice to see more opinions of those on the right...the film did seem to have a bit of a biased edge to it, like it was pushing an agenda.   Good awareness piece though.</review_text>
a light hearted but still kind of sas movie. poweful</review_text>
This is by far my favorite version of this classic story and the most authentic and true to the spirit of the book.  The cast and direction are excellent and the setting is gorgeous.  This film will delight both children and adults with it's adventure, suspense, and innocent romance.  It's a little spooky in some scenes, but of the fun rather than truly scary kind.  This story has a very positive underlying message but doesn't preach, rather it expresses it in subtly beautiful ways as the characters unlock the mysteries of the Secret Garden and of themselves.   No matter what age you are, this is a thoroughly enjoyable, uplifting, perhaps even transformative film - don't miss it</review_text>
This 1955 release is one of those smaller Akira Kurosawa films that is overlooked in favor of his bigger films like &quot;Rashomon&quot; and &quot;Seven Samurai&quot; but it's still worth seeing. The great Toshiro Mifune plays an industrialist in post-World War II Japan who is slowly going mad with the notion that a nuclear war is coming and tries to convince his family (and his mistresses) to flee Japan with him. Mifune's obsessive portrayal is the stuff of great tragedy especially as he vainly pleads with his greedy family to leave and Takashi Shimura, the samurai leader in &quot;Seven Samurai&quot;, is also effective as a counselor who tries to help straighten the mess out.    The movie captures Japanese dread about the atom bomb, a subject Kurosawa would also treat in his masterpiece, &quot;Ikiru&quot;, very well and with the greedy family closing in on a raving patriarch, brings to mind &quot;King Lear&quot;, a tale the director would go back to many years later in &quot;Ran&quot;. This is a small film from one of the world's great directors but a very good one</review_text>
I really like these tapes.  The first one is pretty easy, but it is very relaxing, and i use it on days when I want to take it easy.  The second one is somewhat challenging, and the third one is even more so.  These tapes are a great guide from a beginning level to a more advanced one.  Tracy Rich is a very good instructor and makes you feel comfortable.  I also like how they (Ganga White and Tracy) show different versions of the poses with one being more advanced</review_text>
V for Vendetta was already out on DVD before I finally saw it. My college roommates told me that it was a great movie, so I finally went to blockbuster and rented a copy. The next day I returned the copy and went to Best Buy and bought my own copy of the movie, it was that good.V for Vendetta takes place in the not so distant future in England, where the residents have a curfew that they need to follow if they don't want to be arrested, dirty cops and policemen hand out their own cruel form of justice, and where our female hero Evey [payed by Natlie Portman] lives. After being cornered by several dirty cops Evey is rescued by the charismatic, fast talking, highly intelligent masked man simply named, V.V is a man of many words, and he explains in the movie that he is tired of the "big brother" style of living that everyone has to endure. Although the government controls the entire city V is upset that the population is not fighting back and taking back their own lives. He explains he is a one man crusade to Evey as he blows up the Old Bailey building to opera music as he laughs uncontrollably at one point.This is a movie anyone will like, except you probably wouldn't want the kids watching because of the violence and language. V is a guy you will totally like because he is charming to the ladies, cool to hang out with and watch movies [his favorite is the Count of Monte Cristo] and also is one tough son of a bitch who uses knives and martial arts to take out his enemies.Evey is also great to see in this movie. She is the daughter of political activists who were killed after speaking too loud against government corruption. She also literally got her head shaved in one of the scenes in the movie! Natalie Portman was great.The movie is awesome to watch. It is fast paced and exciting in a lot of scenes. From V taking over the tv station in England and talking on every single tv screen in the city as he fights the government, to Evey getting caught by the government and sitting in a cell for several months with a shocking ending. Great movie to see.The extras include:"Freedom Forever!" The making of V for Vendetta"Designing the Near Future" The artistic look at making V for Vendetta"Remember Remember" The look at the man named Guy FawkesEaster Egg! A Saturday Night Live digital shortPlus more!</review_text>
When you talk about the one motion picture that fully encapsulated all the angst and nihilism of the `70's generation you're talking about Paddy Chayefsky's brilliantly written black comedy, `The Hospital' which was released in `70.A contemporary, dysfunctional, urban hospital serves as the microcosm of America's failure to deal with not only the physical maladies of the twentieth century, but the mental and emotional illnesses as well. George C. Scott stars in the role of Dr. Herbert Bock, hospital administrator. Dr. Bock is already tittering on the edge of insanity. His wife has left him, he's estranged from his children and he's in the grips of a mid-life crisis causing him to call everything he once held dear into question. When a bizarre series of unexplained deaths begin to occur within the ranks of the hospital staff Dr. Bock is left to ponder the nature of sanity and whether he can continue to function in a world gone mad.With great performances by George C. Scott and the lovely Brit Diana Rigg, `The Hospital' is a thought-provoking film that will elicit discussion and debate. Watch it with a friend</review_text>
This is a masterpiece of cinema. After watching Robert Mulligan's more famous (to me) movies: To Kill a Mockingbird and Summer of '42, I found this jewel. I did not think that the same man could create a third work of art but here it is.Directors like Ford, Hawks, Lubitsch or Vidor and Capra are long gone, and so is cinema as art, but a few movies like this one seem to resurrect it, although it may only last a blink of an eye.I am off to check out "Come September" now.Who is this Robert Mulligan, anyway?Lovable little gem</review_text>
I own the first two volumes of the Lost Treasures series and am waiting for the third to arrive on my doormat. They are brilliant and I hope more volumes appear on a regular basis.Why though, must I suffer for purchasing these titles when they are released by not being able to get The Plays volume without buying them all over again?I suspect (and hope) that it will eventually be released seperately but in the meantime I can only say that if you don't already own any of these and are a fan of Broadway, theatre or the performing arts in general, buy this today! A fantastic showcase of theatrical talent</review_text>
I'm delighted to see there aren't a string of 1 star reviews from people who don't get A Mighty Wind. If it has a weakness, its that its played so dryly, its almost like non-fiction that just happens to be funny.  Thank god for Fred Willard who adds some vitally important crassness to these "serious" proceedings.I share a sentiment expressed by some of the characters.  I've never liked folk music.  But somehow this movie manages to poke fun at those less cynical times, without being too cynical itself.My one dissapointment is that we don't get to see Ed Begley Jr. sing How's It Hangin' Grandma? in Swedish.  Talk about a missed opportunity</review_text>
"El-Hazard: The Magnificent World" is an anime very much in the "Tenchi Muyo!" mold: a romantic comedy/adventure in which blank-slate protagonist Makoto is thrust into a sci-fi scenario and gets to play hero while being chased by multiple women. Though the characters in "El-Hazard" aren't developed as deeply as the "Tenchi" crew and the show occasionally suffers from awkward pacing, "El-Hazard" has a charm all it own. The mysterious antiheroine Ifurita is compelling, and the kids' hard-drinking teacher Fujisawa is consistently funny. Most impressively, "El-Hazard" tells a complete and satisfying story, tying up its seeming plot holes with an ingenious last-episode twist. Usually these types of shows start strong, only to end up limping through anticlimaxes and false endings. Even the romantic tension is unambiguously resolved!The dub is also pretty darn good, though it tends to get overly shouty, especially in the segments centering on Jinnai. Can't the guy ever just speak in a normal tone?"El-Hazard" is hardly the type of show that will change your life, but if you like "Tenchi" or other anime in this vein, this box set is probably a good bet. (The set actually contains two separate shows: the original "El-Hazard" OAV and its 4-episode sequel "El-Hazard 2." The sequel is an inconsequential side story that unfortunately doesn't really add any value.)</review_text>
Terrific movie. Matthew Broderick makes you believe that he is a high school social studies teacher with every step he takes and every rhythm of his speech ("Good luck, there, Tracy"). Reese Witherspoon can't be accused of underacting her part, but that's the fun of it. She is hilarious as the high school overachiever who doesn't care who she steps over (or on) to succeed.Filmed on the site of a real Omaha high school, many of the other members of the cast are taken from local talent. All the extras are actual students, and one of the leads (Chris Klein of "American Pie" who plays Tracy's archrival Paul) was just the kid who had nailed the part of Tony in the school's recent production of "West Side Story." This was his break-out movie. Even the custodian was played by the real custodian. All that gives the film a kind of realism that's rare.It accordingly uses ordinary sounds and spaces brilliantly, from the rotating sprinkler that begins the film, to the noises of kids talking outside class, to the grind of the garbage truck in the early morning hours when Mr. M snoozes outside Linda Novotny's house waiting for her (never) to return home. And on the subject of garbage, watch for the number of times this becomes a motif in the film, leading up to the culminating event (which I won't spoil). Even the denouement has a rehabilitated Mr. M, turned museum docent, throwing trash at the rear window of a limo. This is not only a very funny movie; it's also an intelligent and careful one. A lot of sex too, but none of it glamorous</review_text>
A documentary about the making of a film that never got past the shooting of a couple of scenes doesn't seem to promise much, but the story of what was to turn out to be a real-life "disaster movie" is riveting stuff.Terry Gilliam's obsession with "Don Quixote" is infectious and his enthusiasm for the task he faces coupled with glimpses of what it could have been really make you wish that things had turned out better. The insights into how a film is planned and the hugely complex logistics of a "live shoot" are fascinating, while the build-up to the almost inevitable collapse of the project, compounded by unbelievably bad weather and the illness of the central actor, coupled with the impacts of it all on those involved, is about as far removed from the typical self-congratulatory "making of the movie" add-on as you can get. Finally, the whole sorry affair - in particular Gilliam's persistent & unbridled optimism in the face of virtually insurmountable odds as he pursues the chance to realise a long-standing dream - becomes a quite bizarre, tragi-comic parallel to "Don Quixote" itself.You may only watch this once, and renting is therefore probably the best option, but you won't be disappointed.</review_text>
This movie has great casting. The actors play characters that they usually don't play. This may be the best acting I have ever seen Keeanu Reeves do</review_text>
It's hysterical and pitiful that some of the other 'reviewers' describe this program as though it is some subversive, dangerous, dogmatic propaganda.WARNING: This program teaches children to love themselves and respect others and we all know how threatening and subversive those values are! Quick run back to the cave and hide! The sky is falling!!If you believe little boys playing with dolls is sick and threatens their development, then you won't like this program. If you think it's subservise propaganda to tell little girls it's okay for them to be smart and strong, then you won't like this program either. On the other hand, if you are a nurturing parent and some of your goals include teaching your child to have a sense of self, to respect humanity's differences (gasp!) and to empower (double gasp!)  them to reach for the stars, then you'll enjoy sharing this program with your kids</review_text>
I must say that I am generally not interested in watching a romance movie, but this movie is a definite exception. It "Possessed" a great soundtrack that fit the scenes perfectly, captivating scenery that is incredible, and a cast that perfectly fits the mold of the story. From beginning to end it was an absolute success of a complete movie. It piques the curiosity, it warms the heart, and it even manages to make you feel slightly better about life after watching it. buy it, you won't regret it</review_text>
Justice in the criminal justice system? What is that but empty talk in the real world? IN HELL shows how an innocent man who honorably slays his wife's murderer finds himself brutally thrown into prison where he learns how to survive in the harsh system. No macho Van Damme kickboxing here, but a portrayal of his progressive instincts in an environment of hate. A true portrayal of life in today's world that is infected by faulty institutions who jail innocent men, and corrupt power brokers who run them.</review_text>
I was looking for Solyent Green since I was young after seeing it in theater as a science-fiction drama.Now that I found it, I do not know if I am very happy to see it again considering that it might be closer to reality than to Sci-F</review_text>
This movie is a classic, especially for those who love Tim Roth</review_text>
As popular as Prince was in the 80's, it's hard to believe it has taken 18 years for Under The Cherry Moon to find it's way to DVD.  Critics largely considered the film a stinker, especially considering it was only two years behind Purple Rain, but Under The Cherry Moon was a very good film, although very different than Purple Rain.  Shot in black and white, Under The Cherry Moon starred Prince as Christopher Tracey, him and his buddy Tricky (Jerome Benton from The Time) are living it up in Europe.  They wine and dine the rich and upper class and take their money, basically they are gigolos.  They swear it never gets personal until Mary Sharon comes into the picture.  Christopher falls for Mary in a big way, but her father Issac Sharon isn't having it.  Drama ensues. The soundtrack is awesome and includes the songs "U Need Another Lover Like You Need a Whole In Your Head," "Mountain," and "Kiss" and the DVD includes the videos for the songs shot for the film.  A must have for Prince fans.</review_text>
This story is so fascinating that I couldn't stop feeling that the drive to create and to be true to one's identity and sexual preference had to be overwhelming to cause the writer, Arenas, to survive and escape the homophobic surroundings in Cuba under Castro.  Johnny Depp is unbelievably wonderful as both the sadistic lieutenant and the transporting Drag Queen</review_text>
"Cry Baby" is the coolest movie since Grease that deals with this time period. The songs are good and the actors in the film are really excellent. I'm a fan of Johnny Depp, and he came through in this movie and him in a lead role set in the 50s worked! This movie is not only a movie that takes place in the 50s, but it feels like a movie that was made in that decade as well. Everything that was big in the movies during that time are seen and used in here. I really enjoyed how this film also dealt with issues people had then and the way people acted and thought.I also love the music, classic Doo Wop. So if you love movies like Grease, then you need to see this movie. It's not entirely a musical like Grease was, but it still has a few songs in it. But to hear music from this time makes this movie even more real.</review_text>
John Waters who likes to be called the "Pope of Trash" has done a lot of films that are outrageous in style such as "Cecil B. Demented," "Pecker," & "Hairspray." "Cry Baby" is a 1990 musical that is utterly silly and frothy, but works nevertheless. Johnny Depp, now a big box office draw and critical success with Oscar nominations for "Finding Neverland" & "Pirates of the Caribbean: The Curse of the Black Pearl," can be proud of the rockabilly Elvis-type singer he plays named Wade "Cry Baby" Walker. Depp performs his "Jailhouse Rock" type number with great energy and rebellion. Having him run through sewage pipes in his underwear is enough to set many a teenage girl's hearts aflutter. The female lead is Allison played by Amy Locane who worked in other films like "Airhead," "The Mummy" & "Bongwater." She does a good Olivia Newton John-like "Grease" character of the square girl who has a crush on Depp's bad boy. Stephen E. Miller who was recently seen in "RV" with Robin Williams and previously in "The Accused" with Jody Foster does a good job as the square boyfriend Baldwin who loses his girl to Cry Baby.The supporting cast also frolics and froths with Ricki Lake as sister Pepper who is intensely pregnant. Iggy Pop plays the daddy Belevedere and takes a scrub bath in a tub sudsing up favorite parts of his anatomy with gusto. Traci Lords who was an adult film star plays Wanda to the hilt. The deleted scene where she sits in an oversized champagne glass while other hotties romp nearby is way over the top. Kim McGuire plays the character Hatchet Face with a permanent mug. Susan Tyrell who actually was nominated for an Oscar in 1972 for "Fat City" plays the biker matriarch Ramona. She recently appeared with Bob Dylan in the film "Masked & Anonymous." Polly Bergen does a nice job as Mrs. Vernon Williams, Allison's grandmother, who emphasizes propriety but encourages her granddaughter to follow her heart. Patricia Hearst (the same I think) who also worked with Waters on "Pecker" & "Cecil B. Demented" does a nice job as the naive mother who uses the "F" word in the courtroom. "Cry Baby" is meant for pure entertainment; and that it does! Enjoy</review_text>
This movie would probably not be on anyone's top ten list but it is a must see for the 1980's B flick movie loving enthusiast! The Stuff is an interesting look at consumerism in the 80's and the hairstyles and outfits are just plain hilarious!I remember renting this movie (on Beta) in my childhood over and over again, much to my parents chagrin. The Stuff will bring you back and make you glad the past is where it is.</review_text>
This movie shows the real life hell that was Andersonville.  A prison camp that turned into a death camp. Not enough food,water or shelter for all the prisoners sent there. The south was losing the war so they had no provisions or men to assist in the detainment of these captured soldiers. Basically letting them rot slowly inside the walls that confinded them. A well acted movie which shows the hell that can come from wa</review_text>
This is by far my favorite musical, not the concert but the actual musical from the 70's. When i saw Alexis Smith the first time i fell deeply in love. Of course i was only 24 at the time.Even though this is just the concert version minus the terrible cutting and editing it's better than nothing at all. This cast was also wonderful with it's vintage and well polished cast, I gave it the four stars only because it's not as complete as the CD. After all most of the people that would buy the concert version would also have been fans of the original show itself so why not include all the production numbers.Maybe if enough people make compaints do you think they may re-do this DVD?To all those wonderful women who were in the original production,,,Hats off, to those wonderful girls.. The likes of this will never come again</review_text>
As a fan of New Order and Joy Division this was on the top of my list. Fast-paced, witty, and shot in documentary like style, 24 HOUR PARTY PEOPLE is a great movie along side the more traditional narratives like GO, ALL GONE PETE TONG, GROOVE, etc. Winderbottom does a terrific job in satisfying a range of audience and Steve Coogan is terrific. The soundtrack is solid and the produciton value is high. Not to be missed by fans (not ultimate fans) and general movie goers alike</review_text>
Davy Crockett is one of Walt Disney's most endeared and remembered live action characters from the television and silver screen as personified by Fess Parker. This colorful and entertaining film was re-edited from three segments of Disney's TV show for theatrical distribution. Parker, with his coonskin cap and homespun drawl and witticism created a nationwide phenomenon in 1955. Who can forget "The Ballad Of Davy Crockett" composed by George Bruns and Tom Blackburn. Buddy Ebsen played his sidekick George Russel, whose adventures take them from Tennessee to Washington, D.C. to the Alamo. The film's third act focusing on the defense of the Alamo, though well remembered, is somewhat labored until we see the final image of Davy Crockett passing into legend and glory. This straightforward and beautifully photographed film expounds the virtues of honesty, integrity and bravery. Highly recommended family viewing personally produced by Walt Disney</review_text>
This was not the scariest film I've ever seen, and I really can't take horror very well. But it was good, because there was beauty in it, and that is quite rare in horror films. I think the idea of the film was very good, and surprise in the end too, even though the plot was not so brilliant.I actually liked it. I'll probablu rent it again and watch it this time with sound.</review_text>
This movie is a wonderful follow up to the first...Anne has the same charming spirit and the cast is just as wonderful as they were the first time. I highly recommend this movie to anyone</review_text>
This is not only a thrilling story on the life of a group of African Americans but it also captures the reality of the streets of L.A. As you watch the movie you see the life surrounding this group of black friends. You truly become attached to the characters and begin to feel that they cant do anything to escape the struggle they have been in since they were born. Ice Cube the main character plays a gangbanger who is living the life of a criminal, from fights on the corner, to drive by shootings.This movie truly captures the struggle millions of African Americans go through. As we watch the kids grow up in the ghetto, to when they are old enough to get out, they still seem to be the same. Their customs dont change, simply because of their surrounding, guns, liquor, poverty, and crime. They have no other option than do join in.When dough boy's(Ice Cube) brother Ricky is offered a scholarship to play college football it looks like a way to get out of the ghetto. The whole family feels as this a way for them to escape it also, so everyone is supporting him. Until a tragedy is brought upon the family. This story truly proves nothings good until finally out of the hood for these boys.</review_text>
It is easy to see why Jane Wyman, with her limpid eyes and winsome smile, won an Academy Award as a deaf-mute in this adaptation of the play "Johnny Belinda." The Academy is known for succumbing to characters with mental or physical afflictions ("The Snake Pit," "Rain Man," etc.) When she kneels beside the body of her father (Charles Bickford) and signs The Lord's Prayer, her Oscar was a secret even Price-Waterhouse couldn't keep. The temptation to cynicism, however, is unwise.The picture turns out to be quite affecting. Wyman and Lew Ayres, as the doctor who teaches her to communicate, do some of their best work in "Johnny Belinda." After the town bully (Stephen McNally) rapes Belinda, he and his wife (Jan Sterling) attempt to adopt the son (named Johnny) Belinda has by him. Director Jean Negulesco ignores the soap operatics and creates a rugged sense of place, an insular Nova Scotia seaside farming village. The black-and-white cinematography is invaluable here.The supporting cast is fine, and there are memorable touches everywhere. In addition to Wyman's prayer for her father, there's Bickford's pride in his blossoming daughter, and her responses to life's vicissitudes. Agnes Moorehead is the tart-tongued but quietly sympathetic aunt. And Sterling, in her first major role, does not disappoint. What does disappoint is the perfunctory DVD release Warner Bros. has given the studio's own movie, a big hit with audiences in 1948.</review_text>
The title of this movie holds no secrets. The Virgin suicides may have its up and downs throughout the movie but the whole time the viewer is left with an impending sense of doom. Almost every aspect of this movie is fantastic, between the acting and a great story line, but this movie is truly dramatic in that it will no doubt influence your emotions</review_text>
School House Rock is mad awesome cool! I love all the song, like i'm just a bill. i memorized the preamble cause of the preamble song thing. peac</review_text>
This movie is a must have for all family libraries. It appeals to adults and youth alike. A true feel-good movie about how we are all the same inside, no matter what our outward differences are. Really teaches the lesson, "Don't judge a book by its cover".</review_text>
On a June evening in 1968 I was awakened by my dad, a Marine Raider and one of the Chosen Few, at ten o'clock PM, that's 2200, to watch The DI... five hours before I was to report to the Armed Forces Induction Center, Oakland, Calif. I won't ever forget that movie session with my dad, and as one other person commented, ya never forget your DIs, mine were SSgt Gonzales, SSgt Rogers, and Cpl Sexton.Great movie, Jack Webb is still the DI, sorry R. Lee, gotta go with tradition here!Sure would like to see this on DVD, but for now I'll settle for the VHS... I bought two copies, one for me and one for a friend!Semper Fidelis to all the Brothers and Sisters!Pau</review_text>
This film having been produced in 1957, was seen by me in 1958 while serving as a D.I. AT P.I. It showed for two consecutive nights and I think every D.I. on P.I. somehow arranged to see it. We wanted to see if they got it right I guess. I viewed it again recently and it was most nostalgic. A most memorable time and the film was reasonably accurate for the times. I highly recommend it</review_text>
Thank God that there is a full recording of this evening available on CD, because this video only shows about 45 minutes of the actual concert. Granted, they are 45 minutes that are not to be missed with this brilliant cast and this amazing show from Stephen Sondheim. This is truly a Broadway event. The documentary, which makes up most of the running time of the video is a lot of fun, but cutting the actual concert down to bare bones is a sin. We who adored Sondheim should appeal to the producers and beg that this magical night be released on video in its entirety</review_text>
This movie is a fast ride and a lot of fun.  It is the furthest thing from a slow-moving documentary.  The technical style and flair would appeal to practically any viewer.  The Source is glossy and gorgeous.  The director's clout is also impressive. Johnny Depp gives a performance monologue as Jack Kerouac and John Torturro gives an emotional reading from "Howl."  Dennis Hopper imitates Burroughs as well later in the film.  Their efforts are impressive.Just to let the skeptics out there know, there is no room for doubt in this documentary.  The beats are heroes and saviors--and not much else is considered.  That some of them were minor talents is brushed over.  Massive beat generation fans would give it five stars.  A totally sanitized version of William S. Burroughs is presented, and it is implied that Kerouac was only a heterosexual, which is something that most commentators would regard as dubious.  The film's attitude towards drug use is rather slanted.  One memorable quotation was, "you can overdose on anything including sushi."  Well no, not really.It does not matter though, the movie is an amazing sprint and it succeeds in making itself impossible to turn off.</review_text>
This is a good solid documentary that sticks to its subject.  The clips of Ginsberg &amp; Burroughs are especially effective.  The celeb performances in the second half are all of the work itself &amp; not just empty theatrics. The Beats are still a source to return to for inspiration &amp; insight.  The world they emerged from is not all that different from the one in which we find ourselves now.  Of course there's more, but this video gives you enough to get you started &amp; gives you enough of the good stuff to go back to late</review_text>
As someone well versed in various kinds of literature, someone who has read (and enjoyed) almost all of Tom Clancy's novels, and as a professional videographer, I have to say, this is a great flick.For those who are upset about the adaptation, what do you expect?  When taking an 800 plus page book and condensing it down to a two hour movie, some things are going to change.  The second and third Clancy movies- especially Clear and Present Danger - were also adapted to give Harrison Ford the action spotlight.  But now that Ford is ageing, Paramount (who after all, is a business needing to turn a profit) needed to re-invent the franchise.  The move to make it not just a new actor, but to show it as the start of Jack Ryan's career was cleverly done.  Most of all, it held true to the idea of the book, that when we base our actions off of our fears and suspicions, our peace can be torn apart by a few depraved individuals.This movie falls into the category of action/thriller.  As such, not everything is true to life, but instead is designed for entertainment and suspense.  And it delivers.  For something in the action category it has a remarkably intelligent script.  It's a little slow in the beginning for those who are looking for nothing more than explosions and shootouts, but it's worth it.  It also has better than average cinematography compared to most action flicks.  The effects are well done and not at all cheesy, as many action flicks have taught us to expect.The acting is well-done, with a typically good performance by Affleck and a stellar performance by Freeman.  The soundtrack is also fantastic, especially the rendition of the national anthem at the football game.Bottom line, if you're a reader who expects movies scripts to be written like books, don't see this movie.  If you accept that literature and movies are entirely different formats of entertainment then you'll probably enjoy this movie, and it is certainly worth ownin</review_text>
Cannes Man was funny.  I don't know why this movie was in the drama section of Blockbuster, but it made me laugh out loud. Just goes to show that nobody knows anything in lalaland, and movies are made by a bunch of nincompoops who don't know their **s from a hole in the ground</review_text>
These early thirties films labelled as "Pre Code", are always most interesting to watch from a historical perspective as only a few years after this film was made such a topic would never have been able to be presented as it is here. The passage of time of course makes the subject matter of MGM's "The Divorcee", seem tame however back in 1930 this story was considered very adult and almost ahead of its time in its fairly honest examination of the "expected", roles for husbands and wives in the marital situation. Norma Shearer who today is sadly not well known really proved her acting chops in this vehicle and went home with the Best Actress Oscar that year for her troubles. Often labelled quite restrictively as the dignified first lady of MGM resulting from much of her later work in this decade in husband Irving Thalberg's prestige productions; here proves what she was capable of doing on screen when given meaty roles to tackle. Her other effort from this time "A Free Soul", makes a nice companion piece to "The Divorcee", in illustrating the range of roles Shearer was capable of handling when examining her overall career.</review_text>
I just watched the second half of Guarding Tess on TBS. It's now 11:30PM, and I am writing this review when I should be in bed 1 and half hour ago. Nicolas Cade and The old woman in the movie both turned in great performances. The story was lightly funny at first, but didn't really go anywhere. The relationship between The FBI agent and ex-first lady was strange, and though the movie tried to give their intimacy an explanation, it was still weird. The climax came at the end, and was very entertaining, for it broke a long line of fairly boring plot. There is much meaning in the movie; it tried successfully to bring the emotions of a smart first lady widow who dearly wants attention to life. I was touched by the movie. Thank you. I should go to bed now</review_text>
This is a western because it takes place in the old west but that is not what this film is all about. It is about laughs. It is a comedy that takes place in the old west.Mel Gibson plays a professional gambler, Brett Maverick,  who wants to pit his skills against the best poker players around in a big tournament. The entry fee is 25,000 and the prize is half a million dollars. He has most of his stake and lots of people owe him money but everything seems to go wrong as he tries to collect the money due him, always with hilarious results. As he makes his way towards to tournament, he encounters another gambler, played by Jodie Foster, who also wants to enter the tournament. She too is a bit short of a stake and will stop at nothing to get into the tournament and this includes playing the vamp and the pickpocket. The final main character is the US Marshall played by James Garner. He does not seem interested in playing poker but he is on his way to the tournament as well. He has been hired to provide security.As they make their way to the big event, all three of the protagonists take their shots at the others. The Indians get involved and come across as the funniest, most honest and most intelligent people around. They finally get Maverick his stake (with lots of laughs) and the stage is set for the big tournament.The tournament itself is full of laughs, surprises, twists and turns. It also has a lot of cameo appearances from old time western stars. All of this is fun but the interplay between Gibson, Foster and Garner is the real fun.Get this one for the laughs and then prepare to hold your sides while you bust a gut laughing.</review_text>
My two and three year olds have almost all the Baby Einstein DVD and this is one of their favorite.  They beg to watch it and laugh out loud at the puppets.  As usual, I am happy with the classical music, art work, and learning elements</review_text>
This is a visually elegant and thematically frightening movie. It conjures up some authentically unearthly and mysterious atmosphere. Once agan the outstanding musical accompaniment of TOMANDANDY helps to elevate the film to a level of dread not seen since DON'T LOOK NOW back in '73. This was a strangely malinged and neglected film at the time of its release but i think history will mark it out, alongside WHITE NOISE, as the best of the thrillers that came out in the wake of The success of THE SIXTH SENSE.</review_text>
Contrary to what the box and description here says this disc has NO subtitles or closed captions or whatever. The R2 neither.So again, don't feel sorry for the film companies about their complaining of copying of films and stuff.Non anamorphic or simply 4:3 format, no subs, not available at all (yes I mean you, Disney)... In short, no quality or consistency. Go and take a hike.Stop lobbying for legislation and start making real DVD's</review_text>
Robin Williams is an AFRS disc jockey in Saigon during the Vietnam War. He is fast-talking, zany, unconventional - and a problem for his superiors. Williams is so much at center stage behind the microphone, doing his imrovisational schtick as only he can, that whatever else the movie is about becomes inconsequential and quickly forgotten. The movie is an exhausting experience to watch, as it must have been for Williams to perform. It's an amazing one-man show, but the picture as a whole left me somewhat empty</review_text>
as an asian american, i just want to say how well this movie is made.  i'm not offended that this movie casted caucasian actors (come on people, this was in the 1930s!!)  and yes, there are a few scenes that are not in the book.  but, let's count how many hollywood movies (taken from books) that can't hold a candle to it's original masterpiece.  i love the movie 'misery' but if you've read the book, the book outshines the movie by a landslide.  so yes, the good earth movie has scenes that are different than the original book, but still a very well made movie nonetheless, particularly for the 1930s.  i saw it on tcm and am looking forward to getting the dvd</review_text>
This is a good old fashioned film similar to the English film 'Goodbye Mr Chips'.  It has lots of old fashioned values and contains humour, pathos, passion and sentimentality which will tug at the heart strings!!!  I defy anyone not to have a lump in the throat or a tear in the eye when the long awaited Marr baby dies shortly after birth, or when James 'Red' Sandstrom Jr. comes to vist Marty at Christmas with his mother.  I just love the whole tone of the film - the director has got the atmosphere just right.  A real cracker of a film lacking in any real violence or nastiness I am pleased to say.  It is a film I can watch again and again.  Even my husband, normally quite reticent with such films, was impressed.  That to me was praise indeed</review_text>
Let me start out this review by saying that this anime should be a martar for other anime to follow because it is an amazing anime. The plot is basically a cybernetic government agent, Major Motoko Kusanagi, who goes and tries to catch a computer virus called "The Puppet Master". From start to finish this movie is amazing with great animation and storyline. I think almost everybody should be able to see it as long as they are mature enough. There is a lot of violence and some language. Also, some slight nudity, but very non-sexual. Overall, I think this is one of the best anime ever</review_text>
I can remeber being a little over eight years old the first time I saw this movie. While I didn't understand it then, I found that the music and the scenery was breath taking. Seeing this movie years later along with other great's such as Young Bess and Mary Queen of Scots, Helena Carter's and Cary Elwes performance's are right up there with such great names as Stuart Granger and Jean Simmons. I would recommend this movie if you like period piece movies, but like I said, don't take into account that the history is a little jumbled, just enjoy it for the tragic history that is burried underneath the plot.</review_text>
Fascinating, educating, beautifully done. Congratulations to the film maker and the sound maker. A story in music louder than words</review_text>
This 1993 movie, based on Michael Shaara's book The Killer Angels, is over four hours long, but it uses that time well to document this critical Civil War battle.  I used the word `document' on purpose because this movie is accurate to the point of being a documentary.  It was even filmed at the Gettysburg National Military Park.  When you see the fight for Little Round Top or Pickett's Charge, or another fight, you are seeing the events much as they happened where they happened.Thousands of civil war re-enactors play the everyday soldiers you see in the background and in the grand charges of this battle.  These amateur enthusiasts put their heart into this movie and it shows.As a high school history teacher, I was timing certain parts of the movie to show in class.  When I timed Pickett's Charge, I realized it is shown in real time.  Those Confederate soldiers charged into Union gunfire for 28 minutes and you see every moment in this movie.Read The Killer Angels and then see this outstanding movie.Kyle Prat</review_text>
This film motivated me to do my own research and I read as much material on the case as I could possibly find--especially arguments from those who maintained that the three teenagers are guilty.  To be honest, I had a natural skepticism about the West Memphis Three's claims of innocence.  A coworker of mine was brutally murdered some years ago and two of her "friends" who were also coworkers were arrested for the murder.  I refused to believe it at first.  But it became clear over time that the evidence was overwhelming and conclusive.  Still there were those who refused to believe the facts and zealously argued their friends' innocence.  When all is done and said - it does come down to facts and whether or not one chooses to face reality and believe facts.First, please allow me to correct a few misconceptions from some of the other reviewers.The Michael Moore mentioned in the credits refers to one of the little eight-year-old child murder victims, not the filmmaker.A couple of reviewers mentioned a necklace worn by Damien Echols which supposedly had blood on it from some of the victims. Actually, nothing more determinable than common blood types was found. One almost microscopic spot on the pendant was consistent with the blood type of Damien Echols (one of the accused), the other micro-spot was consistent with the blood type shared by both Jason Baldwin (one of the accused) and Steven Branch (one of the eight-year-old victims) -- as well as 11% of the rest of the Caucasian population of the United States. All experts agree that tiny micro-spots of blood can be transferred by a number of ways--especially a teenage boy wearing the necklace against their bare skin.  Police photos verify that Jason Baldwin had also worn Damien's necklace.  Police photos taken two days after the crime--show Damien without his shirt and reveal absolutely no cuts, abrasions or scratches whatsoever.The closest thing to credible evidence the prosecution could manage to produce were four very tiny fibers found in the houses of Damien's family and Jason's family which were deemed by the prosecution to be microscopically similar to fibers from two of the victims.  But even the prosecution's expert witness, Lisa Sakevicius a criminologist from the State's Crime Laboratory acknowledged that this was inconclusive and could have just as well come from mass-produced products obtained off the shelves of the local Wal-Mart. Furthermore, Charles Linch of the Southwestern Institute of Forensic Science in Dallas refuted the claims of microscopic similarities in his testimony. No fibers whatsoever were found in the home of Jessie's family.During the appeal process forensic scientists examining the crime scene photos and autopsy photos identified human bite marks on two of the victims.  This was confirmed by a forensic odontologist.  Teeth impressions were taken from the three young men in prison.  None of these teeth impressions from Damien, Jason and Jessie matched these bite marks found on the victims.The highly coerced "confession" from Jessie Misskelly Jr. (a 17-year-old borderline retarded boy with an IQ of 71) was so filled with obvious errors that it is an obscenity that it was treated as the basis for making these arrest. I should mention that this so-called "confession" came after submitting this boy to a 12 hour grueling without lawyers, parents or counsel of any kind and included a polygraph test which he had passed but was told by the police that he had failed. Judge Burnett would not allow the jury to hear about these interrogation techniques.Jessie Misskelly Jr. refused to testify in court against Jason Baldwin and Damien Echols stating that he simply "was not going to get up there and tell a bunch of lies". This was in spite of an offer to remove his life sentence.Read Dan Stidham's (Jessie's lawyer) case synopsis by copying and pasting the web address below:http://www.wm3.org/live/caseintroduction/synopsis_dan.phpThe scenario painted by the police and the prosecutors against the three teenagers is simply a scientific impossibility.  How on earth could there have been the massive blood loss caused by ceremonial satanic cult killings of three persons in the middle of the night without leaving one single micro-speck of blood or any other body fluids at the scene?  Did they sneak in the FBI Forensic Team to clean up after them when nobody was looking?  Luminal testing could reveal blood presence only where the police had laid or transported the bodies. It should also be mentioned that none of the scarce shoe prints at the scene matched Jason, Jessie or Damien either.  .For a scientific view--see this crime scene analysis and profile by one of America's leading forensic scientist which also gives some insight on who might have actually committed the crime. I must warn you - it is a bit gruesome to say the least:Copy and paste this web address:http://www.arwar.org/wm6caseinformation/Turveyequivocaldeathanalysisandprofile.htmlSo let us briefly summarize.  Much of the so-called evidence was based on the notion that Damien admitted an interest in the Wicca religion and the occult which many local people perceived as Satanism.  This is not evidence of committing murder. You can go to any suburban shopping mall bookstore or small town library anywhere in Middle America and find plenty of books on such subjects. Furthermore, neither Jason nor Jessie had ever expressed any particular interest in Wicca or the occult.Both Damien and Jason wore mostly black clothes and loved heavy metal music.  So what?  The police actually confiscated 15 black T-shirts from Jason's home as evidence to prove God knows what.Damien was undoubtedly a troubled teenager from a troubled family. He was a bit of a wise-ass teenager.  He wrote some morbid poetry.  So what?A couple of young girls claimed months after the fact that they had heard Damien say that he committed the murders.  Any reasonable-objective person listening to those testimonies would have found them implausible to put it politely.A young burglar/drug addict who was in the juvenile detention facility claimed that the shy and reserved 16-year-old  Jason confessed to him the second time they ever met ghastly stories about drinking  blood from the genitals of a murdered child while worshipping the devil. The counselor from that facility warned the prosecution that this young man was not credible and gave them detailed reasons.  And there is no evidence that Jason and this young man ever met.  Even if they did--the story is ridiculous. Still, Judge Burnett would not allow the jury to hear counter-testimony or information that could have challenged the credibility of this witness.The so-called "confession" of Jessie and the scenario put forward by the police and prosecution would have involved massive amounts of blood left at the scene.  There was not even one tiny micro-spec. That is a physical impossibility.The simple fact is ALL FORENSICS were either exonerating or completely inconclusive."There was a lack of physical evidence to tie anyone or anything to the crime scene."--John Fogleman, prosecutor of the West Memphis Three--Sadly, the West Memphis Police would not do anything more than a cursory and disinterested investigation of the most obvious suspect. (See the forensic profile mentioned above) Probably because that obvious suspect who had a violent history including family violence and a lifetime as a penny-anny career criminal was also an undercover narcotic informant who was in a very tight relationship with the West Memphis Police.Anyway, for God sakes--see this film along with Paradise Lost 2 and read Devils Knot.   .This is not a political film.  This case has nothing to do with being liberal or conservative, Democrat or Republican, left or right or even whether you support or oppose the death penalty.  I hope that we of all political persuasion agree that locking up the wrong people and letting the real killers get away is a very bad idea.For an in-depth analysis of all details of this case-see these two websites.  And if it touches your conscience please consider trying to help:http://www.wm3.org/live/caseinfo/index.phphttp://www.arwar.org/wm6.html</review_text>
This outstanding and bold director has always paid special attention respect the dark side of the state of things; like in this case where a lawyer practically out of the game due the drink, decides to assume a delicate case of unorthodox medical praxis. Please notice how Lumet works with grayish tunes in the lawyer ' s office to accent his personal drama.Go for this emblematic film, where Paul Newman makes a delirious performance.</review_text>
After I saw this film, I went in my backyard and tried digging, then my mom yelled at me. Now I'm older and I am going to order this DVD. The movie is awesome, it's a classic in my mind</review_text>
A great learning tool for childern of all ages</review_text>
i just so the uncut version of this movie and if you like perverse and grotesque movies you will enjoy this. an uncut version can be purchased at trashpalace.com check it out</review_text>
This movie is based on reality in which the boxer Ruben Carter was wrongfully accused of murder. It shows how awful racism was and that makes one feel horrible. Just because Carter was black, he was imprisoned. This film is remarquable and Denzel Washington is absolutely fantastic as Ruben Carter. It shows his wrong accusation, the racism, and his descent into madness in prison. It's very sad but the ending ends out being a happy ending. Ruben Carter is helped by a group of Canadians who are inspired by his book that he had written and they try to help him get released from prison. It's a beautiful story and deserves to be watched by everyone. This movie is up there for me with films like the Shawnshank Redemption and the Green Mile! Highly reccomended</review_text>
I recommend this movie as a most usually high star. The Torch Song Trilogy has done something that no other movie producer has dared to do (I will leave it to you to identify what that is). The torch song trilogy has blended wisdom and humor in a comical theatrical version of the life of drag queen, who is more than what she appears to be on stage. It identifies with what most homosexuals yearn for and the strength it takes to get it. This movie is inspirational, comical, sad, and dramatic. There is no other movie of its kind, and no other movie compares. The movie identifies that love can overcome all- and that if there is one thing homosexuals want, it is acceptance, and if you can not do that then get out. This is a must have. The ONLY five star movie I have ever watched</review_text>
Another hilarious cube vision movie.  Mike Epps is one of the funniest guys on the planet and Cube's serious personna make for a classic goofy guy/straight guy combination.  Get some popcorn,  take a few deep breaths,  cause you will laugh.  Its a gas!!</review_text>
Flawless and Beautifully Rieveting"The Joy Luck Club" has to be the best movie I have ever seen, and probably will be the only one of it's kind. The story is beautiful and timeless and I encourage everyone to see it. It makes you think of the relationships of your family and how, even though this is a movie, it can impact you beyond belief. It will rock you to the core of your being and I am living proof</review_text>
I WATCHED THIS FILM BACK IN THE 80'S WHEN IT WAS FIRST RELEASEDAND I LOVED IT.A REAL TEAR JERKER WITH A TINGE OF HUMOUR THROWNIN.A DEFINATE LADIES FILM I WOULD SAY AS A LOT OF BLOKES DON'T LIKE ALL THAT MUSHY STUFF.GOOD ACTING ALL AROUND FROM KEVIN BACON AND AN APPEARANCE BY A THEN DASHING ALEC BALDWINLADIE'S FETCH THE HANKIES</review_text>
Lets start off with how happy I am this finally after all these years got on DVD.I remember watching this movie when i was a kid on HBO. i was not more then 8-9 but I remembered it so vividly that when I decided one day to search on Amazon for it, I went insane when I saw that it was there! This movie revolves around the 80's, you guy can probably tell by the cover picture.Its mainly about a NOT popular girl named Louise Miller who is striving to make it throught school and at the same time crushing over the most popular guy. She went into a fortune telling store and the little lady, Who i have no idea who her name is though, lol she is that lady in poterguist as well. Either way, the fortune teller lady to her that on the night of her 16th birthday, she will have her powers. Louise sorts of thinks the lady was crazy, runs away.True to the Fortune tellers words, she finds out the hard way.She starts to believe in her powers and ability and used it for her own benifits. sooner or later, to make herself to become the schools most popular girl and snag the man of her dreams. but then in that process, she might lose her really close friend that has been with her through thick and thin since the beginning of probably grade school, who knows. LOL.But then later on she realized that her powers she has may be too much for her to handle. will she give it up and go back to who she was, a nobody? or would she learn to use them wisely with the old lady's help and fix the mess that she got herself into?the only tibit of it was when i bought this from amazon. i bought it for the price of $9.99 and then a few days later, the price changed to $6.99. what a way to take the money!</review_text>
For every season, there is a classic movie.  In our house, "A Christmas Story" tops the list when Christmas rolls around.  Without a doubt this movie is a classic!  Ralphie and his quest for the Red Ryder BB gun -- I do love this movie.</review_text>
James Mangold Identity is one hell of a movie. The twist is amazing, didn't see that coming. The ending will shock you to pieces. John Cusack and Amanda Peet are superb in their roles, he plays a former cop and she plays a hooker trying to get home to Flordia. Clea Duvall also appears in this film, Duvall was previously in Girl, Interrupted (another Mangold film). This film kept me interested for all its 90 minutes. Great direction, top-notch acting, and awesome plot. Identity is the best pyschological thriller of all-time, I highly recommend this engrossing little film</review_text>
What a great movie.  And it's still believable after all these years even with the mainframe computer consoles and tape reels and camera monitors.  The panscan is very well executed and hardly noticeable or annoying.  The print that was used has stood up very well.This is the movie that got me interested in programming computers when I first saw it.  Before there even was a Microsoft, I had dreams of one day building my very own super computer under a mountain somewhere.  The damn things can now fall deep inside your ear canal and lodge inside your brain if you're not careful.I wish the movie had more story to it instead of just being a rather quick build-up to an even quicker ending.  But this is a movie I can watch over again and again.  Wow.  This isn't just any movie about a mainframe and its keypunch operator.  This one's the real McCoy</review_text>
I LOVED this movie. Breathtaking scenery, a simple yet enthralling story, and wonderful acting all around. No drugs, no guns, no over-the-top violence. A nice movie to watch on a rainy day....</review_text>
This is a masterpiece of cinema. After watching Robert Mulligan's more famous (to me) movies: To Kill a Mockingbird and Summer of '42, I found this jewel. I did not think that the same man could create a third work of art but here it is.Directors like Ford, Hawks, Lubitsch or Vidor and Capra are long gone, and so is cinema as art, but a few movies like this one seem to resurrect it, although it may only last a blink of an eye.I am off to check out "Come September" now.Who is this Robert Mulligan, anyway?Lovable little gem</review_text>
this movie was a good stay at home movie to watch with a friend or bf. Gabe the lead character is a musical song writer who goes to a bar and sees a handsome gogo boy dancing on stage, after a few drinks gabe leaves and is on the train on his way home....the gogo boy from the bar(strip joint) walks in and sees gabe and sits down across from him...gabe stares at him up and down. but gabes stop comes up and the gogo boy follows him out...now they both go from place to place trying to find a place to do the deed...but his str8 roomate interrupts, then gabes older friend offers his pad but he bumps into an old flame and now gabe and the gogo boy once again have no place to go....all in all...its a great movie to watch with someone and cuddle...funny and a good watch. enjoy</review_text>
"Anne of Green Gables--the Sequel"  Is  a well done, beautifully photographed and scripted portrayal of the wonderful novel by Lucy Maud Montgomery.  This movie continues the story of the older Anne Shirley as she faces the challenges of separating from the home she loves and staying true to her strong sense of self as she  finds her place in her adult world.  The interplay of familiar and newly introduced characters is compelling.  This movie is well worth your time and money and a great conversation starter for family time together.  Get the movie "Anne of Green Gables" also and watch it first for the most enjoyment.</review_text>
Wow, I just viewed "Spun" the other night and I thought this movie was outrageous. This is sort of a guilt-pleasure movie but you want to take shower afterwards."Spun" has an impressive cast of recognized actors. The film is, essentially, about a few days in the lives of a group of drug addicts. There is The Cook (Mickey Rourke, he truly makes this story worth watching), who makes the drug (speed) and sells it to Spider Mike (John Leguizamo), a dealer with a junkie girlfriend, Cookie (Mena Suvari, looking infinitely less attractive than she did in "American Beauty"). One of his clients is Ross (Jason Schwartzman), who does a lot of favours for The Cook and his girlfriend, Nikki (Brittany Murphy).I was surprised at how funny the film was at times. It doesn't drown us in anti-drug messages, nor does it become one of those, equally tedious, drug films where you feel like the sober driver at a drunken party. The humour is dark, certainly, but funny nevertheless. A lot of it comes from a subplot about Frisbee, Patrick Fugit,  who is caught by a couple of TV policemen (Peter Stormare and Alexis Arquette) and is told he will be let off if he helps them get Spider-Mike. I will only say of the resulting sequence that he does it with all the subtlety of an undercover policeman with his badge stuck to his forehead.This is a film with a lot of energy, that seems, like its characters, not entirely sure where it is going, but determined to get there, and quickly. Although I am sure it is boring to be surrounded by people on speed when you are sober, this film almost makes you feel like you are on speed too. The director, Jonas kerlund, has directed music videos in the past, and it shows in his impatient filming style, as he plays around with animation, speeded-up camerawork and such like.I'm not recommending the film for its style though, although I am sure it is the best way this material could get to the screen. I am recommending it because I liked the main characters, which I think will stick in my head for much longer than the animated sex scenes or the split screens. I can imagine an entire film about The Cook and Nikki, or Spider Mike and Cookie, or even just Ross, who absentmindedly keeps leaving a girl handcuffed to his bed for hours/days. What makes "Spun" better than those hypothetical films is that it puts the characters into their own little community, and we feel as if we are watching their everyday, speeded up, sleepless lives. Simply amazing.</review_text>
John Wayne stars as Sgt. Striker.  Striker is a marine whois given a group of misfits to turn into men.  Striker isalso dealing with problems at home.  His wife hates the militaryand has left him taking their son away.  Wayne is obviouslyconcerned about what will happen to his son in the clutches ofsomeone who may teach him none of the values of being anAmerican.Making it worse, one of Wayne's men is the son of a famoussoldier but has been so brainwashed that he hates America,everything it stands for and the military.  Its obvious thatthis guy represents what Wayne fears his son will be turnedinto by his wife: an anti-american/anti-military peacenikliberal weakling.Wayne is the pure image of the american fighting leader.  He isa machine that crushes everyone in his path.  He knocks oneold troublemaker soldier around as an example and that bringsthe men into line.  By the time they get to Iwo, Striker hasbuilt them into a fighting unit.  No personalities, no thoughtsexcept for battle, no fear.  They have been perfectly preparedfor the battle.  And having accomplished his task, Striker iskilled during the battle.His death teaches us as Americans a final and most importantlesson.  None of the men are important in their lives or whatthey do.  Leaders are not important either.  Whats important isthat the corps as a big machine keeps going.  Striker buildsthe new leaders in battle and then the torch is passed to themto go on and do the same thing.War builds character and burns away the phony idealogy ofliberalism and peace.  Great men like Sgt. Striker are notcreated in classrooms, they can only be created in war.</review_text>
Into The Blue turned out to be a decent movie. I was not expecting a story or ANYTHING from this movie other than pure eye candy. I was surprised by a decent story with suspense and action and some really beautiful cinematography. The underwater shots are really breathtaking. I also enjoyed the special features on the DVD which demonstrated how these great shots were taken in waters that were both beautiful and shark infested.Of course, aside from the beautiful underwater photography, there are the movies stars who are some of the most beautiful people in the world. Jessica Alba looks incredible. Ashley Scott is also gorgeous. And for the ladies, there's Paul Walker and Tyson Beckford.I wasn't expecting much from this film, but I was pleasantly surprised. It's not going to win any Academy Awards, but it is entertaining and fun</review_text>
Overwhelming in sincerity and pain. To watch and observe Stephan's life go from a pain of loneliness and secrecy to love and shame rips at your inside and leaves you feeling both uplifted and vulnerable at the same time. This cinematic masterpiece moves beyond the typical coming out story and focuses on true love and the boundaries it faces and must conquer inflicted not from the outside world but from the lovers themselves. Combining a mix of heart wrenching drama and laugh out loud dark humour I was left enthralled and fixated not wanting for it to finish. A great cast and a great script push this movie forward to the top of my list.</review_text>
Knowing that "Stray Dog" was a movie by Akira Kurosawa gave me high expections and I was not disappointed.  The movie starts out as a sort of beaurocratic comedy as a plain clothes officer named Murakami has his pistol stolen by a pick pocket.  Despite the embarassment, it was a matter that could affect his continued employment with the force.  As he starts to track down which pickpocket might have done the job, it becomes apparent that the gun has been used in a violent crime.  At this point, the officer gets teamed up with an old pro named Sato and the two are on the hunt for a serious criminal.The plot may sound semi-standard but, as in most Kurosawa movies I've seen, the excellence isn't in the story but in its' telling.  There are several scenes of Murakami wandering through Tokyo that reminded me somewhat of "The Bicycle Thief".  There is a lot of psychological aspects to this movie such as Murakami's efforts to reconcile the use of his gun in the hands of a violent criminal.  In the conversations between the two detectives we hear the hardened outlook of Sato on the criminal element in society.  Murakami shows the occassional fine line between cop and thief which may have been Kurosawa's main point in "Stray Dog".  There are many other interesting aspects to the movie and I'm sure more will emerge each time I see it.  The movie has the added aspect of being a fairly good thriller.Toshiro Mifune plays Murakami and it seemed strange to see him clean cut throughout the movie.  Takashi Shimura plays Sato and the two work very well together.  All of the acting is well done as well as the directing and the writing.  Kurosawa shows in "Stray Dog" that he is as comfortable in the present as he is in the past.</review_text>
The story gets a bit complicated because it deals a little bit with law issues. The real problem is that most of us get kind of frightened when we face something unusual in our daily lives. I had to watch the movie's end twice in order to understand well how the bad guys were going to be punished. I wonder what lawyers, FBI agents and mafia members would think when watching this movie.Most of us don't know much about legal issues but are still interested in thrillers, and this movie shows a rather believable and very fun plot. The good guy, Mitch McDeere, wins over evil not only because he's smart but also because of a big deal of good luck. Mitch is so lucky that the story strains credibility.For example, Mitch's wife gets to know all of a sudden that Gene Hackman's character (who has important documents to copy) is not going to dive as Mitched though so she saves the days by showing up to distract him. Well, good luck tends to favor people with drive in real life.   At the same time the movie shows legal procedures made-up by real life lawyer John Grisham.The movie is also realistic in the way the bad guys are punished. In real life white-collar criminals hardly ever go to jail, even less killed by the good guys; everybody knows this. What not everybody knows is that these crooks can still face problems. The movie shows the sort of legal and money problems they get involved into.Finally, the suspense is well organized. Moreover the piano and instrumental music goes really well in those scenes.Yes, this is very compelling movie to recommend watching. Beware that this movie deals at some degree with the Conservative vs Liberal cultural war. The bad guys had to be the Southern Conservatives who want to rule other people's lives according to their own hypocrite standards. Meanwhile the good guys are Liberals from NE. I wondered how writer John Grisham could portray his own Southern fellows in negative ways. All I guess is that JG realized what would be accepted by the Entertainment industry and wrote according to it. Anyways, this is just a movie and it does what it's supposed to do: to entertain</review_text>
This was a great movie.  True the Cube was a trap but it showed the greatest danger was the people inside.If you do an indepth look  you will realize  all the names of th epeople inside the cube are names of prisons in 4 different countries, and furthermore  their personalities decribe what the prison is like.Kazan (autisic guy) come from  Kazan Prion in Russia  which is a psychiatric prisonAlderson  comes from  Alderson prison in West Virginia.  This prison commonly uses isolation as a punishment.  Alderson died alone having never ran into anyone.Rennes  comes from Rennes Prison In France.  Rennes was kinda the groups mentor.  He showed them 2 tips on how to survive, thegroup took these as policy.  Rennes Prison is where most of modern prison policy originated.Holloway comes from Holloway Prison in England.  Holloway is a prison for womenLeaven And Worth come from Leavenworth Prison in KansasLeavenworth has stict rules so does math wicj Leaven is a whiz at.Leavenworth was bulit corportely by architects.  Worth was an architect.Quentin comes from  San Quentin prison in California.  Both Quentin's are brutal.The makes of this movie really did their home work to make those connections.The plot was good also,  total strangers  with their memory of how they got there wiped out have to rely on each other to survive</review_text>
1st of all if you are a Prince fan, then it is ofcourse the norm, that you have some favortism directed to the film. That would be me included!!! Does he ever not look good on camera??? I love his hair styles throughout the movie. O.K. now on the movie itself; I find the plot of it beautiful. I wish it did; however, show more erotic love scenes. I love the idea of this movie pertaining to the fact to w/ being a male gigolo, and finding love. THIS IS A PRINCE FILM that does not come on to often...this is simply beautiful B&W so clean looking. (...)! to all the naysayers, because Graffiti Bridge is sexy too! This could be a silent film, and I would still get it just to watch him sashay his cute (...)on screen...everything about him is art. More than half of all people even if they tried could not be such as he: An animated piece of expensive art on screen that you want to just watch...cut it out you haters he is GORGEOUS!!</review_text>
There are a whole bunch of films from the 70's that deserve a DVD release and this is one of them</review_text>
After her amazing performance in Misery, Bates takes the role of another Stephen King character: Dolores Claiborne.Dolores is a tough, bitter, sarcastic woman who is accused of murdering her despotic employer, Vera Donovan. We are all hasty to set a judgement upon her, but as her story unfolds we realize that things are far more complex than what they seemed at the beginning of the movie.Jennifer Jason Leigh proves why she is one of the best young actresses around by playing Celina, Dolores's troubled daughter who hates her mother for the wrong reasons. I own this dvd since 2000 and it is still one of my favorites</review_text>
There are few great movies that will make shed a tear, but this one is really great. Daughters don't know how much their mothers will go for them. They just understand their mothers when they get to be one. This movie, the place, the weather, the circumstances, is so depressive but beautiful. Dolores started to work hard out of love for her child, after that she worked because of gratitude. What a great woman and her daughter never understood her until the very end.At the beginning I was weary about this movie because is based on Stephen King's work, but this movie really proved me wrong.</review_text>
This movie is great. I remember watching it when I was really young. Im 21 now and still love it. Yeah some things are corny but that is part of what makes it great. Its not suppose to be realistic. Its fiction! I just realized too that the daughter is the girl from American Pie which makes it even funnier. Overall this movie is pretty good. If you dont care for the story, atleast get it to see Kim and the other chicks in the movie. If you've never seen the movie, just buy it. Its about the same as renting it a couple times and you will be able to keep it. For all you people who rated it a 1 you have issues!</review_text>
Oh God, as a graduate of UAG I should say that this movies is nothing like the movie but I can't lie. The Madera's own the med. school.. the Leano's own the med. school. The Dean does not care about students.... Dean Villalobos and Martinez Sandoval dont care about the students. The infrastructure is a bit outdated.... you guessed it!! UAG's buildings are as old as Fenway without any upgrades.  Oh yeah, the pride and joy of the institution is the infamous PMC program:  "Programa Medicina en Comunidad", just like in the film!!!!   It is a riot! If you plan to go to UAG you must watch this film. If you get a hold of it, bring it down to Guadalajara so you can laugh.</review_text>
I have been using Cindy Crawfords tapes since 1993. I used shape your body while I was pregnant 10 years ago ( Don't be horrified )  living in the tropics and with a few adjustments I did that workout in the pool minus the situps combined with walking. I had my first birth naturally and within 3 Hours and had the best legs ever.My first impression of Cindy was that she is honest. She does not pretend to be the expert and she really has a Genunie interest in exercising this shines throught on the DVDs.  I have tried many other celebrity videos and you just don't feel comfortable with them. She does not try to exercise and be perfect at the same time. Really  she is there just to help and with alot of sympathy.You cannot help but like her.New Dimension is fantastic I have started doing the 10min workout everyday. You do not have to do alot to get results just target the right areas. People can workout for an hour and not get the same results.New Dimension is not just a post pregnancy DVD . This is great for women over 35 that want to control their pelvic muscles the other two workouts on the DVD are more than you will ever need to work all your body . I still mix it up with first two DVDsI have just purchased the set of three DVds again to replace worn out copies . Cindy looks like she will be in my lounge room for a very long time.Please enjoy !!!!!!</review_text>
Logan's Run belongs to a class of old school science fiction films which were popular in the early and mid-1970's, prior to the beginning of the Star Wars franchise. These films did not rely on non-stop action or dazzling special effects, but rather on thoughtful, intelligent stories, intriguing "What if?" scenarios, and astute social commentary. They included Sci Fi classics such as Soylent Green, The Omega Man, The Andromeda Strain, Westworld, and others. While the shopping mall setting and some of the special effects of Logan's Run are pretty cheesy, it is still an interesting film and its themes may be even more relevant in today's botox era than they were in the 70's. I have heard they are doing a remake and would like to think it will improve on the original. Unfortunately, given the recent history of Hollywood, it is more likely that they will drain every last bit of intelligence out of the story, and replace it with more explosions, and perhaps Will Smith.</review_text>
This is another american remake of the original Danish movie, starring Stellan Skarsgard, which is more interesting than this remake. I always wonder why, when Hollywood does a remake, they change the things that make the movie interesting in the first place. Even though I give this remake 4 stars, mainly because Al Pacino and Robin Williams restrained themselves, and that Hollywood changed the ending. Check out the original. I give the Danish original 5 stars.</review_text>
The Hucksters does an excellent job of portraying the cut throat business that advertising is.  Clark Gable, playing the suave but ethical advertising man, is the protagonist and he is pitted against the larger than life business tycoon Sydney Greenstreet.  Both are pitted against one another in this real life chess match, each making strategic moves of cunning, self-pride and power--Gable, in an attempt at making the advertising business a respectable one and Greenstreet by instilling fear into the bumbling idiots who surround him.  Greenstreet operates as though his customers are mindless sheep easily persuaded by fancy packaging and jingles of no substance whereas Gable is convinced that the customer is intelligent and is looking for more than bells and whistles when purchasing a product.Most interesting however is the internal struggle Gable, Kerr, and Gardner are each battling.  Gable, basically a good man, is somewhat of a player and finds himself in love with Kerr.  Kerr, a widow with children, is a righteous woman deeply attracted to Gable but cannot reconcile with his lifestyle.  Gardner, a sultry singer of a sordid background, longs to settle down as a respectable housewife and mother and his her net set for Gable.  All three do a magnificent job of portraying the internal struggles of their characters.In the end Gable buckles but does not break before the formidable Greenstreet.  Realizing that he cannot continue on working for this tyrant without compromising his standards, Gable passes on the company?s lucrative offer and walks, but not before he has publicly humiliated Greenstreet.Of course, Gable does get the girl in the end.  Which one?  Watch the movie and find out!</review_text>
This wonderful little book is for you, the student of screenwriting.  How do I know?  I had the good fortune of being in Dr. Claudia Hunter Johnson's screenwriting class at Florida State University.  We used the methods described in her book and they work!  If you are disciplined enough to follow her process, you will amaze yourself.  You will begin with Le Menu (your very own personal autobiography) and finish with a well-crafted script.  Although you will not have her direct feedback, you will have the benefit of a script coach who has helped launch a thousand careers.  Tom</review_text>
The Labyrinth is a delightful movie of fantasy and fun for all ages to enjoy.  This has always been one of my favorite films, and going back to it as an adult only makes me enjoy and appreciate it all the more.  Jennifer Connelly gives a superb performance as Sarah, the main character, whose baby brother is taken by the Goblin King (David Bowie in one of his best characters - who ironically gives an often sensitive and human performance while being fanciful and fantastic at the same time; he wrote and performed all the music, which is also some of his best work).  Sarah must leave her world of make-believe and enter the very real and deceptive Labyrinth to save her brother in time before he's turned into a goblin.  Along the way, we encounter a large cast of Jim Henson's puppet-creatures, some of which become Sarah's friends and helpers in her journey.  The puppets are so believable that you soon forget that they are not real people.  The movie is filled with magic, both on and off screen.The film is supplemented on this DVD with a "Making-of" documentary - an original feature, narrated largely by Jim Henson himself - made during the actual production of the film (released in 1986).  Such a documentary makes one appreciate even more what goes into a movie like this and how complex the creatures are - what goes into their creation, how they operate, and how they interact with the sets and other characters (especially in this case with the live actors).  It's a lot of fun to see this "inside" look, and more than anything gives a real sense of who Jim Henson was and how much this all really meant to him.  My favorite quote from Jim Henson in this documentary was when he said (about his inspiration and motivation when he makes a movie), "When I go see a film, when I leave the theater... I like to be happier than I was when when I went in, I like to leave with an up feeling, and I like a picture to have a sense of substance, to be about life and the things that matter to me," - a wonderful sentiment to remember in this day and age.Lighthearted, fun, fantastical, funny, beautiful, exciting, and more "real" than many of today's "realities" - extremely enjoyable and uplifting.  As an added bonus, Monty Python member Terry Jones wrote the script (and is interviewed in the documentary).  Cheryl McFadden (Star Trek: TNG's Beverly Crusher) also did all the choreography in the film (for both humans and puppets). :-</review_text>
How can we ever be disappointed by a Anthony Hopkins performance? In my opinion, one of the best actors of all time ( especially his portrayal of Hannibal Lecter ). In this movie, he plays a anthropologist first living in Africa among the rare and beautiful mountain gorillas. After defending the gorillas and killing 2 poachers in the process, he is captured and sent to a mental institution where a psychologist played by Cuba Gooding Jr.( who gives a good performance) tries to delve in the mind of Hopkins' character and help him. I just love the flashbacks to Africa and the gorillas. Very touching scenes in this movie along with great acting. My favorite part of the movie is the ending where we see Hopkins return to the gorillas and the place he feels he truly belongs and truly wants to be. Great movie!</review_text>
Excellent!  I gave this book to my sister who lost her granddaughter to cancer and she said it provided the most help of all.  Thanks so much</review_text>
This film is a stunning tribute to the memory of all the victims of this tragedy,and to all the heros who contributed to our triumph of the American Spirit</review_text>
Most people I know who have viewed this film fall into two categories. On one side there are those who hate it, while on the other are those who like it. I am of the latter group. This is not a comedy, although one gets the feeling that with so many absurdities in the lives of the characters that make us laugh, it appears to be a comedy. However, make no mistake about it, this brilliant film is more than that. It is a biting satire of a very dark side of life. One I wouldn't wish on anyone.I didn't know what to make of this film when I first viewed it. And I knew it was darker than a dark-comedy. Surely the director was making another statement in this film? And maybe he was. The dysfunctional life of Vanessa (Reese Witherspoon) and the even more dysfunctional life of the  sociopathic Bob Wolverton (Keifer Sutherland) converge in one hell of a nightmare.This satire on the life of Vanessa as a modern day "Little Red Riding Hood" meeting Bob the "Big Bad Wolf" while on her way to grandma's house was like a punch in the face when I first saw this film. I didn't think of it as a comedy--as many do, but actually a sad commentary on one part of american society. This film hits you in the gut. Even though some parts of the film are funny: the disturbing parts are much more powerful. Highly recommended</review_text>
I had viewed this movie on tv a while ago. I am a Hospice nurse and found this movie so down to earth and informative about what a person's thoughts might be in the face of a debilitating condition.Most of the Nurses that I work with have gained new insight. Lest I lead you astray this is not a documentary for medical personnel. It is a wonderful protrayal of one woman's battle</review_text>
Once more the irreverent vision of Georges Bernard Shaw, carves in relief with this story about a rich girl who decides to join the Salvation Army. Wendy Hiller one of my beloved "brides" of the screen makes a delightful and terrific performance in this satire of mistakes where she will discover the other side of the life.</review_text>
I have studied Kenpo Karate and several other disciplines of martial science, and I can say honestly that this movie is accurate.  My father, who is a former Kenpo instructor, and I both recognize things from the movie.Kenpo is an ancient martial art from about 2000 years ago that was formed by combining the major martial arts of the time, such as Kung Fu, Tae Kwon Do, and Ju Jitsu.  Last century, though, an outstanding martial artist named Ed Parker became an expert in Kenpo and "Americanized" it.Jeff Speakman was (as I have been corrected) a 4th degree black belt in American Kenpo.  He does an excellent job of keeping what is in the movie real.  I especially like how a history and the philosophy of Kenpo is given during the scene in which he is shown learning Kenpo.  But, don't take my word for it, go see the movie.  I know that a lot of people have gotten rid of the VHS players, but if you have one get this movie.  The plot is decent, and the fighting is incredible.</review_text>
Another great Richard Scarry video.  This video teaches kids in a way that is interesting and fun for them...without being obnoxious for their parents!  We love it</review_text>
This is the best ABC video I have came across. I bought the VHS for my niece about 10 years ago and I still have that same video. It was passed back to me and now my daughter & son have enjoyed it. It's been through a lot so I decided to buy the DVD and it's great! My kids love it & it's really helped my 2 yr old boy recognize his letters as well as what begins with each letter. I give this video an A</review_text>
After reading the very positive reveiws of this late 90's thriller I decided that it deserved at least a rental. I must confess that I am glad that I happened to stumble upon this movie on Amazon because it was everything that a horror movie should be. The Screenplay was very put together, the plot & setting were intriguing yet mysterious & the killings (Or cinematography if you want to make it sound all fancy) & visuals are quite impressive for it's 500,000$ dollar budget. Now, the only real complaint that I can say about the film is that the acting is horrid. Now dont get me wrong not ALL of the acting was that bad but I would be lying if I said that most of the actors were okay, the truth is that most of them had very little experience and THAT made the film look all-around quite a bit less professional and hard to look at as an ELITE horror film. I think that if the producers would have known when they made the film that it would do so well and have such great reveiws and number of veiwers than they would have been more than willing to dish out the few extra bucks in order to have some more experienced actors.I thought that David Hewlett played David Worth (The Architect) acceptably and I also thought that Nicky Guadagni's performance as Helen Halloway (the Doctor) was pretty good. Other than those two I thought that the acting was very lightweight. The guy that played Quentin (the cop) was really bad which was quite a shame just because that characte had a big role in the film and was really important ... also I thought that they could have gotten a better and more experienced guy to play the role of the Autistic boy (or man it was some what hard to tell...).I know that I keep going on and on about the acting but I cant wonder away from the truth to much. The concept and idea of the film was really quite brilliant, the screnplay was brilliantly written and the story line meshed with extrodinary ease. Despite the acting I was heavily impressed and the film was Overall very good.Grade: B+</review_text>
Putting it simply, this film is the work of a genius. As a Tom Stoppard fanatic, I adored it from the moment I read the play, which was even the version he was considerably unhappy with. He was significantly more satisfied with the movie, and there is very little doubt as to why. He clearly had a handle on what he was doing and writing and with whom he was working.Any being who has ever had a single existentialist thought should see this film--they may or may not like it, but that's not what matters. This film is amazing</review_text>
Although it is very funny, and it is about talking animals that drive cars, "The Wind in the Willows" is not suitable for four to eight year olds to read on their own.  That would be the Disney cartoon version, not the book, which is pretty sophisticated for such a young age group.  It is great to read aloud, however, and for older kids who love nature and humor, "The Wind in the Willows" could lead to a lifetime love of books.  "The Wind in the Willows" reminds me of the Victorian humor book "Three Men in a Boat", because both are about the adventures of a group of wacky English bachelors messing about in boats on the river.  It is funny, with real slapstick comedy, and it is also touching, because it deals with friendship and loyalty, and beautiful, because it is about nature, and love of the countryside and home.</review_text>
I just read Dirk's "spolier" ending to the Mothman Prophecies and had to say huh?  Demonic, fallen angles? What?  Did we watch the same movie?  If all you go by is the movie, that might be the impression you're left with. But if you've ever looked into the events that happened around Point Pleasant, or any of the books on the subject, you'll see that the Mothman was more UFO related than anything. At same time of the Mothman sightings the Point Pleasant area  was in a wave of UFO reports, Men-In-Black, and all sorts of goings-on up in the sky. In fact, Mothman played only a very small part in the drama, it was by far predominately UFO related, as Keel makes clear.Unfortunately, the producers chose to abandon this aspect of the story entirely, and so the happenings at Point Pleasant lost their entire frame of reference. If you see this movie thinking this was the way things actually happened, you might come to the conclusion of the Mothman being evil, demonic, fallen angles, whatever you like. But if you research the incident at all, you'll see you're only getting a fraction of the story from the movie. And if, like Dirk, you thereby think you know all about what Mothman actually was based on just the movie alone, then all your conclusions end up being based simply on a Hollywood writer's imagination and script and nothing more. Mothman having anything to do with demons and angels or any religious overtones is as far from the truth as you could possibly be. Don't judge by the movie, read the book</review_text>
I never really knew of Matthew Modine until I saw this movie.  He was very good in the part and I have watched the movie several times. I also purchased the book as well.</review_text>
Everyone should see this movie.  Also, everyone should buy it so they can show it to their friends, so the word can keep spreading, and hopefully and finally, justice will be served</review_text>
Seriously guys... if this film says ANYTHING to you, then it is your DUTY to do something... these young men were WRONGFULLY imprisoned.... Im not saying you have to donate your college fund... but atleast spread the word... tell people about www.wm3.org  tell people about wm3 awareness day (July 23).. go to events... tell EVERYONE YOU KNOW about this cause.... and while you are saying "I don't have time for this" remember that what is 5 minutes to you, could help these boys have 5 minutes more of freedom.... seriously, think about it</review_text>
This movie is wonderful. Although it didn't exactly make me cry, it did touch me in a sentimental way. I fell in love with Morrie. He is such a sweet guy, and his story is an inspiration to everyone. I was greatly impressed by how he chose to make the most of his life, even though fate had handed him a death sentence. He made up his mind that he wasn't going to sit around and feel sorry for himself; he was going to make his final days as happy and pleasant as is entirely possible, and I really admire that.I was also pleased with the effect Morrie had on his old college student, Mitch. Mitch learns to appreciate life's little surprises, and to not be in such a big rush all the time. He learns to relax and smell the roses, to let go of old grudges, to value the people in his life, and he even learns to allow himself to cry.My most favorite scene is where Mitch actually breaks down and bawls, and Morrie takes him in his arms and the two men embrace each other. This scene is without a doubt the most moving one in the entire film. Although it's the last time that Mitch ever sees Morrie alive, it's still very sweet and poignant. The ending is pretty sad, but it's also happy at the same time. Morrie is gone, yet his legacy lives on.I recommend this movie to anyone, of any gender, of any age.</review_text>
I have seen this movie in the past on TV and am familiar with the story line. I have also been to Visit Boys Town Since I have family in Omaha Nebraska. I would say if anyone is considering buying this movie, Do. Spencer Tracy makes a good Father flanigan (the Priest who starts up Boys Town) in this movie and Micky Rooney who plays a hoddlem</review_text>
Given that pornography is a multi-jillion-dollar-a-year business, it's sort of surprising that it hasn't received the cinematic treatment more often, but Boogie Nights provides it with the sort of skewed, darkly comic treatment that it almost certainly deserves, and becomes a certifiable classic in the process.  Following the story of Eddie Adams, a simple-minded, almost impossibly well-endowed teenager from suburban California who achieves porn stardom as Dirk Diggler before turning 20, Boogie Nights is both a time-tested star-is-born-and-almost-blows-it-all story and a loving tribute to a time and place that will probably never be replicated and the individuals who made it what it was.Paul Thomas Anderson's directing is as excessive and stylish as you'd expect from a movie centered on the porno industry, with Anderson pulling out every trick in the book--long tracking shots, underwater closeups, montages, movie-within-a-movie views, and some moments that approach stream-of-consciousness (Dirk's vision of his professional name literally exploding off a neon sign being a prominent example).  Naturally, Anderson also loads the movie up with period details, right down to the Farah Fawcett poster in teenage Dirk's room, the platform shoes, and the obligatory disco sequences.  Its visual flair aside, though, Boogie Nights is also the sort of insanely quotable, watch-it-until-you've-memorized-it movie that seemed to come out in droves in the nineties (Trainspotting, Fargo, Goodfellas, Swingers, True Romance, etc. etc. etc.) but has been in disturbingly short supply this decade.  This movie simply seems to have everything you can think of going for it, especially its murderer's row of a cast--Burt Reynolds (Jack Horner), Don Cheadle (Buck Swope), John C. Reilly (Reed Rothchild), Julianne Moore (Amber Waves), William H. Macy (Little Bill), Luis Guzman (Maurice Rodriguez), Tom Jane (Todd Parker), Philip Baker Hall (Floyd Gondolli), Philip Seymour Hoffman (Scotty Jay), and Alfred Molina (Rahad Jackson) all figure prominently--and even Wahlberg (Dirk himself) and Heather Graham (Rollergirl) have roles that are perfectly suited to their relative limitations as actors.That said, what really gives the movie its resonance is the obvious sympathy with which it treats its characters, who are generally easy to laugh at but equally easy to like.  The main characters almost entirely have hopes, aspirations, and attachments beyond the rather closed world of their profession--Jack's desire to be a serious filmmaker; Dirk's ridiculous pseudo-Karate and Reed's equally ridiculous poetry; Buck's goal of opening his own stereo store; Amber's attempts to get back in touch with her son, which she blatantly compensates for by mothering her co-stars--helping us see them as fleshed-out characters, not just plot devices in the story.Since there isn't really a plot to speak of, the movie is told as a series of episodes, Goodfellas-style, with several extended pieces--the pool party at Jack's House where Eddie/Dirk gets introduced to the whole crew; the New Year's Eve party celebrating the start of the '80's; the fake drug deal gone bad at a Rahad's house--serving to turn the narrative in new directions.  This last set piece--when Dirk, Reed, and Todd head over to Rahad's house to sell him some baking soda disguised as cocaine and it quickly degenerates into a laughably misguided robbery attempt--deserves special mention, as it's easily one of the most fascinating single scenes in recent film memory.  It starts off almost surreal, with a skinny Chinese guy walking around randomly lighting firecrackers and Rahad (clad only in underwear, a bathrobe and slippers) discoursing semi-coherently as he sings along to not-so-classic 80's songs on a mixtape.  From there it just gets progressively darker and tenser, with the lighting, acting, and direction all perfectly serving to ratchet up the feeling of desperation and horror as Todd kicks his ill-conceived robbery plot into motion and things spin way out of control.  Molina's over-the-top performance, more than anything else, makes the scene, as he turns Rahad into a manic ball of drug-fuelled energy and, later, a shotgun-toting avenging angel determined to take his revenge.  I wouldn't say Molina turns in the best performance I've ever seen in a movie, but it it probably the best performance I've seen from someone who only got one scene in the whole movie.The '80's are, of course, the hangover from the joys of the previous decade, as the emergence of video downgrades the quality of the product, cocaine suddenly becomes addictive, and Dirk starts to become too big for his britches in more ways than one.  Fittingly, as the disco era gives way to tougher times in the eighties, the movie takes a darker turn, becoming grittier, more downcast and a lot more violent, but no less compelling.  All the unbridled energy and creativity of the first half is still present, just in a decidedly less sunny form.  Even when people are getting beaten up and shot left and right, the movie's pedal-to-the-metal pacing makes it all but impossible to look away.  Well, except maybe for the notorious money shot at the end, but by then I for one didn't care.</review_text>
I have loved this movie ever since I saw it on television and watch it whenever it is on (it's been some time now) and I plan to buy it.  Waterston has never been better as the understanding and loving father.  I didn't realize when I first saw it that Reese Witherspoon was the daughter (that was before Reese Witherspoon became Reese Witherspoon).  A heartbreaking, beautifully acted and must-see film.  Rings true to life.  They certainly don't make movies like this anymore, and it's a shame</review_text>
His words to the jury, a petition for strength for them against great odds, for himself against greater odds, for a system sometimes blind to justice, and for the victim of negligence who has no voice, puts a lump in your throat today 25 years after the release of 'The Verdict.'TV bytes and news reports of lawyers' greed today have surpassed the image of scoundrels as nearly all of us now just leave them to their money-grubbing best. And the courage and brilliance of "Brown v. Board" and "Heart of Atlanta" exemplifying courageous men and women doing what is best fade into a distant past. But once in while a movie ('Mockingbird') comes along and moves powerfully to recall what it was that attracted us to the beauty of this ancient profession: to do what is right, or even better, to do what is right against great odds.Frank Galvin, drunk, ambulance chaser, liar, failure, had that dream once but a mistake, an error of judgemnt, a naive trust in loyalty that was gravely misplaced led him to where he is now, sucking on breath mints and bourbon, handing out cards, working for booze money.His old friend Jack Warden handed him a case, a no-brainer, a lovely Irish girl who went into labor and came out brain dead. The Defendants? A squeaky clean, Chaired, lauded, published and handsome OBGYN and  . . . . the Diocese of Boston. And Frank's going to cave. Hell. It's the eve of trial and he's been drunk through the 24 months of discovery. And then he prepares for the Settlement Conference with the Dfense Lawyer, James Mason (just positively brilliant) and goes to the girls hospital room where she is machine fed and takes photos. But a funny thing happens. Lke Marcellus (Burton) winning the Robe in the lottery at the foot of the cross or a drunk at his first AA meeting, Frank's not sure but something's different. And he begins to wonder if maybe this time he won't cave.Great, morbid, wry, ironic, gallows humor. Warden says after the Settlement Conference, "whadja' think of (Mason)?" Galvin: He's good. Warden: Good? He's the  [. . . . .] Prince of Darkness.A cast that you have heard of and seen a thousand times and some that you would never see again all working together to bring you a blue collar story of the good thief. I don't know that there is a better trial movie.People say that Newman lost but wasn't robbed for the Oscar because Ben Kingley was so wonderful in Ghandi.He was robbed. 5 stars. Larry Scantlebury</review_text>
THIS 1948 15-CHAPTER SERIAL FEATURES SUPERMAN [PLAYED HERE BY THE LATE KIRK ALYN] GOING UP AGAINST A GANG OF CROOKS. THIS IS A HELL OF A LOT BETTER THAN THE 1950S TV SHOW THAT FEATURED GEORGE REEVES! AT LEAST THIS SERIAL WAS FUN TO WATCH AND AT LEAST YOU CAN GET INTO WHAT'S GOING ON IN THIS MOVIE. YOU MIGHT NOT BE ABLE TO FIND THIS SERIAL IN STORES TODAY, BUT, IF, BY SOME CHANCE, YOU COME ACROSS THIS VIDEO, GET IT!!!!</review_text>
Movie: *****  DVD Quality: *****  DVD Extras: ***Dramas about _Teenage Gays Coming Out Of The Closet!_ are so plentiful, they sometimes run together in my mind.  "Edge of Seventeen" is an exception to that statement because it genuinely is an exceptional movie in every way.  The screenplay by Todd Stephens is sensitive and true to life, or rather, many people's lives.  It tells the story of Eric (Chris Stafford), a young man growing up in the small town of Sandusky, Ohio, who is just beginning to grapple with his sexual orientation.  What is so refreshing about the script is that Eric is portrayed as neither a victim nor a hero; he's simply a kid on the cusp of adulthood who is trying to find himself.  Eric is sometimes selfish and thoughtless; other times sweet and naive; occasionally manipulative; but generally a good guy ... in other words: completely human.  That holds true of the other characters in the movie, including Eric's parents who love him dearly but aren't quite sure what to make of his fast-changing moods and appearance; his female best friend (Tina Holmes) who harbors deeper feelings for him; and his new gay "family" (headed by Lea DeLaria) who are fiercely supportive, yet sometimes insensitive to where he is at in terms of his coming out process.  Thankfully, Stephens' screenplay remains true to itself right down to the final fadeout and doesn't cop out by trying to wrap everything up into a neat little package; at the end of the movie, there's a definite sense that these characters will continue to live, learn, make mistakes, and thrive.  (Sequel, anyone?)The entire cast is uniformly outstanding.  Chris Stafford embodies Eric in all his complexity; his performance never strikes a false note.  Tina Holmes is amazing as his confused female friend; more than once her face and vocal inflections reminded me of an extremely young Meryl Streep (a high compliment indeed).  Stephanie McVay distinguishes herself as Eric's baffled mother, and Andersen Gabrych is fine as Eric's first same sex crush whose confident veneer covers a troubled heart.  Perhaps best of all is comic Lea DeLaria, who turns in a warm and winning dramatic performance as the Earth Mother whose wisdom and understanding are always available to Eric, regardless of how hard he sometimes pushes her away.The Strand DVD offers a flawless letterboxed transfer featuring outstanding audio and video.  The somewhat sparse extras are limited to the Theatrical Trailers for "Edge of Seventeen" and five other feature films designed to appeal to LGBT audiences.   It would be wonderful to have the additional benefit of cast and crew biographies and filmographies as a reasearch tool for the viewers who want to explore others works by the filmmakers, but this is a small complaint.  Overall, this is truly a must-see film, one that is worthy of repeat viewings.</review_text>
I've seen it on the orginal screen in a theather, saw it many times on the VCR I have.........this new DVD is superior to both in it's clarity, color and a real gem to own</review_text>
special effects have come along way from 1974 when westworld first came out,but this little gem still hangs head and shoulders above most sci-fi entertainment.welcome to delos,vacation spot of the future,where you can have a once and a lifetime fantasy come true. you may choose westworld,romanworld,and meadevilworld! you can,for $1000.00 a day(1974 prices) you can live out your most secert fantisies.it's all set up to please you and you can't get hurt. of course if that were true then we have no movie. soon after the latest batch of people get to the park,the robots begin to have breakdowns,like a virus(i still remember the reviews calling the idea of computers getting viruses as "to far out there,no one will believe it" wonder if they still think so). james brolin and richard benjemin are two friends enjoying westworld when the whole park goes on the blink and the robots start to kill thr guest.the final chase(with evil robot yul brynner,still dressed as chris from his stint in the maganfict seven cloths)is very thrilling and the whole movie has the feel of a park ride gone bad. a very fun movie</review_text>
I enjoyed most of this movie and applaud its central message: that kids (and people) rise to meet expectations, and that the socioeconomically disadvantaged are not necessarily lacking in intelligence but only in resources and opportunities.However I found the movie not entirely satisfying because it does not really show just HOW Jaime Escalante turned these kids around, other than being creative, charismatic and persistent.  As a former teacher myself of high school kids from a similar background as the ones portrayed in this movie, I know firsthand that what Escalante achieved is not impossible but it's not quite so clean and simple as shown here, but is extremely hard grueling work that often entails breaking through a lot of the students' ingrained patterns and applying a lot of painstaking coercion. The director, Ramon Menendez, seems to present a fairly sanitized  and glib version that glosses over a lot of the underlying social problems that are endemic to the urban poor while sometimes relying on some stock movie cliches (the tough guy who's really a softie at heart, the big seemingly dumb lunk, etc.).In short, "Stand and Deliver" lacks the kind of rawness, grit and ballsiness that could've made it more than just another well-meaning, triumphant and feel-good movie.  It could have been a movie that asks questions instead of spooning out pat answers.It's too bad a real master like Martin Scorsese did not direct this one</review_text>
This is the way comedy should be done- warm, funny, heart-touching, with a little craziness thrown in.Hector Elizondo and Raquel Welch are perfect- he's understated, she's over the top...just like the movie. The story never bogs down, but zips right along nicely. The sisters bicker, their father worries, Hortensia (Welch) does her best to snag him, and we laugh.  Great fun!A note on the rating for parents like me who wonder about the PG13 rating (one can never tell these days!): There's one woman shown in skimpy underclothing, and one sex scene along with sexual references and jokes, so this would not be suitable for kids</review_text>
An old movie, but a good movie.  The end is a sad comment on the society of tomorrow.  Heston and Robertson do a great job of acting.  The pace is a little slower than current special effects of today's movies.  If you are not a fast paced dude and can slow down, then I would recommend this one for you</review_text>
A documentary about the making of a film that never got past the shooting of a couple of scenes doesn't seem to promise much, but the story of what was to turn out to be a real-life "disaster movie" is riveting stuff.Terry Gilliam's obsession with "Don Quixote" is infectious and his enthusiasm for the task he faces coupled with glimpses of what it could have been really make you wish that things had turned out better. The insights into how a film is planned and the hugely complex logistics of a "live shoot" are fascinating, while the build-up to the almost inevitable collapse of the project, compounded by unbelievably bad weather and the illness of the central actor, coupled with the impacts of it all on those involved, is about as far removed from the typical self-congratulatory "making of the movie" add-on as you can get. Finally, the whole sorry affair - in particular Gilliam's persistent & unbridled optimism in the face of virtually insurmountable odds as he pursues the chance to realise a long-standing dream - becomes a quite bizarre, tragi-comic parallel to "Don Quixote" itself.You may only watch this once, and renting is therefore probably the best option, but you won't be disappointed.</review_text>
I am hopeful that Katie Holmes has not forsaken a promising acting career to become tabloid fodder and a Stepford wife for her couch-jumping husband-to-be. It's not that she strikes me as all that brilliant, but she does bring a relatable sense of humanity to her role as April Burns, a rebellious twenty-something girl who has defiantly moved away from her family's upstate home to a tenement in Manhattan's Lower East Side. Encouraged by her new boyfriend Bobby (who happens to be black), she invites her estranged family to Thanksgiving dinner where she will cook the whole meal in her tiny apartment. There is a tragic undertone to the event since her angst-driven mother is dying of breast cancer, and this may be their last meal togetherDirected and written by Peter Hedges (who wrote the equally eccentric "What's Eating Gilbert Grape?"), the story bounces back and forth between April's hazard-ridden preparation of the meal and the Burns family's chaotic journey to the city. While the family trip will remind you somewhat of this year's "Little Miss Sunshine", April's adventure consists mainly of meeting her motley neighbors, all strangers at first, to borrow a working stove for her turkey. Among others, she runs into a friendly black couple, an obsessive vegan and an elderly Chinese couple whom she teaches the origins of the holiday. On top of this is an odd, racially-driven storyline involving Bobby's need to buy a suit while being pursued by some suspicious characters.Shot in digital video by Tami Reiker and running only eighty minutes, the 2003 movie works toward an inevitable conclusion, but Hedges adds enough filmmaking idiosyncrasies to make it all seem more intriguing than it has any right to be. Among the supporting cast, Patricia Clarkson stands out as April's mother Joy, bringing a steely resolve as she crumbles under the surface. Oliver Platt is terrific as her put-upon husband Jim, as are Derek Luke as Bobby and Allison Pill as April's "perfect" little sister Beth. In little more than cameos which could have been excised, Sean Hayes plays a neurotic neighbor with a new stove and a pampered dog, while Dru Hill's Sisqo plays Bobby's friend Latrell. Hedges provides a nice commentary track on the 2004 DVD, which also includes a fifteen-minute making-of featurette</review_text>
Katie Holmes plays April, a young woman whose family has despaired of her.  She has invited them for Thanksgiving dinner, and it's particularly important because her mother (Patricia Clarkson) has cancer and is not expected to live. Katie is living in NYC with her boyfriend in the kind of grafitti-covered apartment building filled with an odd assortment of tenants that is only to be found in NY -- in other words, it will terrify her non-urban family.  The film begins as Katie wakes up -- she's never cooked a big dinner like this before and has a reputation for failure with her family.  In fact, her family puts her down so much that you quickly feel sorry for her -- no-one could be that bad, and isn't your family supposed to have an unnaturally high opinion of you, and not the other way around?Patricia Clarkson was amazing in this film; she is batty but at times her battiness is just simply playing with her family (there's a method in her madness).My only criticism would be that the whole subplot about what Katie's boyfriend is off doing while she's *trying* to cook the turkey -- well, that subplot just didn't work for me.Otherwise, this was a memorable film worth watching more than once</review_text>
Prince's 1986 romantic comedy "Under the Cherry Moon" finally received the DVD treatment it deserved in the Summer of 2004. When the film was released, it was bombarded with bad reviews but this film is actually decent. Of course the music stands out but it actually succeeds as a comedy. The acting may be full of flaws but it's the 80's, what do you expect? Prince and Jerome Benton , from The Time, are gigolos living it up in South France and they come across a beautiful heiress (Kristin Scott Thomas) who happens to get her trust fund on her 21st birthday. They both woo her for the money but Prince ends up catching feelings for her. With a beautifully filmed movie and an incredible soundtrack, "Under the Cherry Moon" fails to disappoint</review_text>
I love this movie!! I remember the first time I saw it, I was about 6-7 yrs.old, on a plane & on my way to Puerto Rico.  Eighteen (or so) years later, I bought it & watched it with my family, it brought back so many great memories, We loved it all over again. I love the music, the dancing & the actors/actresses, The only reason why I gave it 4 stars is because IT IS AN 80's MOVIE!  We all know how 80's dance movies  have the bad fame of neing CORNY!  I have to admit, it did have some corny and bad acting moments, but all in all, I think this is an amewome movie, I love it & recommend it</review_text>
I lvoed this movie I have been looking for it for years. The story plot is ok but the dancing in the movie is awesome and the music is great. It just wants to make you get up and dance</review_text>
It is definatly a total 80's movie!  Packed full of cheesy music and themes!  But I love it!  Teen Witch is a feel good movie about being okay with being different!  Gotta love that</review_text>
I bought this because I remembered loving it when I was a kid in the 70s.  Now, my daughter is watching it all the time.  The basic theme is timeless even if our daughters already know they can be doctors.  It's fun and socially educational.</review_text>
I love this movie so much. I first heard about it while listening to a Henry Rollins spoken word performance (I know so random)when I was in my teens. I went out and rented it right away, and I have watched it about 100 times since then.  I tried to get a copy for years without realizing I could just order it on Amazon.  It's such a sweet touching story.  It's a bit off the wall, but that's of course what I love about it</review_text>
DVD newcomer "Fort Apache" (1948) looks great, with minimal wear on its crisp black-and-white images (from original nitrate elements) and bugle-brisk audio. The film, ironically, finds Henry Fonda playing the maddeningly hawkish cavalry commander against John Wayne's humanistic officer willing to risk all for peace and justice.The (single) DVD has no documentary on the exciting and heartfelt film, a shame. It does include a 15-minute piece on Monument Valley, covering Ford's significant and seemingly beneficial role in the Indian reservation's history. The Navajo, paid good wages for their appearances, called him "Giant Soldier." "I've kissed more babies than a politician," Ford said."Part of his vision of the world was that we're all very small in the scheme of things," film historian Joseph McBride says. "I think (Monument Valley) gives a dimension of moral seriousness to his work that was intensified as he went along."[...</review_text>
Boyz N the Hood is an oustanding movie about a young man named Tre Styles who grows up on the hostile and violent streets of South Central Los Angeles. After a confrontation with a classmate at his school, Tre's mother forces him to go and live with his father Furious. She says, " The last thing I want is to see you end up a drunk hanging out in front of one of these liquor stores or killed. Look at me, I'm serious. I love you. You're my only son." She just can't take his problems anymore.After being dropped off at his fathers place, Tre grows through  5 more years of seeing what hood life is really like making him about 13 years old. All the while Furious tells Tre, "You know Tre you may think I'm being hard on you right now, but I'm not. What I'm doing is trying to teach you how to be responsible. Its like your little friends across the street, they don't have anybody to show them how to do that. And you're gonna see how they end up too."His next door neighbors Chris, Doughboy, and Ricky are very close and all grow up together learning how to survive the streets. Ricky is a high school all star football player and scholar who hopes to get into USC on a scholarship. Meanwhile his brother doughboy on the otherhand becomes a thug involved with a gang (the crips), pushing drugs, boozing 40s (OE), and running his mouth.Ricky and Tre both want to make something of their future while doughboy is just trying to survive. One night at the strip on Crenshaw, a group of bloods are strolling through, and one of them bumps into Ricky on purpose trying to start crap. He says, "F*** you lookin at nigga?" Ricky shouts back, "I'm still trying to find out nigga!" Doughboy hears the confrontation taking place, rushes up with his homeboys right by his side and says "We got a problem here? We got a problem? He pulls aside his coat flashing a .45 concealed in his pants and flashes gang signs.The bloods flash gang signs back. Doughboy pulls back the slide on his gat (cocking it). The gangsters give him a dirty look, turn their backs and walk away. Right when the crowds are ready to leave, the bloods open the trunk of their tricked out hyundai and fire a fully automatic uzi in the air. Ricky and Tre drive off together saying, "can't go nowhere without getting all shot up and crap." They get pulled over and hassled by the cops. Tre drives over to his girlfriends house and he shows sad and angry emotions. She comforts him and they end up making love.About 15-20 minutes near the end of the movie, Rickys wife asks him to go the the convenience store to get some cornmeal. He walks a few blocks from his house with tre and walks out of the store with the cornmeal, a container of milk, and several lottery tickets. Ricky and Tre are walking back home and Ricky is totally unaware that his SAT scores for college are waiting for him when he gets home. He scored just enough to get him accepted into USC. The red hyundai pulls up on a side street and the bloods inside are saying, "Theres that bastard that was talking smack the other night." The gangsters grab their guns and the car peels out around the corner catching Ricky and Tre running and ducking into an alley near a wooden fence down the street. The fellas inside the car are shouting, "Cut him off man. Lets kill him. Come on man, go." The leader of the gang steps on the gas and the car races down the street after them. Doughboy and his homies are waiting on the porch chilling when the red car races past with its system booming.Doughboy knows something is up and he races inside, grabs his gat, and the guys jump into the car, racing to find Ricky & Tre. Ricky and Tre are walking down the alley. Ricky is finishing scratching off his lottery ticket when the car full of bloods pulls up. Tre shouts, "RICKY!" Ricky sees the car, drops his bag, and runs as fast as he can away from the car. By that time it is too late. A 12 gauge shotgun gets raised and blasts two shots. The first one hits him in the legs to cripple him and the 2nd shot hits him blowing a hole in his chest, knocking him to the ground.There is so much blood all over. Tre tries to comfort him Ricky and keep him concious as Doughboys car pulls up. Ricky dies in Tres arms and they take him home. Rickys mother comes unglued and the mom thinks that Doughboy is the one who shot him. She starts beating on him like crazy. Tre pulls him away from her on the porch. Tres clothes are covered from head to toe in blood and he tells Doughboy "meet me at my house in 5 minutes." Tres girlfriend tries to stop him to see whats up and he tells her to go home. Tre walks into his fathers bedroom and loads a .357 magnum. He wants to kill the guys responsible for murdering his best friend right in front of him.Furious does his best to stop Tre from commiting murder by confronting him in the living room and demands him to hand the gun over. Tre falls into his dads arms and begins sobbing. His dad says, "Your my only son and I'm not gonna lose you to any crap. I love you man. Go clean yourself up. Go on." Tre goes back to his bedroom knowing that his buddies are outside waiting for him in the car. He jumps out the window and runs to the car jumping in the back of the car. They race off and his father and buddy Chris are thinking, "oh shoot." Tres father is very nervous because he knows what the guys plan to do after the tragic & bloody afternoon. Tre does a lot of thinking in the backseat and orders his friends to pull over the car and let him out. They do as he wants. The guys in the car let him out and they drive off into the night looking for the thugs who murdered his friend. They pull into a burger joint and find the gangsters outside eating burgers at a table. They load & cock a fully automatic AK-47, turn off the lights on the car, and pull a drive by shooting on every single person at the table. The car comes to a screeching halt, doughboy cocks his sidearm and runs up to the surviving gangsters and murders every single one of them in cold blood.They peel out of the parking lot and the following morning Tre ends up talking to Tre about how hard it is to break the cycle of violence growing up in the hood. Doughboy says, "They sure pushed the clock on Rick man. I ain't got no brother. Next thing you know somebody might try to smoke me. Don't matter though. We all gotta go sometime huh?" Tre tries to comfort him by saying, "Hey dough. You still got one brother left man." Doughboy says, "Thanks man." Doughboy and Tre embrace with a hug. Doughboy walks away pouring out his bottle of OE as an homage to his mudered brother and then a message comes up on the screen saying "2 weeks later doughboy is murdered." How sad. Personally I didn't like the ending. It wants to get out the message that the violence never seems to stop. Tre & his girl survive and go to college out of state later in the fall. A very powerful and moving story that should be shown to every young man & woman near high school age. Although the movie has a lot of language and is very violent, it has an important message that needs to get across to everyone."INCREASE THE PEACE</review_text>
This movie may not be for everyone, but to me it's highly memorable.POSSIBLE SPOILER ALERT:This isn't your ordinary "travel back in time to alter the futures of people you care about"-flick (Back to the Future--although, granted, it was better made and more entertaining).Butterfly Effect is really about (in alphabetical order) acceptance, chance, charity, choice, grownup love, hope, identity, opportunity, regret, and sacrifice.Some reviewers mentioned the quality of acting.  Here are my thoughts:Kutcher to me always seemed an innocent, caring, small town fellow more than the fun guy most of us might know him as, and that's why I wasn't surprised to see him pull off this role.Amy Smart was good mostly, but glaringly off-key at times (granted she had to show more range the the other actors)</review_text>
I really can't say anything new that hasn't been said about this great movie, except read Jean Shepherd's novels...you will get a whole new appreciation for the movie and the characters that have become a part of so many of our lives.Thank you Darren McGavin for giving us the best Christmas Present ever</review_text>
I've loved this movie since the first time I saw it. If you like Jack Nicholson and Meryl Streep, you won't be dissappointed with this movie.</review_text>
Ted is a lonely bellhop. He's got the whole hotel all to himself on New Year's eve. So, what else can he do but be the lap dog for every requesting customer. But, he only has to worry about four particular, and sometimes peculiar, rooms. Each room is a story involving ted, directed by four different directors. Call it a collaboration of different comedic talents. So, let's go through them, one by one.Story one: The Secret ingriediantNot really much to go on here. A coven of witches are trying to ressurect some virgin wicth who was wrongly accused of a crime. Not really that funny. It's a bumpy start but it gets better. ted stays the same goofy self all through the movie.Story Two: the wrong man.A mistaken identity sex game in which ted accidently found himself in. Constantly he tries to escape the room. Funnier than the last one. Still bumpy, though.Story Three: The Misbehavers (Directed by Robert Rodriguez)Funny story of a couple leaving their kids in the room to go celabrating the new years eve at a party. These kids are bad news. They get their hands into any and everything. Poor ted runs rampant to make sure they won't misbehave or else the father will kill him. ted at his best here. hilarity incarnate. Explosively funny.Story four: The Bet (Directed by Quentin Tarantino.)An after hours new years eve party with a witty group of filmakers who have had too much to drink. Quentin stars. Bruce willis too. Ted stays the same, quirky and naive as well. Funny and different, but quick on the jokes. There is one take where there is just one uncut shot, lasting well over ten minutes. They must've rehearsed that one for hours.the overall feel of the movie is unique and full of laughs.Enjoy</review_text>
THis is one of my favorite movies. Besides containing a stellar cast (Matthew McConaughey, Sandra Bullock, Sammuel L. Jackson, Oliver Platt, DOnald AND Keifer Sutherland, Kevin Spacey) You get the idea. Is there a cast member that ISN't a biggie? The casting is Genious, and the acting incredible. It's suspenseful, deep, VERY emotional.. slightly dark.. it's the perfect movie. Even the rape scene is well done by being comfortably vague while still haunting you.A Time to kill's plot is pretty simply explained.  In the deep south, a 10 year old black girl is raped by two wite rednecks, who almost kill her. A young white lawyer and father (Matthew McConaughey as Jake Brigance) is sickened at the news, and doesn't quite know what to think when the little girl's father (Sammuel L. Jackson as Carl Lee Hailey) pays him a visit and asks if he'd "help him if he were in a tight spot".  The next day as the two redneck/monsters are being led up the stairs of the courthouse to their arraignment, Carl Lee Hailey pops out of a storage clauset with a machine gun and blows away the two young men that raped his daugher.Jake Brigance agrees to defend Hailey as his murder trial begins. The insanity plea is used to "give the jury an excuse to aquit" But in my opinion, I think it was quite legitimate. What father WOULDN't be driven insane under the circumstances?  the rest of the movie is Carl Lee Hailey's trial and the surrounding Drama as KKK violence emerges led by Kiefer Sutherland, and Jake's life and home are in danger, his relationship with his wife strained, and his career are seriously on the line in what seems to be a loosing battle.My favorite scene? It might come as a surprise, but my favorite scene is when the Prosecution calls to the stand the policeman who was leading the two rednecks up the stairs to their trial. He was caught in the knee by a stray bullet, and now has half a leg.  After the prosecution use the witness to incite rage against Carl Lee, and establish unerring identity of the shooter, The Defence asks him two questions."Do you think Carl Lee intentionally shot you?""No""Do you think he should be sent to prision for what he did?""He did what I would have done."but it doesn't end there as the Policeman (remember he's missing a leg because of what Carl Lee Hailey Did) becomes very emotional and boldly confesses that if someone raped his little girl he would blow him away just like Carl Lee did. He starts screaming to the jury to "turn him loose, He's a hero!"  I think this is one of the most emotion packed and well acted scenes (albeit there are many others too) (Great acting by Chris Cooper as the policeman)Anyway.. forgive if I rambled. I love this movie and if you like courtroom dramas... star studded casts.. John Grisham...suspense thrillers..just all around good movies.. You need to see this.</review_text>
This is a great "feel good" movie, but Hollywood altered the story for theatricality.  In the film, a group of students who are having difficulties with simple fractions are brought up, in one year, to become calculus winners.There is a good backgroud article at:http://reason.com/0207/fe.jj.stand.shtmlthat describes how the process took ten years, so that the original group of future-burger-flipping students were not the ones who passed the AP calculus exam.  Jaime Escalante (played by Edward James Olmos of "Miami Vice" fame) actually built up the system of excellence one grade at a time, reaching back to the junior high school that fed Garfield High.The way that the movie was done, however, allows the viewers to see some of the decision-making processes that the students went through in understanding that they could achieve and did have a chance in life to be more than others around them, especially their parents.Remarkably, at one point there were as many as 400 students enrolled in math enrichment classes under Escalante's leadership.  That's 400 fewer future employees for KFC and MacDonald's.  (As Escalante said in one of his taunts to a reluctant student, "So tough guys don't do math - tough guys deep fry chicken for a living?")Eventually, it appears that the Education Establishment won out, driving the brilliant teacher out, and sending the kids back to a guaranteed failed future.The idea is great, that no student should be regarded as hopeless, and that all should be encouraged to try, but obviously there is a lot more work involved in that goal than this movie shows.</review_text>
This is an important and well presented video tape documentary on the Panama Canal. It is also about how the United States was instrumental in the following: assisting Panama independence from Colombia, completing the canal project where the French failed, establishing U.S. geopolitical interests in Panama, e.g., military bases and improving trade relations throughout the world by the Panama Canal transit waterway</review_text>
i had never seen this movie, and i dont know why! freddie bartholomew (top-billed as a teen!) is an obnoxious rich kid who falls overboard and is rescued by portuguese fisherman spencer tracy. over the next few months a bond forms between the two that is both honest and touching. a terrific olio of pathos, comedy, melodrama, and good common sense make victor flemings adaptation of the rudyard kipling novel (which im embarrassed to admit i never read) one of the best movies ive seen. great supporting work by lionel barrymore, john carradine, mickey rooney, melvyn douglas, more. and freddie is quite the beauty here. a winner!</review_text>
This is my favorite film of all time!I am sad to say that most people have never even heard of it -It was an Acadamy Award winner, so I don't understand why it's not gotten much attention over the years...I find it  superior to other classics which seem to have withstood the test of time better than Captains Courageous.I don't know why this is the case, but I am it's biggest advocate - urging all my friends to see it...It is a wonderful and moving story, that will bring me to tears time and time again the same way as "It's a Wonderful Life Does"...If you have strong values and a warm heart - this movie is for you!Do not miss it</review_text>
Be sure to catch the Alternate views on Disk 2.  The view from the control booth with the director losing his mind, in a good way, is great.  They also have A Beautiful Day from the rooftop in Boston</review_text>
This movie shows the real life hell that was Andersonville.  A prison camp that turned into a death camp. Not enough food,water or shelter for all the prisoners sent there. The south was losing the war so they had no provisions or men to assist in the detainment of these captured soldiers. Basically letting them rot slowly inside the walls that confinded them. A well acted movie which shows the hell that can come from wa</review_text>
"I gather there are some people beyond that darkness out there, but if I don't look you in the eye it's because I don't see you, I only see the darkness."That quote is found toward the beginning of "Manufacturing Consent" and is taken from a lecture Chomsky was about to give in an auditorium where apparently no house lights were available. I'm unsure if anything more revealing was intended by Chomsky's opening comment, although it's impossible not to read something more into it.The breadth of information offered in "Manufacturing Consent" is manifold, shedding light on two primary subjects.One: Noam Chomsky, his life, childhood, his anarchist convictions which fueled his decision early on to place a lesser degree of import on an easy going, comfortable career in linguistics in favor of an uncertain, often tumultuous life of political activism and dissent.Two: The oligarchy in which existence is ensnared. The necessary illusions which are implemented to deceive and brainwash the populace, tricking them into believing that they actually have a representative form of democratic government and indeed have a hand in decision making policy.And of course, the media; a broad apparatus used to manufacture the people's consent, ensuring that an appropriate percentage of the populace will be effectively indoctrinated and hoodwinked into supporting the agenda of the ruling class and its military power, or, will be effectively depoliticized, tuned out and away from crucial matters which directly impact the quality of social and individuated life.Most of what is seen on television, be it news, sports, situation comedies, movies, whatever the programming, serve as little more than an advertisement for a specific mindset resulting in a strategically wished for outcome.At one point someone asks Chomsky "how do the elites control the media?" He replies, "how do elites control GM? ...because they own it." Look at institutional power as an entity: they have their own "news" division. In fact, it's THEE news division. Naturally those who comprise this power structure at all of its various levels understand that to serve the proper role, especially if one wishes to "get ahead" is *not* to actively undermine the structure's agenda by telling the truth and revealing its own crimes."Manufacturing Consent" is a remarkable film. You see Chomsky interacting with all sorts of people, students, interviewers, average people who he's inspired, and even those who obviously despise him for daring to speak a truth which conflicts with prevailing (media induced) ideology, one that their own self deceptive belief structure demand be untrue in order to maintain a delusional, happy consciousness.As Chomsky asks, "do the facts matter, or don't they?"For him it comes down to a single question: Can you look at yourself in the mirror?Another telling moment comes when Chomsky is asked to recall a childhood incident which left an indelible impression. He tells of a time where the standard fat kid was being picked on at the playground with everyone taunting him as someone's older brother was on the way to beat him up, and Chomsky was impelled to do the right thing, so he went and stood next to the fat kid as a display of solidarity, but was eventually intimidated and walked away. He says the shame he felt for doing so never went away, has always stayed with him, and that the lesson learned was to never do that again, and that you always stand with the underdog."As any change must begin somewhere, it is the single individual who will experience it and carry it through." ~ Carl Jung</review_text>
A new documentary film that won the 2005 Grand Jury Prize at the Sundance Film Festival now in nationwide release features a warning from this nation's 34th president about the unwarranted influence on U.S. foreign policy from the nation's numerous military contractors and is gaining praise from civil libertarians across the nation as that influence on world affairs is still obvious to all of us in today's times.The film is called `Why We Fight,' a title the documentary filmmaker took from a series of World War 2 propaganda films made by Frank Capra.  It opens with the January 17, 1961 farewell address to the country by President Dwight Eisenhower who was about to turn over the keys to the White House to a young newcomer named John Kennedy.The remarks made by the outgoing chief executive from the Oval Office was the last talk to the nation by the one time five-star Army general before returning to private life.  What's interesting in the speech is the candor he exhibited about what he believed to be the growing cozy relationship between military suppliers and those politicians in Congress who liked to keep the constituents in their districts happy with large contracts for the making of weapons and supplies.  That, in turn, would keep those contractors and the leaders in the military pleased because they would keep getting improved weapons to counter the growing Cold War threat they believed they faced from the Soviet Union.The phrase Ike used, `the military-industrial complex,' has since become synonymous with the growing influence by military weapon suppliers on eager politicians wanting campaign donations for their coffers and jobs for their districts and the eagerness of those politicians to keep purchasing more and more weapons from these same suppliers.It's obvious the World War 2 hero who commanded the Allied military invasion of Europe that defeated Nazism knew what he was talking about when he warned his fellow citizens that `we must guard against the acquisition of unwarranted influence, whether sought or unsought, by the military industrial complex.' Unfortunately, for us citizens who believe a rising police state has developed in the four decades since.Eisenhower is considered by many of today's historians as an amiable military dunce who only knew how to operate in an Army setting so let the political experts in his administration make the decisions to run this country in his eight years in office in a similar fashion to that of a highly successful corporate CEO letting his underlings run the show while he spends most of his time visiting stockholders in cheerleading sessions to keep their stock value high.  But it's now apparent that he was much shrewder than originally believed in his dealings with Congress and the military bureaucracy he found in Washington during his tenure and what he felt was a growing threat against the unique political power of the president in setting American foreign policy and what the military need for defense.The ninety-eight minute film then uses interviews with contemporary figures as diverse as Gore Vidal, John McCain, Richard Perle and William Kristol to showcase the filmmakers opinion that we still have too many Americans believing that the concept of never-ending war is good for the American economy and our nation's foreign policy goals that is transposed with historic footage and material regarding why we are currently in the conflict in faraway Iraq.Dwight Eisenhower recognized the horrors of war and his farewell warning to the American people and his successors not to be taken in by those who promote the perpetual re-armament of our military so we can always be stronger than our perceived enemies still resonates with great force today.  It's a sad commentary that in the forty-five years since he left office with that dire prediction that so few of our politicians chose to listen.</review_text>
This is, by far, the best "beginners" video I have ever done. I am a HUGE fan of the FIRM workouts; their approach is based on science, they have a diverse selection (I own over 30 FIRM videos and DVDs), their instructors know what they're doing, and most of all, THEY WORK. These workouts, combined with the sensible FIRM eating plan (it is NOT a diet, but a practical plan based on the food pyramid) helped me quit smoking without gaining a pound...in fact, I lost weight and was in the best shape of my life. Now that I'm planning to quit again, these videos are the first things I'm pulling out of my "toolbox." Tracy Long is one of the best instructors the FIRM had; she gives excellent demonstration and information regarding form and "how to's," and I find her quiet style preferable to hyper cheerleader types. She remains a great inspiration for me</review_text>
If you take your humor blackGrab your Kona and sit backWatch Chili Palmer work his hustleAs Ray Barboni's hired muscleHe's looking for Leo DevoeA dry cleaner who ought to knowThat when you've markers that are due,You pay them off - that's what you doHe missed a fatal airplane crashFaked his death and took the cashFled Miami for LAAnd Chili goes to make him payHe takes a side job, Harry Zimm(Gene Hackman, remember him?)Who makes a deal with Chili P.To co-produce his next movie.Now Chili Palmer's really hookedWhen at the movie biz he lookedHe even had a movie themeAbout old Leo's crazy schemeBefore they even film one take,Harry Zimm, that sleazy snakeinvolves Bo Catlett with his goonpromising the guy the moonNow Bo Catlett's a slimy catDealing drugs is where he's atHe's got drug money stashed awayWhere the Feds watch it all dayBut then he made another blunderThe delivery boy is six feet underIn comes Mr. Escobar,a caricature of a big drug czarSo now it's all about the doughBut Mr. Lovejoy's still a goKaren Flores used her linkFor Martin Weir to sign in inkWeir's a major movie starShort as cake, below the barIt's called "Get Shorty" after himVapid, vain and oh so dimWith Gandolfini and Bette MidlerThis one's no boring finger twiddlerBig on laughs and full of actionYou'll find it to your satisfaction.Amanda Richards, September 11, 200</review_text>
The traveling plot seemed like a take-off of 'Trains, Planes, and Automobiles' - traveling from NY to Savannah vs traveling from Chicago to NY. Same sequence: airplane delays, then train occurrence, then bus, then jalopy-type car. But, since I totally enjoyed the Steve Martin movie, I also enjoyed 'Forces of Nature'. The writer even threw in some weather and fire, same as 'Trains, Planes, and Automobiles'. Because of the similarities, I rated it four stars instead of five.I thought the movie was cute and I like both Sandra Bullock and Ben Affleck. I saw the movie as being typical of infatuation with a good-looking person to whom we've been thrown together with for a brief unlikely encounter and of indecisiveness prior to the marrage ceremony , but Ben was, indeed, committed to his fiance and to his future, which was a positive attribute on his behalf.Unlike some other reviewers who stated commitment was void, I felt it was very much stated in this movie, in spite of other's around them having their own relationships fall apart.Sarah's life was to be her son and her relationship with him - to build it up after some years of absence. The movie ended correctly. Everyone got what they wanted.Gail Gupton, Author: 'The 31-Day Diet of Spiritual Enlightenment', and 'Seekers of Truth'.</review_text>
This is by far one of the very best musicals ever made. Kathryn Grayson and Howard Keel displays Oscar worthy performances as Lilli and Fred. Sadly, this was Grayson`s last MGM film and she did only 1 more(at Paramount - The Vagabond King with Oreste).In KISS ME KATE she shows us a depth and nuance and is right on target the whole picture through. Audrey Hepburn won that year`s Oscar for Roman Holiday - but Miss Grayson should deservedly have won it.The same goes for Howard Keel. True, he is hammy at times - but it is a remarkable performance he gives(Mind u - he was a musical star). William Wolden`s Oscar for Stalag 17 should have gone to Mr Keel.That`s Entertainment and its sequels payed deservedly homage to producer Arthur Freed and his genius in selecting and delegating crew and performers to the right project were uncanny.Yet you shouldn`t negletct Jack Cummings who produced this film, Seven Brides For Seven Brothers and Three Little Words(to name but a few). It seems to me that MGM had an "MGM-look!" Can u really tell the MGM films from 1930-1960 apart and say which 1 was the director? Not really, unless u are Hitchcock or Fritz Lang.What I mean to say that it`s high time Cummings, Joe Pasternak og Sol C. Sigel comes out of the cold and are giving honours for their splendid musical efforts(Bathing Beauty, Anchors Aweigh, In the Good Old Summertime, Summer Stock, The Great Caruso, Hit The Deck and High Society etc).I must also pay may respects to Tommy Rall(soon 2 be one of the brothers in Seven Brides for Seven Brothers); he is a dancer`s dream come true:-</review_text>
I remember watching Anne of Green Gables when I was a little girl with my sister, over and over again. Laughing everytime Anne broke her slate on Gilberts head, or when she accidently dyed her hair green, or when she waxes poetic about her "bosom friend". It made me smile and laugh then and still does now as a 25 year old. I would recommend this movie for anyone young or old. It is a beautiful heartwarming movie, with gorgeous scenery, unforgettable characters, and plenty of moments to laugh and cry</review_text>
15 Minutes is worth the money.  It probably will not be the number one DVD in your collection, but you're sure to go back and watch it from time to time.  This film gives an interesting, if not frightening, look at the role mass-media play in our country's daily life.  We don't think about it, since we are living it... but this film gives us a view of someone who might not be used to the faced paced, 24-hour news cycle lifestyle that most of us live today.At the center of the movie's plot is a greedy, slick breaking-news style anchor who is given the 'gift' of being the only personality in town to have the near-realtime footage of a string of murders, as they are being committed.  He has a moral pause, only for a second, before he unabashedly trumpets the news to the entire world.  The rest of the movie deals with the minds of the killers and the techniques used by the authorites to catch them.  All in all.. not the best movie out there.. but worth the money.</review_text>
First heard his stand-up on CD when I worked at Borders a few years back.  Sometimes he gets a bit carried away (a lotta comics tend to, though), and his comedy comes across dopey, yet easy to relate to.  Clean (no naughty words or uncouth situations here!), family-fun comedy (dirty or clean, as long as a comedian can deliver to the audience well, then he/she is funny in my eyes)</review_text>
thoroughly enjoyed this product, have already watched it numerous times.  Highly recommend this to any chick fan</review_text>
Hey if you have all seen the works of Argento and Fulci then you probably understand how illogical GIALLO is. This was not always the case and some of them come across as quite alright in the end. I would actually recommend this Argento 'primative slasher' over Fulci's "Don't Torture a Duckling" - not anywhere near as good as its GIALLO hype, this version of The Bird With the Crystal Plumage I watched was uncut and a lot more violent than the PG version that has less murder violence, but is still dark all the same. Although I give this five stars, it is more of a three star movie, but this is the one that started a whole cult wave of stuff like this, and for that it is recognized and prized, but you have seen better Argento and GIALLO, I recommend that you get SUSPERIA before this. I say stay away from "Don't Torture a Duckling"</review_text>
With a cable modem, took about 1 hour and 15 minutes to download Unbox, install the program and download the episode.  It's a great download speed considering the file is 803 mb.  I was able to still use my computer, IE 7.0 and RealPlayer, so the download is not a resource hog.  The menu bar includes a link to shop for more Unbox titles, which I found very convenient.The quality is great, but the video stutters in Unbox.  Maybe because it uses 3 applications when playing video?  I chose to watch the episode on Windows Media Player 11 and I had no problems at all.I've bought and watched 3 episodes, all with the same results.  Fast and unobstrusive download, great quality and low price.  Just use WMP, or another player that can handle wma files, to watch.</review_text>
Anthony Hopkins is absolutely riveting as Adolf Hitler.  He captures all of Hitler's mannerisms, quirks, and facial expressions.  My only complaint is that he doesn't use a German accent.  The production is poor, and there are some flaws in the story.  For example, Albert Speer is made out to be almost a hero in the film.  It has been proven that there was actually no assassination attempt made by Speer.  The guy who plays Joseph Goebbels is horrible, one of the worst acting jobs I've seen.  But overall the acting is great, and the performance by Hopkins makes this movie worth owning</review_text>
This a wonderful movie. I had never seen it before. I am 65 and was a teenager in the fifties and an avid movie goer. Some of these old black and white films bring back memories of a time when life seemed to begin every moment. It was a time after the war and people were just beginning to discover each other. The old Italian movies had a grittiness to them. A reality from far away places where life just had a different style. La Strada and the Nights of Cabiria were from this time. I feel such a pull watching them, wishing things had never become so modern. The Bicycle Thieves belongs in this catagory. The reproduction is marvelous. Clean and smooth. I am glad that this movie has been restored. Its a beautiful piece of the past.</review_text>
This is the original version of this film with David Niven, Peter Sellers, Woody Allen and other very familiar faces.  The film is nothing at all like the 2006 version which was very good.  But Ian Fleming intended his 007 to be a non-serious serious agent.  Excellent film and I heartily recommend it.  My 20-something grandson is a 007 fan and he really liked this movie; had to have the DVD after seeing it on TV</review_text>
Suspenseful erotic thriller with Neve Campbell, Matt Dillon, Kevin Bacon and Denise Richards. Has the teacher Sam Lombardo raped his pupil Kelly Van Ryan? Or does the spoilt gal want revenge for being rejected? The movie with the many twists and turns. Brilliant story. The resolution only comes in the final credits</review_text>
Great movie.  Hard to believe what C. Bale did to his body to make this film so realistic.  Great photographic work</review_text>
movies was good however the quality of the film was not very good.  screen was very cloudy at times and it was hard to see some things and the sound was not very good.  the story it self was moving.---thk</review_text>
As a girl from Russia i want to tell - this is a very good movie about turning point of my Fatherland's histor</review_text>
It all started with John Malkovich. Me seeing the movie I mean, not the film itself. I was scanning through Malkovich's filmography and saw this film in their. I had heard of the film, but had no idea what it was about but I checked it out. Malkovich is close to top billing, but his role is really small...Having said that, this was an amazing film. Truly a work of art. The movie stars Sam Waterston ('Serial Mom') playing Sydney Schanberg, a New York Times columnist who heads to Cambodia on the brink of war. Bombs have been dropped, labor camps have been set up and Schanberg wants to write about all of it. When he gets there he meets Dith Pran (Haing S. Ngor, who won an Oscar for the role), who becomes his friend and interpreter. Malkovich plays Schanberg's photographer Al Rockoff; His role is brief, but he leaves his mark. After Schanberg's war entraps himself and his fellow journalists, Pran saves him from being executed but is himself placed in a labor camp. The script is based on a New York Times article by Schanberg called The Death and Life of Dith Pran. When I saw that, I figured this would be a rather depressing story. Truth is, the film is quite uplifting. The choice to use John Lennon's "Imagine" for the final scene was perfect. Anyway, back to the synopsis...Schanberg is back in New York, while Pran slaves at the labor camp. Schanberg has no idea whether Pran is alive or dead, but doesn't give up on the idea of one day reuniting with his friend. Most films that take place in this setting, I'm not a big fan of. I'm not saying I didn't like these films, but movies like The Constant Gardener and Beyond Borders are a bit like this movie. Although, for the record, this film is way better. Having said those last two things I was surprised that I liked this film. Whether you're a fan of these kinds of movies or not, you need to see this. It's an important and uplifting movie, that no one should not see.GRADE: A</review_text>
This episode is a classic, and is one of the best in the series. It explores time travel and alternate time lines, and it's storytelling had paved the way for many screen plays that followed.</review_text>
This film seems to be known worldwide as a "chick flick", from the romantic aspects of it, to the current anniversary DVD's pink cover.I'm an 18 year old guy who absolutely digs this film, especially due to the Holly Golightly character. After viewing this film for the first time, I developed a crush on the character Holly (kind of goofy, I guess, but it's very hard for me to dislike a character like her.) Audrey Hepburn played her to perfection. The film was also brilliantly shot by Franz Planer and directed by Blake Edwards. I love the film's dialogue as well, it has a very realistic quality, and it's so fun to hear the characters converse with each other."Breakfast At Tiffany's" is perhaps the best "date" movie ever conceived.  This film is an absolute classic that is worth subsequent viewings and it will never age.</review_text>
I finally made my first purchase from Amazon's Unbox Video Downloads just to try the service and am happy to report a solid customer experience. For $1.99, I purchased and downloaded one of my favorite episodes of "The Twilight Zone", and it took about twenty minutes to download through a broadband connection. I don't think it's the most ideal way to see full-length motion pictures, but for a 26-minute classic TV program, I think my 17" LCD monitor makes for a suitable viewing experience, and the video quality of the downloaded file is clean.Aired on September 15, 1961 as the show's third season opener, the episode is a Cold War fantasy appropriately called "Two" about the last two survivors on earth, a man and a woman, after an apocalyptic world war in 2109. Written and directed by TV veteran Montgomery Pittman, the simple plot revolves around the complicating fact that he is an American infantryman and she is an invading Russian soldier. Like two feral animals, they glare at each other among the debris of a deserted town destroyed by the war. He even knocks her out her after she aggressively throws pots and pans at him. The reality of their solitary existence, however, gradually dawns on them, especially after they see an evening dress in a shop window inspiring her to speak her only word of dialogue - "Prekrassnyi" - the Russian word for "lovely".What really makes this episode memorable is the unlikely casting. Two years before she twitched her nose on "Bewitched", a brunette Elizabeth Montgomery, looking appropriately ravaged and sporting a deadly ray gun, plays the untrusting Russian soldier with surprising fierceness and vulnerability. The American is played by perennial tough-guy Charles Bronson, fresh from "The Magnificent Seven". Even though he has to spout some inane philosophical lines to describe the futility of war, he leavens his natural sullenness with a determined romanticism. They make an odd couple, but it works splendidly. I also learned that canned fried chicken will become a staple in the 22nd century. Narrated by Rod Serling in his inimitably halting manner, the show ends with my favorite line in his signature postscript: "This has been...a love story." This is classic TV</review_text>
I wanted it for my collection, however you can sift through all the youtube stuff and end up with the same video for free if you want to do the work</review_text>
This film is really excellent, with a great cast, and a thoughtful and frightening message. We see the story of a group of high school boys graduating and then immediately joining the German army to fight in World War I.  The story revolves around Paul Baumer, a thoughtful and sensitive young man who gradually sees so many horrors of war, and loses so many of his friends, that he is transformed into a different person, a war-weary pessimist with no illusions, no dreams, no purpose, and no homeland.  Richard Thomas does a masterful job of playing Paul Baumer. He is supported with a fantanstic cast of actors.  Ernest Borgnine plays the peasant shoe maker who leads their platoon. He is an earthy fatherly survival focused man who does his best to ensure his men have food, rest, shelter, and take no outrageous risks of glory. Paul learns much from this man, who becomes a surrogate father and mentor. Ian Holm plays a military school drill instructor who is a sadist. Eventually his sadism goes too far and he is sent to the front lines where he exhibits cowardly actions that ironically result in his receiving a medal from the Kaiser. Patricia Neal plays Paul's dying mother. Paul has seen so much death that he is only able to show dispassionate empathy with his mother and tells her lies about the front lines so that she does not die of cancer worrying about her son. Donald Pleasance plays a high school instructor who fills the heads of young men on concepts of national glory, heroism, manhood, and other nonsense to which 18 year old boys fall victim.The oddessey of pain is carefully told as Paul experiences one loss and disillusionment after another. The tired eyes of the German infantry speak volumes as the Kaiser urges them on to give their lives for the fatherland. Paul's return home is a wonderful turn in the film as he finds that his father and the older fellows have no idea of the reality and horror of the war. They make simplistic overgeneralized comments such as 'the war will be won if we surround them' and other such nonsense. Paul's eyes glaze over as they discuss these abstractions while his young friends die in the muddy trenches. Paul's best friend, a gymnast and forrester, dies after a leg amputation. Paul tells his mother a story that her son died immediately and painlessless, which is far from the truth. She makes Paul swear by everything he holds sacred that this is the truth. He does so. Then she makes him swear by his own safe return home that this story is the truth. Again, he does so. In this extremely painful scene we see that Paul has beent totally transformed by the war. He no longer believes in anything but his ability to periodically protect himself and others against random and senseless violence and pain. He also realizes that he is no longer able to feel comfortable in his past or in the land of the living away from the war. He returns to the front lines fully expecting that the random nature of war may soon take him.Exceptionally well done, this is a film every family should see. It is only when peopel face the reality of war rather than the abstractions that war would ever end.</review_text>
This is a monumental movie that helped to shape the identity of Jamaica after its independence from Britain.  The character work is very good and the plot gets more and more interesting as the movie goes on.  To top it up, the soundtrack on this movie is trully great.The only negative with this particular DVD is that it is slightly below par for a Criterion transfer.  Having seen quite a few Criterions, I can say that I was not particularly impressed with the quality on that one.  I am sure though that Criterion must have done the best they could with whatever "raw" material they had available</review_text>
NUTS is a great movie from Barbra Streisand. One of her best acting performances! The movie is about a high class call girl named Claudia (Barbra Streisand) who kills a client in self defense. Her parents want to avoid scandal by having her declared mentally incompetant to stand trial. After attacking her attorney, her case is taken over by a legal aide attorney (Richard Dreyfuss). Claudia doesn't do much to help her case, with her constant outbursts in the courtroom. It was a really well done drama, with an interesting plot and good acting all around</review_text>
This two parter commemorates the  10th anniversary of the Arthur show on PBS. It's nice, they could have gone cheesy and just recycled old footage but they decied to be subtle about it. Really the only thing that specifically makes this a 10th anniversary show is the fact that there are '10's hidden throughout each episodes kind of like how Marc Brown hides the names of friends and family in his picture books. It's nice to see them both together too (episodes 1 & 2), I think they aired them seperately on TV</review_text>
What else could you expect from the belgian's... buy hey, jean-claude, at the premiere of cyborg you let me and my cousin in the rain.  You were stuck in brussels... so, i'll still owe you a signed poster ;)This movie is what it's all about, off course, bruce lee was widely known.  But this one is trully magnificent... the story is based on a true-story, the movements are very very athletic and beautifull... to make it short...THIS MOVIE HAS IT ALL !!!More from this please instead of such stupid movies were chinese men make 7 flips in once while throwing some stars on top off a bus for example...This movie let's you see what it really is... ART !!</review_text>
Okay, for all those who are fans of the Orwell classic, you have to understand how difficult this tale is to bring to the big or small screen.  We're dealing with talking animals relating to humans.  This tale is too deep for the "movie public" and ANY movie will fall short for true purists.Taking it for what it is, it is an accurate depiction of the novel.  The reviewer who didn't see Moses the Raven in the story must have watched a different film.It is really difficult to get people today to feel the horror of what Animal Farm represented when originally written.  Take that and put it under the Hallmark label and it can be just plain confusing for those who haven't read the novel.I truly enjoyed this film.  I reccomend it for all.  Even if it is a little difficult to follow.  Unlike the box says, it is NOT for children</review_text>
I viewed this film a few years ago when I had nothing to do and found this to be a masterpiece.  Luis Buuel's direction is unique.  I found that the main character's desposition changes his love for the woman.  When she gets him angry, we see one woman.  When she makes him happy, we see a different woman in the same character.  I don't think I've seen a movie quite like this.  This movie will stay with you for some time, especially if you have a broken heart.</review_text>
I've enjoyed the black humor of the various Texas Chainsaw movies, but the gas was running out when this one was made. Still there are some fairly funny moments and in-jokes. Matt's performance is a definite highlight. It's worth a look</review_text>
Prepare yourself for an illuminating evening which begins in an upscale New York bar but slowly degenerates into visiting some of the more unseamly locations of the big city. The story revolves around Rodger (Campbell Scott), an egotistic, insecure, overly analytical wordsmith who has just been dumped by his female boss (Isabella Rossellini). His sixteen year old nephew Nick (Jesse Eisenberg) unexpectedly shows up in his office and Roger decides to break the young boy in 'New York Style.' Prepare for a crash course in how to pick up a woman as taught in the sometimes alluring, often times sleazy world of Uncle Roger, the proverbial lounge lizzard.Dialogue is everything in this film and most of it comes from the incredibly glib and searing tongue of the recently scorned Roger who has yet to learn how to deal with rejection. Roger is the self-proclaimed prophet of the "Gender Wars" and is determined to teach his naive nephew how to cope with the opposite sex. This is as close to a one-man-show as you can get and Campbell Scott pulls it off in amazing fashion.This is a film that demands your full attention. The dialogue comes fast and furious and you really don't want to miss a thing in this somewhat pessimistic but well contructed production</review_text>
Flesh and Bone is an evocative, haunting and rewarding study of a drifting man (played with understated, heartbreaking perfection by Dennis Quaid) who encounters a lost soul (Meg Ryan, outstanding)leaving a violent marriage and begins a tender relationship until a dark figure from his past shows up.Plotted an as slow burning thriller, this is really more of a complex and intriguing character study of guilt, father-son ties, violent crime and doomed love. Flesh and Bone is a bleak but supremely well crafted film that reaches a truly sad (though inevitable) conclusion. The final moment between our two main characters is incredibly moving (in a very unsentimental sort of way) and a scene that I will never forget. I didnt mind the major plot twist as its no more unbelievable that a dozen of Hollywood's most praised suspense thrillers. The spare, atmospheric photography (set in a desolate, bleak Texas) is exceptional and Thomas Newman's suberb score will get under your skin.For those who wont something altogether deeper, affecting and more emotionally satisfying with their thrillers (or love stories), Flesh and Bone should be ripe for rediscovery.</review_text>
"Shampoo" is probably the most sophisticated sex comedy ever made in this country. It's a very clear-eyed (and very funny) look at how love and lust get inextricably mixed up with up with power, money, position, and politics. Of course, contrary to almost every critique posted here, George (Warren Beatty), the philandering Beverly Hills hairdresser, is the primary victim of the rules of the game, late-60s Southern California-style. Unlike the protagonist of the great Renoir movie, George doesn't end up dead, but he's left alone, abandoned by all the women he's bedded, looking like a naive fool. And that's George's sin--he's an uncynical romantic in a world that doesn't know the difference between felt emotion and deliberate calculation. He sleeps with women because he genuinely likes them. For him, taking a woman to bed is an extension of doing her hair--it's an intimate act in which he makes her look and feel better. All the other characters in the movie use sex as part of a larger plan--they each have some separate goal on their mind, which they achieve in one way or another, and George is left behind with his silly emotional and sexual vulnerabiliy. He's Don Giovanni in reverse--the boy who can't say no because he actually gives a damn--and he pays a steep price for his availability. Playing a slightly out of it dupe, Beatty has never been better or more dazzlingly glamorous. And he's surrounded by a flawless ensemble cast--Lee Grant is simply astonishing as a deceived and deceiving Beverly Hills matron, and Julie Christie, in her flared pants and mini skirts, is peerlessy sexy as the 1968 version of a Rodeo Drive courtesan. Thanks to Robert Towne,  "Shampoo" also has some of the most natural, unforced, yet revealing dialog ever heard in an American movie--nothing is stylized or italicized, but every nonchalant remark hits target like a polished Wilde epigram. Delectable</review_text>
This movie is among the top 10 of my favourite movies of all time!It not only honours the life and achievments of the great Christian man Alvin York, it honours many truths of the Christian faith, God's power to to transform sinners, the virtue of forgiving your enemies, putting God before man, the virtue of earning an honest livelihood.Though it does all this, it is not a "preachy" movie, it simply tells the amazing story of a simple farmer who becomes the greatest hero of WW1.Other movies in my top 10 include: It's a Wonderful Life, Forrest gump, Shawshank Redemption, To End All Wars, Les Misrables.</review_text>
saw this film recently all the way through&the thing that grabs you is the natural way the film is presented in 1970 without compromise or hestiation.strogn writing&acting is what carry this film from start to finish.the pacing of the film keeps your attention from start to finish</review_text>
With a cable modem, took about 1 hour and 15 minutes to download Unbox, install the program and download the episode.  It's a great download speed considering the file is 803 mb.  I was able to still use my computer, IE 7.0 and RealPlayer, so the download is not a resource hog.  The menu bar includes a link to shop for more Unbox titles, which I found very convenient.The quality is great, but the video stutters in Unbox.  Maybe because it uses 3 applications when playing video?  I chose to watch the episode on Windows Media Player 11 and I had no problems at all.I've bought and watched 3 episodes, all with the same results.  Fast and unobstrusive download, great quality and low price.  Just use WMP, or another player that can handle wma files, to watch.</review_text>
easily one of the funniest movies ever made. its incredible today to realize that irene dunne never won an oscar, and this year is the most galling of all, as she lost to the ridiculous luise rainer in "the good earth"; and even more galling to realize that cary grant was not even nominated (after all, its only a comedy, right?) but this is a movie that will never age: it makes me laugh as much today as when i first saw it on television thirty years back, and if id been alive to see it in a theater 70 years ago, the response would be the same. dunne and grant excel as a divorcing couple who sabotage each others new relationships, and randolph scott is a miracle as dunnes new fiancee ("not oklahoma city ITSELF?!"). but it is irene dunne who is the star here, and until such time as "theodora goes wild" and "show boat" are finally released on dvd, this is the best of her 30s roles.</review_text>
If you are a fan of horror movies, the old EC comic books, Stephen King, or just fun movies in general, than look no further than this 1982 classic!=================================================THE MOVIE (5/5):"Creepshow" is an anthology of scary stories-- five of them-- that is bridged together by a sixth tale of a boy who loves horror comics and his abusive dad who hates them. The movie features pitch-perfect performances by an all-star 80's cast that seems to be having a lot of fun being in this scream of a movie. The stories are as follow:1. "FATHER'S DAY" (4.5/5)Stars Carrie Nye, Ed Harris, and Viveca Lindfors.Easily the cheesiest of the five stories (but still a lot of fun), Father's Day tells the tale of a family reunion from hell when a long-dead dad rises from the grave for his "caaaaaaakkeeeee" (and for a little good old fashioned zombie revenge).2. "THE LONESOME DEATH OF JORDY VERRILL" (4/5)Stars Stephen King.Although its easily the weakest of the stories, it's probably also the most original, so keep your finger off the fast-forward button. Stephen King (!) gives a nutty and throughly enjoyable performance as a country bumpkin who battles alien plantlife from a meteroite that touches down in his backyard. Sounds weird? You don't know the half of it.3. "SOMETHING TO TIDE YOU OVER" (5/5)Stars Leslie Nielsen, Ted Danson, and Gaylen Ross.This segment is legendary. Leslie Nielsen gives the performance of his life as a psychotically jealous husband who takes a notion to bury his wife and her lover neck-deep in sand before the tide rolls in. Needless to say, love is more powerful than death, as our antihero soon finds himself neck deep in terrifying troubles of his own.4. "THE CRATE" (5/5)Stars Hal Holbrook, Adrienne Barbeau, and Fritz Weaver.Hands down the best tale of terror, it's no wonder that the three main actors of this single story also receive top billing in the picture's opening credits. This epic blood-soaked tale of insanity, fear, and fidelity is a timeless classic with excellent performances all around, and an unforgettable monkey-like demon from special effects master Tom Savini. The longest segment of the film, "The Crate" tells the story of Henry (Holbrook), a college professor with an unbelievably obnoxious and domineering wife (a brilliant performance by Barbeau). When Henry's colleague Dexter Stanley (Weaver) discovers a flesh-eating monster under the stairway under the stairs of the college and informs Henry, the henpecked husband makes plans to use the monster to his own domestic advantage. This out-of-this-world premise carries very real themes of love and death, friends and family, and moral responsibility versus personal hapiness. With subtle undertones that just hint at the depth of this brilliantly written horror masterpiece, Stephen King has never been more entertaining than with this perfectly crafted tale.5. "THEY'RE CREEPING UP ON YOU" (4.5/5)Stars E.G. Marshall.Bringing us back down for a soft landing, Romero and King conclude their horror anthology with this wonderfully bizarre tale of a millionaire hypochondriac whose allegedly germ-proof apartment is overwhelmed with an army of cockroaches. This one goes way over the top, but it all keeps with the tempo of the movie. If you know somebody who is deathly afraid of bugs, try showing them the final scene of this segment, then sit back and enjoy their screams of bewilderment.All in all, I'd have to say Creepshow is one of the top three horror films ever made. Rent it or buy it today!=================================================THE DISC (1/5):Unfortunately, the "geniuses" over at Warner Bros. have insulted this fine film and its fans by offering up a very lame disc. The picture quality is only passable, the letterbox formatting is kind of funky, and there are absolutely no extras, save for a trailer, which I don't really count as a real feature. The only good thing I can possibly say about the disc is that it's got 41 chapters, but only 21 of those are accesible with the disc.While we'll have to wait for "Creepshow" to get the same Special Edition treatment as its inferior sequel, this bare bones disc only goes to show the strength of the film in the fact that even with no bonuses at all, "Creepshow" is still one of the most rewatchable and indispensable horror movies on the market</review_text>
The Movie has always been a favorite of mine.  If you have a big screen TV, this movie on DVD will appear to be sloppy in some areas, but if you just follow the story and enoy the music, you'll over come the critical nit picking of your prefectionate self.  Go look in the mirror by the way.I recommend this product for purchase</review_text>
This is my favorite film, bar none.  MPI Home Video is releasing this title on DVD 5/15/07, according to MPI's official site.  In addition, as of this writing (Feb 07), this stellar film is showing in theatrical re-release in as many as 30 American cities.  This film has everything an epic should have: a first-rate cast, beautifully-written screenplay, spectacular (and mostly historically accurate) settings, even solid humor.  I've been waiting for this to be released on DVD for years</review_text>
I saw this film at the old Post Office Cinema in East Hampton when it came out in limited release in 1976. Filming was done in 1974 at the mansion on West End Road, now owned by Ben Bradley of the Washington Post.The film is great like the rest of the Maysles films. I will pass along this little story. I was working as a desk officer at the old East Hampton Village police station on Newtown Lane about 30 years ago when little Edie called me one winter afternoon.She reported an alien in a ufo flying around the  yard of her house. So I sent a cop up to her mansion and it turned out it was a tree cutter in a cherry picker trimming trees of a neighbor. Another note: The lead detective in the 1972 raid of the Beale's house, is now the mayor of that charming village</review_text>
I like almost everything that Andrew V. McLaglen directs. This film has quite a lot of good things to recommend it. Mostly I like the opening Civil War scene and later Wayne, Rock Hudson and company doing battle with the invading French down in Mexico. There's enough humor, action and emotion to go around not to mention Hugo Montenegro's very good score</review_text>
I love this movie!  I could not find it in any store, and Amazon.com had it!  MY movie came very quickly and in great condition</review_text>
Note: 4 1/2 stars is what I mean.This is one of the most gorgeous films you will ever see.  You can watch this film without sound or subtitles and still be enraptured. The breathtaking landscapes, the gorgeous use of colors, the wonderful costume design, the stunning dance and fight choreography will captivate you like few films do.The musical score is excellent, it enhances the mood of the scenes even further. The acting is also very convincing, your hearts will go out to these characters.The story is simple, but has some interesting twists, and is told very well. Compared to most movies there is very little dialogue, but you won't miss it.  Words are never wasted, every line seems essential.  My only qualm is with the final unfolding of events which are not bad, but were not up to the level of the rest of the film.Target audience: Anyone who doesn't mind subtitles.</review_text>
It's right on. The scene transitions are nicely done. Even though a lot of this is predictable, it is still funny and makes one eager to see what's' next.Fernando literally goes down the line of all the sisters, till he has a shot gun wedding with the last. The scene between the cuckold and the err... cuckolded cuckold is hilarious. The sisters are very vivid and pretty (well except that cruz girl).Overall a very brilliantly done story</review_text>
Once again, Fox has cancelled a brilliant show. While it is occasionally a bit off-color, the dialogue is brilliant, but apparently people couldn't follow the episodes, so no one watched this great show, and it was cancelled. I haven't tried the download option, but I highly recommend the show</review_text>
Good workout video for only 15 min. per session.After doing the video for 2 weeks straight I could tell the difference.My only complaint was that Tamilee doesn't give very explicit instructions for all of the moves.It was a little hard to follow at first.If you are looking for a decent workout for a small amount of time,this is a good choice</review_text>
I'm 7 months pregnant and have been looking for videos that I can do in short blocks of time, and this one is perfect.  I've been a fan of Tamilee's for quite a while and have several of her tapes, all of which are great.  She's very motivating and encouraging, and I like the fact that she really has a good background (education-wise) when it comes to fitness. This one is no exception.  Just a warning - if you are looking for complete body toning or cadrio, you won't find it here: this one just hits the main areas (legs, biceps, triceps, shoulders, butt and abs).  But that doesn't mean it's easy!  I found myself sweating just doing a few of the exercises (even before I became pregnant) and I'm in fairly good shape.  I'd recommend doing this video and interspersing it with other longer, total body sculpting videos</review_text>
Meet Me in St. Louis takes a war-torn America back to a simpler time, a time when telephones were new and everyone was talking about the World's Fair. The Smith family is very close, and although each of them have their problems, they share their lives with each other. Esther (Judy Garland) has a crush on "The Boy Next Door," and sings a beautiful song about him. Rose (Lucille Bremer) hopes to be proposed to, even if it is over the telephone. Tootie (Margaret O'Brien) has a fascination with death and a wants to be included with the older kids. Everyone's lives are changed, however, when they hear that their father is going to move everyone to New York for his job.There are plenty of great songs here, and although many of them sound like show-tunes, they enhance the film quite well. Aside from "The Boy Next Door," we have the famous "Trolley Song," as well as the now-classic "Have Yourself a Merry Little Christmas" and a fun number called "Under the Bamboo Tree." Of course, the main title song "Meet Me in St. Louis" is run throughout the film.You might think the story is rather silly and unrealistic, but it is actually based on the memoirs of the woman that Tootie's character is based on. One can learn all about it and other behind the scenes stories like about the romance that developed between Garland and her director Vincente Minelli in the documentary also included on this VHS</review_text>
Freddy Krueger is held in Hell after being killed by his daughter.Allevidence of his existence have been taken out of his hometown.As far asElm Street is concerned Freddy never existed.He is unable to return and wreak havoc.Freddy is able to free Jason Voorhess from Hell.Jason almostimmediately takes up his machete and starts killing Freddy's children.Jason starts killing too frequently for Freddy's taste and he is forcedto make a return to stop Jason.Upon the return of Freddy the viewer is treated to a battle royal of thetwo forces of evil.The knife glove of Freddy against the machete of Jasonmakes for some exciting fighting.The final battle finally is settled on apeir on a lake.The two most evil people on earth cut each other to peices.You think that you have a victor in this classical battle but the finalscene leaves you wondering who really won this fight.I believe that theyleft the movie open for a sequel.Fans of "A Nightmare ON Elm Street" and "Friday The Thirteenth" will be greatly entertained</review_text>
I was skeptical when I first heard they were making a "Freddy vs Jason" movie. The chances of getting it totally wrong seemed quite high. After viewing the film, however, I was pleasantly surprised. The plot makes a twisted kind of sense, the performances by Robert Englund and Ken Kirzinger are inspired and enthusiastic, and the special effects are top-notch.As a Nightmare on Elm Street fan, I was pleased that the movie seemed to fit the tone of previous Nightmare movies. I was, however, intrigued by the Jason backstory and scenes. Since then I have become a fan of the Friday the 13th pictures also.If you like either franchise, you will most likely enjoy Freddy vs Jason. Even though the final battle might not end the way you would prefer</review_text>
Yes, this movie is kind of unrealistic but so what. And just to re-clear up the bike thing. It wasn't a coaster brake bike like you had on your old banana seat bike when you were a kid. It's a track bike with a fixed gear. Which means the pedals spin as long as the rear wheel spins. And backward pressure slows your speed but does not completely stop it.That why he always jumped off the back and grabed the seat when he wanted to stop quickly. That is also why anyone crazy enough to ride a track bike on the street usually has a front brake installed. Look at the scenes where he is freestyling in his apartment. He is pedaling backward. This can only be done on a fixed gear. No coaster brake. If you look really closely at some of the scenes you will be able to see different bikes. Like when Bacon rides down the stairs, you can see the bike he's on has brakes. Obviously for the stunt. But I really like this movie. I've been a messenger and I always wanted the place I worked to be like that movie. We never went outside and freestyle in the street while the boom box played. And hot girls never gave me their phone number. But we get to see Lawrence Fishburne as Voodoo when was still know as Larry. And that's worth the 13 bucks right there</review_text>
Singer had the best male body, bar none, I have ever seen in films and *it* is really the star of this one, right behind the two ferrets, "Beastmaster's" friends. Most of the camera angles enhance Singer's musculature. He has learned how to stand and move to best advantage for the cameras. He's not handsome, though, which doesn't really matter in this film.The film is fun, action-packed and pretty to watch. While Tanya Roberts in her rather small role is nice to look at, she cannot act her way out of a paper bag, but manages to lend another perfect body to the cast.Rip Torn, the evil one, barely suppresses a guffaw at the lines he has to say, but pulls it off nonetheless. The plot is good - "Beastmaster" (Singer) is ripped from his mother's womb before birth, placed by occult means into the womb of an ox (cow?) and is then ripped out again at knifepoint. As a result, somehow he is able to communicate nonverbally with animals and they are his helpers - an eagle, a black leopard and two ferrets - on his way to avenge his mother's death.For what it is (bad acting, beautiful people and an unusual plot), it deserves the cult following it's got. After all, cult movies don't always become so by being great works of art. Buy it just for fun, suspend your incredulity for an evening and just enjoy it</review_text>
After chatting online for 3 weeks, Jeff Kohlver, a 32 year old photographer, and Hayley Stark, a 14 year old honors student, finally meet in real life at a cozy local coffee shop called Nighthawks.For a `normal' person, just knowing this age different would make you feel.. Uncomfortable and you would think that what they are doing is `wrong'. But what exactly are they doing? Nothing illegal.. Yet.As Hayley attempts to flirt with Jeff, she is not getting the feedback that she wants. Sure, Jeff is replying and some of his replies seem as if they would be very sexual. But the way he talks and presents himself to Hayley, he seems as if he is not interested in her, even claiming he would have to wait 4 years for her.But when Hayley invites herself over to Jeff's home, he accepts. So he must have some interest in her, right? Well he does, but he isn't able to make his move, as Hayley makes her move first.After intensive research, study, and stalking, Hayley discovered a gruesome past that Jeff never wanted to surface, which is the only reason Hayley met with Jeff. To do justice to.. In her own special way.Our knowledge of Jeff and Hayley now change.Jeff Kohlver, not only a 32 year old photographer, but a pedophile and a murderer. Or at least the accomplice of a murderer. Hayley Stark, not only a 14 year old honors student, but a vigilante who literally takes the law into her own hands.Through torture, which includes castration, stun guns and a call to Janelle, Jeff's ex girlfriend whom he is still obsessed over, Hayley digs deeper into Jeff's memory and the complete truth is out.Hayley gives Jeff two options.Jeff must commit suicide by hanging himself. Making others, including Janelle, believe he was just some sad lonely man. In return Hayley will clean up all the evidence that would lead police to finding out his crimes.Or she will let Jeff live and she'll take off her clothes.. Run into Janelle's arms. And the truth about Jeff. About his pedophilia. And about his murderous acts. Will be out to the public. And his name will be put to shame.Jeff chooses suicide.And at the last minute, Hayley tells him.She will not hide his past.It is now for everyone to know.------------------------------Hard Candy is a psychological drama with a very unique and twisting storyline and plot. One that makes you question the movies, the characters, and even question yourself.What kind of person are you if you side with Jeff? Sure, he is a pedophile, but does he really deserve all this torture? And what kind of person are you if you side with Hayley? Sure, she is ridding the world of 'evil', but shouldn't she have just gone to the police?Most people just get stuck on the storyline and plot itself and don't take time to notice the acting, dialogue, and cinematography. Patrick Wilson and Ellen Page did an amazing performance, I have never seen better.And the dialogue is so impressive and so striking. Some times heart moving, as well as heart chilling. As for the cinematography, the movie is absolutely beautiful. The colors, the shots, really look at it.This movie is definitely a favorite of mine and I give it a 10+</review_text>
"I will not live without love." ~Vincent van GoghThe story of Vincent van Gogh's life seems best told in his own words, complete with casual sketches, detailed drawings and famous paintings. In the spirit of "Crows" in Akira Kurosawa's Dreams (where we see the Langlois Bridge and Crows in the Wheatfields brought to life), we are entertained by visions of painting after painting. It is fun to watch Akira Kurosawa's Dreams after viewing this movie because then you recognize the paintings that were brought to life in a dream of pure visual delight.The Caf Terrace, Yellow House, Fishing Boats, Bedroom at Arles, Starry Night and Sunflowers are some of the paintings featured, but there is an entire world of Vincent van Gogh's art that is introduced with analytical letters written to his brother. In these letters he tells his brother of the art he is working on and his motivating influences all while we the viewer are entertained with the art, scenes from nature and the acting out of various scenes (Night Caf with Pool Table) that eventually became paintings. There are fields of olive trees from Olive Trees 1889 and Vincent's letter speaks of the difficulty of capturing the colors in the soil and tree bark.When you hear the story of Vincent van Gogh's life in his own words, suddenly he becomes so much more than a famous artist. His life is filled with tragedy and hardship, but he is also able to find stunning beauty through his love of philosophy and his view of the world seems to remain relatively positive right up until his death. He not only travels, he also lives with Gauguin. The art shown after living with Gauguin shows how being able to relate to someone like himself increased his creativity.He speaks of how he is a self-taught artist and how thankful he is that he was not trained and therefore had to experiment with paint to produce eye-catching effects. As he travels, his world expands and so does his art. He tries to capture his experience in 1,800 works during his life and while they can't all be shown in this movie, the director tries to capture as many beautiful scenes and pieces of art as he can in as many ways film allows. The creativity is delightful as actors take their places and then a picture emerges."How lovely yellow is." ~Vincent van GoghHe seems far from debilitating madness in his letters (he talks about episodes) and more inclined towards deep contemplations and philosophical discussions. He seems to be reaching out to a world that does not quite understand him all while trying to make the lives of those around him less lonely.The movie begins with his lofty spiritual goals and ends with his death. We learn so much about this artist, of his being homesick for the land of pictures and how he felt compelled to capture the daily activities of the peasants.The goodness in his heart truly shines through the darkness of his later days as he helps a woman most would have shunned and must live without the love of the woman he wanted to marry.Through a weaving of philosophy and art, Paul Cox created a stunning and somewhat mesmerizing journey through the life of Vincent van Gogh (1853-1890). I watched both the movie and the interview three times because the thoughts and experiences are so compelling. Of all the movies I've seen on an artist's life, this is my favorite. What makes this truly memorable are the letters from Vincent to Theo read eloquently by John Hurt.After watching this, you may find yourself looking for a book about Vincent van Gogh's art or his letters in order to find some of the art shown in this movie or to expand your knowledge of his writing and philosophy. While many emphasize the madness, this movie emphasizes the struggle for beauty and the unending desire of the artist to capture all that he loves.~The Rebecca Review</review_text>
No one will doubt that Woody Allen is the only director who has consistently mastered the art of writing and directing intelligent, funny, unforgettable stories.  These films are great examples of that. Fromk Annie Hall to Sleeper [I haven't viewed Stardust Memories yet], you will be completely satisfied with your purchase. Here's an overview of the films:Annie Hall: Allem's best film, hands down.  The story of a couple who meets in a New York tennis club.  Allen plays Alvy Singer, a carbon copy of Allen's stereotypical self [neurotic, clumsy, "suave"], while Keaton, who gives a stunning performance, plays Annie Hall, a country girl from Wisconsin trying to find a life in New York. A great story about relationships. The last paragraph that Allen narrates is fabulous. Don't watch this film first, or you may not appreciate Allen's other work as much!Bananas: On the sillier side, this film is about Fielding Mellish, another character based on himself.  Mellish works for a large corporation. Testing products. If you are at all familiar with Allen, you already know that there is a witty scene coming up.  Mellish travels to the small Latin American country of San Marcos to find something to do. He ends up becoming the communist dictator there, and that is all I will say.Everything You Always Wanted to Know About Sex* *But were afraid to ask: A great satire on the popular book. This is a series of seven small sex stories, varying from Gene Wilder's affair with a sheep to a giant, deadly mammary. Watch for Allen's coolest role as Fabrizio, the Italian.Interiors: A stunning film [very serious] about a wealthy Long Island family that steers away from the mother. This film is beautifully shot, and it really pays a lot of attention to showing every aspect of every character. Tension builds quickly, and it stays until the end.Love and Death: One of my personal top five Allen films.  This one is about Napoleon trying to take over Russia. Allen plays Boris Grushenko, a Russian Catholic, who falls in love with his distant cousin, Sonja [Keaton].  This one is nonstop laughs, but only if you are familiar with the war and the works of Russian writers. It is still very funny otherwise, but not as deeply funny.Manhattan: Similar to Annie Hall, but a little different.  Allen plays Isaac Davis, who falls in love with a seventeen year old [Mariel Hemingway], and also with Mary [Keaton], an overly pretentious New Yorker at the same time. This story is again about relationship, but this one is extreme. Shot in black and white, and accompanied by a George Gershwin soundtrack, many Allen fans consider this film his love letter to New York City.  It is also considered his best by many people. I think he has made better, but this is a stunning film.Sleeper: Sleeper is 'Love and Death' set in the future. A great film about Allen, who is frozen in 1973, and defrosted 200 years later. Great jokes, chase scenes, and more. In one scene, Diane Keaton and a leader of a revolutionist underground organization re-create scenes from his childhood. Another joke about the NRA. Sleeper is probably the best film to see if one wants a good introduction to Allen's style.All in all, this collection is a must-own. Also, at less than ten dollars per DVD, no fan should pass this up. Separately, they cost more. Buy this today and you will be granted a good taste in motion pictures</review_text>
This album has pure energy, pure lyrics, pure beats. Everything went right in this soundtrack. Public Enemy seldomly puts out any bad albums. The title song in this album &quot;He Got Game&quot; was a pretty weak song.  The beats were nice though, but this song leans a little towards the blues  and jazz catogorie. That was the only song that I disliked out of 12  tracks. The album starts off with the song Ressurection, that track was so  beautifully produced it sounded way beyond Public Enemy's music. Masta  Killa dropped a verse that was so so tight. Track 3 wit KRS-ONE was one of  the best, number 5 had a cool beat. The rest of the tracks were just Public  Enemy style. This is a great album for a Public Enemy fan</review_text>
Yes, this film feels like a diatribe.  It's probably less factual than the film version of John Dillinger's exploits that director John Milius made in the seventies.  So why do I recommend this film over Milius' more polished account?  Well, this film in a campy, over-the-top way is just so entertaining.  Secondly, Lawrence Tierney in the title role is such a magnetic screen presence.  His tough ferocity keeps the film's campier elements in check and grounds it in some semblance of reality.  There's also a good supporting cast here with gangster veterans Marc Lawrence and Elisha Cook Jr. (seems like he's in all these noir-gangster flicks) on hand.  The story is told here crisply and in an economical 70 minutes so if you have an hour plus to kill there's worse ways to do it.  Oh, John, if only you had the two bucks to pay for the drinks!</review_text>
I like it. It was nice. I have seen so far:Pokemon:the first movie,pokemon 2000,pokemon 3,pokemon 4ever,and pokemon destiny deoxys. My favorite is probably pokemon deoxys</review_text>
This is a great movie full of adventure and excitement.  Pokemon 4 ever takes place  during the period of the time when Ash is in the Juto League.  In pokemon forever ash   must protect the beautiful pokemon celbi from the evil Iron Masked Marador of team rocket.In this movie you get to she something you never got to  she before  Professor Oak as a little boy.  If you are 7 or older than this movie is fine for you.  If you are under 7   this movie may be to intense and violent for you to handle.My favorite part in this movie is when Celebi  makes the twig monsters  and start destroying the forrest.  Attribute to toho who created Godzilla.  If you enjoy this you the other pokemon movies.  I also recomend Digmon the Movie.This movie also features a short chute little min movie called Pikchu's Pekaboo which should be fine for  kids age 7 an up</review_text>
Avatar is one of my favorite shows. I am so thrilled that it is on Amazon. At first, the episode I downloaded didn't work, but they fixed the bugs. I have it on my Creative Zen Vision:M and it looks great</review_text>
Great old time classic.  Don't bother watching the remake with Harrison Ford. This is all you need to see</review_text>
When Worlds Collide has all the ingredients of a great movie for the year that it was made.  The actors were great.  The story is scary when you start to think that this can happen.  The ending was excellent.  Not a happy ending for mother earth but not all end of the world movies should have the earth been saved.  I bought the movie and seeing it many time and still like it.</review_text>
This Jet Li movie is thus far the best movie since Shaolin Temple as Younger Jet Li. Its awesome surreal fighting creates this Epic feel to the whole Genre of martial arts fighting. Jet Li has never been so swift and so passionate in this movie. It has laughter, suspense, compassion, and innocense. The most spectacular scene is the dual fights with his son doing foot to shoulder cambat against the Witches pawn. This film is highly recommended to those who love Jet Li and Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon. An Excellent movie to add to the Jet Li collection</review_text>
Workout Description:  30 minute routineWorkout Level:  beginner-intermediateInstructor: Tamilee Webb (Has degrees in Physical Education and Exercise Science; IDEA's 1993 Instructor of the Year; original Buns of Steel instructor).  Tamilee is soft-spoken but serious about what she is doing.  She restricts her chatter to cueing and pointing out facts about the muscles you're working.Class:  Tamilee onlyMusic / Set:  The soft instrumental music is not intrusive.  Tamilee stands outdoors at some sort of country club.  (A few ducks waddle by to see what's going on.)Equipment Needed:  mat.  The workout can and should be done barefoot.Caveats: Follow Tamilee's suggestions in the introductions.  As she says, always stretch to the point of tightness and never to the point of pain.Additional Comments: You don't need a lot of space for this routine.  You should be able to lie down with your arms and legs extended, and you should be able to kneel and stretch forward.This is geared towards the end of the day, since it includes a relaxation segment.  The stretches are held for a decent amount of time; they're not very short, but they're not very long.  Once you know the routine, you'll be able to move into the stretch sooner and get a few more seconds in.This workout is available on DVD with Total Body Stretch for Beginners</review_text>
This movie has been on my top 5 list for years.  Although the quality of the movie is poor by today's standard, it is worth it to see the transformation of this young woman.  Don't miss this movie</review_text>
It is truly a pity that the western has died off. They are rare and far between these days. A few years back Tom Selleck and Sam Elliot made a few together and separate. They are all worth seeing. This one has Tom playing Cable, a confederate soldier who has left the war early because he knows it is over and the South has lost. It just hasn't been declared yet. His family and friends thought him to be dead, and the reunion seems a bit shaky. His wife played by Suzy Amis, is a tough as nails no nonsense frontier woman that knows guns well from her fathers gunsmithing business.Eventually she works things out with her husband Cable and it is a good thing he has her to back him since she is great with a gun. Even though Cable believes the war is over he finds sympathizers trying to enlist his aid in the confederate cause but he shuns them. When he is accused of murdering a retired Union officer he must track down the real murderer and bring him to justice. The production values are excellent and the acting, directing, sets, and music are all top drawer. Good DVD quality but no extras. If you enjoy westerns you should find it very entertaining. If you like it be sure to see "Crossfire Trail" and "Conagher"</review_text>
There used to be a tv show of the Baby-sitter's club and I loved it. It used to air on the Disney channel. When disney wasn't pathetic as a ballon back then. But the film was great... I remember the times when i used to read the books. Their classic books for kids. But the movie is awesome. The girls played to their characters wonderfully. In the movie Christy was my favorite, the girl who played her, anyway. I like the scene when Christy went to the fair and her dad didn't show up. To me that was mean. Then she was walking in the rain. The rest of BSC showed up. It all became a happy ending, which was good. I can't wait to get it on dvd.</review_text>
I love this movie.  And I don't have anything bad to say about it.  But if you get the DVD be prepared because the movie and the audio tracks do not match.  So you hear an actor speak before their mouths move.  This drove me crazy but I still enjoyed the movie</review_text>
Wonderful Movie from the 2nd world war period. Poetic & very british. Movies like this are no longer made</review_text>
The tale starts out with a historical reference to Chaucer.  For a fraction you wonder if you are watching the film you expected. And then you see the Michael Powell and Emeric Pressburger eagle that transitions us form mid-evil times to present day (1944) England.Time is taken to give depth and background to all the main characters by the use of interactive dialog. We find that each brings different technical skills and interpretations of the road to Canterbury:U.S. Army Sergt. Bob Johnson (U.S. Sergeant John Sweet) on his way to Canterbury mistakenly gets off in the hamlet of Kent. He is accused of having his stripes on upside down.British Sgt. Peter Gibbs (Dennis Price) is temporarily stationed at Kent while staging for overseas. He was and theater organ player before the war.Alison Smith (Sheila Sim) a London store clerk before the war is now seeking a job as a `Land Girl'. She seems to have an uncanny knowledge of Kent and the Pilgrims' road to Canterbury.The night they got off the train at Kent they had a strange encounter with the mysterious "Glue Man".  Then befriended by the local magistrate, Thomas Colpeper, JP (Thomas Colpeper, JP). Mr. Colpeper is interested in the history of the Pilgrims' Road from Kent to Canterbury.Until you get pretty much through this story you are never really sure where they are trying to take you.  Is the focus on a local mystery? The interaction of the players or the lives of the characters themselves?--------------------------------------------------------------------Be sure to get the Criterion version with the second DVD. The main item besides the film is the voice over commentary by film historian Ian Christie which will rival the film for entertainment and after watching you may want to give the film that other star.</review_text>
My husband, ex-military and combat veteran , doesn't watch war movies, but a friend recommended this movie and, when it arrived, my "MAN" agreed to watch it with me.  Well, Honey, what do you think? HE SAID: "HOLLYWOOD TRULY IS A LAND OF IMAGINATION AND FANTASY." I SAID: "THAT WAS A GOOD WAR MOVIE."  HE SAID: "THAT WAS NOT A WAR MOVIE, IT WAS A MOVIE ABOUT PERSONALITIES: THERE WAS NO WAR IN THAT MOVIE."  Well, he's right, but, I LIKED THIS MOVIE, AND, I THINK, MOST OTHER PEOPLE WILL TO.</review_text>
High-energy encapsulation of the American spirit in this tough-tender production.  Done lean and hard-scrabble, as opposed to the lush and green Hollywood version.  Curley really is as wonderful as he sings he is. Aunt Eller, the matriarch, as done by Maureen Lipman is tough, and loving.  Jimmy Johnson, the Welshman, jigs and does rope-tricks.  Shuler Hensley's Jud is repulsive, and vulnerable.  A classic.  For your permanent library.</review_text>
For all you Hal Hartley fans who have desired having a copy of Simple Men on DVD,  your time has come.  Simple Men will be released on DVD widescreen format January 27, 2004.  I can't wait to get my copy!!</review_text>
Nuts was a hit off-Broadway play.  Claudia Draper (Barbra Streisand) is a high priced call girl who has killed one of her johns (Leslie Nielsen).  Her parents, Arthur and Rose Kirk (Karl Malden and Maureen Stapleton), just want to sweep it under the carpet by having her committed to an institution.  But she doesn't anything to do with her parents or their scheme.Her high priced lawyer quits after she attacks him. That gets the attention of public defender Aaron Levinsky (Richard Dreyfuss).  The arraignment judge (Dakin Matthews) is displeased with Levinsky's wanting to take this to trial and only gives him the weekend to prepare his case for the sanity trial. Their relationship begins is a chess match of trust.Levinsky gathers the evidence he needs for the trial and the sanity trail begins with trial Judge Stanley Murdoch (James Whitmore).  The first prosecution witness is Dr. Morrison (Eli Wallach) who testifies that Claudia should be institutionalized.  This followed by her mother Rose who testifies about her past.  And then her stepfather Arthur testifies.  During the testimony, Claudia first draws her stepfather as a vampire then her parents with no mouths.  Aaron puts the clues together and discovers that Arthur was molesting Claudia.The defense puts up its only witness, Claudia.  Even under sedation, Claudia makes her points.  The prosecution recalls Dr. Morrison and his testimony inflames Claudia and she makes an impassioned rebuttal.Martin Ritt and Barbra Streisand assembled a flawless cast.  The role of Claudia was made for Streisand.  She has a field day with it.  Maureen Stapleton is always a joy to see and she hits all emotional levels with this role.  Karl Malden usually plays the stoic heroic man.  This was an underrated performance and should have been garnered more attention.  James Whitmore had a small pivotal role but showed what featured actor really means.  And this is probably Richard Dreyfuss' best performance.Martin Ritt was one of the great directors and he liked nothing more than a controversial film.  This was a perfect film for him.Streisand did triple duty on this film besides starring, she produce the film and did the musical score.  Streisand has shown that she has a talent for scoring films.  Before, she just wrote music for songs.  This was a big step for her and it proved that she can do more than the normal performer.If you like high drama, courtroom films or just plain good acting, this is your film.DVD EXTRAS: Commentary by Barbra Streisand</review_text>
it is an fantastic concept for a movie plot. just how much trouble can a frozen man from the past get in? this man is even less refined than tarzan but has a better sense of humour. if your feeling down and want a pick me up this is a must see</review_text>
This a classic John Carpender film but defentaly one that needs a sequel by him. The skill with which action mixed with heavy metal music is excellent. As far as I'm concerned everyone in this si-fi horror thriller did their job right. I could feel it ,be it , live it. It could be real. Each character brought something essential to this film. I'm not the only one that likened the  martian leader to a cross between Marilyn Manson and Rob Zombie. There are very powerful fight survival scenes with just enough blood and gore to freak you out and keep you on edge. Who will get possessed next? A must see. More than once to notice all of the effects, and believe me they are powerfull.Watch it and see who lives and who dies and how.Great work Mr. Carpender</review_text>
&quot;The Great Director,&quot; Volume 2 in the &quot;Unknown Chaplin&quot; series from Thames Television, looks at Chaplin working on some of his biggest films, including &quot;The Kid,&quot; &quot;The Gold Rush&quot; and my personal favorite, &quot;City Lights.&quot;   The chief assets of this documentary are the treasures found in the Chaplin family private film vault, including discarded sequences and home movies never before seen by the public.  There are also interviews with Jackie Coogan, Lita Grey, Virginia Cherrill and others who worked with Chaplin.  The emphasis remains on how Chaplin worked, beginning with simple sight gags and slapstick and transforming them into comic masterpieces.  This volume also gets into a bit more of Chaplin's artistic temperament, especially when his patience ran thin with Cherrill and he temporarily replaced her with Grey as the blind girl in &quot;City Lights.&quot;  There are even clips of the film's classic ending shot with Grey.  Kevin Brownlow and David Gill were given access to these unseen films by Oona Chaplin and they make the most of it in providing a portrait of a great artist at work.  James Mason provides the narration, managing to sound like a college professor lecturing students and at the same time like a fan of Chaplin's comic genius.  Whether you have seen a few or all of Chaplin's films, &quot;Unknown Chaplin&quot; is an absolute treat</review_text>
The lived tragic story during the WW2 in a small town of the occupied Czechoslovak. A carpenter is hired " Arian controller "in a modest and humble bottom store where her owner a Jew old lady thinks the best about him, unknowing what' s really going on backstage.I few words a major film told without melodramatic effects, but told with asserted  expression and crude realism.Another amazing evidence of the artistic foreseeing three years previous to the invasion.</review_text>
This Amazon unbox is not fully developed or has a lot of bugs in it. They should pull it until they get the bugs ironed out. Could not download all of the movie i ordered and now it is gone from my computer and I don't see how to download it again.Update: Most of the problems I experienced were with my Sattelite connection. After 175 MB they start to throttle the speed way down. I upgraded and this helped. I can now download large movies but only in 350mb bites each 4 hours. If you are having trouble read your sattelite "fair access" policy</review_text>
As soon as I walked out of the theater I declared that I had to own a copy of this movie.  I had to wait a long time for it to be released to DVD (it was in theaters in late winter but they didn't put it to DVD till almost a year later...probably hoping to capitalize on awards' season reviews and recommendations).  It was well worth the wait.It is a shame that this film was overlooked with the awards.  I think that the timing of the release factored in but maybe it just appeals to some people (like me) more than others.  The entire ensemble does a great job.I just rewatched it and I still enjoy it after at least 6 viewings.  It would make a wonderful addition to your video collection, especially if you are a Michael Douglas fan.  (And having a Pittsburgh connection helps too...the movie really captured a lot of the essence of Pittsburgh even with the weather when there is snow on the ground, the sun is peeking through and it is raining all at the same time!).  It is just a good movie all around and should appeal to viewers who enjoy smart films.There are just truly funny scenes and some really touching parts.  What a wild journey these characters find themselves on over the span of just one weekend.  I think the best part is that it isn't non stop action and things don't get so out of the realm of possibility.  It still retains a good touch of believability, even as some pretty unbelievable things happen.Pick up the soundtrack while you are at it.  Bob Dylan's "Things Have Changed" is great (and it recieved an Oscar).  It is mostly a CD to just kick back and relax to.</review_text>
this was a hilarious movie even though I have never seen it before.  It had alot of funny scenes.  But as David Rigsbey says it had no direction</review_text>
These were two of the most amazing and creative films I have seen in months. Buster Keaton wrote, directed, acted, and did all his own stunts in these two films. He even did stunts for a lot of the other actors in these films too."Our hospitality" is the story of a feud between two families that reaches a crisis point when Keaton falls in love with a daughter in the other family. In "Sherlock Jr." Keaton plays an aspiring detective and movie projectionist who dreams that he is a famous and skilled detective. Not only are these two films engaging, well made, and interesting, they are funny!! I go weeks sometimes without laughing at a sitcom or a movie that is supposed to be a comedy. I found myself laughing out loud numerous times during this film.There are some classic scenes that just stand out when you watch these movies. The whole "floating down the river" scene at the end of "Our Hospitality" is jaw-dropping. These have got to be some of the most dangerous stunts ever attempted. In "Sherlock Jr." there is a pool game where every ball on the table is bounced around except for one which is miraculously untouched, there is the harrowing motorcycle ride, there is the escape from the gangsters, I could go on an on.These films are like live action Bugs Bunny cartoon. There were several occasions where as I was watching these movies, trying to anticipate what was going to happen next I said to myself, "No way. He's not really going to do that. That's not even possible. No sane man would attempt a stunt like that." And yet...he does.There are about 4 or 5 scenes from both of these films which are completely seared into my brain. That isn't an easy thing to do. Most films don't have one memorable scene, and to have a single film with 5 or 6 of these scenes is nothing short of amazing.They just don't make filmmakers like Buster Keaton anymore. I wish I knew where his creativity came from. If directors today could channel even a fraction of the skill that Keaton exhibited, cinema would be an amazing and wonderful place</review_text>
The movie "Days of Heaven," written by Terrence Malic, is a movie of transcendentalism, anti-transcendentalism, and nature. In class, we have been discussing the term transcendentalism. Also we have talked about how nature cannot be destroyed or stopped. Nature itself balances out life. From a meteor crashing to earth wiping out all life, to a simple hurricane wiping out a whole city and killing thousands, nature cannot be inverted and prevented. In the movie "Days of Heaven," this idea is clearly shown. The scene where the locusts were eating the crops is the prime example in this movie to me of how nature will always have its ways of evening things out. When life starts to get ahead, when things are going well for everyone, something always seems to happen. In this movie, everything was going well for everybody. This is when nature comes into play. Locusts come to eat all crops. This is nature acting in response to the success of humans. What this says is that no matter how powerful humans are, the machines we have, or the ideas we come up with, nothing stands up to nature.In this movie, and in modern times today, people take advantage of life and what is available to us. In "Days of Heaven," the characters lives are what some may call perfect. Livestock is healthy, crops are good and productive, and just overall there are no problems. This is when people take advantage of what they have. We do not respect what we have and realize its importance. Once it's gone, that's when we are aware of this. Nature does its thing by balancing everything out. Now it's too late to appreciate what we had. As humans, we start over. With the work ethic and determination to have this life we once had, we will do whatever it takes. The continuous cycle of this is what makes life worth living. The thought of accomplishment, and that there will be problems in life is what drive us every day. One will face challenges all throughout their lives; its how he or she reacts to these challenges that makes us who we are as humans</review_text>
There is no way around it, no matter how it is staged Shakespeare will inevitably feel like a stage play. That it is acted by two of Britains foremost stage actors of the time, Kenneth Branagh and Emma Thompson (who at this stage were still married) adds to the feeling. There is some over the top voice projection, but generally this feels light, fun and a pretty glorious rendition of one of Shakespeares frothiest plays.Much ado about nothing really is just what it says. The premise is that the duke returns from the wars with a half-brother whom dislikes him but has reconciled with him simply to create problems. Which he manages to do, embroiling the hapless Hero (the heroine of the story!) and her love.  It is all based on falsehood and nothing.Branagh and Thompson play the battling ex-lovers who are reconciled during the course of the movie, but this doesn't stay their battling wits and shrewdness. This is one point where their clear diction and stage presence makes a huge difference as each word and inference can be celarly understood.There are wonderful set scenes - the arrival of the duke and his men, and the finish with the dancing through the grounds was gorgeous. The real winner of the movie has to be the house and grounds it is set in - how wonderful! Who wouldn't want to live in Italy after seeing this movie - and a nice way to learn some of Shakespeare good fun</review_text>
TCM III was a good movie.It had all the necessary tools and villians to make a good horror movie.It lacked the essential characters,though.It would've done better if they had brought Chop Top or Drayton back to life.The film is about two friends headed down to Florida from Texas when they come upon a pit of decayed bodies.We already know it was Leatherface,and the two drive on.The next day,they come upon a gas station,where a crazy,yet funny gas station attendant named Alfredo work.Also making his appearance here as well is Viggo Mortenson as Tex,a redneck cowboy who gives the two friends guidance.The two take the road he suggests after a near attack and end up stranded in the woods,pursued by the evr vigialnt Leatherface armed with his trusty chainsaw.It gets the job done every time.As in the Texas Chainsaw tradition,they are captured and prepared for dinner.One of the friends narrowly escapes and must take on Leatherface with the help of an Veteran they met along the way.It's an overall good movie and I loved it</review_text>
... but it`s coldly made without much heart. Time and time again, readers have been overwhelmed by the old publicity "Garbo the great actress", "The Sphinx", "The Greatest Star"...Oh I could go on forever... However, boiled down to the essentials, she had a charismatic, photogenic face, BUT SHE NEVER DEPENDED ON PROMOTING HERSELF: MGM and fellow artists and critics sang their rhapsodies and privately I suspect she overdosed quickly of the SuperStar-label and became bored with the whole idea. I think she felt she was overpraised much too early in her career and felt embarassed by the never-ending attention.In Queen Christina she is beautifully lit and photographed(and from 1927 on - she was filmed behind closed curtains...with only William Daniels and Karl Freund close at hand)...I would say that many an actress with that attention could have easily have filled her shoes. She was a timid actress. Cukor once observed that he felt she had to be thrown into the action - she never created. Seeing her with Constance Bennett in TWO-FACED WOMAN og Charles Boyer in CONQUEST, you`ll see that she can`t reach their standard in  scenes she is forced to act and interplay - and not merely pose and being brilliantly photographed in close-up.In QUEEN CHRISTINA she is a MOVIESTAR, not an actress...So who would I define the ultimate star of the 20th century? ELIZABETH TAYLOR; for all her brilliant performances(and bad 1s), her legendary life and beauty...  Now, Miss Taylor is what A MOVIESTAR AND A GREAT MOVIEACTRESS is all about..</review_text>
+++++This movie is based on the story "The Adventure of the Dying Detective" (1913) written by Sir Arthur Conan Doyle (1859 to 1930).Adelaide Savage (Susan Harker) consults Sherlock Holmes (Jeremy Brett) about what she can do about her husband's cousin, Culverton Smith (John Hyde) who seems to be having a negative effect on her husband Victor Savage (Richard Bonneville).  Sherlock dismisses this as not in his field of expertise until Adelaide's husband dies from a parasitic fever.  Coincidentally, her husband's cousin is an expert in such diseases.Even more coincidental, the majority of Victor's estate will go to his cousin leaving his wife with very little.  At this point Sherlock becomes interested.  He even publicly states to Smith that these coincidences are not within the realm of probability thus implying that Smith is a murderer.  But how is he to prove this?Unfortunately, Sherlock comes down with the same disease that Victor died from.  And the only person that can help him is Smith (as Dr. Watson (Edward Hardwicke) attests)!Brett (as usual) does a good job in capturing the essence of the famous gumshoe in his performance.  Also John Hyde as Culverton Smith gives a fine performance.I had a friend who knew nothing about Brett's health problems watch this movie.  She could not see anything abnormal about him and, in fact, commented on his excellent performance.  I also felt his performance was excellent.Finally, the props, costumes, background music, and cinematography are well done.In conclusion, this is a good movie to watch even if you have read the story it's based on!!(1994; 50 min; British drama; made for TV; full screen; colour)+++++</review_text>
Ok,so it isn't one of the movie greats but it is really enjoyable.Four idiotos rob a bank when one of them is supposed to be marrying Drew's character,whatsername</review_text>
Vanilla Sky is either a disappointment when viewed against Indie Film standards, or a happily confusing lark when compared to the unending deluge of big budget / low-minded Hollywood that's released weekly.On the plus side, we find a movie that engages the viewer and the mind. A movie that is certainly confusing at first sitting, it is that rare commodity: the movie we like to talk about later. Like Memento or Barton Fink, people will find themselves dissecting the minutiae of the film after it's over.Also impressive is the fact that Tom Cruise, one of Hollywood's famed pretty boys, spends at least two-thirds of the film either hidden under a mask, or horribly disfigured. Not a role many other actors would jump to take.On the down side, Vanilla Sky, (a re-make ?) is basically an Art House or Indie film starring a big Hollywood actor. What could have been an interesting view on the hidden nature of man, or alternate/multiple realities, or even a study on the nature of reality itself, instead ends up like an art house rip-off of Total Recall.Rating: B- / C+FYI:1) When did the universe change so much that "Banky" from Chasing Amy could get a lead role playing opposite Tom Cruise?2) When did Penelope Cruz get the role of Indecipherable Speaker, ala Brad Pitt in Snatch or Fenster in The Usual Suspects?3) When did Paul McCartney last have a decent single? Here, with the title track</review_text>
I very much enjoyed this story of a man battling drug addiction-alcoholism.Michael Keaton has never been better and his portrayal is dead-on, even when the film is occasionally hard-going at times.In fact, the whole cast is first-rate, the direction good, and the script unflinching and realistic. Of all the films about drug addiction, this one is highly recommended. and the ending is even happy</review_text>
Scary Movie is an instant movie classic.Director Keenan Ivory Wayans outdies himself in a spoof of horror films involving an innocent teenager named Cindy Campbell who's being stalked by a goofy killer in a cheap rendition of Scream.Though funny to watch,Scary Movie also has it's share of gross-out gags and laughs.The way Wayans slanders horror films is so funny that you can't help but laugh out loud</review_text>
Celebrated scholar Lord Clark invites viewers to join him on an extraordinary guided tour of Western civilization.  Filmed on location in 11 countries, and richly illustrated with architecture art, philosophy, and music, this magnificent series travels 80,000 miles and illuminates sixteen centuries, to the 20th century.  Brilliant cinematography allows viewers to experience the mysteries and wonders of our civilization-from Graeco-Roman sculpture, to the streamlined ships of the Vikings, to the exquisite stained glass windows of Chartres, to the towering skyscrapers of New York.  Lord Clark's narration builds bridges over time and space, imparting an awareness of the breathtaking beauty of the priceless legacy that has been handed down to us.  Available now for the first time on video.  Civilisation was originally produced by the BBC in 35mm color, and is considered the standard-bearer for all TV documentaries.</review_text>
Bo Derek plays the title role to perfection in this Blake Edwards comedy. Despite what the Amazon capsule says , Julie Andrews plays Dudley Moore's girlfriend and not his wife. Watch the film before you write a summary of it!Along with the Pink Panther films, this stands as one of Edwards best films. It is a high point in the career of Dudley Moore and he is just perfect as George. Robert Webber also is good as George's gay cowriter and friend. Andrews is fine, also but what you leave the theatre with is the images of Bo Derek. Someone knew how to cast the title character perfectly</review_text>
What more can be said about this film? Filmed on location in Rome, Italy in the fifties.  Greg Peck and Audrey Hep.  Nuff said</review_text>
Audre Hepburns debut.  This ismy favorite movie of all time.  A romantic comedy whose characters have the highest integrity of any film I've ever viewed.  If you're not moved by this story and it's portrayal by command performances, then you're not breathing</review_text>
I remember the first time I saw the movie on TBS in the U.S. As usual, I started watching half-way into it and I was amazed by an unknown actor/star (Van Damme) who captivated my interest with some of the most awe-inspiring martial arts moves I'd have ever seen at the time. As a young teenager, this movie was very inspiring (to get involved in martial arts).Plot - BDoes a movie such as this need a plot to be an enjoyable movie? Simple answer is no. The plot is very basic. A soldier (Frank Dux) in the U.S. military goes A.W.O.L. to compete in a no-holds-barred tournament in Asia (think Ultimate Fighting Championship--Asian style). He is competing to fulfill a promise to his old martial arts mentor. The U.S. military sends two agents after him to bring him back in one piece and to keep him from competing. Along the way he makes a friend (who is also competing in the tournament) and a girlfriend (who is a reporter who is covering the tournament). Expect lots of different styles of martial arts fights with Van Damme's fights being the most impressive. The side stories of the friendships and the relationships are not fleshed out very well. The movie is all about the action! According to interviews, the original cut was unreleasable. Van Damme went back and re-cut the movie and even 16-18 years later, the movie holds its own in the martial arts movie genre.Acting - CThe acting is pretty bad from all, except for the small role of a military agent (played by a young Forrest Whitaker). Van Damme is young and very goodlooking, but it doesn't compensate for his trouble with the dialogue and his rather wooden presence (even in the romantic interludes). He does display at times a boyish charm, but it does not occur often enough. Who needs acting skills when you can dazzle with your martial art skills.Music - BI found the music soundtrack (which I actually own) to be quite entertaining and fit perfectly in a fight-type movie. The songs were done mostly by  Paul Hertzog and reminded me of the fight anthems of Rocky IV (by Survivor). Very original to this movie and remain among my favorite of any fight type movie.Cinematography - CThe movie occurs mostly indoors (with a few shots of the Asian streets) so there isn't much to comment on. The choreography of the fights and the camera angles really make the fights appear authentic and rather gruesome.DVD - DThe only extras are a trailer and some behind the scenes info you can read. Typical "movie-only" release for this kind of film.Overall - BIf you are wanting to relive '80's fight action movies or are a martial arts fan, this is the movie for you. Very good movie and I consider it one of Van Damme's best.</review_text>
This film must be scrutinized in the light of being Tony Scott a famed and renowned director of spot lights and subtle commercials at that moment. Additionally the figure of the vampire is refreshed and renovated with the presence of the feminine vision. Sarandon and Deneuve are in very good shape and Bowie gives another of his outrageous and perverse performances; after his standout performance in "The man who fell to earth" and "Furyo."So think about all those factors at the moment you bet for watch it. It's extremely important. To my mind, this is one of the hottest cult movies of the eighties.</review_text>
From the first day I watched this video, I have picked up so many musical ideas to apply to nearly every genre of music I play (and, being a military rock band bassist, I play a LOT of different genres).  This video will, without a doubt, help you become a better player</review_text>
freddy rules!I remember growing up and being afraid of freddy.Jason on the other hand never scared me to much.He was just a big dummy who walked slow.Now watching the end of the movie how can anyone say jason won?Jason went down in the water and never came back till the end.freddy survived only to be killed by the teenagers them selves by slicing off his head.freedy won!but anyway its not a bad movie .freddys make up looks great and glad to see him on the silver screen again</review_text>
I enjoyed Jet Li in this movie...never mind the dubbing, I can look past that and enjoy the move for what it is...fantasy/action.  Four stars..</review_text>
I thoroughly enjoyed the animals and would have liked more info given about them.The movie is pure entertainment with wonderful color [except coloring the tiger black] weird!They can leave off the technical jargon - I want to hear about the animals and how some of the scenes were shot - how the actors played their parts etc.What rigors did the actors have to go through? The set making was interesting and oh, yeah, didn't they know anything about horses?Definitely a fun movie</review_text>
I love this classic type of Sci-fi movie that was a really well written story.  I know it seems corny now but at the time it was a really cool movie</review_text>
I rented this movie about three years ago and fell in love with it.  I recently purchased it as a Chritsmas gift for myself.  I loved it</review_text>
Wow, this l932 camp classic squeezes so much into its running time--S&amp;M, near-nudity, drugs, racism,sex, sex--you're left gasping. Boris Karloff turns in a delightful turn as the menacing Fu Manchu. Myrna  Loy, in her pre-superstar days, is his &quot;horribly ugly&quot; daughter,  who delights in capturing gorgeous hunk, Charles Starrett, and playing with  him like a toy. His nearly nude scenes--when he wears a loose, constantly  shifting diaper--while she runs her long talons over her glistening  torso--must've have accelerated pulses of all sexes back in this pre-Code  extravaganza. Fay Wray should have played Karen Morley's squealing heroine.  Silver-haired and elegant Lewis Stone makes an off-beat hero-adventurer.  Gorgeous photography by Tony Gaudio, comic book costumes by Adrian, art  deco settings by Cedric Gibbons make this a smash-hit from the first frame  to the last. Lots of flesh baring by Charles and the dark slaves. It's fun  to watch Myrna lash her whip over Starrett and her &quot;Nubian&quot;  slaves. Great quote: &quot;Will we ever understand this Eastern race?&quot</review_text>
My brother, Henry, always said this was his favorite movie. He loved film noir...(although I didn't know what that was at the time) and, of course, he loved Richard Widmark in his role. Looking back, Widmark should have gotten the Academy Award for Best Suppporting Actor for this (he was nominated) but there are many Oscar "should'ves". If you like prison/gangster movies, classic film noir, Richard Widmark, Victor Mature and, of course, Brian Dunleavy, you've gotta see/own this...if you havn't/don't already</review_text>
quick and uncomplicated shipping; The DVD is still with my parents in law in the States - I myself live in Germany ; they bring it at Christmas - sorry, I cannot tell you anything about the qualitiy of the DVD, but I assume , that it is fine such as the shipping. If you want me to do so later, please let me know.That is why I did not write earlier.Best regardsJessika Krau</review_text>
This episode of Star Trek, "The Man Trap" is my earliest memory of what would become a lifelong enjoyment of the franchise. Truthfully, "The Man Trap" terrified me (I was maybe two, or three, although I am sure by that time the series was limping along in it's third season and I was seeing a repeat for the first time); Star Trek was considered "adult programming", and as such I was not allowed to watch it - I used to sneak behind the couch while my grandfather watched it on nights I stayed at their house, then would lay awake in my bed scared by what I'd seen, but excited just the same. Like another space show I enjoyed and was terrified by (Lost in Space), I didn't recognize Star Trek as anything but a world I wanted very much to be in, but remained frightened of anyhow (I was, as I said, very young).</review_text>
Fellows:I picked up the DVD in London, at a cost of 20 pounds, or about US$39.  There were still four copies left at the Virgin Superstore in Picadilly Circus.  So you got be able to find it somewhere, even not on Amazon.</review_text>
jacques tati takes on the modern world in his second sally as the perpetually bewildered mr hulot. while the movie is very funny in its pokes at modernism (highlighted by the house of hulots sister with its newfangled "conveniences" and its hilarious spouting dolphin fountain), it drags some of its jokes out a tad too long, and several scenes (notably the garden party) would have benefited by judicious paring. still, the movie demands to be seen by anyone who is a fan of classic comedy.</review_text>
Jacques Tati wrote, directed, and starred in this satire of modern gadgetry. He visits his sister's house, which occupies a definite spot in one of the circles of Dante's Hell: the furniture is ugly and useless, the kitchen sounds like the insides of an auto repair shop, all the "modern" conveniences are eyesores and demonic. The movie consists of mostly all sight gags, some funny, others not. Tati is the French Chaplin: there's very little dialogue, he wears a set costume (raincoat and pipe), there are lots of weird background noises and pratfalls. There's a lot of subtlety here, too, (it's not the THREE STOOGES by a longshot), and a lot of care went into the little things - all of them visual, of course (Tati doesn't speak at all). But it can fall flat at times, and it does go on too long. It's a very clever idea, though</review_text>
This is a very fun show and i enjoy watching it. i bought all the episodes available and they all worked great! its good to pay less to view</review_text>
I saw this on tv and loved it, so i had to buy it</review_text>
I think this is a great film.  Many critics and a few reviewers always complain about it's running time (128 minutes), insisting it's too slow.  Almost ALL of Clint's films (the ones he's directed) run long.  The running times range from just over 2 hours to just under 3 hours (the longest being Bird, at 2 hours, 40 minutes).  Sure, the film isn't PC, but it was made in 1975, when you didn't have to be PC.  But there is one thing that almost everyone agrees on...the mountain climbing scenes at the end of the film.  These are nervewracking and incredibly authentic.  Clint did all his own stunts in these sequences, and many professional rock climbers and mountaineers have praised these sequences.  And they are very intense to watch, because you know the actors are really up there.  No CGI in those days.  This is one of the reasons they work so well.  CGI looks fake anyway.  It makes movies seem like cartoons.  People know it isn't real.  CGI reliance should be reduced in Hollywood, as it takes the tension out of action scenes.Check this film out.  It's worth all of its 128 minutes.</review_text>
Clint Eastwood's "The Eiger Sanction" was made in 1975 and was, at that time, an excellent action thriller. Viewing it again recently, I was surprised at how well it has held up. This is due mostly to the location shoots - filmed in Monument Valley and in the Swiss Alps instead of on a Hollywood soundstage. These guys really went up there and filmed those climbing sequences for real (including star and director Eastwood, who was about 45 at the time), and that just can't be faked. The spy story is also pretty good, there is an excellent supporting performance by Jack Cassidy, and Vonetta McGee and George Kennedy lend solid support. Also, John Williams' pre-Star Wars score is hauntingly jazzy and suspenseful. Check this one out</review_text>
How to steal a million was a light-hearted farce starring too skilled performers in their own right.  Audrey Hepburn is delightful as the sweetheart bedazzled by Peter O'Toole an expert in forged art works.  The two have you rooting for them in their improbable caper.  Once you remind yourself that this is all just healthy fun than you can enjoy their performances.  Greed becomes almost a worthy attribute as they endeavor to outwit the perfect security system guarding unknowingly a fake artwork.  It is all good fun as the security system is foiled without harming a hair on anyone's head.  Dishonesty doesn't enter your mind as the caper comes to a pleasant climax.  Everyone ends up with their reputation intact and some spare change jingling in their pockets.  The two stars are engaging and carefree and are so effortless in their actions that they are a joy to watch.  Mind candy doesn't necessarily have to rot your brain.  It can give you some mindless enjoyment on a quiet night</review_text>
ok i like horror movies and i like slashers movies and even if this is a low-buget slasher it works very well. the cast is unknowens so it gives you the feeling that any of them could die at anytime,and that helps. plus the guy in the mine suit with the pix-ax is very scarey. give it a try</review_text>
When you consider the physical condition Olivier was in, his performance is pretty damn good. The supporting cast are mostly excellent, with Diana Rigg a standout as a venal, vicious, voracious, yet strangely feline and alluring Regan, and Dorothy Tutin not far behind as a grabby and lustful Goneril. Leo McKern is the definitive Gloucester</review_text>
This was purchased for my daughter for her 15th Birthday.  She is very deeply interested in Shakespeare and all his works but especially Romeo and Juliet.  I saw this version when it was released originally in theaters and wanted her to have the experience of seeing these 2 actors.  I thought it was beautifully done then and she loves it now.  Impressive that Mom and daughter enjoy this movie when the music of today's teens and much of their other interests are definitely not Mom's thing.</review_text>
After an elaborate theft scheme at the Cannes film festival goes terribly wrong Rebecca Romijn Ex-Stamos must go into hiding.She assumes a new identity but 7 years later a photographer threatens to expose her unless she can outwit him.Full of twists,deceit and secrets where nothing is as it seems don't expect a  plot or memorable performances.Rebecca is incredibly sexy but along with the rest of the cast she's just a pawn in DePalma's clever mindbender.A huge Hitchcock fan DePalma is best at stylish suspense scenes with no dialogue(like the 15 minute opening scene at the Cannes film festival in this film)and nicely includes elements of his and Hitchcock's previous films from Vertigo to Dressed to Kill.It's a lot of fun spotting the cinematic references and on repeated viewings you'll notice plenty of sneaky touches.If you're looking for an actionpacked straightforward suspense film you won't like Femme Fatale.If however you're looking for a twisty challenging film Femme Fatale will reward your attention</review_text>
When Darryl Zanuck announced that he intended to produce a film version of John Steinbeck's Depression-era novel, Grapes of Wrath, the industry was stunned... They were all the more surprised when the resultant film, directed by John Ford, proved to be one of Hollywood's finest achievement...This story of a family of Oklahoma sharecroppers who leave the oppressive poverty of the Dust Bowl in hope of finding a better life in Californnia was told with all of Ford's considerable artistry, and it featured compelling performances by Jane Darwell as the matriarch of the clan and Henry Fonda as the son who is driven to radicalism by the intolerable conditions that grind his family down..."The Grapes of Wrath" is a superb motion picture which could scarcely be improved upon... Acting, photography, direction combine to make this an unforgettable experience, a poem of a film...</review_text>
Colin Firth is the quinessential Mr. Darcy!  This film captures the depth and essence of Jane Austen's novel in such a beautiful, classic way.  It is worlds better than the recent Keira Knightley version, whose weak interpretation of the role of Lizzie made me appreciate Jennifer Ehle even more</review_text>
Most of the other reviews printed here I am in agreement with.  There is little I need to add except that I saw the film for the first time in the eighties when it came out on tape.  I just rewatched it and still find my gut reaction to be the same and then some.  Schlesinger's work, the three leads and the marvelous script make for an engrossing, sobering and disturbing treatise on how so many people lack values and seek "happiness" in all of the wrong places -- especially in the wrong people.  After the twenty-odd years of first viewing this film, I realized tonight how strong Julie Christie's performance is in this film.  There is not one hole in this bravura performance.  It's odd to make this statement, especially since she's playing such a shallow role.  It's not an easy nor a desirable part to play, but she carries it off as if she herself were the character.  Selfishness is at the core of the character as well as immaturity, and she stoops and conquers.Laurence Harvey has never played the rogue better and Dirk Bogarde is perfect as the jilted lover who indeed possesses a heart, but nevertheless gives in (but not completely) to Ms. Christie's empty needs.  He, indeed, sees through her throughout most of the film but cannot help being swayed by her charms.Emptiness served up brilliantly.  And we must respect the talents involved for providing us with a lesson -- as well as thank them (on two levels at least: talent coupled with making us examine what should really be of value to us)</review_text>
I think this is a great movie about a Guilt stricken IRA gunman. Based on a book this movie will make you laugh,cry,and excited.This is a must</review_text>
I found La Ciudad a very different movie from any other movies I have wathched. This movie is split into four narratives of Latino immigrants living in the city of New York. Immigrants come to the US with many dreams in their minds. These dreams include getting higher education or getting thier childeren higher education, getting rich, and living a happy and high standard life. This movie shows how these dreams of immigrants are turned down and broken because of the exploitations at thier workplace and the laws of the city and the government. This movie also shows how the immigrant children are affected from these laws and exploitations. For example, Luis's daughter Dulce cannot get addmission to school, and Ana cannot do anything to treat her ill daugheter who is not with Ana. I like it how the movie is shown in black and white; it really matches with the narratives that are shown in the movie. It also indicates that although immigrants hope to have happy and colorful lives in the US, they are not able to have them because of the laws and exploitations. Overall, I really liked the movie and I would encourage anyone to see it</review_text>
I came to this film after rave reviews from friends, so perhaps I was expecting too much. There is much to admire here; the acting is top-notch, the contrast between chatty characters and completely silent people in the opening interview scenes is well-crafted, and the plot premise itself is a fascinating one. For me, films are all about endings, and I felt in this area After Life didn't quite pay off. I didn't really buy into the romance, and wanted to know more backstory about the female character so I could care more whether she gets the guy or not.  I also thought they could have cut it a bit more - it feels 10-15 minutes too long to me. However, these are minor criticisms; it is a film I will watch again, and recommend to Japanese film fans, especially those who like the more slow-paced Japanese films such as Eureka, Moe no Suzaku and Sonatine</review_text>
It's right on. The scene transitions are nicely done. Even though a lot of this is predictable, it is still funny and makes one eager to see what's' next.Fernando literally goes down the line of all the sisters, till he has a shot gun wedding with the last. The scene between the cuckold and the err... cuckolded cuckold is hilarious. The sisters are very vivid and pretty (well except that cruz girl).Overall a very brilliantly done story</review_text>
jorge sanz (a looker) stars as a soldier deserting from the spanish army during the 1930s civil wars, taken into a family, who proceeds to fall in love with and seduce all four daughters, while forging a father/son relationship with the patriarch. touching and kinky and off beat, a worthy winner of the oscar as best foreign language film in 1992.</review_text>
The acting in this was very good.  It had a great cast.  It's just such a classic.  Being Shakespeare, it may be hard for some people to understand at first, but you catch on pretty quickly</review_text>
Al Pacino gives the best in this movie.  Shakespeare's play set on an authentic set in Venice with excellent photography - nobody could ask for more.  At least subprime lenders can't demand a pound of flesh.</review_text>
I always have a soft spot in my heart for film adaptations of Shakespeare.  They are always labors of love, often cribbed together by excellent actors and technicians working well-below scale just for the sheer thrill of working with the Bard.  Even the less-successful productions, such as Mel Gibson's turn as the Prince of Denmark or the recent update of "Love's Labours Lost" win my affection if not my undying devotion.But I had a special place in my heart for a few Shakespearean adaptations, such as Kenneth Branagh's "Henry V" and "Much Ado About Nothing," Ian McKellan's "Richard III," and even Baz Luhrmann's "Romeo + Juliet."  These were bravura, pell-mell, energetic films that made the Bard accessible and personal to me in a way that I couldn't get any other way.  I had thought that it would be a long time until another film jumped into that pantheon.Michael Radford's "The Merchant of Venice" has made the list.  A lush take on one of Shakespeare's "problem plays," "The Merchant of Venice" features a reasonably-well-cut two-hour version of Shakespeare's original play, a stellar cast, and a sumptuous visual feast of Venetian delights.  And, perhaps most surprisingly, Al Pacino does not overwhelm the entire production by either chewing the scenery a la "Scent of a Woman" or by his sheer star wattage.  Indeed, in a cast that also features Joseph Fiennes and Jeremy Irons, it is a newcomer, the ravishing Lynn Collins as Portia, who nearly steals the show.  Radiating intelligence, wit, humor, and burning sexuality, Collins is a revelation and worth the price of admission on her own.This "Merchant" also has the courage to leave no doubts as to the relationship between Bassanio (Fiennes) and his lover/patron, Antonio (Irons).  This is a mature, focused, respectful production that honors both its audience and the original source material.  Check it out</review_text>
I enjoyed the film, it was uncanny, bizarre, and colorful. wow. It' was a nice family movie</review_text>
This is a pretty original 70s horror movie starring two very likeable and attractive stars of the era - Katharine Ross and Sam Elliot.  It's just fun, not really all THAT scary or even too tense.  Basically Sam and Katharine end up unwilling guests in a spooky mansion where the guests are dropping off like flies while waiting for an old spooky man to pass away and leave them an inheritance.  Roger Daltry makes an appearance.  The deaths are all way over the top, and it's just fun.DVD is the movie plus a trailer.  That's about it, but the transfer is great considering the age of the movie.  Great spooky flick for a cold night by the fire.</review_text>
Follow one girl's story into adult hood. A beautiful story of romance that is realistic and tragic. If you have a romantic bone in your body and you don't mind crying, buy this movie and watch it with your girl friends.  I lend this movie out as well. There is adult content in this with nudity not for the faint of heart. Have your tissues ready.</review_text>
Avatar is so awesome! I saw one episode by chance and was determined to watch them all. It's got an excellent story line, great characters and awesome animation. I'd say it's the best show on TV out there right now, not just considering the cartoons either. It's got a real depth to it and isn't only fit for kids but teenagers(like me) and adults alike. Highly recomended!I don't know if the downloading was not working in the past but it's definitely working now. I've downloaded a few and they all work fine for me</review_text>
Can the book reviewers please pay attention. This is not the book, this is the VHS movie section. I see many book reviews, but not a single movie review. I'm glad everyone liked the book, but we need to see if the movie is any good here. I am sure it has alot going for it based upon the book, but I have seen some movies do a terrible job. What about this VHS movie? Has anyone actually seen it? Also can someone tell me how to get people to sell it for a reasonable price. Used rental copies for $22 to 125 is outrageous. One can only hope it comes out on DVD and these scalpers lose money</review_text>
Thanks for keeping a Brit sane in a country full of "My wife says..." jokes.Your wife is fat and ugly and I don't care what she says. Because she's ugly. And fat.....and not my wife</review_text>
The first time I saw this was on ABC. I thought, oh my gosh what the heck is this movie. I just couldn't stop watching. Before I knew it, I was sucked in to the plot. I absolutely !love! this movie! I can't wait to watch it again and again and again! -Ale</review_text>
A fellow is jailed for killing his estranged wife, but he actually had been at a bar, picked up a woman and took her to a show. Except that the cops don't believe him because everyone says they never saw him with the woman. His secretary, Ella Raines, is determined to find the phantom lady, with the help of his best friend and a detective.Nice jobs by Franchot Tone as the best friend and Thomas Gomez as the detective, and a great job by Elisha Cook Jr as a strange drummer who takes Raines to an after-hours jazz club. I've always liked Tone and think he was a very good actor. And as the years went by he became even better.This is a solid noir with a couple of unusual, surreal scenes. One of these days I hope someone brings it out on DV</review_text>
This movie is about a bunch of cheerleaders that witness a murder that Tommy Jones has to take care of. The girls always walk around in short clothes and Tommy struggles with the concept of he has to live with these women cheerleaders and he also cant find a way to talk to his daughter and these cheerleaders help him do that. and Also help him with a date he has. If you like that type of stuff this movie is for you. Its funny to me but everyone has an opinio</review_text>
I have had this movie on VHS for quite some time andjust recently purchased the DVD. This movie tells a great story while revealing L Amor's view of the range cowboys morality.  There simply are not enough good westerns being made anymore.  This is a great western. I would highly recomend any western that is derived from a Louis L Amor novel</review_text>
If one likes old westerns, especially written by Louis Lemore, it is excellent and so is the actors, especially Sam Elliot and Katherine Ross</review_text>
This film is primarily a screwball comedy with dance and song numbers thrown in for good measure.  The story concerns a ballet star(Fred Astaire) and a stage performer(Ginger Rogers) who may or may not be married depending on whom you ask.  Given the celebrity of the two parties involved hijinks and scandal ensue.  Both Fred and Ginger are in top comic form with their verbal sparring.  Need we redundantly state that they dance together exquisitely.  Good supporting cast includes the perpetually nervous Edward Everett Horton, the droll Eric Blore, and Jerome Cowan("The Maltese Falcon").  Good score by the Gershwin brothers.  You do not hear much about this film in the annals of screwball comedy probably because the principals are known primarily for their dancing.  Check this film out if you want to see a first rate comedy</review_text>
I had seen this film a number of times either on T.V. or by me popping it in on my DVD player. Denzel Washington and Sarita Choudhury are a pleasure to watch in this engaging story about a love affair between a  Africa American male and an Indian woman, whom both has never been to there native land, and how their romance causes strife in a small Southern town.  The movie handles the reactions by both families to the interracial union of Mina and Demetrius. Against all this, a subplot in the story revolves around the loss of a homeland and friendship between Choudhury's proud Ugandan national father and the Black Ugandan friend he left behind during Idi Amin's reign of terror.There are very few movies that can capture the emotions that go along with such a sensitive and controversial matter. Most importantly the opinions, thoughts, and traditions, both negative and positive, of both the Indian and Black communities are fairly communicated through the movie. A must see film and the only one I'm aware of that explores the relationship between African Americans and ethnic Indians.</review_text>
This is Bresson's greatest, and last, work.  It is a work from a true cinematic auteur.  No one made films like Bresson did, and I don't think anyone ever will.  This film is based on a short story by Tolstoy entitled The Forged Coupon (aka The Forged Note), except Tolstoy's story is much different that Bresson's take here.  It is about how a forged note of 500 francs passes from one hand to another, ruining the life of a fuel oil delivery man.  Bresson made this film when he was 82, but you couldn't tell that it was made by a man that old.  Quite often, critics assume that filmmakers (and artists in general) have nothing to say as they get older.  On the contrary.  They have even more to say.  A real artist's vision deepens as they grow older.  Kurosawa made Ran at 75, and Eastwood made Million Dollar Baby at 74.  Those are their best films.  Bresson is rather feisty and combative (which is a good thing) in the interviews presented here.  He doesn't mince words, and he doesn't seem interested in doing the usual inane questions that featurettes on DVD's usually have from bubble headed reporters (even though these were shot for French TV, not Entertainment Tonight).  He has something to say.  This is my favorite film of his (even though Lancelot of the Lake and Au Hasard Balthazar are close behind).  Sadly, he never made another one after this, but the 13 he did make are all brilliant.  Not one bad one.  Great film, great man...</review_text>
Fred Astaire met Ginger Rogers on the set of a previous film, FLYING DOWN TO RIO, where they were paired somewhat arbitrarily in one of those momentous decisions that, or so it seems from today's perspective, made the studio system seem to make sense.  You couldn't have really predicted the two would click on camera, for Fred's previous partner had been his own sister, and the two of them (Fred and Adele) had concentrated on the slightly nutty, zany dances together that did not require any sexual tension between partners.  (Think of the "Triplets" number in THE BAND WAGON.)As for Ginger, nothing in her previous screen or stage work hinted at any softness or vulnerability--she was, of course, hilarious at playing the sort of hard-edged blonde tramp parts that were too vulgar for Jean Harlow to play.  So matching them up was a gamble, but it sure did pay off, even if FLYING DOWN TO RIO gave them little room to show their stuff in.  One number, the incandescent "NIGHT AND DAY, changed the way people felt about them almost instantly, and even the never-ending CONTINENTAL, the longest and most tedious dance craze ever captured on film, could not douse the Promethean spark they created.Hopefully sometime soon whoever owns the RKO catalogue will issue this gem--and its successors--on DVD.  If even FINIAN'S RAINBOW has come out on a great looking DVD presentation, why can't THE GAY DIVORCEE</review_text>
I came away from this movie thinking - Wow, I wish I was like John Tucker!  I have never seen anyone make lemonade out of lemons like that man.  He was good and fine to boot.  I thought it was entertaining.  It was clearly more of a teenager movie, but I thought it was fun.  Definitely worth a check out.</review_text>
Wonderful and beautifully transferred to DVD.  Excellent production numbers and this just might be my new favorite Judy movie.  Grab that bucket of popcorn pop in the DVD and let Judy do her thing.  She is wonderful.  It will be just a fun evening</review_text>
Most serious directors and actors aspire to a level of professionalism that seems effortless to the point of casual.  Like the best baseball outfielders catching swirling flyballs with a nonchalant jog and a flick of the wrist.  On the other hand, Kinski and Herzog want you to feel every moment of effort, every muscle twitch, the oppresive heat, the mind-numbing glassy eyed exhaution,  the dangerous waters, & the sleepless nights. Watching this movie, I can easily imagine the furious arguments and sullen bitterness of men pushed to their creative and physical limits. They suffered to make this movie and they want you to know it.  Herzog's actors tolerate conditions and exertions far beyond the call of duty and for what?  To make a flick.  Aguirre's men tolerated far more for gold most didn't live to see.  At the heart is the titular character, played by Kinski as a wild eyed wraith more dead than alive as he descends into an utter madness as a refuge against the ordeal and death he presides over.  To know anything about Kinski is to know that Aguirre is not a terrible stretch for him.  If anything, his performance is more brave in its selfexamination than creative in its acting chops. Herzog, for his part, seems to be a good old-fashioned meglomaniac as he appears to derive great satisfaction from pushing his cast and crew far beyond normal limits and treating them like little toy people so he can be a rich famous director. He has a singular vision and is determined to see it on the screen, no matter what.  He is a throwback to the American studio director/petty tyrants like John Ford, Alfred Hitchcock (a gentleman tyrant who referred to actors as cattle), Michael Curtiz and many others.  Herzog is determined to control and Kinski resists control and their collaborations are the output of a kind of two brained insane but brilliant filmmaker. Aguirre is almost two movies.  One is a brillant study of madness and ordeal and the other is an equally fascinating, if unintentional, documentary of two difficult half mad professional collaborators making a great movie often in spite of themselves</review_text>
Nominated for Best Actor (Massimo Troisi), Best Adapted Screenplay, Best Music, Best Director, and Best Picture, "Il Postino" is a tender tale of love and poetry on a small island in the Mediterranean Sea, inspired by an incident in the life of Pablo Neruda, the Chilean poet who was briefly exiled, in 1952, for his communist ideas which have often got him into trouble...'Il Postino' is a beautiful, heartbreaking movie, funny in its simplicity and honest dialog...Massimo Troisi leaves his final legacy in the role of a shy, hesitant and uncultured postman who possesses the heart of a poet with truly peculiar observations, such as 'the whole world is the metaphor for something else,' often without realizing how exciting his comments are...Director Michael Radford had the care to create a wonderful film which floats on the love of words, rhythm, and imagery... His movie is much heightened by a music score that includes quotes, paraphrases and Argentinean tangos...His film turns out to be a great little movie... It deals with a friendship between a lethargic villager, who takes the modest job of delivering letters to the celebrated poet living in a secluded area... Poetry becomes their connection...Mario Ruoppolo is a simple man with a complicated set of values who rides his bicycle climbing the hard road to Neruda's cozy home and with his timid manners delivers the armful of correspondence to the single customer of the island...A polite Neruda shows little interest in his personal postman, but he favors him, one day, with his autograph, signing one of his books with the words 'Regards, Pablo Neruda.' Nevertheless as time passes the 'poet of love' becomes a bit more friendly, intrigued by Mario's enthusiasm regarding his poetry and poetic manner of speaking...Mario, impressed that almost every letter delivered to Neruda is from a female, couldn't understand how his new resident, despite his advancing age, has such magical power over women... So he tries, with his simple way of thinking, to understand all the secrets of the exalted poet, sharing his thoughts with him... He becomes increasingly curious, asking a lot of questions about the mystical creation of poetry, forcing the fascinating celebrity to reveal some of the unexposed materials of his artistic vision... Neruda introduces Mario to the verbal rupture of metaphors, attempting to teach them to his anxious pupil... The two men discover an unexpected friendship based on their mutual view that life should be a framework for seduction and romance...As the film goes on, Mario, crafted with a tender spirit, attempts, through Pablo, a gentle intervention and poetry to win over the woman he has fallen for, Beatrice Russo - played by Sicilian fashion model Maria Grazia Cucinotta...Becoming in a slow way his 'Latin Cyrano de Bergerac,' Neruda guides his postman into romance, but refuses to write a poem that could charm his young passionate Beatrice...To attract the prettiest girl in town, Mario becomes a bit of a poet himself... But when he finds his own words insufficient to his romantic mission, he appropriates one of his tutor's sensuous poems, and protests, when discovered, that "Poetry doesn't belong to those who write it, but to those who need it."Unbelievably his 'lyrical words' fascinate the sensual bombshell who was playing a mean game of table soccer in a low cut dress, but disturb greatly her disapproving aunt Donna Rosa, who sees that Mario is contaminating her niece with his nice words... Nevertheless the postman wins the beautiful Beatrice and convinces her to marry him...Heartbreak comes when Neruda receives a telegram that he can return to the country he loves so much... From here on, an extended epilogue with smiles, tears and regret, takes the story on... And the film almost breathes lyrical tenderness in its depiction of an honest man who longs so much for love...Mario, who has not received any word or greeting from the poet and had remarked that it's quite normal for the poet not to remember him, returns to the poet's villa to revisit the place that had once been alive with the sounds and sights of emotional discovery... In the silence that now surrounds it, he realizes that the poet has taken all the beautiful things away with him...He gets the idea to create a 'live' poem for his dearest friend Don Pablo... An outdoors tape to let him listen to the wonderful sounds of the island, from the small and big waves at the Cala di Sotto, to the wind on the cliffs, to the wind through the bushes, to the sad nets belonging to his father, to the church bell of Our Lady of Sorrow, to the starry sky over the island, to Pablito's heartbeat...Philippe Noiret (best remembered for 'Cinema Paradiso') charms us once again as the affectionate mentor to Mario... He convinces the postman that poets are quite human but warns Mario about the old Dictaphone saying, 'Even the most sublime ideas sound ridiculous if heard too often.'The sets and the cinematography, accompanied by an Oscar Winning Score, create a wonderful atmosphere of the remote poor island with no running water, of the modest houses with pealing plaster, of the Rocky cliffs overlooking the blue Mediterranean, of the post-war fishing village under the shades of rose and salmon...Like love itself, some great movies seem surprisingly human... Delbert Mann's 'Marty' was one, Cameron Crowe's 'Say Anything...' was another, and now Michael Radford's "Il Postino" is exceptional... His film stands tall in its own right as a 'must see' movie... It's tough to imagine anyone not liking it... It simply revives our memories, and breaks our heart...</review_text>
This video gives insight into the life and persona of Picasso.  While it touches on his climb to fame, recognition and success in the art world, it focuses primarily on his personal relationships.  I love his work, but I  sure wouldn't have wanted to live with him!  The video had therapuetic  effects for me; I would assume it would for any viewer as it certainly  calls into question your own view of relationships, how they are and how  they should and shouldn't be. A winner all the way around</review_text>
If you played any of the pc/video games than you know how much they left out of this movie. Still, its one of the best "B" movies I've ever bought. I enjoy it every time I watch it</review_text>
Truely speaking, this is a very hilarious episode. Must see for every one</review_text>
"Dangerous Beauty" is a beautiful period piece based on a non-fiction book. The movie is set in 16th century Venice. Veronica falls in love with Marco, but Marco comes from a rich family. Veronica's mother advises her that she should become a courtesan so that she can spend time with Marco. Veronica does so well at the courtesan business that she becomes a favorite of all the men in the city. Later she becomes the target of an inquisition by the Church for witchcraft. A beautiful story about how women survive in society</review_text>
We start off with ace fighter pilot Topper Harley (Charlie Sheen) who originally got kicked out of the NAVY but is returning to help them save a mission, code name "Sleepy Weasel". Harley has his own problems like overcoming the death of his father and getting along with a snobby brown noser Kent Gregory (Cary Elwes). Adding to the confusion is Ramada Thompson (Valeria Golino),a beautiful shrink, who is Kent's girlfriend and Topper's love interest. They go head to head when Ramada & Topper's affection becomes obvious at the bar, and Kent declares war on Topper.Among the other pilots is Pete "Dead Meat" Thompson (William O'Leary), Jim "Washout" Pfaffenbach, Kowalski (Kristy Swanson), Lt.Comm James Block (Kevin Dunn),and  Admiral "Tug" Benson (Lloyd Bridges).Topper & Kent is definatley NOT the only story going on here. There is the death of "Dead Meat", "Washout" struggling with wall-eye vision, a deceitful commander trying to abort the mission, and an incompetent admiral that doesn't know which you shoot: fish or duck.But c'mon, you didn't really watch this movie to make sense out of it did you? You watched it for the same reason you watch any of Jim Abrahams movies-you want a good laugh!! And I guarantee you, you won't be disappointed! Don't try to analyze it. Just have a good time!!!</review_text>
A fantasy, dealing with the curse of star-crossed lovers, Ladyhawke never fail to be top-notch entertainment. The cast is exceptional, and get their characters right. It's all too easy to fall into the story and believe what's going on.Along with "Dragonslayer", this is one of the top fantasy movies. The story is compelling, the setting has a very gritty, dirty feel to it, and the location just adds to the overall feeling of living in the middle ages.This is not a movie I can just put on 'in the background' and let play while doing other things, because it suck me in every time</review_text>
This is an excellent movie for the romantic type. A real classic!  Got it for my wife for her birthday.  Enjoyed it very much</review_text>
This book is not about the grand strategy of war nor is it specifically about the heroic actions of its author, Audie Murphy, who was, of course, America's most decorated soldier of  World War II.  On the contrary, the book is about the war as seen up close and personal by those who actually fought it in the foxholes, on the roads and in the forests, and many times on the open battle fields of North Africa and Europe.It is a remarkable book which puts the reader right in the middle of the action, right there with the bone-weary dog faces wallowing in the mud at the bottom of their fox holes, right there with them as they slog toward the battle lines with trucks passing them bearing the corpses of those who went before.  And, if the reader listens carefully to their gallows humor, he or she can hear them joke with one another as they try to calm their nerves and still their fears.  Then, he or she can hug the ground right beside them as they are shelled by mortars and artillery or raked by machine gun fire and watch as the soldier, whom he or she has almost come to know, is picked off by a concealed sniper or killed by a mortar blast.In other words, this book is about war and the men who fight it.  If I had to recommend one book by means of which a reader could fully understand what it is truly like to be a combat infantryman, this would be the one.</review_text>
Aside from the rather chintzy quality of the disc itself, (WHY oh WHY don't they re-release the Special Edition again???) The film is fantastic. Kris Lemche is, as always, sarcastically funny and somehow very real and relate-able, Katherine Isabelle is quite convincing in her portrayals of madness and mayhem, and Emily Perkins is uniquely lovable as the younger sister trying to save her sibling from the woes of Lycanthropy. Tightly edited, and beautiful in it's cinematography, this is one indie horror flick you don't want to miss!!!</review_text>
Like everyone says, this is a very strange story.    It seems to be a love-triangle, but there are more angles than three. For about half the film I thought Glenn Ford was meant to be in love with the Ballin Mundson (Ballin Mundson?) character, because he saved Ford's life (what for?), then gave him a job and was good to him. So far, so odd, but relatively simple to understand. When Rita shows up things become extremely complicated: incomprehensible in fact.  Who had run out on who, and why? I think we should have been told. Was it something to do with Rita's earlier line of work?  A lot of blame was being put on Rita, but so far as I could see she wasn't doing much wrong. Well, maybe just a bit of a tease, but so lovely, sweet and tender you'd forgive her anything. Actually, nobody's motivation here was the slightest bit convincing.  Also, as somebody else has said, the plot reads as if someone put together the pieces left on the cutting-room floor after Casablanca. Anyway, two-thirds into the story,  we get a totally alien sub-plot about conquering the world by cornering the tungsten filament market, which we couldn't care less about, as it has  nothing to do with the tensions between the three main players.  This part is boring and even more unconvincing than the original triangle. The sinister Mr Mundson looked good in his part, but it seemed as if he wasn't being allowed to get his teeth into the role.  Glenn Ford has never impressed me as a personality. He never seems to have what it takes: I can't imagine Rita falling for him, nor can I believe he could take out heavies with his puff-ball punches. I can't even believe he'd behave like the nasty little swine he's supposed to be. So why have I watched this movie two or three times, and why will I watch it again? Only one answer: you said it, folks --- Rita Hayworth.</review_text>
I haven't read them all, but it seems to me that most of the reviews here are about film technique. In addition to being ground-breaking from a director's standpoint, it's a great story. I've seen the Richard Gere version, and frankly, all I remember about it is the MTV music video for the theme song. The original gave me a completely different perception of the story, and the ending surprised me. I thought Jean-Paul Belmondo did a fantastic job with a complex character. There's a press conference scene that I thought was important to the story, as well. I wish I spoke French, because I think there are nuances in the dialogue not captured in the subtitles, but nevertheless, I think this is an enjoyable film in addition to all the cinematic masterpiece accolades.</review_text>
A schizophrenic journey through the dark urban world. Michael, A young writer, comes from a dysfunctional household and uses his cartoons as an outlet. Eventually he begins to delve himself into his dark toon world and the movie is beautifully animated and stuffed full of creativity, sex, bigotry, and ultimately a true grim view of society. As dark as it sounds I found parts of this movie very amusing. Housewives, pass on this one it's not 'Finding Nemo'. If you enjoy a truly stunning visual experience and dark humor/satire I'd reccomend you watch this....A true must see for the inebriated</review_text>
I really did like this movie and the different kind of story. It was very imaginative and well acted. The story was very scarey at times and gorey as well. The only problem with the movie is that the director covered up Ezra Godden's nude scene with a half shot of his butt in the begining of the movie. Other than that, if you would like to see a town that prays to a fish god Dagon that wants human sacrafices and the town's people peeling off the faces of it's visitors then this movie is for you</review_text>
I saw a high school production of BRIGADOON in San Francisco at the ICA (Immaculate Conception Academy) at 24th and Guerrero.  These girls who played the parts had never been anywhere near Scotland, you could tell, and some had not been in the USA very long and the charming accents of South of the Border stood in for the strong Scots burr.  Nevertheless they played the show beautifully and ever since then I have had a fondness for the music and the story.  I feel that the makers of MOULIN ROUGE were probably trying to capture some of the big-hearted appeal of BRIGADOON when they created their fantasy world.  Watching the movie I have always felt that a bit of the magic was lost because so much of Minnelli's canvas was spent on dance elements which, IMHO, are just not that interesting.  So many dance numbers created to take advantage of Gene Kelly's and Cyd Charisse's astonishing abilities.  Maybe too many!  Thus some of the musical numbers had to be cut out, including some of the loveliest of the songs Lerner and Loewe wrote for the 1947 musical.Imagine my surprise and delight when the new DVD came out this spring and I discover that, in fact, Minnelli did film three of the rejected songs (and recorded another, perhaps the greatest) and that all of this deleted material would be available on the disc.  I was in hog heaven.  However we are all familiar with some deleted scenes that you watch and then you say, "Well, I know why that sucker got deleted" and I was afraid that these scenes would be of inferior quality.  (Like "Is It A Crime?" in BELLS ARE RINGING--forgive me, "Crime" fans!)But it is my pleasure to report that all 3 numbers here are keepers.  I wish somehow they had been re-integrated back into the main print of BRIGADOON and we could then judge the movie for once and for all the way Minnelli wanted it.  If it is too long, then maybe shorten down the "Sword Dance."  I feel sure that somewhere footage must exist for the exquisite "There But For You Go I"--or is that just a dream of mine?  In any case we can now hear the track, and we can see the fully staged versions of "Come to Me, Bend to Me" and the marvelous "From This Day On" which is to BRIGADOON what "From This Moment On" is to KISS ME KATE.  All in all, the plus factor makes this disc the one to buy if you're wanting the full BRIGADOON magic</review_text>
At this moment in our history we need all the input about the multiple facets of the hideous War Machine that has an apparent strangle hold on every country on the planet.  In this Russian meditation, 100 DAYS BEFORE THE COMMAND, we are shown the behind-locked-doors view of youth preparing to become soldiers and leaders of soldiers.  On the surface the director's eye seems to be telling us that 'boot camp' for these VERY young appearing boys is no more than a summer camp experience.  But then he gradually shows the darker, terrifying side of what preparing these innocents for war produces - suffering, self-doubt, death, alienating behaviour, dreams and nightmares.  There is an incredible sense of innocence in the eyes of these youth, and a groping for comradery that lightly brushes on eroticism.  The multiple nude scenes seem to be offending more people than the Russian censors, but they are some of the more tender and tangible scenes in this meandering film about questioning our place and mindsets in the propagation of war leaders.  Of note, in this very Russian film, the music used in the background is all Bach - excerpts form the Passions, cantatas - instead of works by Russian composers.  This adds another dimension to this apparent 'paean' for world peace.  This film is not for everyone, especially not for those who still have difficulty with male nudity........</review_text>
This movie was much better than I expected. With all the nonsense about the "NC-17" rating wooooo, I thought it was gonna be all T&A and more. Not that I don't like that, but the movie was exactly what Siskel & Ebert were saying at the time: A movie that has a plot and sexuality. NOT porn, but a truly ADULT movie. This is a movie that deals with grown up issues regarding sexuality, marriage and fidelity.Those who are to immature or whose sense of morality forbids them from whatching a movie about two adults having extramarital and love affairs, DEFINATELY will be offended and should avoid this movie.If you can watch something like that with an open mind and are interested in such a story line or you are interested in a love story that gets a little complicated and convoluted then this is for you.I am a big fan of UMA THURMAN and that only makes this movie better for me. The story gets a bit complicated as the lovers grow in different directions.This is a very "artsy" movie. It deals with comlex love and sex issues. This by the way, was the first NC-17 movie. Yes, they made that rating especially for this one, but its not anywhere as hot as SHOWGIRLS as far as nudity. (see my review of that one) I was expecially surprised to find out that this is a TRUE story about famous people.I loved it and I give HENRY & JUNE 5 stars</review_text>
This movie has a very high "cheese" factor. The most glaring example being when the Notre Dame player scores a touchdown in the 1928 Army game after Rock's rousing "Win One for the Gipper" speech, looks to the sky and says "That's one for the Gipper!" That aside, this is a great movie! It is way better than "Rudy"!!! After all, Rudy's Notre Dame playing career lasted less than even 30 seconds!!! This is the story of the story of the one man who actually BUILT the program for crying out loud!!!! If it wasn't for Rock, Rudy would have never happened! I'll take this story over the one about a hapless janitor any day!!!</review_text>
If you have read and enjoyed the book then you will love the movie.  Micky Rourke is excellent (this is still in the days when he could act) and so is the rest of this stellar cast. Well worth it</review_text>
Grand old movie, well acted, will watch many times agai</review_text>
Being a fan of Russ Meyer movies since classics like "Mudhoney", "Vixen" and "Lorna" it is amazing what happens, when Russ gets some money to make a movie for a major company. Likewise italian competitor Tinto Brass Russ gets in feel with picturing "Erotic" in a slight different way. I liked this movie very much for it's blooming 60's Pop-feeling and great decent inszenation of the participated women. I'm in general a fan of exploitation movies and this one is an especially great one presentated on DVD with a great transfer and lots of extras. Well Done. (Hope my english is half the way understandable, sorry I'm german)</review_text>
This Amazon unbox is not fully developed or has a lot of bugs in it. They should pull it until they get the bugs ironed out. Could not download all of the movie i ordered and now it is gone from my computer and I don't see how to download it again.Update: Most of the problems I experienced were with my Sattelite connection. After 175 MB they start to throttle the speed way down. I upgraded and this helped. I can now download large movies but only in 350mb bites each 4 hours. If you are having trouble read your sattelite "fair access" policy</review_text>
In my opinion one of Gary Coopers greatest roles. The background story is excellent making this movie one you can watch over and over.</review_text>
I recently viewed this film when it was broadcast on television, and I must say that it was one of the best movies I've seen in a while. Part of the spy genre, Quiller travels to Berlin to investigate the resurgence of a group of Nazis and it is necessary for him to uncover where their base is located. As with any spy thriller, it is difficult at times to differentiate between a supposed friend and and an enemy. One keeps wondering if Quiller is indeed placing his trust on the right people, particularly those who claim to be on his side. Quiller is a spy who doesn't carry a gun, noting that he is less likely to be killed if he is not armed. Despite his intelligence and wit, he still gets caught in precarious situations. Impeccable acting accompanied by astute dialogue make this a compelling piece to watch over and over again</review_text>
AFTER 81 YEARS, I HAVE DECIDED TO GIVE UP ON THE GREAT DRAMATIC MOVIES THAT PRESENT THE WORLD IN ALL ITS MASSIVE TURMOIL.  I GET ALL THAT FROM NEWSPAPERS, PERIODICALS, RADIO, TELEVISIOPN AND NOW, EVEN THE INERNET.  I WANT TO WATCH MOVIES THAT I CALL "FEEL GOOD" MOVIES. THESE MOVIES CEMNTER ON A SMALL GROUP OF PEOPLE WITH A FEW INSIGNIFICANT PROBLEMS AND THEN, OVER THE COURSE OF AN HOUR OR SO, WORKOUT THE KINKS OF THIER LIVES AND LIVE HAPPILY EVER AFTER.  THESE MOVIES CAN BE FULL OF PATHOS OR BATHOS OR EVEN SLAP STICK COMDEDY, BUT THEY NEVER PRESENT YOU WITH ANY PROBLEM GREATER THAN HOW TO GET YOUR MOTHER-IN-LAW TO BABYSIT THE KIDS BUT NOT MOVE IN WITH YOU...UNLESS YOU WANT HER TO.  COLD COMFORT FARM MEETS MY CRITERIA TO BE CLASSIFID AS A "FEEL GOOD" MOVIE.</review_text>
this movie far exceeds its later edition. this edition is disturbing, but excellent. the violence, the gore, everything is heart-pounding</review_text>
My niece and I love the movie. We sing Thumbelina all the time.  The movie is a treasure.I just wish it had some special features worthy of the movie</review_text>
My almost 3 year old loves it.  She doesn't understand a lot of it and some of the scenes are a bit 'mean spirited' but she's been able to overlook them.  She and I love the music together.  That's why I bought it in the first place</review_text>
This episode of Star Trek, "The Man Trap" is my earliest memory of what would become a lifelong enjoyment of the franchise. Truthfully, "The Man Trap" terrified me (I was maybe two, or three, although I am sure by that time the series was limping along in it's third season and I was seeing a repeat for the first time); Star Trek was considered "adult programming", and as such I was not allowed to watch it - I used to sneak behind the couch while my grandfather watched it on nights I stayed at their house, then would lay awake in my bed scared by what I'd seen, but excited just the same. Like another space show I enjoyed and was terrified by (Lost in Space), I didn't recognize Star Trek as anything but a world I wanted very much to be in, but remained frightened of anyhow (I was, as I said, very young).</review_text>
I seen it a few months back then, to my dismay it was on again the same time as RAW, but instead I recorded it anyways. It does a very good job of creating a nightmare Orwellian future, without making the people seem too paranoid for the most part. The scenes of the President talking on TV were very powerful. It strongly reminded one of a "Big Brother lite." Yes there is violence and a love story and rebels risking their lives for a better future.Some favorite moments: 1. The girls running out of the clinic 2. The guard and dog patrolling the quarantine 3. The rebel leader screaming for guards there was a negative present(which is punishable by getting shot on the premises) 4. The extremely moving ending and the new rebel leader Awesome flick you don't wanna miss, trust me.</review_text>
This is my first Bergman.  (And I did not pay $36 for it.  I bought it for 99 cents on eBay, completely new, played fine.)  I bought several Bergmans (almost all from eBay, they're very expensive otherwise)when his name kept popping up in connection with Woody Allen, a hero of mine.  I liked this movie very much, it was warm and soothing and interesting.  I was struck at first with the simplicity of the symbols and the extremely detailed direction (e.g. when the old man starts while leaving the room to move a chess piece, then changes his mind and continues on out of the room).  I have 6 of his films left to watch and I'm looking forward to them, particularly the ones with dubbed in English, which most of them are.  As for its being similar to a Woody Allen flick, all that comes to mind is "Another Woman."  But I'll hold my tongue (fingers), I have 6 more to see.  What really does come to mind, and the reason I gave this flick such a mediocre rating, is "A Christmas Carol"!  It's better than I ever thought Dickens was, but the Dickens came first.  I loved the movie until I realized that</review_text>
My almost 3 year old loves it.  She doesn't understand a lot of it and some of the scenes are a bit 'mean spirited' but she's been able to overlook them.  She and I love the music together.  That's why I bought it in the first place</review_text>
I had not heard of this production, so I had no expectations of it.  I am a fan of the BBC literature miniseries, and the lead actor in this had a small, disagreeble role in "Wives and Daughters."  What a nice surprise to see him in such a positive role, so charming and sincere.  He is wonderful here, complex and layered.I found this film to be an unexpected joy.  The plot has many twists that went in unusual directions, the countryside vistas are gorgeous, it is like a rustic country vacation with a love story.If you want to find faults, there are always some to be found.  The villian is handsome but one dimensional - and what is up with the "soul patch" beardlette and the hair? The heroine is lovely, but really a bit too young to have the acting complexity to hold our interest for this long.  One of the sisters has horrible modern highlighted blonde hair which many actresses have now, and it is the bane of period movies... why didn't they fix that?  Some of the plot points are silly and expected, but still... overall, this is a delight, and the costumes, sets and villages feel authentic and isolated and real.At the half way point, the story completely surprised me and took us to a different place.  How fun.  This film is also a rare one; in that I think BOTH my parents would enjoy it.  It is enough of a man's story to hold my father's interest, but enough of a woman's story to keep it lively and lovely.  Much of the action is outdoors at some locations which are part of a national preserve/park which lend a fairytale quality to the action, perfect for this legend of a magical romance in a very real world.Completely enjoyable</review_text>
I have always loved this movie, but especially love the music used in the soundtrack. It lifts the soul</review_text>
I really enjoyed this movie however one of the more interesting parts of the movie was not fully developed.  Ian Mckellen's character was supposed to be homosexual .....he is in love with Vincent Perez's character.  It was a pretty subtle subplot in the movie and while I was watching it I was thinking....hmmmm is Ian Mckellen's character gay? I read Roger Ebert's review of the movie on [...]. In his article Ebert says the movie could have been more interesting if this plot was further developed....I agree. I really enjoyed the movie but I thought Ian Mckellen's character was very interesting and if his desires were further explored it could have turned this fairly ordinary romance movie into an extraordinary movie</review_text>
I got what I ordered in a timely fashion, with no complaints. Thank you</review_text>
To begin with, I wish these so-called reviewers would stop giving away the plots of the movies they extol!  That said, this is a rare case (the 1st of its kind?) of a movie being better than the play it was based on.  The general framework was of course the same, but in the play Judy Holliday's part was taken by Josephine Hull, a very funny little old lady (who also scored both on Bway and on the screen in "Harvey" and "Arsenic and Old Lace," to name the only 2 that I know of), and the love interest on stage was only hinted at around the edges, it blossomed in the film.  One problem, there simply were no witty lines, either in the play or the movie.  This is odd for Kaufman (though the play was produced in 1953, very late in his career), but about par for Burrows (early in his career).  But still it was clever and interesting, the play had more structure than the movie (typical of Kaufman), but the movie did things with the plot that were suggested but left undone in the play, which surprised me very much and made me wonder about Kaufman.  Also the flick left out all the naughty words which I'm sure Hull barked out with delicious abandon!  (Note:  Kaufman co-wrote the play, Burrows adapted it for the screen.)  This I think was more a sit-com than an actually witty Kaufman comedy.  And finally, Judy Holliday did NOT play a "dumb blonde"!  She only did that in "Born Yesterday.</review_text>
I have to say that I picked this one episode out of the many as an example of the talent of these two gentleman.  If you see comedy and want comedy that is more direct and honest in how it portrays different groups, this is the series.I enjoy their skits and think that it simply pokes fun without being mean.  That is hard to do.  The different characters they take on makes me think there is more than two guys, they are that good. In my humble opinion. You do not need to be an Anglophile for the series but it would really help to be an Anglophile Valley girl for the Vicky skit.</review_text>
I highly recommend this DVD for its superior acting - all hands, as well as for the spectacular photography, scenery and overall quality of presentation.  A real keeper</review_text>
Probably the best portrayal of Louis L'Amour's Sackett series.  Although more than one book was used, it all ties together.  Casting was excellent.  I would highly recommend this DVD for all L'Amour and/or Sackett fans</review_text>
I love this movie.  And I don't have anything bad to say about it.  But if you get the DVD be prepared because the movie and the audio tracks do not match.  So you hear an actor speak before their mouths move.  This drove me crazy but I still enjoyed the movie</review_text>
Although he was raised by an underworld important personage., James Cagney will join F.B.I., when a pal is killed by gangsters ., and he will put all his first hand experience to be useful.Another little gem of William Keighley of the middle thirties.</review_text>
The Dylan (?) lyric "To laugh and cry in a single sound" came to mind the first time I saw this movie as part of a Saturday night film series at the local university 25 years ago -- it's just brilliant, a wild and manic ride that ends up being completely life-affirming, you just want to cry out at the end of the movie, it's too good to be true. This is one of the best movies I've ever seen</review_text>
If you like Denzel Washington, I think this is one of his best movies yet.  He is sexy, and so is his co-stars.  The movie delivers great action, suspense and surprises at the end.</review_text>
This is a terrific movie regarding military life in the '60s.  Jessica Lange truly deserved her Oscar and Tommy Lee is excellent and of course Powers Booth shows his narily side which he protrays so well in so many movies.  I can't even tell you how many times I have seen this movie and I will watch it again and again.</review_text>
Most of us have seen the movie, a great drama with great acting. The DVD is a super clean transfer. Not any features to speak of but well worth the money invested. Very clean for a movie made so many years ago.mann</review_text>
Eisenstein's verve has never been questioned, even if it was absorbed by living in 'dark times,' to reference Hannah Arendt. This feature is worth anyone's time as the angles of observation and superb editing defy adequate description</review_text>
Sure, it would have been great if the Chuck Jones and Dr. Seuss  alliance would have continued for this outing (their "How the Grinch Stole Christmas" and "Horton Hears A Who" are unquestionable classics) but this is a noble effort.. a VERY noble effort.  "The Cat in the Hat" was always been my favorite Dr. Seuss book. Having said that, I felt the top notch vocal talent (Allan Sherman will forever be the Cat in the Hat, sorry Mike Meyers!) and whimsical screenplay really fleshed out the book playful theme ... and the Geisel penned songs were truly inspired!  So the animation is a little off.  This is going to be considered quite the classic when that stinker of a movie opens this winter</review_text>
When I was little, I remembered this show before I read the original Cat in the Hat.  I was enanmored by the animation of the great late Chuck Jones and the wonderful vocals of Allan Sherman as the Cat in the Hat.  If you see the credits, Theodore Geisel had his hand in the music.  I recently bought the sing-a-long tape for my daughter, Grace, who is 3 years old.  She requests to see it, so hopefully the new DVD will be a great asset if it has extra features such as interviews or even behind the scenes of one of the best animation short classics ever</review_text>
I first stumbled across this movie on cable in the late 80's. I loved it then and still do today. Great story, great casting, great acting & great period film making. Diane Lane is not to shabby either as a strippin' diva with a taste for the fast life. Matt Dillon plays a complete craps stud who can win any dice game no matter the stakes or cash on the table. Tommy Lee Jones, Tom Skerrit, Bruce Dern & Lee Grant all contribute with awesome performances to this "Gem Club" of a movie. I sincerely hope we'll all be lucky enough for this title to be available soon on DVD. Heck, I'd love to have a DVD with tons of extras too if it was up to me but it it's not. I can always dream though..</review_text>
This is a CLASSIC Christmas movie that you AND your entire family are sure to love.  Check this out...  I PROMISE you that you will not be disappointed</review_text>
Tales from the Darkside the movie is a well crafted horror film that brings us Stephen King and George Romeo and Michael McDowell together and give us different tales of imaginable horror!!!!!! Lot 243 is about a mummy that is on the loose and kills for revenge and Cat from Hell is a black cat that is out to kill a old rich guy and with Lover's Vow bring us to the city that never sleeps New York and one night a artist goes to meet a friend at a bar and ends up making a promise to a monster or he dies!!!!!!! Warparound a boy is trapped in a lady's house as she prepares him for dinner!!!!!!! Each tale is different and has its thrills and jolts within each story and has Debbie Harry from Blondie in it!!!!!!! If you loved the show then you need to check this one out!!!!</review_text>
Jamie Lee Curtis plays a college co-ed who and her friends throw a party on a train, and a killer is amoung them....A good slasher movie of the 80's, David Cooperfield plays a sexy magician, who forms his wonderful magic, almost putting a spell on those ladies around him....Just remember jokes could kill you........</review_text>
This was purchased as a gift for a co-worker who is adopting a child from China.  Therefore I did not open it nor view it.  The recipient is now overseas picking up their daughter so I know they haven't had the opportunity to view it.  But being from Sesame Street, what can you lose</review_text>
I purchased the DVD for my adopted Chinese grandaughter...the whole family loves it.</review_text>
This is far too big and rich a film to be contained in any summary description. It is rich in its beautiful depictions of childhood, family, and of sexual love, rich in its narrative of the growth of fascism, and fascist personalities, in pre-WW II Italy, rich in its analysis of the unjust relationship between the owners and the workers of Italy's farm lands, rich in the beauty of its sets, costumes, and scenes. It is a rough, rambling, long film, badly dubbed in the English version, but it is also an indispensable, inimitable, and immensely enjoyable journey through a vital part of modern European history. I saw the "short" version of the film shortly after its release in 1977--it did not have a long run in the United States--and never forgot it. I saw it again, just now, thirty years later, but this time, the director's much longer cut. It had lost none of its power.</review_text>
Although given short shrift by the few critics who watched it, this is a worthy effort, marked by good acting, direction, technicals, and an intelligent script. Although in a state of undress through much of the film, Kelly Lynch is given an opportunity to display the full panoply of her acting range as there are essentially only two actors. And, as so often with independent films, all involved have an opportunity to be truly creative. The desert setting enhanced the starkness of the extreme emotions to which the viewer is exposed.</review_text>
I think it's kind of poetic that I ended up getting the film adaption of Ray Bradbury's "Fahrenheit 451". It was because I couldn't find the book anywhere! I don't know how good it is as an adaption, but I found the film thought provoking, well directed and clever.The film is set in a world where books are banned and burnt. Nothing is to be read, except for the numbers on top of the bottles of pills and sedatives people of this age often take. Books have contradicting ideas, the book burning "firemen" claim. They make people unhappy sometimes, they change people. Authors are raised on high in the world of literature, as if they are more than the people around them. For a happier society, where everyone can be equal, books must be destroyed, they say. Montag is a fireman, a talented one due for a promotion. He has a wife, he has a large television set in the wall (though most people in this world have two), and he considers himself a pretty happy guy. A young woman approaches him on the monorail home, having seen him around for so long on the trip home she felt she should say hello. She asks about his job, and wonders if he ever read any of the books he burnt. It gets him thinking, and he ends up reading a copy of David Copperfield by Charles Dickens that is due to be torched. Like the Firemen say, it changes his life, and suddenly this happy society seems a little more sinister than before...I think it's a film that flows really well, has a couple of nice directorial quirks, and has that British 1960s feel in it's sets, landscapes and colour schemes, which I always like. It's kind of strange that it's an English film, since Ray Bradbury, the author of the book is American. Ah well. There's a lot of ideas being toyed with here, the nature of memory, of knowledge, of oral traditions, of control. A lot to think about.Definitely worth a look for sci-fi fans, I think</review_text>
187 is a strange movie about schools.  It's strange because this is one of the few pictures that looks at a teacher's perspective of the system and it's strange because it's not a rosy picture of schools.  Jackson's portrayal of Trevor Garfield paints a picture of a nervous, worried teacher who was passionate about teaching, but is now scared of the slightest sound, continually checking the corner of his eye, as he's been faced with a near fatal attack a year earlier.What the film is about is the various teachers' reactions to the students around them.  Garfield wants to do good, but has a past that is burning him up inside.  John Heard's character is a teacher who's embittered by the students, working to merely cash a paycheck, while kelly rowan's character means well, but is scared and confides in Jackson's character because he is a survivor.What I love about the film is that there is a realism in the way the teachers communicate with each other.  The good and the bad is here.  We get a picture of the various attitudes teachers have about their kids and how some events can make or break a teacher.  I also love how 187 explores the political and sometimes beuaracratic nature of the classrooms, including the placement of students in a given classroom, and how teachers can sometimes have their jobs put in jeopardy because of very rigid law.  Clearly, the writer Scott Yagemann, who is a teacher himself, feels the system has failed and has gotten in the way of a primary goal of teachers when they enter the profession: a desire to teach.The film is somewhat problematic with an over the top, preachy, and somewhat implausible conclusion.  But the writer wears his heart on his sleeve and the above all message about the passion being sucked out of teaching is clear.  For that reason, it's as powerful a movie as any about teaching even if it lacks the uplifting conclusion so many others offer</review_text>
This is a very dark film . Kevin Reynolds illuminating allows him to describe somberly the hard and bitter conflicts with the students in a High school, but this picture has nothing in common with To sir with love .This is much more than a simple fairy tale . Carefully made script and a brilliant performance given for Samuel Jackson</review_text>
When Foxfire first came out, I had no interest to watch it at all. Recently I became a huge Angelina Jolie fan. The main reason to watch the movie was her. Jolie is great as usual. She gives everything into her character and is very good. The reason that films like these don't get as much publicity as their male counterparts is because they are all are so stereotyped and labeled. And while the generalization about most "female bonding" films is true, the same could be said about the men. And what makes each film stand apart is the emotion and ideas of the characters. The plot is based on real life situations, and the characters and the charisma they deliver is what makes the film so liberating and exciting to watch. The girls are learning life lessons, growing up, experimenting, facing hard issues and learning to cope and understand each other.Angelina Jolie has some brilliant lines and poses as an almost Mother-like figure, affecting their lives forever, sheltering and explaining, and persuading the girls to take an extra risk, or risks, rather. It's very intimate and she does an incredible job playing "Legs". It isn't meant to represent what all girls do, and don't bother looking for a movie about lesbians guys. It gets very ethereal at points and made a point about bonding and unity. Don't bother looking for deep intellectual comments either, because the most poignant scenes are sullen and the actresses use their eyes over words.The opening scenes are good, the way they introduce the oppressed victims, and you see the wide-eyed looks as are often given by people who are afraid - but who will later look for comfort in Legs and her new-found posse. It is all set up very well. And the touching ending scenes provide closure, showing how very real, and sincere, everything has been. It's not sugar coated in any way and let's you take a glimpse into a female perspective that does not revolve around whether or not they have a boyfriend, and whether their hair and make-up look okay. And if at least 1 girl can watch a movie like that, or read a book like that, and be inspired enough to raise her self-esteem and not let anyone walk over her, then it has made a good impact. After all, it's simply not often movies about self-proclaiming girls rebelling get in this much of a spotlight, right?</review_text>
I have watched this movie again and again, and I can't imagine a better Carmen than Rita Hayworth!  Her Carmen is a free spirit, proud, sensual, intelligent, and yet vulnerable too.  Glenn Ford may have been slightly miscast as Don Jose, but he and Rita had such a chemistry that they make this film work.What really sets this film apart, though, is Rita's fantastic dancing!  She was raised in the tradition of Spanish dancing from the time she was about 4 years old--she came from a famous family of renowned Spanish dancers--and it's such a pleasure to watch her do what must have come so naturally to her.  No other dancer can match her for her sheer gracefulness and passion.I've only seen the DVD version of this movie, so that's the version I'm recommending.  The colors are luscious and the photography is clear and crisp.  And the musical score is very moving.  This film may very well become one of your favorites, especially if you're a Rita Hayworth fan</review_text>
Mata Hari arrived in Paris and soon began to spin a web of sorcery. Her naked body (that same body that was later to be riddled with bullets)her password to a greedy world of material success.Margaretha Geertruida Zelle MacLeod enjoyed a happy childhood in Holland the darling of a dotting father. Early restlessness brought her to Java, the mail-bride of a brute. There, in Indonesia, amid crushing tragedy and spousal abuse, Gertie absorbed the artistic concepts that will one day found her applauded, then, mowed down by a French firing squad. Poor judgment, and Eastern flair, and a gluttony for men, contrived to make her eternal. But was Gertie a spy? The visionary Irving Thalberg secured the rights to Mata Hari's notebooks and thus MGM began production starring Greta Garbo. I find this 1932 film a work of contrasts. To watch Garbo mise-en-scene through the lens of William Daniels, in a genial atmosphere assembled by Cedric Gibbons, rapturous, is truly a fine thing. MGM's 'Mata Hari' remains a unique accomplishment. Though one wonders how the silly story-theme ever passed Thalberg. There is a dichotomy here, style versus substance (a chronic blemish with some of Garbo's films) The developing narrative is puerile, and mind you, the early thirties boasts many a gritty film. More than an actress Garbo is a virtuosa, a poseur. Thus she offers art more priceless, a curious and singular spiritual apogee, such pulchritude and distinction. Watch her shoulders ache suddenly as she plays piano en-scene, as her stock-in-trade matinee idol grasps her from behind wantonly. Watch her match wits with Lewis Stone, tonight her spy-master. Watch Garbo in the third act climb the hospital stairs Adrian head-to-toe. Watch her watch her. But! if I hear Ramon Navarro one more time call her "...Mata!" I think I'd croak (her name is M-A-T-A-H-A-R-I) How many times I've seen 'Mata Hari' I'm ashamed to say. The last viewings have been in the wee hours where there reigns a sad and profound solitude. On cue Greta emerges, like Cybele, to temporarily soothe my ills. Soon, I hear a halting viola: "...I come to you Si-va! like the bayaderes dance in your sacred temples in Java...!" Mata Hari! Mata Hari! Mata Hari! Mata Hari</review_text>
Just one of those classics I'm in the mood for once in a while, and needed to replace my VHS version.  Excellent copy on cd, very happy with it.</review_text>
Gibson and Weaver star in theis steamy view of the fall of imperialism in Indonesia.  They start living the expat life in Jakarta, and live the transformation as the country moves to military rule.  The movie is interesting on many fronts:  Seeing the leads before they became megastars, watching the subtle condemnation of expats amongst locals, and the history woven into the fiction.  Supporting roles are played superbly as well.  It's a great movie</review_text>
To say this is a great film is probably an overstatement, but it certainly is a great idea for a film. Gibson looks good, Weaver looks good, Hunt acts good, Weir directs good, and the script is better than good. Much. It's a movie about ideas, which earns high marks these days, as so few flics can make that claim. Sure, it stumbles a bit, and the ending is purposely frustrating, to carry forward the theme of White Guilt and "What then shall we do?" Beyond all that, it's sensual, and unpredictable, and pretty damned intelligent. Seen anything lately in the multiplex that fits that bill? I ain't. See it for yourself.</review_text>
Tommy Lee Jones plays the role of L.T. Bonham.Bonham was atrainer of Special Forces soldiers.He in effect turned thesesoldiers into klilling machines.Benicio Del Toro plays thecharacter Aaron Hallam.Hallam was a former student of his teacher L.T. Bonham.Hallam has been killing hunters in the Northwest.The F.B.I. after investigating realizes that theirkiller is by no means normal.The F.B.I. is forced to turn tothe one man who can bring in the killer L.T. Bonham.After he begins his tracking he immediately knows who he is hunting.Herecognizes the tactics and techniques of Hallam.Remember,he trained Hallam.Bonham and Hallam begin a hunting adventure thatwill take them from the woods of Oregon to the big city.Thismovie turns into a thriller.If you are a die hard Tommy Lee Jones fan this is your movie</review_text>
At the tine it was unsurpassed in spectacle and scope, and has held up remarkably well, despite a few touches of typical silent overacting/heavy-handedness. Still, the 1925 Hur belongs in any collector's collection for its importance in film history. Not to mention the fact that it sealed MGM's financial future. So of course, as of this writing, the greedy oinkers at the studios haven't released it on DVD because it won't sell 4 million copies</review_text>
I was fortunate to see this movie in a cinematic retrospective show. I had already seen and liked "Ben-Hur"`s 1959 version and was curious and keen to observe this earlier product.I really wasn't prepared to see such gem! If for nothing else, the sea battle scene alone merits viewing the movie.In some ways the story line is better developed in this film than in the more modern one, even if the acting, as in all silent films, applies some exuberance to the corporal demeanor.There are also a couple of surprises: some scenes are filmed in color enhancing the realism to the Passion; the chariots race is realistic in extreme and the already mentioned sea battle involves hundreds of extras.Director Fred Niblo reached his peak; he was an experienced film maker, having conducted major actors and actresses as Rudolf Valentino, Douglas Fairbanks and Lillian Gish. He was also author of first versions of films that will be remade in the future as "The Mark of the Zorro" (1920), "The Three Musketeers" (1921) and "Blood and Sand" (1922).Ramon Novarro also gives his best as Judah Ben-Hur before entering his path into oblivion. Francis Bushman fleshes his Messala with a Mussolinian air and overacts a little.Very good film for all time cinema lovers!Reviewed by Max Yofre.</review_text>
With a cable modem, took about 1 hour and 15 minutes to download Unbox, install the program and download the episode.  It's a great download speed considering the file is 803 mb.  I was able to still use my computer, IE 7.0 and RealPlayer, so the download is not a resource hog.  The menu bar includes a link to shop for more Unbox titles, which I found very convenient.The quality is great, but the video stutters in Unbox.  Maybe because it uses 3 applications when playing video?  I chose to watch the episode on Windows Media Player 11 and I had no problems at all.I've bought and watched 3 episodes, all with the same results.  Fast and unobstrusive download, great quality and low price.  Just use WMP, or another player that can handle wma files, to watch.</review_text>
All 3 WIWAG are excellent. This is more than just a well put together documentary. Its very moving because of the footage, narration and music. You don't feel like you are watching a DVD about baseball. It feels like you are watching a snapshot of Americana from the 50's and 60's. After watching this, you wish that things today were as they were back in those days. Not just baseball or sports, but life in general as it was protrayed in the DVDs</review_text>
Why the record company would put this out on VHS, and not DVD, is beyond me, especially considering its release date. The ultimate would be (and they have done it before, see both the Doors and Sepultura DVD releases) to take this, and add to it, Live at Brixton, and put it all on one DVD. Since this doesn't seem likely, I suggest, burn your own DVD, and include not only "Ricochet" and "Another Bloody Murder" (both left out), but also Mr. Bungle's one music video release. Happily, while "Stripsearch" is not listed on the back of the VHS box, it is included. FNM videos? GREAT, GREAT, GREAT..</review_text>
Even though this cinderella does not have the modern day "movie magic", (in fact, the sets are pretty corny)...That does not hurt, or take away any of the  wonderful memories of when I was a little girl, and looked forward every year for the airing of "cinderella" and "The wizard of oz"  I was thrilled to have found this, and would highly, highly recomend it to any 40+ woman out there that has the memory of this wonderful version of cinderella. Leslie Ann Warren is simply timeless in this</review_text>
We've seen several versions of Cinderella now and like this one the best. When my kids were smaller they liked the Disney version with the little mice but now they have thrown the Disney version out the window. I personally really liked the Julie Andrews B & W version due to the GREAT singing but my girls prefer and love watching this version while singing and dancing around the room as the DVD plays</review_text>
I've always fondly remembered this movie. Bette Midler and Danny De Vito have perfect comic timing. :-D</review_text>
Here's an extremely stylish, different film panned by almost all the professional critics which means here's another example of why they should be ignored. You are better off reading the reviews of people here at Amazon.Being one who appreciates stylish film-making, I thoroughly enjoyed the images and the sound on this movie. I found it absolutely fascinating. Being a male, it doesn't hurt that Ashley Judd stars in it, either.To be fair, I can see where the story would turn off a number of people.The co- lead, Ewan McGregory's character, is odd and not very credible. k.d. lang's character is unlikable, there is some stupid numerology as part of the story and the ending is unsatisfying .Yet, despite the above, the story is very involving and the visuals and sound (5.1 surround) are just so good that they way outweigh the negatives.The movie flat-out entertains, which is the name of the game.</review_text>
I would reccomend this film to any Robert Johnson fan as well as to anyone just getting into the blues who wants to know where its really at. It includes some great interviews with Johnny Shines, Robert jr Lockwood and others who knew Robert. Its worth it just to hear Lockwood play an unrecorded song of R.J.'s! The parts where Keb' Mo' re-enacts segments from R.J.'s life are well done and effectively illustrate what life would have been like back then for a traveling bluesman. My only criticism would be that there are few extra DVD features,however, that doesn't stop me watching this film again and again! A very informative insight into the life of one of the greatest Delta bluesmen</review_text>
I won't spend a long time explaining why I like this movie...it's just mindless fun and that's all it needs to be.  A movie about a bunch of overweight kids taking over after their fat-camp is sold into the hands of a crazed lunatic is enough reason to watch, and while it's not the funniest or clever done comedy it's a great kids movie with enough laughs for us adults to enjoy along with them.  Plus, that blob thing is just too freaking cool</review_text>
I first saw the b&w original of "The Thing" in the late 50s (?), and was totally engrossed (jumped out of my seat with the rest of the audience, at one point) - so I knew generally what the plot might be. The story line and characters here were pretty much the same, dressed up in color and hi-tech research equipment. Nifty vistas of Alaska's bleak beauty, and a satisfying high-tech rendition of the half-uncovered alien saucer.The suspense and drama were nonstop, and the characters interesting, individual, and credible. It was a relief that the standard beuatiful female scientist (or alien) was omitted for a change.The Thing was believable and suitably gory and menacing, even if a little stereotyped (eg long slavering fangs, powerful tentacles, bulging eyes, and dripping goo). It and the other special effects were well done, and worth the price of admission.I won't comment on the ending to avoid spoiling it for you, other than noting it reminded me of the old folk tale "The Lady or the Tiger."Engaging, entertaing reality-escape flick</review_text>
OH YEAH! This is the film which set the standard for the women-in-prison genre. The Big Doll House has everything you could possibly need if you are WIP junkie: cat fights (one even takes place in the mud), group showers, sadistic guards, scantically clothed gun toting babes, lesbianism, torture, and Pam Grier. OH YEAH!</review_text>
This is a must for purchasing dvds! This is one movie that should be on dvd and still in the market! This special edition different from the original dvd release. The original dvd release as just the movie. This special edition featured full length intewrviews with the cast from 2005. They were also pictures of the cast, including the witch women. They weren't ugly, they were gorgous. I don't know why the director wanted to place those ugly masks over thier beauty, I mean not all witches are ugly!</review_text>
This is definitely not the typical look at the "Death Camps". This is a truely "horrific" look into the reality that was the Death Camps.I wish it was longer, but the limited time reveals so much more than we ever get from all the other narrative tours.With the option of just listening to the soundtrack, that adds a different dimension that can't be duplicated</review_text>
Ive seen them live in Norwich (England) and they were wonderful, its a little slow to start but with wonderful light humour and sound that have to be heard live to belive, a wonderful performance from 6 men who are all in their own way geourgus and extreamly talented, you will leave tired for them, i brought the dvd but it doesnt give you the real thing, if their in a town near you, go, their worth every penny to see, im not a dance person but oh how i wish now i was!!!!! Wonderful, breathtaking and loud..</review_text>
A Good movie;A John Wayne movie with a very nice cast, the usual Harry Carye Jr.Ben Johnson,John Agar,Paul Fix and many other great people. Especially from the time it is great to see Merlin Olsen and Roman Gabriel from the Football movie actor Era. The added plus is we have Rock Hudson in the movie.Not to forget the movies leading ladies Lee Meriweather,Marian McCargo.The women are very nice looking  and they would be if they were in Rock Hudson's family. The time era of the film is after the American Civil War. John Wayne is your Northerner and Rock is from the South. The deep South. John Wayne is with his loyal men who are finanical ruined after the war and need to take home money to their families when they return.They band together to run a herd legally.The Rock is a family man who has lost everything even his country. The Southerns are lured to Mexico with false promises and high hopes. The Northerners are going to do business with Mexico also.John Wayne and the men end up helping the Southerns. Enemies but John Wayne and his men have honor and help the Southerners.Most importantly fellow Americans. The Civil War tore us apart and threw us together. There are great elements in the movie action,love,honor in people,human weaknesses,saddness,and some historical correctness. The movie is not anyone's best movie but it is not the worse either. Good entertainment with a good mix of plot and history. John Wayne and the Rock's only movie together. The movie shows everyone in such great shape and takes you back to great movie times.Watch and Enjoy</review_text>
I  thought George Stevens' impeccably crafted and literate THE GREATEST STORY EVER TOLD (1965) was the finest life of Jesus Christ on film.  Then I took another look recently at director Nicholas Ray's KING OF KINGS (1961) and changed my mind.  I don't know what the best life of Jesus is, but KING OF KINGS has a charismatic and sympathetic Christ (Jeffrey Hunter in the performance of his career), a great John the Baptist (Robert Ryan), the definitive Salome's dance (luscious Brigid Bazlen) and the ultimate Sermon on the Mount (with 7,000 extras on a Spanish hillside), a striking Last Supper with disciples sitting at a Y-shaped bench, a strong Crucifixion, and a reverent Resurrection.  At 171 minutes (including ten minutes of Miklos Rozsa music), Samuel Bronston's production seems the ideal length to tell the story of Christ.  The screenplay is by Oscar winner Philip Yordan.I have often had trouble with Ron Randell as the Roman Lucius; he is a major character here and only a cameo in other Biblical epics.  Same with Harry Guardino as Barabbas.  They are, in actuality, the second and third most important characters in Ray's film.  But both actors are magnificent.  Lucius lets us inside the Roman power circle to understand the Roman way of thinking, so it is nice to have his role be big.  And Barabbas answers the question a lot of viewers may ponder, namely who was this convicted killer whom the crowd chose to live while Jesus died.The movie, narrated by Orson Welles, starts the story with Pompey in Judea in 63 B.C.  This helps give us information on what Judea was like in the several decades before Jesus was born.  Among a superb supporting cast are Siobhan McKenna as Mary, Royal Dano as Peter, Hurd Hatfield as Pontius Pilate, Viveca Lindfors as Herod Antipas' mistress, Frank Thring as Herod Antipas, and many more.  The sets and costumes are gloriously colorful; what was the Academy thinking when they were not nominated for Oscars in 1961, along with no cast mermbers or screenplay?  Rozsa's music is glorious.  And the movie is presented on DVD in about a 2.2 ratio for 70mm Super Technirama.KING OF KINGS is powerful, intelligent, colorful, and reverent.  I think Jesus himself would be impressed by it.</review_text>
Derek Jarman's 'Sebastiane' is a momentous painting which is simply brushed on film rather than canvas. This is a master work and should be in any serious film buff's cabinet. (I should very much like to see it running continuously upon a smooth stone wall of a monumental pillared vestibule - perhaps like the Four Seasons in New York. It's visual beauty should be constantly on view.Not one element could be added or deleted. If I may continue the painting analogy, each stroke, whether finished or raw melds this work into a composition which I think is flawless. The men are beautiful, but in a tangible human manner. The settings, whether Diocletian's startling lurid palace or the rough bare terrain of Sardinia evoke both pagan and Christian motifs flawlessly. Good and evil (and all shades between) found in both places; the irony of the world as it is and has always been.The homoerotic nature of the film is vicseral, candid rather than overtly condescending - it might well be set in modrn Iraq with 21st century troops. I felt each character's longings, whether for the god of carnal flesh or that of human love and companionship or a spiritual and other worldly deity. The recognituion that each of these forms of eros may entertwine and meld is genious. It is Everyman. It is a scrupulus portrait of the easily duplicit qualities of beauty, deceipt, brutality and even truth. Powerful stuff.</review_text>
one of mikio naruse's last masterpieces was 1960's &quot;when a woman ascends the stairs&quot; - it is also one of only two of the great director's films currently available in any video format in the u.s. but wow, what an introduction it is! this seemingly modest film about a woman on the edge of a precipice, winding her way through dismal back alleys and cheap bars in search of an out is one of the great character pieces in world cinema. crisply shot in black and white widescreen (which is admirably reproduced in this edition), this beautifully directed and acted film is an absolute must for anyone interested in movies. the sadness lies in the knowledge that this kind of film is not made anymore; there's no one talented enough to pull it off nearly as well. class and subtlety are a rare commodity and this film has just the right amount of both. it's perfect, one of the greatest films of all time, one i come back to again and again</review_text>
Every time I was flipping the channels and Dutch was on I would end up staying on the channel and watching it.   I hated Married with Children so I was very suprised that I like this movie</review_text>
When con man and general loser Eric Stanton (Dana Andrews) drifts into the small California ocean-side town of Walton late one night, he has dollar in his pocket and few prospects. Stanton wanders into the only diner open, Pops, to get a cup of coffee and something to eat. He meets Mr. Judd (Charles Bickford), a retired New York cop, and the waitress, Stella (Linda Darnell). Stanton soon finds himself up to his eyes in three things he didn't expect. He didn't expect to fall for Stella, a sullen beauty who is prepared to sell what men want for a wedding ring and a good life. He didn't expect to find himself on the run for Stella's murder...with a wife, June Mills (Alice Faye), a woman he married for her money so that he and Stella could eventually be together. Not only are the Walton cops after him, they've signed up Judd to help out, a smart, tough man who doesn't hesitate to punch up a suspect if that's what he thinks is needed. And Stanton sure didn't expect to ever find himself in a situation he couldn't talk himself out of.The one thing that struck me about this movie is how much of a hole in the center Alice Faye leaves. Her June Mills is so bland and vanilla that her character is just not very interesting. She loves Stanton, she's loyal, she's convinced not only that Stanton is innocent, but that he has the ability to change his life into something worthwhile. In other words, June Mills is so noble she's boring. This may be the way the part was written, but Faye doesn't seem to have the acting ability to add some edge around the words. Having to compete with Linda Darnell's lush sullenness was beyond Faye's abilities. It would have been interesting, for instance, to see Ann Sheridan as June Mills, speaking the same lines. That leaves the three main characters who, for me, were hard to feel much for: Stella, who'll take you to the cleaners before she'll take you to bed; June, who'll probably want to pray with you every night before you climb into bed; and Eric Stanton, a weak con man who often gets caught up in his own cons.One other weakness for me is that it is easy to spot the killer, but his comeuppance only came about in a fast last three minutes of the movie. The reason for the killing is nice and tawdry, but I wish that we'd had one or two strong red herrings to chew on. There were a lot of possible candidates but they were left floating alone by themselves.I liked the way the small town of Walton looked and was photographed, tidy and boring. The opening of the movie -- the state highway speeding by at night with the credits appearing as signs -- was nicely atmospheric. Stanton's conning of June into having her fall for him was great. The screenwriter hit just the right notes of sincerity, friendliness and charm, all of which was a little too practiced. It was fun watching Stanton in action. He thinks of himself as able to talk anyone into anything. Dana Andrews and the lines he says make it believable.One of the strengths of the movie now is the range of fine character actors who show up. To name a few, in addition to Bickford, there's John Carradine, Percy Kilbride, Bruce Cabot, Jimmy Conlin and Olin Howland. You may not recognize all the names, but if you're fond of old movies you'll recognize the faces. And Anne Revere does a fine job as Clara, June Mills' older and protective sister. Revere was a plain looking, raw-boned woman and a first-rate actress. She was one of many whose film careers were destroyed in the Hollywood witch-hunts of the late Forties and Fifties.Fallen Angel is a minor noir, but worth a look. The DVD presentation is just fine. There are a couple of minor extras, and a commentary by Eddie Muller, described as a noted film noir historian, and Dana Andrews daughter, Susan Andrews. I didn't listen to it. The case contains a small, four-page booklet that gives insights into the movie</review_text>
The whole story would help us learn about the silent truth of female pleasure and sexuality. The plot, director, actors and wonderful actress in overall are much more better than other explicit sex movies such as "Lie With Me" and, especially, "Intimacy.</review_text>
This character Buckaroo Banzai played by Peter Weller is an incredible individual.  A well accomplished person who is half japanese, brain surgeon, scientist, martial artiste, and rock star.  He also knows how to ride a motorcycle. BB is backed up with a special hand picked team of men known as the" Blue Blazers".  In this episode they battle aliens from Planet 10 across the 8th Dimension.  John Lithgow stars as the demented Dr. Emilio Lizardo in one of his greatest roles.  Blue Blazer Regulars such as Perfect Tommy, Reno, Jersey, Rawhide, and Pinky Caruthers add to the amusement but Pacos is in Tibet. The characters are colorful.  As "another you", Ellen Barkin plays Penny Pretty who safeguards the overthruster.  Flaws with the script would be "Why would Orson Wells be giving the news during Halloween 1938 and changing it to H.G. Wells "War of the Worlds"?  I thought he did fiction like "Citizen Kane" not report news events of the era such as the tragedy of the Hindenburg Disaster for example.  Is Orson Wells related to H.G. Wells or Tom Cruise? The movie is entertaining.  We can see why Peter Weller today stars in documentaries on the History Channel.  I only wish there be re-issues of the "Kids From C.A.P.E.R."(Civilian Authority for the Protection of Everyone Regardless) Television Show originally aired back in 1975 and before they battled indians, the original "Ghostbusters" also '75 starting Larry Stork, Forrest Tucker, & Kong. The songtrack on these shows were great. BB & The Hong Kong Cavaliers are not The Monkeys. BB lacks a decent song track. At least we get to see the devote effort of saving mankind from world destruction armed only with slingshots, boyscout knives, and six shooters unlike today where Captain America can't even save himself or maybe it's because america is only doing a job we all know needs to be done.  The movie was put together well.  It is a classic.  Jeff Goldberg also appears in this film but I don't know why.  Anyway, "wherever you go, there you are"</review_text>
I have owned the video for several years and just purchased the DVD.  Hannah and Her Sisters far exceeds Anne Hall as my favorite Allen picture.  Such a joy.  And the DVD is wonderful</review_text>
This is a great movie for airplane buffs and those who enjoy comedy.  The filming and stunts are amazing.  To think this was the beginning of aviation.  A must see for anyone who appreciates comedy and/or aviation.  A family favorite at my house, one we view over and over.  The laughs never seem to stop</review_text>
We've seen several versions of Cinderella now and like this one the best. When my kids were smaller they liked the Disney version with the little mice but now they have thrown the Disney version out the window. I personally really liked the Julie Andrews B & W version due to the GREAT singing but my girls prefer and love watching this version while singing and dancing around the room as the DVD plays</review_text>
In 1997, forty years after Julie Andrews performed the title role LIVE in Rodgers and Hammerstein's TV production of Cinderella, R&B singer Brandy brought the role to life in TV's third incarnation of this musical classic, produced by The Wonderful World of Disney and Whitney Houston, who played the fairy godmother. Ratings were huge for the program, and it even won an Emmy.This new production is different from the previous two in several ways. For one, this one is a made-for-TV movie, whereas the previous two were shot as if they were televising a play. This new version also has three new songs - The Sweetest Sounds, written by Richard Rodgers, The Music's In You, and Falling In Love With Love, written by Richard Rodgers and Lorenz Hart. Updated special effects, more modern vernacular, a more empowered Cinderella, and a color-blind casting approach lend a freshness to the classic fairy tale. And I'm not too thrilled with all the complaints about the mixed cast. I, for one, am thrilled that little girls and little boys can watch this and see themselves represented, no matter what race they are. It's nice that for once, a little African American girl can see herself as the object of desire. And yes, the black queen and white king have an Asian son. Families like that are not uncommon today. Funny that people don't have a problem with a pumpkin becoming a carriage or mice becoming horses, but they have a problem with this.A few flaws exist in the film. The CGI effects are sometimes a little TOO obvious, such as in the pumpkin transformation sequence. And although Brandy is sweet and lovely as Cinderella, she's no Julie Andrews. These flaws do not detract from the general charm of this production, and don't put me off at all. I love Brandy's performance, and her more modern feminist approach to the character of Cinderella.However, Disney needs to release a new DVD version. This DVD is one of the first Disney DVDs ever - in fact, this DVD predates the "Disney DVD" brand and logo. The bonus features include a home video release trailer and "A Cinderella Story" featurette. I think it's time to update this DVD release. The transfer is very good, but could possibly use a bit of remastering. Maybe some retrospective bonus materials. And, since an official soundtrack was never released, a music-only track would also be a nice idea. Maybe some audio commentary from the actors and producers and such.Despite all the flaws of this DVD treatment and the flaws of the production itself, it's definitely a DVD I was thrilled to find for $10 at a local drug store, because I've loved this production ever since it first aired in November of 1997 on ABC. It's definitely worth buying</review_text>
This episode is a classic, and is one of the best in the series. It explores time travel and alternate time lines, and it's storytelling had paved the way for many screen plays that followed.</review_text>
Avatar is so awesome! I saw one episode by chance and was determined to watch them all. It's got an excellent story line, great characters and awesome animation. I'd say it's the best show on TV out there right now, not just considering the cartoons either. It's got a real depth to it and isn't only fit for kids but teenagers(like me) and adults alike. Highly recomended!I don't know if the downloading was not working in the past but it's definitely working now. I've downloaded a few and they all work fine for me</review_text>
This is definitely screwball.  Forget about anything resembling emotional reality, this movie tromps along it's own gay way.A lot of the humor comes from the absurd manner Cary and Irene skip along in their own little la-la land of wealth, suspicion, and inzaniness.  Maybe not for everyone, but Cary gives one of his classic, clueless performances</review_text>
MY FAVORITE WIFE is not among the very best comedies of pre-war Hollywood, but it is nonetheless quite excellent, driven by a strong script, superb lead performers, and a number of great character performances.  Cary Grant is the finest comic actor film has produced and this film demonstrates that as well as any.  Though he was equally as good in classics such as BRINGING UP BABY and THE PHILADELPHIA STORY, those films were so marvelously directed, so superbly well written, and filled with such an overabundance of great actors that one might not notice just how outstanding Grant was (that is not the case with HIS GIRL FRIDAY, where even among an embarrassment of riches, Grant stands out and dominates the film).  Here Grant is surrounded by fewer talented actors, is working with a slightly less superb (though still quite good) script, and is directed by the writer instead of the director originally scheduled for the project.  Originally the plan was to reunite Grant, Irene Dunne, and Leo McCarey, the big threesome of the classic 1937 screwball THE AWFUL TRUTH.  Unfortunately, McCarey had a car wreck just before shooting was begun and was unable to be on the set.  Canin did a good if not spectacular job.  Unlike his fellow writers Billy Wilder and Preston Sturges, both of whom became fulltime directors of their own scripts around this time, Canin primarily remained a writer for the rest of his career.Still, the film was more successful than it should have been, mainly because of Cary Grant, though Irene Dunne was certainly a strong presence as his costar.  But in rewatching the film, it becomes obvious that almost all of the great comic moments are Grant's.  What is remarkable is that he essentially plays a coward.  The plot is simple.  A man goes before a judge to get his wife declared dead after she has been missing for several years, apparently drowned in the Indian Ocean, so that he will be free to remarry.  The judge grants the request and then marries them, but of course the next scene shows the wife who has been declared dead arriving at her home, just after being rescued (why she wouldn't have called first isn't explained).  Learning that her husband has remarried and is about to go on his honeymoon, she follows after.  Much of the humor of the film revolves around cowardice, Grant's inability to tell his new wife that his old wife has miraculously returned from the dead, and Dunne's reticence to tell him that she had been stranded on the island with beefcake Randolph Scott.  That really is about all the plot there is.  They manage to get a lot of mileage out of Grant's inability to come out and say what he wants.  He is the epitome of the incommunicative male.  The film is also enlivened by a number of superb supporting actors.  Virtually none of the great comedies off the studio era in Hollywood failed to feature a group of first rate character actors.  Here the two that most stand out are Granville Bates as the Judge in a magnificently performed role and Donald MacBride as the exasperated, confused, and highly suspicious hotel clerk.The film is interesting for the pairing of Cary Grant and Randolph Scott, about whom rumors have circulated for decades.  I've never seen any good evidence that either was gay or bisexual or involved with one another, but the rumors have persisted nonetheless.  The primary "evidence" seems to have been that while they were roommates during the 1930s they were unusually good housekeepers, keeping their apartment meticulous.  Why neatness should be evidence of homosexuality I am not sure, but we know for a fact that both Grant and Scott dated women extensively through the thirties, but there is no evidence whatsoever of any physical relationship between the two.  Sadly, the rumors of their having had a relationship apparently took a toll on their friendship.  This film was made well after the rumors had begun but after they had ceased rooming together and well before their friendship largely ended.All in all, this is one of the more enjoyable comic films of the age.  It isn't a classic in the mold of HIS GIRL FRIDAY or BRINGING UP BABY or THE LADY EVE, but it is nonetheless an exceptionally easy to like and enjoy film featuring great performers at their peak.Note:  If one scans the reviews below one will note several mentions of colorized versions.  I believe that these refer to the old VHS versions.  Amazon often meshes reviews of DVDs with older reviews of VHS versions of films.  As far as I know--though I could certainly be mistaken--I do not think this has ever been released on DVD in colorized form.  At any rate, the current retail version is certainly in pristine black and white.  So don't be afraid that you are about to purchase a colorized film</review_text>
A little known documentary that is both entertaining and informative. Touching first hand accounts and rare footage that give an extraordinary look at both Mr. Welles and the Brazilian culture. If there is one reason  to own this tape it would be to see over and over again the last part of  the film. A piece called &quot;Four Men on a Raft&quot; It is the most  beautiful black and white short film I have ever seen. The love Mr. Welles  had for these poor fishermen is so wonderfully apparent</review_text>
Even though this is about 4 years old, it is extremely halarious.  I've been waiting to see a good stand up comedy. The first 15 min is just one hilarious hit after another. I love this guy</review_text>
This is a brilliant film by a master filmmaker/storyteller.  Dark, moody, exciting (and FAST!), THX-1138 is an amazing example of style AND substance.  So whatever you do, DON'T BUY THIS DVD!Instead, spend just a few bucks more and get the 2 DVD version which delves into the making of the film, the early days of Lucas and Coppola, Walter Murch's involvement, and the whole story about American Zoetrope.  It also has a little segment made back in the day about the actor's getting their heads shaved.  All in all, it is a spectacular DVD set and worth the extra few dollars.  (The 2 dvd version also has a much better cover.</review_text>
I first watched this movie in a class. A professor showed this movie and talked about Oedipus complex. I am not sure about this concept in it but sure enough this is an excellent movie</review_text>
I'm absolutely shocked that the critical reaction to this movie has been so negative. I was overwhelmed by `The Weight of Water.' I guess part of the problem is that the ad campaign seems to have presented it as a thriller, which it's not. It's also not a mystery or a love story. It's a slow-paced, decidedly downbeat look at two women who are trapped in loveless relationships. Basically, it consists of two parts, a modern-day part and a historical part, set in the 19th century. The 19th century part shows promise and actually gives a pretty interesting view of how a mysterious double murder took place, but ultimately it's underdeveloped and I'll have to admit is a bit slow.However, compared to the modern-day part, the 19th century part is sort of Oscar material. But as you watch this film you will notice that the modern-day part seems to rely on two major things: Liz Hurley's breasts and some endlessly drawn out shots and quasi-philosophical conversations which really don't have much of a storyline.Kathryn Bigelow's direction is masterful. She uses images and sounds to express the powerful passions which the two main characters feel but can't express themselves. She gets excellent performances out of the entire cast, but Sarah Polley is especially fine. I'm sure the fact that none of the characters are sympathetic (at least not in the usual sense) is one of the reasons people aren't responding to the film. Bigelow isn't telling a simple story here, and she doesn't want to manipulate the audience by trotting out the usual clichs. This is a complicated movie about how complicated love really is.I haven't read Anita Shreves's novel, but I'd like to. I imagine Bigelow was attracted to it because it offered a blunt, unsentimental look at relationships. `The Weight of Water' is not a conventional Hollywood entertainment. If you're open to it, if you throw away your preconceptions, you may be surprised at where this film takes you.</review_text>
I couldn't resist using the lyrics from a Minor Threat song in semi-reference to Eisenstein's silent masterpiece.2 years ago I took a class, "Intro to Modern Film"; I'm none too fond of classes telling people what to think about film, and how they should be made, but I needed a class, and figured it would be a simple A; it was, and I was exposed to some new, to me, film makers, who I'm sure I would have gotten around to discovering anyways; Werner Herzog & Wong Kar Wai are the two most noteworthy.One week we were discussing "classic endings" and among these were, for a reason beyond my comprehension, Dead Man Walking, oh how I loathe Sean Penn.  Also included was the vastly overrated ending to Coppola's flat first installment of the Godfather series, and then there was the scene from Battleship Potemkin, the rise & destruction of the people in the town square; copied in the Untouchables by the master thief Brian De Palma.I didn't really pay attention to the scene, I'm sure because I was tired or just didn't care, but about 2 or 3 months ago I finally got around to getting Battleship Potemkin from Blockbuster Online, which is a joke of a deal by the way.It's a pro-communism film, obviously, but only in the sense of the theory of communism, not the all too often execution of it by human beings, which always ends in some sort of perpetual massive tragedy.  The politics didn't bother me as it seems to have gotten to some others; complaining about how all the actors involved were lifeless, showed no emotion, as to display them all as one collective person, an important aspect of communism.It is certainly a powerful piece, not only for the story telling, but for some of the images; the imagined hanging of the crew members, the woman on the steps, dead child in her arms, and the gunblast to the eye are all incredible fuel for frightening nightmares</review_text>
Classic Duke!!  One of the best, great cast, Opening scene remindes me of his early movie Red River</review_text>
What can I say if you like Clint Eastwood your going to like this movie.  I Have not seen this movie since it played at my local drive-in!  What  memories</review_text>
This movie is funny is hell.  Three little words-omg i was dying.  Anyone know what song is playing when O'connel is in the car and he starts bumping it?  It sounds like Rage but im not sure</review_text>
Only The Lonely is  a good romantic comedy type movie that has a great cast that includes, John Candy, Ally Sheedy, Maureen O'Hara, Anthony Quinn and Milo O'Shea. The movie is about a Irish American cop who lives in Boston with his over bearing overly opinionated mother and he falls in love with a woman who is mother doesn't like. This is a cute movie and I'm glad that they finally have put it on DVD</review_text>
A group of male pals are at the wedding of a friend.  When he gets married, Jerry O'Connell, (as &quot;Michael&quot;) and the rest of the men agree to never get married, be single and be a &quot;Tomcat&quot;.  Horatio Sanz (as &quot;Steve&quot;) agrees too, but the next thing they know, he gets married too.  Michael and Steve are still friends.  Everytime Michael meets a woman, bad luck happens and he gets in trouble with thugs or the law.  He's a innocent as can be.  Horatio Sanz (NBC's Saturday Night Live) is hilarious and a delight in this film. Billy Hufsey plays a &quot;Pit Boss&quot;</review_text>
The first edition of Don't Look Back was the first DVD I ever bought and I bought a DVD player the same day.It is an execellent example of the power and pitfalls of "cinema verite/direct cinema", a style emerging in the 1960s made possible by lightweight sound sync cameras and recorders, zoom lenses, and fast film stock.  The "who threw the f-- glass" altercation followed by the cruel juxtoposition of Donovon offering "Song for You" to which Dylan responds with a smirk and "It's All Over Now Baby Blue" is one of the great passages in documentary film.You may love or hate Dylan's music and after watching the film, you aren't left with any illusions about him being a nice person.  But he is a force of nature.  Lyrics poured through him, some timely, some timeless, raw ones and delicate ones.  For me he was always better on recordings than in person, and the film reminds me why.  But I'm glad to have this glimpse of  the artist.I don't know about the "deluxe edition".  It may be worth it for the higher quality telecine transfer.  The original film does not need amplification.  It reveals more about Dylan than the bloated "No Direction Home" that used so much of the same footage</review_text>
"Father Goose: was a movie I had seen and enjoyed a long time ago, I rembered the name of the film, but could not find it locally. I contacted "Amazon", its was in stock and I received it in a few days. I was very pleased with your quick attention to my simple request. I will be coming to you for future purchases.</review_text>
In Jean Renoir's introduction to this film the great master cites Rumer Godden's book The River as the greatest work of literature about English colonialism in India. I can think of at least two books that are greater, E.M. Forster's A Passage to India, and George Orwell's Burmese Days, two works of literature which seem to indicate that Britain's endeavors in India produced more harm than a few damaged human relations among the English.Never the less, Jean Renoir brings unbelievable beauty to this film, which was his first attempt at full Technicolor, and it's a glorious attempt, called the most beautiful color film (along with Powell and Pressburger's The Red Shoes) by Martin Scorsese.The color has a warm subtlety and grace which can only be described as characteristic as his father's paintings, cheap as that sounds.Is The River the Rules of the Game of Renoir's color period, as Andre Bazin claims? No, I'm afraid no movie is as good as The Rules of the Game, yet this is a wonderful and important work all the same.</review_text>
Most of the movie, the parts that work anyway, is like a visual kei band's music video, and it's nice to have that kewl aesthetic without the bad music that usually accompanies it. The movie's concept is something that could have only come from asia, where filmmakers seem to digest american influences and refashion them into something that seems to miss the whole point of what made the original ideas work. The kooky Face/Off being a prime example of this insanity. The cop movie setup seems like needless window dressing, anchoring the visually oriented fantasy content in a reality it needn't have any relevence to, but I guess even Alice In Wonderland, Labyrinth, and the Nightmare On Elm Street series used the device of having it be all in a dream. It's not a story driven movie and to grade it as such would be unfair. It's a surrealist visual art project, something that barely exists in cinema, and although it would be better placed in the context of some worthwhile characters and plot, it is making progressive and original use of the film medium. It's much like The Corpse Bride in that regard, except this film will weird you out with twists of random insanity instead of bore you with tedius monotony and musical numbers. Criticisms from one-star reviewers such as "pure eye candy, no story" couldn't be more accurate, but if you'd ever go to look at an art exhibit, this film is equally worth a look.</review_text>
I love it when two of my favorite actors are in a movie together. When one's off screen, you have the other to keep you entertained. And when they're on screen together, it's movie-making at its best. The plot itself leaves a bit to be desired. The film's production was stop-and-go for so long, I heard that the director changed direction before it was finished. My guess is that some of what was lost was what was missing from the movie, particularly in regards to understanding Benicio's character properly. Nonetheless, Tommy Lee Jones and Benicio Del Toro shine throughout.P.S. Being an animal lover, I love that two leads in a movie are pro-animal too</review_text>
This movie was made mainly to potray the cycle of Jesus' Christ life, and what he when through, sacrificing himself for our sins. People may think that it may be too religous for their standards, but everyone has their own beliefs. I highly recommend you view the film it is very innovating and emotional. Being a christian myself everytime I watch this film it uplifts my spirits and I hope it will do the same with yours</review_text>
MARIA MONTEZ, JON HALL and SABU made some very entertaining Technicolor "sand and sandals" epics at Universal and this DVD restoration showcases them in brilliant Technicolor.It's strictly Saturday afternoon matinee stuff, nothing to really ponder in the way of complex plots--just the usual good vs. evil with Hall coming to the rescue of beautiful princess Montez in her usual damsel in distress kind of role.Exquisitely photographed on desert sands, it's exotic fun fare for adults and children with lots of eye candy to keep things interesting. TURHAN BEY is effective in a brief role but it's Montez and Hall who keep the story moving along at a lively pace. Well worth viewing and nostalgic fun for fans of the Universal series starring this trio of stars</review_text>
was forwarned about this one..but wanted to experience it myself. the directors camera style was very hard to take but overall added to the feeling of control being taken from you. great performances by all the actors. the reverse storytelling was used to great advantage. subtitles not to hard to follow..overall a shocking unexpected experience i would give 5 outa 5 to.</review_text>
This is a very funny movie and I honestly laughed so hard I was crying.   had never even heard of any of the comedians except for Jeff Foxworthy, and I had only heard some of his "You might be a redneck..." jokes.  Ron White is just plain down and out funny. His timing is wonderful, and you don't get what you expect. You do laugh a lot, and you need to put down your beer before he starts talking, lest you blow it out your nose!Bill Engval is the funniest comedian in this line up. If you don't know Bill's work, watch the movie. You will become a fan. His 'Here's your Sign' stuff is funny, but has gotten like Foxworthy's 'You might be a redneck...' However, Bill shines in that he can talk about anything at home, and have you rolling on the floor.I've already heard almost all of the jokes in the movie. Ron White and Larry the cable guy basically do the same jokes they did on the "Blue Collar Comedy Tour" CD that came out at the end of 2000. Also, almost all of Bill Engvalls jokes were on that CD or his new comedy CD that came out late last year ("Cheap Drunk: An Autobiography"). Most of Jeff Foxworthys jokes are not on a CD, but if you've seen him live sometime during the last couple of years you've heard almost all of them. Actually, you can say that about all 4 guys.However, if you've never heard of the 4 guys before or if you've heard of them but never seen them live or heard any of their CD's, then definitely go see this movie. The jokes are hysterical. Then you can go and pick up the comedy CD's and see them live. They have new jokes when you see them live.These guys, as a group and as individuals, are not stupid. You don't get to where they are by being idiots, only by portraying them. They know what they are doing.This video is about laughing, about laughing really hard because they talk about things that have happened to us, things we have felt. Life is sweet, life is beautiful, life can be ugly and hard, and, often, life, real life, is hilarious. And all those traits aren't isolate, they mix and mingle and complicate.</review_text>
Colin Firth plays a teacher and passionate to the point of obsessive football (soccer for Americans) fan who manages to mangle his only functional relationship, thanks to his tunnel vision when it comes to his obsession and fanatical support for Arsenal. His self-centered attitude with no concern at all for his girlfriend's interests muck up what could be a good relationship. On the other hand, it is hard to see in the first place what the woman finds so appealing about Firth's character, Paul. Perhaps because she is so uptight and needs to loosen up and sees in him a way by which to learn to be less rigid. She attempts to get involved in HIS passion but does not quite have the rabid, feverish passion he has. Eventually the fact that he identifies himself so closely with his football club and its ups and downs leads to the demise of the relationship, but she comes to see that she likes his identity, which is strong, linked to football or not. She has also been carried away by a certain infectious passion about football because it is so much a part of his life. Of course, one could argue that this tale is a sad reflection on the idea that there is a genderlect and that women suffer more in terms of being able to communicate, but that belies the point here that sometimes an imperfect person can still be perfect for someone who loves him, faults, obsessions and all</review_text>
Frank Tashlin and Jayne Mansfield-- a marriage made in cartoon heaven. Who better to point up the absurdities of pop culture,1950's style, than Mansfield, with her little girl squeal, breathy delivery, and protruding gunboats. She resembles nothing so much as Marilyn Monroe on steroids. And Tashlin, with his gift for social satire and cartoonist eye for exaggeration. Notice how cleverly sight gags are inserted to stress a point-- an overheated kiss that pops popcorn, a computer read-out that mimics the dialogue, celebrity-mad teen-agers that pour out of a man-hole. Notice too, how in the end, Tashlin confronts the glamorous but artificial world of advertising with the unglamorous but authentic world of living things. In a subtle way, Tashlin's subtext undermines the image-obsessed 50's by anticipating the back-to-nature 1960's. All in all, the movie remains a revealing document of its time.It also serves as a perfect vehicle for the arch talents of Mansfield, the rubber-faced Henry Jones, and the nebbish Tony Randall. In fact, the scenes between Jones and Randall are among the most deliciously droll of that era, while Jones remains one of the most unusual and unsung among Hollywood character actors. Still and all, it's hard to exaggerate what was already extreme about that glossy decade-- the absurd mammary worship, the vacuous teen-culture, the mindless  consumerism. Nonetheless, all get nailed in this inventive little spoofery that remains not only pretty funny in its own right, but reveals a lot about a decade that in many ways is still with us</review_text>
Why do I call this film the best Jayne Mansfield movie?.Well,it is the largest-budget film she ever appeared in + The Film was HERS.The Studio had paid quite a bundle for that play,that basically put Ms. Mansfield on the map.Even 'The Girl Can't help it'(also a great movie),was padded (no pun intended Jaynie!) with rock'n roll numbers,because the Studio was scared that Jayne  could not carry the film alone(Were they ever wrong !).To get back to Rock Hunter,the person that did the switch from the movie-satire to television-satire,did an excellent adaptation job.Tony Randall is fine  as the ordinary-all-American-Joe.Betsy Drake is also good,in her plainesss(about a zillion women must have been able to relate to her).Joan Blondell is FANTASTIC,reminiscing about her milkman !.Something that I have not read in the reviews are all the VERY obvious cheap-shots at Marilyn:1-about being a Communist(at the same time that MM had problems with Miller as they were travelling to England for 'The Prince and the Showgirl'.2-about the Brother Karamazov(MM wanted that role badly).We can easily understand why Monroe disliked Mansfield so much.Jayne never looked better;after all she was then on TOP OF THE WORLD !,and could have stayed there a little longer if she had not decided to get married to Mr.Universe 1955,basically telling the heads of the Studios to go to hell.That was one wrong move,because after this film,her career went nowhere fast,and it went down,down,way down...It is a shame.God only knows what other gems she could have appeared in.In conclusion,I find that this film gives us an idea of what Jayne's real life was about.Oh yes,and before I forget! That scene when she gets off the plane ?.Well the Master himself,and I am naming Federico Fellini was HEAVILY inspired by it in 'La Dolce Vita',four years later with Sweden's answer to Jayne ...ANITA EKBERG,when she gets off the plane herself.The EXACT same scene,but Mansfield did it first,and a big BRAVO to you Jayne the EPITOME of Hollywood Fifties</review_text>
I first saw this film while taking four years of Russian in high school. Regardless of whatever else may be said about it, the film certainly gets its point across.Russia is consistently portrayed as the victim. The aggressions of the Swedes, the Tatars, and now the Germans are recounted. Not surprisingly, no mention is made of the times that Russia was the aggressor.The main feature of Communism has always been its anti-religious, and especially its anti-Christian, attitude.  The Teutonic Knights are portrayed as being surrounded by Crucifix-wielding monks. The reader gets no sense of the fact that the then-current Pope had repudiated the Teutonic Knights and condemned them for using missionary activity as a cover for naked German aggression.Alexander Nevsky is depicted as a Communist-by-anticipation. A scene shows him scoffing at "The people with money". It is implied that these people were unwilling to support the defense of Russia against her mortal enemies.The barbarity of the Germans is shown unambiguously. They are shown throwing live Russian children into the fire. The heavy armor of the Teutonic Knights, a primary cause of the ice of Lake Peipus breaking under them, seems to anticipate the heavy mechanization of the Wehrmacht in Operation Barbarossa seven centuries later.Music is a prominent part of this film. Jubilant music celebrates the determination to win and the final victory. Morose music highlights the cruelties of war.The whole gamut of human emotions is shown. There is a scene in which wounded Russian soldiers cry out to their girlfriends or wives ("Anastasia!" "Natalia!"). There is also irony in this film. As a Russian soldier is stabbed in the neck by a German who the Russian had attempted to tie up, the mortally wounded Russian's last words are, "I knew that the armor was too short!"</review_text>
Siri Amster- OlszewskiAugust 24, 2006Emma, by Jane Austen, was one of the most enjoyable books I have read recently. I chose to read Emma because, having read and loved Pride and Prejudice by the same author, I wanted to explore her other books as well.  The characters in Austen's stories are both intriguing and comical and her description of the era in which they take place creates a clear view of society in those timesI was enchanted with Emma because Austen beautifully blends together a simple story of a girl and a documentation of the societal behaviors of the time.  It provides insights into the life and social customs of a lady living in the late 18th and early 19th centuries.One of the book's principle topics is marriage. The main character, Emma, approves of matchmaking for marriage and, through her, the reader gets a view into the different motives for marriage.  For some people, marriage was simply a way to advance in social status; for others, marriage was for love.  In Emma's time, marriages had to be matched according to social status.  One could not marry below their status.  Marrying too far above one's status could end up disastrously.The book tells the story of Emma Woodhouse who is a pretty, wealthy, poised, and clever young woman. Her mother died when she was too young to remember or miss her and was raised mainly by her governess, Miss Taylor. Miss Taylor behaved like a best friend rather than a governess due to her mild temper and love for Emma. Therefore, Emma grew up without any firm rules or structure. This freedom caused her to think quite highly of herself and of her opinions. It was her excessive self-confidence that led her to often make mistakes creating misfortunes for others and embarrassment for herself.Jane Austen, by the style of her writing, creates some well-defined character while including other character that are left more open to the reader interpretations. For example, while Emma's faults are very apparent, I found her innocence to be charming and it created sympathy for her character. Other examples of characters like Emma are Jain Fairfax, Harriet Smith, and Mr. Elton. In contrast the character of Mr. Knightly, the family friend is set in stone. Within the first few pages of the book he is established as the moral role model of the story. Mr. Woodhouse, Mr. Weston, Mrs. Weston (the former Miss Taylor), Frank Churchill, and Miss Bates are all other characters that give off a particular feeling, the feeling that Austen intended. These characters all have good and bad qualities, all of which are left up to the interpretation of the reader. The novel is written in third person, however the detached narrator often sees through Emma's point of view. Having the effect of a not so neutral bystander.I highly recommend Emma to anyone who enjoys a light-hearted, witty book that captivates and enchants. While reading this book you will find yourself captivated in the pages of one of Jane Austen's masterpieces.</review_text>
Cary Grant was a Great actor with countless memorable films. Although that this film is not amongst his very best, it is a fun movie with a good plot that may be watch by the whole family with pleasure. It is a war comedy with kids in main roles and one may see some Disney influence. But Grant offers us  one of his typical (in a good sence) perfomance that wilkl satisfy his funs. Enjoy it</review_text>
... then this would be a really serious detective. As it's executed now, it's a superbly relaxed copper-gets-the-villain with serious undertones. Cool</review_text>
Well, of course it's that hokey romantic type.  And, of course you see the ending coming from a mile away.  Of course we've seen it all before.  But, as far as entertainment value goes, it's got it.  Reese Witherspoon proves, once again, that she can flesh out an otherwise empty character and give it some personality.  There's really not much to the characters in this movie, but there doesn't need to be.  I was a little wary of the Jon Heder character, having just come off the great Napolean Dynamite buzz.  But, I found his character interesting and didn't think he had nearly enough time to flesh it out, but he did a good job with what he had.  You don't have to bust your brain trying to figure out this one, but it works when you're in the mood for a straightforward romance.  It is what it is</review_text>
Sadly, the DVD does not contain the special features I had hoped for like deleted scenes or a commentary... but that doesn't detract from the movie which, I think, couldn't be more perfect. Do you already love Michael? Then buy this movie for your collection just to have.  Andie McDowell singing about Miles, Ralph and Bradley is worth the price of the DVD all by itself.</review_text>
Funny... crazy... you might want to be sure to watch it first before you buy it... its terrible B movie material but so bad it's actually good</review_text>
I purchased this a gift for a special friend as I know that she loves musicals and had this movie but only on video tape. When she first opened the gift she could nothing but squeal with delight and run around the office showing everyone with much excitment. She has watched the movie several times and invited other friends over to enjoy the experience. I myself have watched the movie and must say it is enjoyable but not the best movie of this genre. Would only recommend for people who like Broadway shows and musicals. I'm glad I got this movie as a gift for her as I will now be remembered for many years to come</review_text>
I have loved this movie since I was a kid.  It is lightyears better than the Hornblower series that was on A&E.  I have read Forester's Hornblower series at least 10 times and never get tired of returning to them.Gregory Peck is not quite the Hornblower that I have come to know over the years, but he does a great job.  Thank goodness this movie is out in DVD.  My VHS version is on its last legs</review_text>
Doctor who materialised without his Tardis on this, my first timelord download in the amazon unbox, which is much larger on the inside than it appears on the outside.For a very reasonable sum, $1.99, my family and I were able to enjoy the first Third doctor adventure after his regeneration, where he encounters the Nestene Conciousness.The down load took only a few minutes although I had some considerable difficulty installing the microsoft program. thanks to the good people at amazon tech support I was able to obtain an alternative download from the gates empire itself which allowed me to enjoy our rental.a great experience and will not be the last. easy to navigate and fun for all the family. someone should tell the timelords on gallifrey about unbox and perhaps they could get rid of all the old type 40 tardis'</review_text>
The Gunfight at The OK Corral and My Darling Clementine have many things in common. Both of them are among the best Westerns ever made. Both of them had stalwart casts and scripts. Both of them had great directors, Sturges for Gunfight and John Ford for Clementine. Both of them didn't exactly tell the truth about what really happened leading up to and including the famous gunfight that took place on October 22, 1881.But while Gunfight tells a great story and tells it well, Clementine has a graceful, elegiac quality that permeated a lot of Ford's best films like The Searchers and She Wore A Yellow Ribbon. The little touches with Henry Fonda's Earp at one of his brother's tombstone, the scene at the dance, and many many others that bore Ford's distinct talent for capturing the so-called little moments in life that usually add up to a whole lot.The rest of the cast, featuring Ward Bond as another Earp, Victor Mature as Doc Holliday, and Walter Brennan as Old Man Clanton, are stellar and contribute much to the proceedings. Gunfight had a lot more of the story right, Tombstone had an unforgettable Doc Holliday in Val Kilmer, and Hour of The Gun had a more sober, somber, mature spin on things, but for sheer beauty and poetry on film, no other version of the Earp/Clanton story is better than My Darling Clementine</review_text>
This was the first Disney movie I watched as a child.I would still watch it today.  Disney successfully humanizes the movie to children by using "friendly" animals, while still keeping the main storylines intact.Thumbs up to the music; "Love Goes On and On" is a moving piece, and even hits my hard heart.Parents with younger children be warned: Some scenes may frighten them.</review_text>
I checked out the movie from my local county library and really liked it. Then I tried to purchase it from Amazon and it was only available from Canada. The cost of the shipping was as much as the movie so I cancelled the order</review_text>
I bought this DVD for my sister, a fan of the movie. She made me watch it with her on Christmas. The touching topic, the much-missed actors starring in the movie and the easy pace of the story left us feeling content, refreshed and ready for more pumpkin pie</review_text>
I don't recall having seen a film where the actors enjoyed more playing their roles.  They seemed to have had a ball</review_text>
This was my first download and it was "free".  The download performed well.  "The Mystery of Edgar Allan Poe" was informative.  It ran up to 50 minutes. This was a Unbox Video Download. It started with the typical intro and ended with the credits. Some individuals did not get a complete download so i included my experience with the Unbox download.  i hope the review was helpful. ty</review_text>
The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods</review_text>
worth the money but dont think it is a feel good happy movieits about LIFE</review_text>
Doctor who materialised without his Tardis on this, my first timelord download in the amazon unbox, which is much larger on the inside than it appears on the outside.For a very reasonable sum, $1.99, my family and I were able to enjoy the first Third doctor adventure after his regeneration, where he encounters the Nestene Conciousness.The down load took only a few minutes although I had some considerable difficulty installing the microsoft program. thanks to the good people at amazon tech support I was able to obtain an alternative download from the gates empire itself which allowed me to enjoy our rental.a great experience and will not be the last. easy to navigate and fun for all the family. someone should tell the timelords on gallifrey about unbox and perhaps they could get rid of all the old type 40 tardis'</review_text>
I got this movie in a three DVD pack from a local dealer, it came along with the movies Eaten Alive and Massacre in Dinosaur Valley.  I'd have to say that all three movies were worth the $15 dollars I spent on the three-pack.  The movie, Jungle Holocaust, is an adventure movie in a different spin.  I dont really consider this a horror movie, at least in the conventional sense.  The movie is exceptionally well done in the development of cinematography, the storyline is interesting and the acting and er...scenes...are engrossing (to use a phrase).  What I would really call this is an anthropological adventure to the extreme...a civilized man placed in a totally uncivilized surroundings.  Communications are not what you would get off the local street corner, worldviews are nonexistent (at least to the tribe in this film), so there is no connection except savagery.  Maybe this movie would have a greater tie with Golding's "Lord of the Flies."  A fascinating movie that brings you to the heart of a world that we, especially in first world countries like the US, have forgotten about.  I would suggest "End of the Spear" as a Christian look at examining these prehistoric people.  That film isn't a horror film, it is a Christian film, but it is (as I am a Christian) an interesting exploration of meeting such tribal people on their own territory.</review_text>
It's time to turn off your brain and have fun.  The faces are familiar and make them part of the family.  A funny, UP movie is good for whatever ails you</review_text>
BACKGROUND: The 1976 cel animated real sequel to Frosty the Snowman, it is shorter than the original Frosty at half an hour format. Made 7 years after the original Frosty which was an hour long format. The character design was by Paul Coker Jr, who did the same work for the first special, so the visual continuity works very well. Frosty gets a wife named Crystal (Played by Shelley Winters). While the first show was narrated and sung by Jimmy Durante, this time we have the voice talents of Andy Griffith. The famous voice actor Paul Frees stars as Jack Frost, and the policeman. Frees was a regular at the studio and had voiced the policeman, ticket seller, and Santa in the original. Dennis Day voiced the Parson, and Jackie Vernon voiced Frosty just like he did in the original. The writer is Romeo Muller, just like the original and Maury Laws returned as the musical director. There are no original songs this time out, as Christmas standards are used instead. Oh, there is another film out there called "Frosty Returns" that is marketed as a sequel to the original Frosty, but it is made by another studio. It features the voices of Johnathon Winters and John Goodman, it's fun but not up to the quality of this show.PLOT: Just like the song says, Frosty comes back again someday. Frosty returns to play with the children, but Jack Frost is envious of him. He tries to steal Frosty's magic hat. The children build Frosty a wife named Crystal according to magic instructions from Frosty. When Jack Frost finally gets Frosty, its his wife that must save him with love. They finally make friends and work together to have a long happy winter.Very well done by Rankin/Bass Studio. Their studio has brought us such memorable holiday classics such as Rudolph the Red-nosed Reindeer, Year without a Santa Claus, Nestor the Long-Eared Christmas Donkey, Mad Monster Party, The Little Drummer Boy, Frosty the Snowman, Santa Claus is Coming to Town, Mouse on the Mayflower, Here Comes Peter Cottontail, Cricket on the Hearth, the Stingiest Man in Town, Jack Frost, Pinnochio's Christmas, Rudolph's Shiny New Year, the First Easter Bunny. They also made non-holiday films such as the Hobbit, Flight of Dragons, the Last Unicorn. It is incredible that one company is responsible for all those TV specials, 95% of the ones we see every year. Their work includes standard animation, stop-motion animagic, and live action. I hope this comes out on a restored DVD soon, I have bought all the other Rankin/Bass that have been released on DVD.</review_text>
This one has one of those touching endings where you get to see that even Booth has a heart...well, more so than we already know.  The ending got me, I got misty over it.  Enjoy with someone you love</review_text>
I have seen many historical war dramas from Far East (mainly China's) and most of them are not only historically inaccurate but have a strong bias toward the enemy.Yi Soon Shin, however, is a rare exception.  Not only is the drama very historically accurate but it is also very comprehensive in detailing the meticulous battle planning of the admiral that leads to each victory but also the political in-fighting between the Chosun political factions (and the second-guessing nature of the king) which causes his eventual death.Also, the special effects are great.  The battle scenes (whether on sea or land) are realisitic and of outstanding quality.The only problem that I can find is that the DVD has not placed sufficient focus on the contribution of the Ming China.  Then again, this is not unexpected since this is a Korean drama focusing on the great admiral.Also, the entire selection should have 104 episodes.  I don't know why it stops at 101.If you want to have a more comprehensive knowledge on the subject, try Samuel Hawley's Imjin War (which portrays Yi Soon Shin more accurately by quoting original sources).Any who is only intered in the fighting may also want to check out Stephen Turnbull's Samurai Invasion (which has more colorful maps and detailed description of battles from the Japanese perspective).Lastly, anyone who is a fan of samurai warfare may want to check out Shogun:Total War by Creative Assembly (now in Gold version).</review_text>
I won't lie.  This movie sucks.However, it is so cheesy and lame that it will make you wet your pants.  I don't care what people say, but I like the no-name actors and the wanna-be power ranger ninjas.  It is a great movie because it is the worst movie ever.Also, I must add that the action was utterly stupid and the acting was absolutely pathetic.  :)  Great movie, though.Yes, I will agree, the plot sucks.  However, there is no plot, therefor the movie rocks.Buy it now and own the best movie ever for two bucks used and new.  It's the corniest and cheesiest movie ever!  :</review_text>
This is one of those groundbreaking films that that put the whammy on a genre; in this case, the Western can never come back.  Oaters traditionally are the realm of strong male characters righting wrong, loving their horses, and ignoring the school marm. Robert Altman, a political and cultural man of the 1960's Left simply says "horse feathers."  The hero is a corrupt bawdyhouse owner.  The school marm makes her living in a crude manner and normal everyday middle-class types don't really exist in the hardscrabble world of capitalism.The town, near Vancouver, Canada sits in a mountains and wilderness.  The film company built the town.  That's real snow there folks and blizzards as our anti-hero Beatty shoots it out with the company men while his best "girl" Julie Christy hides out in an opium den, her brown eyes realistically glassy.  John Wayne's, The Searchers was one of the best films ever made.  McCabe & Mrs. Miller tries to undo all that.Fascinating look at the underbelly of frontier life and a forerunner of the HBO series Deadwood, the West may not be a better place for it.</review_text>
Doctor who materialised without his Tardis on this, my first timelord download in the amazon unbox, which is much larger on the inside than it appears on the outside.For a very reasonable sum, $1.99, my family and I were able to enjoy the first Third doctor adventure after his regeneration, where he encounters the Nestene Conciousness.The down load took only a few minutes although I had some considerable difficulty installing the microsoft program. thanks to the good people at amazon tech support I was able to obtain an alternative download from the gates empire itself which allowed me to enjoy our rental.a great experience and will not be the last. easy to navigate and fun for all the family. someone should tell the timelords on gallifrey about unbox and perhaps they could get rid of all the old type 40 tardis'</review_text>
Lot's of skiing, women that were hot in the nineties, and a little bit of cheese combine to make this the best drama of all time for skiiers.  This movie teaches essential survival skills like exactly how to handle a French jackass ski-instructor if he ever blames you for stealing his heli-ski clients.  What you do is offer to split the tip with them, then when he says with his french accent, "I don wan to split de tip", just slam your ski locker in his face and come up with an extremly witty comment, then call him an azzhole as you walk away.....brilliant!!Also, what do you do when you've been invited up to the mansion of a European lady with enormous teeth and you search the whole house for her, only to find her her in the indoor swimming pool wearing nothing but the fur under her arms?  When she asks if you swim you answer, "like a fish" and whatever you do don't take your clothes off.  This would take too much time.  Just kick off your high-tops that aren't laced at the top and dive in.  When you come to the surface of the water, the hair flip to get water out of your face must be perfect or she may not invite you to stay the night.  PERFECT!!I look at Aspen Extreme more as an instructional video for these situations.  Thanks TJ & Dex, because of you I now live in my van and life is sweet.I'm kidding about all of this but it still is my favorite ski flick for sure.</review_text>
I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out</review_text>
'Zulu' opens on January 22nd, 1879 with a pacifist missionary Otto Witt (Jack Hawkins), and his blonde daughter Margareta (Ulla Jacobsson) attending a Zulu mass marriage ceremony...The impressive dancing and chanting takes on a different tone when the preacher discovers that Zulu forces have massacred hundreds of British troops at Iswandhlwana and are determined to destroy Rorke's Drift, an army outpost, in addition to being Witt's mission station...The shaken reverend arrives and explains the situation to the British officers, advising an immediate evacuation... To his horror, the officers decide to withstand and defend their ammunition dump with 139 Welch infantrymen, a mixture of committed soldiers and complaining malingerers...The haughty arrogant Lt. Bromhead (Michael Caine) is in charge, but Lt. John Chard (Stanley Baker) of the Royal Engineers - on assignment to build a bridge - takes command actually by strict seniority...The situation becomes dramatic by the fact that Chard has had no combat experience and, on a distinguished level, he is obviously not from an aristocratic background... But urgency obliges the two officers to set up the defense of the station, deploy their men tactically, and prepare for the attack...Then thousands of Zulus, armed with short spears and captured rifles, arrive on the grassy hilltops... Their unseen advance is announced by a threatening chanting...And then they come into sight...Long lines of black figures descending the green slopes of the hills, promising with the terrible clash of their shields and spears that soon they are going launch a fearless attack...Their techniques of tribal warfare fashioned an efficient and terrifying fighting force... They begin to test the British firing power with the life of their warriors...The British rifles cut them down and they retreat... But they come again-and again and again-each time getting closer to the station, cutting down the distance...Every withdraw is followed by a deathly silence... It seems obviously that any of them will survive... In every disciplined attack they are less in number and ammunition...After a long night, and at the rise of the sun, the fearful noise suddenly alerts the redcoats to another charge...Most of the men in the infirmary were too sick or injured to help... Few are malingerers, like Private Hook (James Booth), who decides much later to take his bayonet and fights heroically in hand-to-hand combat with dozen of black warriors inside the burning building...Outside, the exhausted soldiers prepare for what must be the last charge, but instead they hear a massed yell from the Zulus--a salute of acknowledgment to the braves as they withdraw from the scene...The battle at Rorke's Drift was a decisive one in the British campaign to pacify South Africa for European settlers who came to force their culture upon the angry natives... As a page in British history it has the distinction of being the battle which produced the Victoria Crosses in few hours - to eleven defenders for their extreme courage - an all-time record for one military engagement...Stanley Baker is solid as the engineer who is forced to become a combat commanding officer; Michael Caine splendid (in his first major role) as the pompous aristocrat; James Booth good enough as the guy who can easily find a reason to check himself into the hospital; Patrick Magee excellent as the calm surgeon; and Nigel Green, a sergeant of the old order, sternly watchful and understanding of his men but compassionate, as in the last move when he lines the tired and dispirited survivors up for a head count... He looks at them and quietly advises: 'Keep your voices down!'The film is a superb account of that bloody engagement, and the fighting is shown in realistic detail... It salutes the heroism of the Zulus and the extreme courage of the redcoats...Cy Endfield's direction gives emphasis to the physical exhaustion of nonstop killing, and the effect it has on men, making some tremble with great fear... More significantly, he avoids any explanation about the racial nature of the conflict, keeping out politics and history...With John Barry's menacing musical score, "Zulu" was filmed in Natal, South Africa and Stephen Dade captured the luscious colorful landscapes and the sense of strange isolation... But the most arresting moment in the film is when Enfield's camera pans over a field carpeted with black corpses, gathered side by side or one on top of the other...</review_text>
This two-reeler begins in the middle of the night.  Stan is suffering from a toothache, and his problem is keeping Ollie up as well.  Nothing he does helps him, but predictably makes things even worse.  All of the commotion in their room brings short-tempered landlord Charley Hall storming in, and the boys have a violent altercation with him that sends him off fuming.  Since everything has tried and failed, there seems no recourse but to go to the dentist.  (The scene in the dentist's office was later remade in their first feature film, 1931's 'Pardon Us.')  Things don't look good here either, since all of the patients are being carried out on stretchers.  Stan resists going in, but is dragged there anyway.  He's terrified of having the tooth pulled, and to calm him, Ollie says he'll show him how easy it is.  Unfortunately, the dentist, who was asked to leave the room during this, tells his assistant he's done for the day and to go in and pull the tooth of the guy in the chair.  Ollie ends up being snuck up on and chloroformed, with his tooth the one that's pulled.  Ollie is so furious that he gets into a scuffle with Stan, and during this they release laughing gas from one of the tubes.  The two of them begin laughing hysterically, and soon two of the nurses are laughing as well.  (The theme of starting to laugh and then getting more and more carried away and hysterical was to be revisited in a few of their other films, such as 'Blotto.')  The boys are still laughing up a storm as they get in their car and try to drive away, causing chaos and road rage all around them, not to mention the wrath of slow-burning cop Edgar Kennedy.  This is a solid comedy all around, with not a dull or wasted moment, and a great combination of both physical and situational comedy.  It's also a fascinating look back at how dentistry was conducted in the Twenties.  Today dentists use Novacaine instead of laughing gas and chloroform, and it's no longer routine procedure to just pull teeth that are giving one a problem instead of just drilling the cavity or infected area out and putting a filling in</review_text>
LAWN DOGS is a surprisingly original and exceptionally well done independent film.Mischa Barton as Devon is amazing.  Her face is pliable and ultra expressive, and even though she's the strangest little 10 year old captured on film, her adult mannerisms and dialogue show us a little girl who has been treated like a China doll by her parents; she's had a rough life and heart problems, which she explains with a dippety dit, etc.  She wants to show that she is still a person and quite capable of doing the things her parents are trying to spare her from.  Sam Rockwell is equally effective as the "poor white trash" who mows the rich people's lawns, a put upon young man, surprised at his friendship with this odd little girl.When watching the film, though, watch the subtle portraits that are painted:  when Devon wants to give Trent a glass of water, she reaches for one of the better glasses whereupon her mother tells her there's a glass for him under the sink---when Trent takes Devon to meet his parents, the mother offers them iced tea--in her best glasses; when Trent interrupts a barbecue at Devon's house, daddy offers him a couple hot dogs while the rest of the guests are eating steak and baked potatoes; when the community's fancy lantern shades are being stolen, they blame Trent, when it's really the nasty little boy who's doing this; when CDs are stolen from the golden boys' car, it's Trent who is blamed, when again, it's our little cowboy/indian/monster.The supporting performances are very good:  Kathleen Quinlan, as Devon's mom, who is messing around with one of the golden boys; Christopher McDonald as her dad, lost in the political workings of the development; Eric Mabius as one of the golden boys obviously interested in Rockwell's body as well.There's no real dramatic big scenes and it's a leisurely film, but Barton and Rockwell are remarkable and the movie has a sense of realism to counteract the fantasy elements</review_text>
I grew up in Australia with these Rankin/Bass Christmas cartoons and I missed them when they were no longer shown. I can only say that the DVD's are fantastic and the cartoons are exactly as I remember them.</review_text>
Being from Midland you might say I'm a homer and thus have a bias towards this movie.  This movie was literally made at the very end of the oil boom period - in fact many of the companies' whose name appear through out the movie had gone out of business by the time it was released (that's how fast the bust hit).  Terry Jastrow (who is from Midland) and his real life wife Anne Archer are great opposite each other on the screen while Mary Kay Place provides great commentary on life in Texas Oil Business</review_text>
I have seen many historical war dramas from Far East (mainly China's) and most of them are not only historically inaccurate but have a strong bias toward the enemy.Yi Soon Shin, however, is a rare exception.  Not only is the drama very historically accurate but it is also very comprehensive in detailing the meticulous battle planning of the admiral that leads to each victory but also the political in-fighting between the Chosun political factions (and the second-guessing nature of the king) which causes his eventual death.Also, the special effects are great.  The battle scenes (whether on sea or land) are realisitic and of outstanding quality.The only problem that I can find is that the DVD has not placed sufficient focus on the contribution of the Ming China.  Then again, this is not unexpected since this is a Korean drama focusing on the great admiral.Also, the entire selection should have 104 episodes.  I don't know why it stops at 101.If you want to have a more comprehensive knowledge on the subject, try Samuel Hawley's Imjin War (which portrays Yi Soon Shin more accurately by quoting original sources).Any who is only intered in the fighting may also want to check out Stephen Turnbull's Samurai Invasion (which has more colorful maps and detailed description of battles from the Japanese perspective).Lastly, anyone who is a fan of samurai warfare may want to check out Shogun:Total War by Creative Assembly (now in Gold version).</review_text>
I remember seeing this movie years ago in college and have continued to like it ever since.  The movie starts off at the 1988 Calgary Olympics.  Doug Dorsey (D.B. Sweeny) is a talented hockey player and Kate Mosley (Moira Kelly) is a pairs figure skater.  Both have mishaps during their big moments, Doug suffering a career ending injury and Kate falling during her performace and failing to meet her own expectations.The movie picks up a few years later with Kate having trouble getting a new partner and Doug is on the skids unable to fulfill his dream of becoming a star hockey player.  Added to the mix is Kate's Russian couch Anton Pamchenko (played by the great Roy Dotrice) who decides Rick will be Kate's new partner as they struggle to get back to the 1992 Olympics.At first glance this is a sports movie about figure skating, but that is not entirely so.  The scenes involving the leads on the ice are surprisingly abstract as neither is a professional skater.  In truth this is a character driven story and most of the action takes place off the ice.  It is absolutely charming to watch the two lead characters go from a dislike of one another, to extreme rivalry and finally ending up in love.  The thing that absolutely makes this happen is the chemestry between the leads Sweeney and Kelly.  They are magic together on the screen, so much so that I am surprised they never paired up again for another movie.I highly recommend this light hearted romance to everyone.On a side note about the DVD, the only special feature is the theatrical trailer.  There are no deleted scenes.  This is where I have a question, because the version of the film on this DVD and that I've scene on TV in recent years is not the one I remember seeing in college.  I distinctly remember the end scene was the medal ceremony.  I somewhat like that version because what Doug and Kate won in that version was so much more.  So where is the version with the alternative ending???</review_text>
I originally saw this IMAX movie in Hawaii, at the Polynesian Cultural Center 3 years ago...and bought the soundtrack, always hoping to get the DVD.  Much to my amazement, the movie was included for my PC as one of the features for Windows XP.  Anyway, the music, narration, and footage is breathtaking, I left the IMAX theatre feeling physically off-balance because of the motion of the seas and the ocean, and so moved by the magic of it all that I was teary-eyed the rest of the day.  I ended up at Sunset Beach on Oahu's NOrth Shore that evening watching the sunset and had the beach to myself. It is one of those days that you will never forget in your lifetime, it is still so vivid, and watching this DVD brings every cell in me back to The Living Sea and the beaches of Hawaii.  Absolutely moving and breathtaking...even when watching on the small screen vs. the IMAX screen.  You will not be disappointed</review_text>
Perhaps the only sculpture movie I ever saw. Very French. She finally looses her mind at the end. Much angst</review_text>
The characters are likable, there is some decent progression and growth seen over the course of the film, but only about half of the scenes are necessary.  It seems as if they just wanted to give Gene Wilder a few more chances to be quirky.  Gene is a funny guy, there is no doubt about that, but enough is enough!The film is family friendly, except for a few instances of harsh language and violence, but it is really nothing compared to the sorts of things that get into theaters these days.It is worth a look, but only if you're willing to deal with some pretty decent stretches of time when there is not a lot of progression in the story</review_text>
Doctor who materialised without his Tardis on this, my first timelord download in the amazon unbox, which is much larger on the inside than it appears on the outside.For a very reasonable sum, $1.99, my family and I were able to enjoy the first Third doctor adventure after his regeneration, where he encounters the Nestene Conciousness.The down load took only a few minutes although I had some considerable difficulty installing the microsoft program. thanks to the good people at amazon tech support I was able to obtain an alternative download from the gates empire itself which allowed me to enjoy our rental.a great experience and will not be the last. easy to navigate and fun for all the family. someone should tell the timelords on gallifrey about unbox and perhaps they could get rid of all the old type 40 tardis'</review_text>
This is one of my favorite movies ever. It really captures life in the 1800's slums and you really get attached to the characters. There are parts that you can barely watch because you feel for the characters. This is a great story about people who hit rock bottom and become much stronger people by becoming tougher and working their way up again to achieve their dreams. I've seen this movie about 3 times and each time I see it, it is just as good</review_text>
I can't believe how underrated this movie is! I never saw it because I had never really heard much about it, but when I finally saw it, I absolutely loved it, along with my whole family! I'm 20 year old girl, so obviously this is my kind of movie, but my brother loved it too because the script is so clever! This movie is hilarious, touching, incredibly romantic, and so beautiful!! The cinematography is astounding, the sets and the costumes are wonderful, and Tom and Nicole are perfect together. They have such great chemistry on screen! I have watched this movie again and again and it is one of my all-time favorites. I highly recommend this film! This is an epic film that should not have been overlooked!!!</review_text>
Well written, well acted, and well directed, this is much better than 99% of all films on TV or in the theatres.  the only reason it is unknown is its adult content - marijuana smoking and romantic affairs, lending amusing background to a woman's haphazard but fortunate search for control of her life.  This is that rare bird, an intelligent film, for adults. My favorite line: Joe Mantegna's remark to Mia Farrow: "You're really interesting", after she relates a private comment she heard him make while she was invisible.  It is not a 5 star film, like say "Witness", but it is an excellent small film.  This is for film fans who prefer romance to violence</review_text>
CSI is great and Downloading was very easy.  This is my fourth video, and I've only had problems with one, and Amazon quickly walked me through fixing it.  Gotta agree with A. Huck on the DSL, though.  While it's certainly useable the higher speed of cable would be great</review_text>
This version of Pride and Prejudice takes quite a few liberties with Jane Austen's most beloved story, but manages to endear itself in spite of that.  Olivier's Darcy will be a shock to those who are in love with Colin Firth or Matthew MacFadyen, but he does so well that you'll be charmed by him in no time.  And Greer Garson's Lizzy is as spirited as you could wish.  The costumes are all wrong, yes, and it is a little distracting for those of us who revel in Regency dramas, but once you get over that, and immerse yourself into the story, you'll be swept away.  Highly recommended</review_text>
In 1969 an unknown Soviet filmmaker Mikhail Kalatozov dared to tell an epic and tragic story concerned with the Italian General Nobile who tried to cross the North Pole in a dirigible failing in his attempt . The awful Odyssey in the middle of this ironically polar hell when no one responded his SOS calls make of this film one of the darkest movies ever filmed.Watch to Sean Connery as the Artic explorer Roald Amudsen .</review_text>
This is an excellent documentary of Shangri-La and its elusive transcendental nature</review_text>
Here's another great film that sprung forth from the Czech New Wave: another film that, through its small gestures and subtleties makes some big statements. I'll leave it for you all to discover Forman's delightful insights into human behavior in LOVES OF A BLONDE. Suffice it to say, the plot---which involves a young girl's (Hana Brejchov) attempt to find true love as a factory girl---could have become whimsical and even sentimental in other hands. In Forman's, the whole thing is grounded on earth. Instead of being a weightless romantic comedy, LOVES OF A BLONDE aims for realism, and while Forman maintains a relatively light touch on the proceedings, everything that happens to her---she finds love in a piano player, makes love to him one night, and then eventually pursues him to his home, where she meets his ever-bickering parents---still has its own kind of weight to it. The only way I can describe it is, I guess, the weight of real life. I haven't seen a more accurate recreation of a marriage that has dulled out in any other movie than I saw in the second half of LOVES OF A BLONDE, with Milda's parents: it is comic, yes, but it is also uncannily realistic, and maybe you'll recognize your own parents when you see the control-freak mother and the carefree father in this film. As for the blonde of the movie...well, she doesn't necessarily become sympathetic as the movie progresses, but we get a sense of why she begins to attach herself to the piano player Milda: she sees him as an escape from the drudgeries of factory life. Understand that, and you'll find the ending of this film poignant and maybe kinda sad. (Her dream has been shattered, but she keeps on believing it anyway, either out of hope or simply desperation.)But enough of my pretentious analysis, hehe. The point is, Milos Forman's LOVES OF A BLONDE, like Jiri Menzel's arguably more celebrated CLOSELY WATCHED TRAINS, is a film that, though short at 85 minutes, takes its time to observe human nature in the face of oppression, in its own light and subtle way. Its comic surface only makes it seem like a slight movie; but in its subtleties and scenes of comic observation, it has a heck of a lot more to say about our little human foibles than a lot of other romantic comedies do. Recommended</review_text>
First of all, let me say Kudos to the seller for getting this to me as quickly as they did. It took about three business days from the time I placed the order.Anyway, I love a good ghost story. Ghosts are still to me, the quickest and easiest way to illicit fear. Think back to when you were a kid and could stay up all night watching Dracula or a stalker movie but had a chill running down your spine when you simply heard a good ghost story. But they have to have to have to be done right. In real estate the three rules are location location location, in ghost movies it's atmospherte atmosphere atmosphere. The tricks of the trade are all old, but just like tripping on a banana peel, if done right, it works.The Devils Backbone not only gets it right, it bravely decides to take it deeper. Calling this movie a ghost story period is a huge disservice. Yes there are sections where there is a ghost present, but the ghost itself quickly fades into the background while we are pulled into a story that  revolves around a time and an event that no American from my generation could completly grasp... and that heightens the movie from a simple chilling tale into something far more relevant.The plot of the movie revolves around Carlos, a young Spansih boy dropped off unsuspectingly at a boys school during the Spanish Civil War after his father has been killed(which for the length of the movie he never is told). He befriends one of the older caretakers,a few of the boys, and butts heads with a former student who now lives on the premesis. Also he is informed by the students that someone else is on these grounds too, they call him "the one who sighs". He appears to Carlos a few times in shadow and in one particularly suspensful scene, in full body trying to tell him something, but for most of the movie,Carlos simpy does what anyone else would do... he runs. Its only when he stops and listens does he learn to stand on his own two feet and to do what must be done to become not only a man before his time, but to save the lives of the other children he's boarding with.It would be ignorant of me to suppose I can deduce everything the director(Guillermo Del Toro) is trying to say, especially without knowing jack about Spains history(I had to look it up to find out what conflict was the central backdrop). What I took away from the movie is this-to become a man, you have to be willing to risk everything for whats right. Its also a nicely told revenge story as the true main villain of the movie comes clear and states very clearly and elegantly what lot of movies clumsily stumble over themselves trying to. That alot of times fear of the unknown is nothing compared to what evil lurks in us and what we are capable of doing to one another. This is all very surface and obvious I know, and Im sure symbolically it has alot more going on, but thats what repeat viewings are for.Mr Del Tormo directs with a kids love for spook settings and a man who desparatly loves his countries sensitive eye. No other recent"ghost story" that i can think of has such an accomplished visual flare while blending 3-dimensional characters into a tapestry capturing a time and place so vividly. It also has to be said that the main cast, most of whom are children ranging from 10-15 do a very good job and  he must have a gift for bringing a credible performance out of them, like Spielberg or Shyamalan.Bottom line, the ghost sections of the movie really work, but what makes the movie is the human element. The ghost story becomes secondary and that's not a complaint, anything else would have been a disservice to a heart renching story.Mr Del</review_text>
This is the first episode where we really see the heart of Tony in his dealings with a teenager struggling with the horrible death of his father. A must see</review_text>
I read a negative review of this show but I just watched it and it was better than foretold.  I expect it will do better than people think.  It's basically a Danielle Steele novel come to life.  Courtney Cox is a somewhat stern and enigmatic publisher of a Los Angeles gossip magazine.The other characters are troubled celebrities (who have sex a lot).  The show feels very contemporary.  It is definitely a drama.  Despite moments of levity, it is basically a dramatic story.In any case, my bet is that this show will get better and that naysayers are jumping the gun.</review_text>
I urge everyone out there to download this episode!  This one totally rocks! Shep, a Wraith and Kolya all in one episode!  Any episode with Shep (Joe Flannigan) and Kolya are well worth watching!  Download this and download every other Stargate SG1 and Stargate Atlantis episode!</review_text>
Stargate Atlantis is great. I like the idea of downloading the episodes, but put in all the seasons. Why leave out season 2?</review_text>
This is a wonderful movie and I have always enjoyed it from the first time that I watched it when I was 20 something.Then to see the actress that plays Miss Ellie on Dallas in such a young roll. It was excellent.The story is endearing and shows the many facets of ones life</review_text>
This is an HBO remake of the original 50's 50 footer. Naturally there had to be some adjustments for the new era. However it still captures the thrills and chills. You may also marvel at the spandex clothing that stretches for ever (rats.)Nancy (the little woman) does not have quite the devoted husband. Here life is not quite ideal. Soon a chance encounter with aliens (the space type) leaves her feeling bigger about the situation. 50 foot bigger. Now it is Nancy's turn for a little revenge. The ending is a little unnerving.Be sure to see Daryl in just as serious of a role in "High spirits" (1998)</review_text>
Friday Foster may not be Foxy Brown, but it's well worth your time if you're into this genre.  It does have a catchy little theme song!  It doesn't have alot of the action and violence of other Grier films, it's more about unravelling a conspiracy.  Jim Backus is given high billing, but only appears in one scene.  Carl Weathers is at the bottom of the billing, but appears in most of the film-But that's a good thing, coz who doesn't like Carl Weathers?  Yaphet Koto, as usual, is a joy, and actually gets a few laughs.  For those like myself who occasionally fantasize coming home from work to find a naked Pam Grier in the kitchen making goulash, will enjoy the two topless scenes.  Foster sure has no problem jumping into the sack with people in this one.  Basically all I can say about Friday Foster is that it's a sure bet if you dig Pam Grier and/or blaxploitation movies.  I know I dig</review_text>
One of the best movies of all time! Bertolucci captures it all: everything is well-rounded, every intimate moment realistically captured, the scenes, the emotion, the beauty and the avant guarde. This is avant-Guarde cinema at its best, it doesn't isolate the viewer, but wholeheartedly brings them into a brave new beautiful world. Lucy is leisurely looking for her father, life and love in an isolated arts commune in Italy. You will forget where you are and how you think you should be living after seeing such free and open beauty of people and interchanging lives. Gorgeous</review_text>
I absolutely love Atlantis. From Ronon Dex, to Sheppard, and to all the faces. I'd cry if Atlantis was cancelled. Seriously though, Steve should have never have died, he should also have been put in command of SG1. Can you imagine that..."Why Steve, welcome to Earth...you're welcome to live out your life, if you only feed in self defense on enemies...'kay? Oh, you're also in charge of Sg1. :P" But seriously, the Wraith make this show so awesome. From Steve to Bob to Edward, to Gordon and Alexander, to Michael and Eric (by far James's best performance yet).The Wraith make this show what it is. But one thing??? Why don't we have Before I Sleep? Seriously, you have no idea how irked I am at that, since I began watching in S.2.12.Anyways, I think Atlantis totally pwns SG1</review_text>
Scooby Doo rocks!  This was an awesome episode, and an awesome way to download some of the earlier episodes of Scooby.  Fun stuff, and an inexpensive download</review_text>
I LIKE THIS TV SERIES, BETTER THAN THE MOVIE THAT MOVIE WAS A DISASTER IN ALL FRONTS, ROBERT CONRAD IS WONDERFUL, &amp; THE CAST IS GREAT</review_text>
I love this film. Everyone must see it, at least once. Just as everyone should taste ice cream or smell a bouquet of fresh lilies-of-the-valley, or fall in love...ya gotta see this."La Strada" is part of a body of work that has, at its core, a thread of autobiographical sentiment so powerful and mysterious, that scholars are still dissecting his films frame by frame.Although Fellini says, in the Criterion Collection DVD "extra""I have no message for humanity...I am sorry", we still believe that if we can decode the images, stories, fantasies and dreams of Fellini's experience/imagination, we will find profound truths. Certainly, the experience of viewing a Fellini film has proven to be worthwhile to a vast audience across geographic, linguistic and cultural boundaries, and over time. There's something to this Fellini guy's stuff...but what the heck is it? I think Fellini's films are distillations of beauty, humor, dreams, pathos, nightmares and the pleasure and pain of living. When Fellini insists that he doesn't have a message, he is probably right. He's not trying to sell ideas. He is only trying to give form to his thoughts and dreams and nightmares and fantasies and experiences and memories. The result is something we would call "art". For those of us susceptible to the aesthetic, Fellini is a master.La Strada is a film with a "neorealist" core. The ravaged countryside, the long, lonely vistas of fields, the sea, and the faces of poverty belong in large part to the "neorealist" post-war films that look unflinchingly at harsh realities of a war-torn Italy.The circus, which here forms an environment, is the backdrop for individuals who reveal their characters in a tragic landscape.Reading the film artist's biography "Fellini on Fellini" reveals his attitude toward the "Auguste" Clown" and the imperious "White Clown", their relationships, power structures, and the circus as a metaphor for life itself. In "8 1/2", the film-maker concludes with an acceptance of life as a circus- a parade of clowns, lovers, friends and associates who enter the spotlight and give resolution to the film. Who is to argue? I think life is like a circus pretty often.There is the reality of being "in" the circus and behind the illusions and there is the reality of being an "observor" and outside. Flip this into any social situation and watch it fit.We develop compassion and sympathy for the main characters.Giulietta Massina is luminous as the female protagonist clown-a kind of "Auguste" figure (according to Fellini's own breakdown of character types). She is the butt of jokes, is the lost soul, the sidekick to the "White Clown", and the hapless, confused child. Anthony Quinn is oh-so-dark as Zampano, the strongman (a kind of "White Clown" authority figure) who blusters, bosses, bullies and frightens.In the end of the film, a man cries at the edge of the sea. He is broken, lost, has betrayed the trust of an innocent, has little reason to believe his own soul may be saved...except for the fact that his tears are falling. His recognition of the sanctity of life comes late.</review_text>
I was about to buy the DVD since I found it in a store near home. I am glad I read the reviews and hope that the poor sound gets fixed for the DVD... and that the poor reviews get deleted (the ones about sound quality, that is). This is one of my favorite movies and I'd really like to have a copy. I wish there were far more foreign films in this site. There's a whole world out there that people do not understand because there is too much of the same around..</review_text>
A very good WW11 Movie depicting a young boys experiance of war in the fareast during the Japanese invasion of Shanghai.Rates with Hope And Glor</review_text>
This is my favorite Spielberg movie. Most other directors would live off a film like this for the rest of their lives. For Spielberg, this is almost a forgotten movie. Wonderful story about a young English boy (Christian Bale) living in China who gets separated from his parents and ends up in Japanese prison camp during WWII. Filmed in China, it beautifully depicts in full detail a part of WWII that is seldom viewed.</review_text>
I rented the movie and I havn't seen the first three but this one was pretty good. It wasn't the absolute best horror film but good pace of the movie, good plots and story line. I don't recommend going out and buying it  righ away cause you should rent it first and decide for yourself</review_text>
This is one of a series of horror anthology movies released by Amicus Studios in the early 70's.  (i.e. "Tales From the Crypt", "The House That Dripped Blood", "Vault of Horror").Each anthology is held together by a certain theme.In "Asylum" a young psychiatrist interviewing for a job in an asylum is told that the head of the asylum has gone crazy and is now a patient.  The young psychiatrist must hear the stories of some of the patients and then determine who was the head of the Asylum.  If he is correct, he gets the job.The stories give the feel of old horror comics, which inspired many horror anthologies. The characters are one-dimensional and driven by such deadly sins, as greed and lust. In most cases,  with a twist and a touch of macabre, the fates get their revenge on the evil-doers.The stories are mostly enjoyable and solid entries in the horror anthology genre. The British countryside, where the stories are mostly set, adds an extra chill.The movie is recommended most to fans of horror anthologies, such as HBO's "Tales From the Crypt" or Stephen King's "Creepshow", and the movies noted earlier.  It would also be great for those who remember how much fun these movies were when they first came out.More general audiences would be entertained, but I don't think this movie should be ranked with 5-Star horror masterpieces ("The Exorcist", "Halloween", "Psycho"), nor would I expect most general audiences to rank it so highly.The DVD quality is definitely noteworthy, having sharp, rich colors which enhanced the movie's experience.</review_text>
The words "accesibility" and "fun" do not often go together with Jean-Luc Godard. He is one of the most important directors in the history of the cinema, but he is not always easy for mainstream audiences - or even the arthouse crowd - to digest.Happily, Une Femme Est Une Femme [A Woman is a Woman], one of his most important films, and one of the key movies of the French New Wave of the 1960s is a blast from beginning to end, demonstrating that you do not have to be awkward or alienate your viewers to be brilliant.For one thing, it's a comedy - and a genuinely funny one, with some hilarious scenes involving the "gender war". There are particularly excellent scenes in which Jean-Claude Brialy and the always watchable Anna Karina as the main couple are determined not to talk to each other and instead resort to showing each other book titles to express themselves.It's Godard's first film in colour and widescreen, which makes a refreshing change from his usual monochrome, square vision of cinema, and it's innovative and moves along at a lightning pace as if it's determined to head off the smallest amount of boredom in its audience before it even emerges. Godard does some fascinating things with graphics: text appears on screen betraying the characters' true emotions as they effortlessly lie to each other.It's a very playful movie, with a few in-jokes that newcomers to the French New Wave will perhaps miss; there are a couple of affectionate digs at fellow New Waver Francois Truffaut. In one scene a main character asks a minor character "How are Jules and Jim" (Truffaut's movie of the same year.) She replies "Moderate."And there are self-references too. Jean-Paul Belmondo's character at one point complains that he needs to leave because he wanted to watch A Bout de Souffle on TV. (He was in A Bout de Souffle. It's Godard's first film.)Characters talk directly to the camera, bow, at one point Anna Karina seems to be about to burst into song and the whole movie about to turn into a Hollywood musical (The film is said to be Godard's tribute to that much-loved genre, although it's more about the love of movies in general.)There's also some very peculiar, and funny work with the incidental music which rises up and cuts out during perfectly mundane conversations to give them a little extra spice and drama.And there's Brialy riding his bike around his apartment for no apparent reason.The plot, by the way, is (as so often with Godard) secondary to the delivery of the movie - its techniques, its quirks, and its innovations. But the style is so effective you won't mind that. And it's a very satisfying 80 or so minutes which will leave you with a smile on your face at the end.Very pleasing that one of the most important films of the French New Wave is also, alongside Demy's sung-through, technicolor musical Parapluies de Cherbourg [Umbrellas of Cherbourg], one of its most enjoyable.Well worth the attention of both the Godard admirer and the newcomer.</review_text>
I first saw this movie on satellite TV with my mom one winter vacation.  Recently, I was reminded of it, and remembered how wonderful it is.  Besides being an adorable story, the film is shot beautifully in black and white, which the DVD shows off perfectly.  I think it's much better than You've Got Mail, although I like that movie, too.  Definitely worth at least a rental</review_text>
This film is frightening in a quiet sort of way...I enjoyed it immensely. It was an especially scary watch, considering I was living an hour away from my military base in the backwoods of the Thetford Forest, in the East of England, in the middle of the night across from a patch of said spooky forest. Delicious. The plot is solid, the special effects adequate to the story, the acting good. I like that it is so quiet, and brings a fairy-tale creature into the modern age so deftly, without the usual American Hollywood theatrics. What would a military unit do if met by a group of supernatural beasts? Hmn... this film offers a good answer. (I do so like werewolves! Check out Ginger Snaps Back -the prequel to the corny Ginger Snaps- it is also quiet. My inner 16-year-old liked it alot, as it is a bit on the young-female-empowerment side. Watch for the scene that shows just how gutsy Ginger is when faced with a jerk of a captain.</review_text>
This is by far the best movie that I have seen that portrays the real life of a Gypsy. Though it is not a documentary, but you will learn a lot about the Gypsy way of life, their music, and most of all FLAMENCO in a very beautiful and touching story.Your breath will be taken away from the very first scene. Awesome sights and awesome music. What can I say! Tomatito performs one of his most beautiful heart-felt solo accompanied with a group of Arabic Musicians. This heavenly moment alone is the reason what makes life so beautiful and precious.</review_text>
This is one of the great Westerns: strong cast in every role, straighforward plot, glorious locale, and lots of hard riding and fast shooting.  For fun, see it as the middle film in a trilogy of Viet Nam-related Westerns.  "Magnificent Seven" is first (all ideology and victory assured), "Ulzana's Raid" is third (everybody's burnt out and savage and nobody wins); "The Professionals" in the middle.  A wicked, wealthy Texan (Ralph Bellamy in the same kind of hat LBJ used to wear when he was on the ranch pretending to herd cattle) hires a small band of highly skilled, experienced professionals (think Green Berets) to rescue his wife (the Viet Namese peasants) from the wicked Jack Palance (the VC).  They do the job, but it turns out the wife really loves her "abductor" and prefers him to the Texan, so the professionals return her to her lover and her home, and, "going native," go back with them.  Or you can skip all that and just enjoy the hell out of this fabulous movie</review_text>
If you like gross-out comedies, this one is for you.  It celebrates the stoned peoples' view of the corporate working world, and has anarchist toilet humor as a bonus</review_text>
I find most "stoner" movies to be too juvenile to bother with. This is not a typical stoner movie, though, because the leads are not slacker losers, they're intelligent guys (one's an investment banker, the other an aspiring med student) who happen to like to hang out together and smoke dope. Which, truth be told, is pretty accurate of a lot of twenty somethings today.The best bits are hilarious. Watch out for the British twin sisters, the evangelical tow truck driver, and Neil Patrick Harris (Doogie Howser) as a sex crazed drug addled party animal. The only scene that fell flat for me was the one with the cheetah. Pointless and not funny. That said, this is not highbrow humor. But if this were just a series of frat boy jokes it would have fallen as flat as most other movies of the genre. What really elevates this movie is the Harold and Kumar characters. Silly antics aside, these guys are really likeable and have great on screen buddy chemistry.I don't know why I haven't seen John Cho and Kal Penn in more movies, but the ending makes me hopeful that there will be a sequel</review_text>
Doctor who materialised without his Tardis on this, my first timelord download in the amazon unbox, which is much larger on the inside than it appears on the outside.For a very reasonable sum, $1.99, my family and I were able to enjoy the first Third doctor adventure after his regeneration, where he encounters the Nestene Conciousness.The down load took only a few minutes although I had some considerable difficulty installing the microsoft program. thanks to the good people at amazon tech support I was able to obtain an alternative download from the gates empire itself which allowed me to enjoy our rental.a great experience and will not be the last. easy to navigate and fun for all the family. someone should tell the timelords on gallifrey about unbox and perhaps they could get rid of all the old type 40 tardis'</review_text>
its easy to state facts when you talk about the quality of a power tool or a tv.  but when it comes to things like movies and music, its all a mater of opinion.  my idea of a great movie might be your idea of the worst movie ever made.  so its not a good idea to buy or not buy a movie based on someones opinion of it.  i liked this movie in fact i just watched this movie 5 min before writing this.  if you are not sure if its your cup of tea rent it before buying it. i seen it 10 times over the years and i still like it</review_text>
Cagney's startling performance as Tommy Powers, in William Wellman's PUBLIC ENEMY, was to be expected. He was powerful when needed. Gentle, with his short jabs of affection. And his fast-talking wit, whether in anger or in good-spirits, was in amazing contrast to his relatively slower talking co-stars. Or was it to be expected in 1931? I didn't know until watching the commentaries around this film that co-star Edward Woods was supposed to be the lead, and that Cagney was to play Matt. At the last minute, in movie minutes, the roles were switched. And yet both actors were beyond comfortable with their new parts. (Edward Woods was incredibly underrated. Does anybody know why he quit making movies in 1938? He lived for decades after that.)I won't rehash the plot here but I must pay homage to every cast member. Jean Harlowe--what more can be said? Leslie Fenton as "Nails" Nathan was a study in polished brutality. Joan Blondell as Mamie was cute as a button with her wide-eyed perkiness, and sincere affection for her Matt. Donald Cook could not have been better cast as the brooding, righteous older brother to Tom. (At points, he's tougher than Cagney's Tommy.) Beryl Mercer as Ma gets away with being so sweet without being saccharine. British actor Murray Kinell is just slimy enough to deserve his end, as the Fagin-like Putty Nose. And last, but definitely not least, is Robert O'Connor as the paternal crime boss, Paddy Ryan, who is sincere in his care for his young apprentices. The uncredited child actors who played the young Tommy and Matt were priceless.Now can anyone tell me who Tony the waiter was: I loved his only line: "Pop! Bur-r-p! Pa-POP!"As for the DVD itself, well the sound was sometimes muddy, and the changes in film quality--where they restored previously edited material--are jarring. But so what? You can see and hear every word in this masterpiece better than films made ten years ago that were sloppily transferred to digital. And the Warner Night at the Movies (1931) was a brilliantly executed way to let us experience what it must have been like to go to the movies 75 years ago. This is a must-have disc for lovers of gangster movies or the classics</review_text>
CSI is great and Downloading was very easy.  This is my fourth video, and I've only had problems with one, and Amazon quickly walked me through fixing it.  Gotta agree with A. Huck on the DSL, though.  While it's certainly useable the higher speed of cable would be great</review_text>
This is the first series of Upstairs, Downstairs.  Chronicling the lives of masters and servants in a Belgravia townhouse, Updown, as it is affectionately known, covers about twentyfive years.  The first series lasts from about 1903 to 1908.  It introduces most of the main characters of the entire chronicle, barring a few later additions to the caste.  Most of this first series concerns the career of Sarah, who has the impertinence to come to the front door when she applies for the position of parlormaid in the first episode.  We also see the early stages of the career of Elizabeth Bellamy, daughter of the house, as she rebels against the path her life is expected to take by her parents.  Some of the episodes in this first series were filmed in black and white, due to a cameramen's strike.  I find these particularly effective in portraying the barrenness of life below stairs.  Some of the episodes are a bit off target, especially The Swedish Tiger, which is just plain weird, but remember the series had not yet reached classic status when these episodes were filmed.  The first series is a great way to start your acquaintance with the residents of 165 Eaton Place</review_text>
No matter how many years pass; still one of the best kung fu flicks ever made</review_text>
Charles Laughton is typically wonderful in his broadly-played role as England's King, Henry the Eigth, who infamously married six different queens, divorcing or executing them as circumstances warranted.  The script to this magnificent Alexander Korda production is a witty jab at English history buffs, touching only briefly on the supposed treachery of Ann Boleyn,  concentrating instead on the preposterous emotional life of the lusty, capacious King. Laughton, as ever, is a marvel, skillfully presenting Henry at first as a thinly-cariacatured lout, and gracefully embuing him with gradual shades of pathos and humanity.  Viewers who look to this film as historical drama are clearly missing the point: this is all about the cleverly-rendered script, which turns British schoolboy lessons on their heads, and on the classy ensemble acting, which admittedly may be hard to focus on with the lamentable quality of the current print (I'm writing in the year 2003; perhaps Criterion or some other class-act movie restoration company can correct this problem soon).  Still, fans of early British cinema will enjoy this film a lot</review_text>
Although this isn't the most polished movie, it is genuinely entertaining, and only someone not remotely interested in seeing a romantic comedy would give it 0-1 stars.I can't remember why I first picked it up (I didn't see it in the theaters), but it is a consistently funny, touching film.  I'm not a fan of Sarah Jessica Parker, Elle MacPherson (who I feel turns in the strangest, poorest performance of the bunch), or even Ben Stiller, but I think it's easy to identify with people so afraid to be in love, but so afraid not to be in a committed relationship.All in all, it's a bunch of laughs, and kind of a relief to watch something that takes itself less seriously than some of the big-name romantic comedies that are put out today and fall flat</review_text>
Billy Elliot is an 11 year old who does poorly in the boxing ring but surprisingly well in ballet class (meeting with the boxers because of building shuffling needed during a coal miners strike).This is the classic "family doesn't initially understand," "teacher believes in him," "screws up audition but spirit carries him through" type movie.  It's put together quite nicely, and you never really know how it is going to turn out.The transition from ballet dancing to tap/jazz seemed to happen in one day, which seemed jarring.The beginning of Swan Lake, with Billy as the lead and family and friends in attendance, 10 years or so later, was a real "feel good" part of the movie</review_text>
Thirty years later it is hard to imagine "The Story of Adele H" without the then twenty-year old Isabelle Adjani as the title character.  But at the time Truffaut's decision to cast the young French theatre star was very risky.  Not because there was any doubt about Adjani's acting, but because casting someone who was arguably the most beautiful actress in the world as a character driven mad by unrequited love raised a potential credibility issue.   Would viewers believe that the advances of a woman so beautiful, passionate, and intelligent were rejected?  And could someone like that elicit sympathy from the average viewer.But Truffaut knew what he was doing because Adjani's Adele Hugo is 100% convincing.  And rather than going for  audience sympathy they go for audience frustration as the viewer is increasingly exasperated over Adele's self-destructive behavior.  Adjani's breathtaking beauty actually is an asset as Truffaut wants you convinced that the world offers unlimited possibilities for Adele if only she can let go of her obsession.  Adjani plays the character with such intensity that you are finally relieved when Adele's madness has reached the stage where she is no longer aware of her own suffering.Apparently Adele had other issues before going on her obsessive quest for love.  Her sister drowned a few years before and her parents had always strongly favored her sister.  Adele has recurrent nightmares about drowning.  Marriage and her pursuit of Pinson are her only way to escape from her famous father. Truffaut's stays with blacks, browns, and blues; with much of each frame filled with shadows; not exactly dreary but consistent with a character who has found little non-fantasy happiness during her life.The camera loves Adjani, a good thing as she is on screen for over 90% of the film.  She was the youngest nominee ever for best actress.   It was the best performance of the 1970's, probably no one but Adjani could have conveyed such inner emotional violence.  It is that extremely rare visual performance that does not need subtitles or even sound.As Roger Ebert noted:  "Truffaut finds a certain nobility in Adele. He quotes one of the passages in her diaries twice: She writes that she will walk across the ocean to be with her lover. He sees this, not as a declaration of love, but as a statement of a single-mindedness so total that a kind of grandeur creeps into it. Adele was mad, yes, probably - but she lived her life on such a vast and romantic scale that it's just as well Pinson never married her. He would have become a disappointment".Then again, what do I know? I'm only a child.</review_text>
It's a great human being, mr. Elvis Aaron Presley, and his talent is real in this funny movi</review_text>
Download takes awhile, but the picture quality was great, even full screen. It played all the way through. And, to boot, it's an excellent show</review_text>
Even though Gordon Lui is the main reason you're buying this film, the story isn't bad either. Excellent training sequences and even better fighting sequences. My only complaint was a dragged out jail scene which lasts about 15 minutes. But that scene is not enough to tarnish this film. This is a solid film</review_text>
Cult Classic ...this is a loners movie ..I think we have all had times in our lives when we felt like kowalski..thats what makes this movie so authentic...What ever happened to Barry Newman ..does anyone remember "Petrocelli" ..the TV series Barry newman played a Private Detective and he was Building his home Block by Block himself in the Nevada Desert?.</review_text>
I guess that is the point of this movie, but there is a little more to it.  Kowalski played by Barry Newman is a car runner that always delivers his cars.  On his drive there he gets chased by a bunch of cops but he drives a Dodge Challenger, so nobody will catch him.  His back story is explained in a few scenes of how he used to be a cop and a race car driver.  Everything in the movie is very interesting but the car chases are the thing that is going to hold your attention.  Well, also the naked woman riding the motorcycle, you have to like her too.The dvd gives us the uncut UK version and wow what a difference.  Also a commentary by the director was a real treat to listen to.</review_text>
I really love Bones.  It has everything: suspense, drama, humor, pretty people, fun storylines.  I have yet to miss an episode, and even into Season 2 this is probably my favorite.  It adds depth to all of the characters.  Also, the winter holidays are my favorite time of year.  I like holidays that are about what is good in the world.  Bones is about people standing for the good in humanity even though they explore the very worst every day.  I cry through half this episode, but in a completely good way.  Buy, watch it, love it.  But watch it with a friend if you don't want to cry alone.  So moving, great performances by the whole cast.  Emily Deschanel was powerful in this one, she brings real vulnerability to Brennan here.  David Boreanaz, as always the perfect sympathetic hero, loveably old-fashioned. Cute, funny moments.  Touching, poignant moments.  This really is the best of what is great about Bones</review_text>
John Cusack is a favorite in our house.  This movie has many funny scenes and quotable lines.  It is the old boy loses girl and tries to get girl back story, but with a new approach.  The supporting characters are very funny.  Great for a rainy day</review_text>
Another great Powell/Loy collaboration this time with Loy as an heiress who's suing a newspaper for $5M after they ran a story about her being a husband stealer - she's not.  Spencer Tracy runs the paper and with nowhere else to turn he hires Powell to romance Loy and prove that she is a husband stealer...problem is Powell ain't married, so he quickly marries Tracy's girlfriend (Jean Harlow).The second problem is Loy is extremely smart and cautious, so Powell has to get his foot in the door via her father who's obsessed with trout fishing.  Powell fakes being an expert trout fisherman with hilarious but successful results.Once he gets to Loy he falls madly in love with her and on top of that Harlow falls in love with Powell!Great fun, but unfortunately the picture on this DVD isn't the best and the lack of extras in insulting</review_text>
It was pretty damn funny!This movie was recommended by my good friend, Bobby Asslong.  In most cases his recommendations are a bunch of [...], but he hit it right on, with this one!  I detest Tom Green.  He is one of those guys, who that when he fails at something (Talk Show, most of his movies, life) I actually feel happy.  And this is actually contrary to my normal personality.  I normally automatically love all Canadians.  Just kidding. I normally want people to succeed, and feel bad when they fail.But Tom Green is so annoying.Great news!  He is in only about 4 or 5 scenes in this whole movie, so you should be able to get through this movie, with little to none hatred for Mr. Green.I love all the characters in this movie, especially the main protagonist, who accidentally sends the videotape to his girlfriend at a far away college.  He is very likeable, and you're pulling for him the whole time.  Another thing I like this movie, is that it pulls a lot from other "gross out" teen and college flicks, but it doesn't go overboard in the gross out department.Tom Green plays the Voice Over explainer in the movie, and he actually does a pretty good job, without appearing stupid.I give this high reviews!MC White said:  Check it out!!</review_text>
Lisa Rinna and Gail O'Grady become best friends..not realizing that they share the same man!  Both women perform very well in this movie...I have been a big fan of both of them since Melrose Place and NYPD Blue.  Sally Kirkland also does a great job in this movie as Gail O'Grady's mother.  This movie is filled with so many different ingredients: intrigue, lessons on overcoming fears, and it helps one become stronger in believing inside what can truly make your life happy.  I've seen it a few times, and enjoy it more each time</review_text>
I have seen this movie many times while growing up.  Its definately a different approach to Science Fiction, but not too bad.  Basically, you get to see how mortal enemies can work out their differences, and work together.  A movie with a message</review_text>
Nobody is safe from satire, not even Alfred Hitchcock. But Mel Brooks straddles the line between parody and affectionate homage in "High Anxiety," a hysterical psychiatric comedy that deftly references all sorts of Hitch films -- while keeping in Brooks' trademark slapstick, hilarious dialogue, and weird characters.Dr. Richard Thorndyke (Brooks) has just been hired as the director of Psychoneurotic Institute for the Very, VERY Nervous, after the sudden death of the previous administrator. Something odd seems to be going on -- screams are heard, a patient signals Thorndyke with a mirror, and Dr. Charles Montague (Harvey Korman) frightens a patient into fits. Then one of the doctors dies mysteriously, while trying to leave the conspiracy.And when Thorndyke is lecturing at a psychiatry convention, the evil Nurse Diesel (Cloris Leachman) sends a hired killer (wearing a Thorndyke mask) to frame the doctor for murder. Now Thorndyke must elude the police and the killer, clear his name with the help of a mysterious blonde heiress (Madeleine Kahn), and overcome his crippling "high anxiety."As a homage/spoof, this is gold. Brooks deftly weaves together elements and storylines from various Hitchock movies, including "Vertigo" and "Spellbound," with some nods to "Psycho," "North By Northwest" and "The Birds." There's dizzying looks down a wooden tower, newspaper "stabbings" in the shower, and Madeleine Kahn's strange not-so-icy blonde.But it's also a great movie in its own right. Rather than outright slapstick as in some of his movies, Brooks instead crafts a clever thriller framed with delicious comedy -- he even makes fun of some standard filmmaking devices. For example, Thorndyke's hotel suite is switched for a top-floor room because of a call from... "a Mr. McGuffin."And he fills it with hysterical comedic situations, like Victoria mistaking the sounds of a life-or-death struggle for a phone sex pervert, or Thornduke being assaulted by a crazed bellboy. And his dialogue is solidly quotable in this one ("Those who are tardy do not get fruit cup"). The highlight has to be murder-by-bad-pop song, where a man is trapped in a car with the unspeakably bad "If You Love Me Tell Me Loud Loud Loud."Gene Wilder wasn't available when this was made, so Brooks took the lead himself. The seriousness of the character doesn't entirely fit him, but he's a solid enough Thorndyke, especially when he has to give a G-rated speech about penis envy.Most of the comedy comes from an unfortunately blonde Madeleine Kahn as the chic love interest, as well as a ghoulish Leachman and S&M enthusiastic Korman ("Too much bondage, too much bondage, not enough discipline!"). And Ron Carey and Howard Morris round the cast off, as the photographically obsessed chauffeur and the stereotypical little German shrink."High Anxiety" is an affectionate parody/homage to Hitchcock -- even Hitchcock was pleased by it -- but it's also a solid comedy movie. Definitely worth seeing!(Stalking, R-Hag?</review_text>
A comedy with a bitter sweet edge, "The Purple Rose of Cario" has a fairly simple premise. Cecilia (Mia Farrow) struggles to make ends meet during the Great Depression. Her husband Monk (Danny Aiello)is a lout who cheats on her and gambles since losing his job and Cecilia has to work in a restaurant and take in laundry to meet their bills and rent. The only escape that Cecilia has is going to the movies--the fantasy world of Hollywood gives her a coccoon from the brutal real world. Her favorite movie "The Purple Rose of Cario" featuring Gil Shepard (Jeff Daniels) as Tom Baxter (also Jeff Daniels in a dual role)changes her life when the character Tom Baxter walks out of the movie into the real world. He says he's in love with her and wants her to be happy something no one else except Cecilia's sister cares about. The rest of the characters in the film (Edward Herrman,Milo O'Shea, Deboarh Rush, Zoe Caldwell, John Wood, Van Johnson)are pretty upset and end up sparing with the audience watching them on screen when they complain how boring the movie is."Purple Rose" is one of Allen's most complete films and captures all the wistfulness that lurks in the background of his films. This DVD looks extremely good considering that the transfer is from 2001. There's some minor artifacting particularly when characters move quickly on screen but, on the whole, it's not a big deal. Allen hasn't done commentary tracks are allowed extras on his releases which is too bad as there's cut footage of Viggo Mortensen and Michael Keaton (who was originally cast in the lead instead of Daniels)that would be of interest. I don't know if that footage still exists but if it did it would make a lovely addition to this. Why MGM didn't choose to include archieved footage of Allen talking about the film and new interviews with the stars is beyond me. This Oscar nominated (for Best Screenplay)film certainly deserves a documentary on its making or, at the very least, a featurette. We do get the original theatrical trailer and a booklet that discusses the making of the film.A great movie that will hopefully get better treatment when it ends up on the Blu-Ray format, "Purple Rose" is still a treat and well worth picking up. It's also priced well at $12-14 at most retail outlets and at amazon.com</review_text>
Kevin Spacey. I'll write it again. Kevin Spacey. Whether he's playing Keiser Soze, a pyschopath in Seven, or an alien in K-PAX, any film he touches seems to sizzle. Swimming With Sharks is no exception; in fact, we get to see Kevin in a role that resembles the one he portrayed in Glengary Glen Ross, only magnified thirty of forty levels on the pompousity chart.Frank Whaley plays his underling in the corporate world. You might remember him as the victim of Samuel L. Jacksons rant in Pulp Fiction right before he gets his head blown off or as the young kid from Field of Dreams - playing a young Burt Lancaster. Well, as goofy as it might sound, Whaley does a WONDERFUL job in Swimming With Sharks. You emphathize with his character, even when he turns from naive victim to unflinching nut-case at the end.As for premise, Kevin Spacey plays a corporate boss who is showing his yes man, played by Whaley, the tricks to moving ahead. In the mean time, however, he does everything he can to make his employee's life a living hell, thus driving the young worker into......The last segment of this film is the most amazing. I loved the twist. Many, I imagine, will not. The film quickly moves from humor to dark drama in a matter of minutes, and the twist may upset many, especially Spacey's delivery in the last clutch scenes.This movie is basically the director's rant and rave come to full life. It's based on his own experience in the corporate world and be warned, untold buckets of foul language await you, so be ready.</review_text>
I can not believe that Helen Gurley Brown would let them make this farce based on her book. Now let see if we can straiten the out before it gets confused.Sylvia and Frank Broderick (Lauren Bacall and Henry Fonda) are a couple in live that are always bickering as to if Frank has a roving eye.Helen Gurley Brown (Natalie Wood) writes her famous book.Bob Weston working for an unscrupulous magazine is tasked with getting the good on Helen. He uses Frank's and Sylvia's problems pretending he is frank to accomplish the mission.Throw in another physiologist a few women some tickets to Figgie and Florida. A lot of misconceptions and one of the best carmaker cycle, ice cream truck, cab, and etc. scenes ever made.Will it all work out in the end?Will it ever end?They try real hard to make it campy and use intentionally exaggerated acting. For some reason it works.</review_text>
Fall in love with Nestor the sweet little loveable long eared donkey and his friend Telly the cherub.  This is a wonderful heart-warming story of a &quot;ugly-duckling&quot; sort, the story of a little donkey with a heart of gold, but big long ears.  He becomes a huge hero by carrying Mary to Bethlehem safely.  tells story of the first Christmas.  this one will make you cry, but it has a happy ending.  It is a true must have Christmas classic</review_text>
This movie gave me constipation that the Gods have never seen!  Not to  mention uncontrolable vomiting. When I was a young Russian Jewish boy ,  before I moved to my navite Japan, I had a pet lizard named Ruby. I loved  to pet his long hairy back while I fed him seaweed and chives. He always  loved cilantro (on the side).  Have I ever told you about my uncle Clair?  He was 5'6&quot; and 423 Lbs. and wore a 48 DDD bro(TM). Oops! I droped my  match! I have to go. My parrot is on fire</review_text>
If you like the typical teenage comedy, then you should give this movie a try. It does fall for some of the routine story lines that are in every movie like this, but it is still a funny movie. The best part is probably when they visit Tom Green's grandparents. I never can get over the dog that talks, lol. Overall, like I said, if you like teen comedies then you will like this movie. Avoid it if you don'</review_text>
If you love Whoopi Goldberg and I do, you will love this movie</review_text>
I don't own any other superman movies but this one and it was a really good movie even though it was short.Some of the parts were funny with joker in it and some were with action were superman fights batman and that part was my favorite and the voice of superman which was voiced by Tim Daly and superman's voice was okay.This movie was the best that I rented it a few times and decided to get this movie on DVD and recently I found this at eb games for [..] and it was the last copy they were selling,oh and here is my favorite line,''It's over,Joker''.That line was a good line and I never heard joker call superman ''supie'' and that name just made me laugh,but still this was a good movie and the charcters of this movie were not so bad after all and this movie is highly recommended to any superman/batman fan</review_text>
This was never meant to win an Academy award. It's simply a fun, classic country filled ho-down film with the intent to showcase some of the better country artists of the sixties. The acting is below average, and I wouldn't want it any other way. That's the charm with these two "Hillbilly" films starring Ferlin Husky. It's nostalgia at it's best, and you can bet the farm-fence that I'll be watching this many times again. Forget the Mamie,and Jayne talk; they were a bonus to this classic clunker. They were never meant to steal the show. Pick up "Hillbillys in a Haunted House" too. That one will do a number on you that you're not likely to forget anytime soon</review_text>
Talk to her is an unforgettable masterpiece about two female coma-patients and the men who nurse them. Provocative and colorful, Almodovar's film keeps the audience on the jump with stupefying plot-turns and as usual he makes short work of  small-minded moral ideas. His piety is seasoned with humor, the entire film a tightrope-act on the border of good taste - but afterwards you will say to yourself: thank God that I have seen it!One of the patients is Lydia, a proud lady-matador and a diva after Almodovar's heart. She spends her life reckless on the passing-lane and celebrates her own image. But life outside the arena exceeds her orbit and her prominent lover drops her. Talk-show host Marco takes her by storm when he kills a snake in her kitchen ("I respect other people's phobias"). Their passionate affair develops into an armament-race and soon the day comes when Lydia faces the bull that is her match. The fight was unfair from the start: the poor creature was stabbed in the neck before being chased out of its box. Marco feels guilty and flamenco-singers set up a wail. Her brain is dead, she has no thoughts, no feelings and the doctors tell Marco that, while there is no hope, miracles happen.Lydia's fellow-sufferer in the coma-ward is Alicia, a pretty young ballerina, four years ago the victim of a car accident. Her boyfriend Benigno looks after her since then. He sponges her down, dresses her, gives her eye-drops. He is her masseur, her physiotherapist and female viewers will resent this violation of their privacy. He cuts her hair so that she will feel no difference when she wakes up. And he speaks to her, mostly about ballet. He believes in miracles and treats Alicia as if she were alive, while Marco treats Lydia as if she were dead. He is afraid to touch her and takes his notebook to her room...Benigno is the film's secret star and one of Almodovar's most endearing heroes. He spent years of his life as subjugated nurse of an exploitive mother and is very much in touch with his feminine side. Others take an interest in his sexual orientation; he thinks it's beside the point. Irrelevant. And he displays unselfish devotion for the woman he loves.When Alicia's father - a psychiatrist - is concerned about Benigno's virginity he has the presence of mind to pretend that he prefers men. The good  doctor - who considers virginity as perversion (!) - is reassured and entrusts him with his daughter's care. And when Marco inquires: "What do you know about women?" Benigno replies: "Everything. I spent twenty years of my life with one, four years with another". Benigno was actually not Alicia's boyfriend, just her secret admirer, but he confesses: "the last four years have been the best of my life. I do everything that amuses her, except travel".Benigno's unshakable optimism irritates the others. Alicia's father restrains himself when he sees the boy's hand on his daughter's thigh, and Marco does not understand why Benigno considers his relationship with a brain-dead woman as mutual. But he sneaks into Alicia's room and wonders what she has that Lydia doesn't have...Marco gives up when he learns that Lydia deceived him with her ex who asserts his claim: "I want to spend more time with her". Marco replies:"Feel at home" and Benigno asks: "Did you separate?".Silent films were Alicia's other passion beside ballet and Benigno feels so much empathy that he dreams in black and white. The dream sequence is the film's most memorable scene and a cross between "the incredible shrinking man", Gustave Courbet's painting: "the origin of the world" and Alfred Kubin's drawing: "Death leap". An egoist shrinks, explores his girlfriend's body and returns to the place her came from...The film takes a highly sensitive turn when Benigno voices his intention to marry Alicia. Marco is shocked: "You can also talk to plants, but you don't marry them!". Benigno is placed in a bad light when the doctors find  out that Alicia is pregnant...The film's exquisite monstrosity lies not in Benigno's act but in Almodovar's conclusion: Coldness kills women, true love brings them back to life. Benigno's "act of love" lies somewhere between rape and necrophilia, and yet Almodovar does get away with it. Perhaps because he is willing to sacrifice his star, perhaps because he is so ingratiating. Women are convinced that he understands them, men are tempted into testing the unknown. He gives the audience suspense and the critics art. He is the favorite..</review_text>
Lucas is one of Corey Haim's 80s greatest movies ,I have The DVD,You too gotta Go get it. :)</review_text>
I've never seen the original Time Machine versions before, but I absolutely loved this movie. I am of course a big fan of special effects, but the story is fascinating! I've watched the movie several times, and every single time I'm blown away. The story line is inspirational and imaginative and knows no bounds. You'll continue to wonder where the story will end up. If you love science fiction and have a fascination for time travel, then add this movie to your collection!</review_text>
How many times have I seen this movie?  Somewhere between 25-50 viewings, with an additional "who knows how many" occurrences wherein I starting watching this movie with the explicit intent of falling asleep to it's indie soundtrack.I was turned on to this movie in the very same way I have discovered most of my favorite films.  It's late night, I'm flipping channels, or to be completely honest, I was browsing the DirecTV guide.  Most people, including me, still say flipping channels, like we actually take the time to go through all the channels, but we all know damn well that we just cruise through the guide to find something to watch.  I guess I'll have to start saying "scrolling the guide" instead.  Anyway, I'm getting sidetracked and I apologize.Like I said, I was "scrolling" through the guide looking for something comfortable and familiar that wouldn't challenge me too much, and I failed.  I had to use that damn "info" button when I saw the title, "Tao Of Steve", so I guess I let my curiosity get the best of me.  Thank Science it did.As is my custom, I normally catch these late night gems at some point in the middle of the movie, and I spend the rest of the movie struggling with the decision to either finish what is shaping up to be a great movie that I missed the beginning of, or jot down the title and catch it from the start the next time it comes on.  I decided to watch the rest of it, and then just buy a copy on DVD.  Does that tell you how engaging and entertaining this movie is?First off, I have a lot of respect for Donal Logue as an actor.  He's done a wide variety of roles in several different kinds of media vehicles, from TV to blockbuster movies, and of course, the classic Jimmie the cab driver shorts on MTV.  He was spot on in this role, he has that charisma and confidence to be able to convince you he has what it takes to bed down with any human being sporting an XX chromosomal set, unless they are wearing Doc Marten's and a flannel shirt.  What can I say, he's a funny actor, and I suppose he's a fave of mine, because I have liked him even in the bad stuff he's been a part of in the past.Supporting cast was full of friends and local actors from the NM area, and while there aren't any household names in the bunch, they more than hold their own in delivering believable characters who are just what they are supposed to be, regular Joes and Janes.  I have already mentioned that the soundtrack was indie, and while I am not an authority on indie music, I can recognize it.  I can't say whether it was great, good, or bad, but I liked it.  I also liked that the band featured live in the reunion scene was from Oklahoma, my home state.The most striking thing about this movie for me was it's beautiful photography and wonderful selection of locations.  Although it was been a while since I watched the commentary, I am fairly certain it was filmed entirely in the Taos, New Mexico area, or maybe it was Albuquerque.  If you've never been to NM, then GO now, it is awesomely beautiful and full of tons of stuff to do.  It definitely scores some cultural points with me, as I am a big fan of the American West.  The colors of the landscape truly come through the lens with full strength, and I just love the way this movie looks.  I can't help but feel that the physical environment is an important ingredient in the "Tao of Steve", which is a real thing conjured up by a real man.  In fact, the house where Dex lives is the actual house of the real life person who Dex is based upon.  He makes a cameo during one of the poker scenes, and on the commentary he provides some interesting insight into the movie, the character Dex, and of course the "Tao of Steve".The plot is actually the only weak part of the movie, as a story, it's predictable, but I think that's okay because I found it more interesting to delve into unanswerable questions concerning the characters, and of course, as a hopelessly single young man who has never been able to get the ladies, I spent much time asking myself, "will this really work in real life, .....my life?"  Well, according to Duncan North, the aforementioned inspiration for Dex, it does work, and he's living proof.  So stop listening to Professor Tom Leykis you bitter bastard, and start watching the, "Tao of Steve".  It has all the lessons you need.THEKEETH, (who is shockingly, still unsuccessful with the ladies)</review_text>
My son, being a hugh soccer fan liked it a lot. I liked the "longest yard" story line</review_text>
This is a beautiful movie, but please have no misconceptions about what you're getting into.  It is not a traditional love story.  It does not have a happy ending. You are taken on an incredible journey, and grow to love these innocent people, who burn with passion--  then you see terrible, undeserved things happen to them.But it is still a wonderful achievement in the arts of filmmaking and film acting.  It is a story about the human costs of founding a nation, among many other thought-provoking things.  It was shamefully overlooked in 1998, and I do not understand why it has not been released on DVD.  I appeal to Fox Searchlight, please DVD this soon.</review_text>
This was the best series on television in the late 1980's.  My sister and I never missed an episode.  Yet it still isn't on DVD.  I can buy "I Love Lucy" and "Dawson's Creek," but I can't have all three seasons of my beloved Vincent and his velvet-over-gravel voice.  What the heck gives?  Please put this out on DVD!!</review_text>
Along with the &quot;Ultimate Jordan&quot; DVD, this is a must buy for all Jordan fans.  While the Ultimate Jordan set has all of his earlier hits; Come Fly With Me, Above and Beyond, etc., this DVD packs in the accolades of his final year as a Chicago Bull.  There are more interviews and more candid insights with Jordan compared with his earlier videos.  The sound and video quality are top notch as well</review_text>
I have seen many historical war dramas from Far East (mainly China's) and most of them are not only historically inaccurate but have a strong bias toward the enemy.Yi Soon Shin, however, is a rare exception.  Not only is the drama very historically accurate but it is also very comprehensive in detailing the meticulous battle planning of the admiral that leads to each victory but also the political in-fighting between the Chosun political factions (and the second-guessing nature of the king) which causes his eventual death.Also, the special effects are great.  The battle scenes (whether on sea or land) are realisitic and of outstanding quality.The only problem that I can find is that the DVD has not placed sufficient focus on the contribution of the Ming China.  Then again, this is not unexpected since this is a Korean drama focusing on the great admiral.Also, the entire selection should have 104 episodes.  I don't know why it stops at 101.If you want to have a more comprehensive knowledge on the subject, try Samuel Hawley's Imjin War (which portrays Yi Soon Shin more accurately by quoting original sources).Any who is only intered in the fighting may also want to check out Stephen Turnbull's Samurai Invasion (which has more colorful maps and detailed description of battles from the Japanese perspective).Lastly, anyone who is a fan of samurai warfare may want to check out Shogun:Total War by Creative Assembly (now in Gold version).</review_text>
best series out there on any sci-fi show, makes you think and imagine the worlds out there in the universe.  this is a good after thought of star trek</review_text>
I have seen many historical war dramas from Far East (mainly China's) and most of them are not only historically inaccurate but have a strong bias toward the enemy.Yi Soon Shin, however, is a rare exception.  Not only is the drama very historically accurate but it is also very comprehensive in detailing the meticulous battle planning of the admiral that leads to each victory but also the political in-fighting between the Chosun political factions (and the second-guessing nature of the king) which causes his eventual death.Also, the special effects are great.  The battle scenes (whether on sea or land) are realisitic and of outstanding quality.The only problem that I can find is that the DVD has not placed sufficient focus on the contribution of the Ming China.  Then again, this is not unexpected since this is a Korean drama focusing on the great admiral.Also, the entire selection should have 104 episodes.  I don't know why it stops at 101.If you want to have a more comprehensive knowledge on the subject, try Samuel Hawley's Imjin War (which portrays Yi Soon Shin more accurately by quoting original sources).Any who is only intered in the fighting may also want to check out Stephen Turnbull's Samurai Invasion (which has more colorful maps and detailed description of battles from the Japanese perspective).Lastly, anyone who is a fan of samurai warfare may want to check out Shogun:Total War by Creative Assembly (now in Gold version).</review_text>
Based on Bram Stoker's Dracula and Murnau's movie, the film is extremely beautiful and the sequence  of the woman crossing the square where they celebrate a final feast is impressive</review_text>
Nice little video for my Zen during my long wait at the doctor's office.  Confucius overcame many difficulties</review_text>
Barry Levinson's Diner is a rich panoramic snapshot of a time, people and place that's treasured by those of us who lived through that period and had paralell experiences. He's a master of his craft and so are all that contributed to this work</review_text>
Since the storylines of this fourteen-year-old film must surely be well-known, let me say that The Piano, one of my favorite movies, is a unique production whose makers went out of their way to truly give it the appearance of the mid-nineteenth-century. It strolls forward with an anti-modern slowness in order to accentuate the unspoiled scenery of New Zealand, and successfully bring certain moments to prominence with a pace that matches that of the pre-electronic era in which it is set. The quality of the visuals is heightened by the performances given by Holly Hunter, Sam Neill, Harvey Keitel, and most especially Anna Paquin, whose skillful portrayal here won her an Oscar at the tender age of eleven. The plot of The Piano is highly unusual, even unique. For filmmakers to have accomplished the release of a tale concerning a woman of the 1800's, who went from Scotland to the most remote of British colonies in order to marry a stranger, for this woman to be one whose self-imposed muteness is compensated by her lovely playing of a piano...I'm daunted by the courage of those who brought The Piano into reality. For the wealth of feeling in its story, for its setting, for its cast and for its sheer brave inimitability, it is a fine motion picture</review_text>
The environment of this movie was so unusual for me, since I know virtually nothing of the Maiori culture, I was enthralled with this movie</review_text>
Doris Day is my all time favoriteactress.Her wonderful dancing, her beautiful voice, and her spectacular acting talent!This movie is about Melinda Howard (Day) she is coming over on a boat to New York to suprise  her mother who is supposed to be famous on broadway and who she hasn't seen in years. On the boat, she meets Tom Farnam who starts playing up the minute he sees her. But she gives him the brush off.So, she forgets about him, and arrives in New York.However when she comes to the fancy house that her mother puts on all her letters, she is suprised to find a strange man (Cuddles) and his wife living there. And the butler sure is suprised when she comes bursting in asking for her mother!But suddenly, the butler (Billy Dewolfe), realizes who the girl is. Because you see, the butler Lefty, is a friend of her mother, who WAS famous on broadway,but really, now, is tough on luck, and sings at a bar! Both her and Lefty, have done everythong in there power to keep this news from Melinda, and our doing a swell job of it.They merely tell her that she has rented the house, and is on tour. Which she believes.So, she decides to wait. After all, she says, I haven't saved up all this money to come to just leave!So she waits.And who enters the picture again? Tom Farnam (Gene Nelson).And soon he and Day fall in love.But not without troubles, which I will not spoil for you!This movie includes wonderful dance sequences by Day and Nelson.Also splendid songs. Overall, this is a wonderful movie, and I recommend it highly!</review_text>
I don't have television, haven't for 11 years. When I learned CBS was allowing free viewing over the internet I checked it out and started watching episodes of CSI, CSI NY, CSI Miami, and NCIS. I found NCIS to be my favorite and this particular show Dead And Unburied is my favorite so far. I enjoy the light-heartedness of NCIS. So I decided to download this episode from Amazon Unbox.I really wish Amazon Unbox would allow me to burn shows I've purchased. As it is they are restricted to viewing on my computer. When Unbox expands this service to allow me to burn DVDs I will likely purchase many more shows this way. I like selecting individual shows</review_text>
great and fast to deal with will do buisness in the futur</review_text>
Good news Mike Leigh fans, this movie is now scheduled to be released on DVD on September 6, 2005 according to Amazon!!The movie is an excellent one.  Sometimes (unjustly) considered one of Leigh's lesser works it functions both as comedy and drama as it looks at the reunion of two friends from college several years after they have graduated and have been trying to find their niche in the world.  Told in a series of flashbacks and in present time it shows how he characters have grown over time while many of their vulnerabilities remain.A must for any and all Mike Leigh fans</review_text>
I thought that Supernatural would just be another Sci-Fi thriller, but then I started watching it and was surprised to discover that there is real plot line and character development. I think this show is wonderful and would recommend it to everyone</review_text>
Ever since the "colorizing" debate of a generation ago, this question has been asked over and over again.And we've finally settled it, I hope.  This DVD gives the viewer options of seeing it in the way it was originally released OR with the ending created by its maker.Like everybody else, I'd only seen the "chopped" version, labelled by some here as "surreal."  Well, there were plenty of other "surreal" elements throughout the original, most epsecially the surreal premise that Ralph Meeker was an actor.However, I would urge even the purists among you to take a very, very close look at the "intended" ending.  It adds so much to what came before, and helps us understand the childlike attitudes we had towards this weaponry we'd just been the first to use in the name of world peace.  This new era was far from innicent, but we were like children with the power we had.A great film, now made even better for history</review_text>
I saw this documentary in a theater when it was first released in the 1970's. 30 years later, many of the images remained etched in my mind. I was shocked to see the living conditions of the miners and their families. I was moved by their stories of struggle and perseverance. We often forget that coal miners risk their lives every day so that we can stay warm and have light in our homes. Regardless of how you feel about unions, this movie will make an impression on you. Highly recommended</review_text>
We were amazed that this film wasn't an award winner.  It is an excellent film, and you might even see some style similarities between Howard Roark and Frank Lloyd Wright.</review_text>
this movie is so good i can't even find it anywhere. if you come across a copy of this buy it. it is reminissant of american history x, or slc punk in the fact that it is mostly about teen-aged boys comming of age. while the first two movies were aimed at a pirticualy sceen, this will hit home for the rest of us. drugs are bad!! :</review_text>
PROM NIGHT is a disco-classic slasher frenzy that will make you watch it over and ove</review_text>
the first time i saw the film was when i saw it in the sale in virgin mega stores.so i picked it up and  put it on straight away a soon as i got home and i was totally amazed with Crawfords wonderful performance and also was amazed with Hustons performance too.in RAIN Crawford plays a prostertute called sadie tompson , who has ran away form her old life in  san francisco.but as soon as she arrives at this hotel at pongo pongo she already gets into trouble as soon as she  enters the hotel by this preachers wife .but later she has a run in with the preacher (huston). which isn't  good for her . huston  hypnotises her with prayers and it makes her want to go to san francisco.but huston in the ends slashes his throat and sadie turns back to normal.its one of the best films crawford has ever made</review_text>
This Picture hit the theaters back in 1975 when a series of disaster films were made. Steve McQueen plays the role of Fire Chief Michael O'Hallorhan, Paul Newman plays the role of Doug Roberts and William Holden plays the role of James Duncan. Roberts is the architect that built the 138 story skyscraper in the heart of the Golden Gate City San Francisco. So James Duncan the owner of the building decides to throw a party inviting over 300 guest to celebrate it's opening. Things start to go wrong when a **** starts in a hall closet. Roberts gets more concern when he fines out that Duncan son in law Roger Simmons has cut cost by putting cheaper wire. Now it becomes Fire Chief Michael O'Hallorham to get the 300 guest out quickly without anyone getting hurt</review_text>
The newly released double disc edition of "The Towering Inferno", with its enhanced picture and sound, not to mention the additional poignancy of its parallels to 9/11, cements its place in Hollywood history as perhaps the greatest fictional disaster film ever</review_text>
this is the story of two navy lifers who are given an assignment of transporting an 18-year old,for a petty theft,to prison.one of the lifers feels pity for the kid and decides to show him a good time before he has to serve his 8-year sentence.the prisoner it turns out has not experienced much and the 2 show him what he's missed all within a 5-day period.jack nicholson puts in yet another great performance,while otis young and randy quaid put in credible performances.other people make appearances like carol kane as a prostitute and look for a gilda radner before her saturday night live days,in a brief apperance.this is a very good film but i wouldn't say it were great,for no particular reason other than it not being that interesting of a story nor a film that i would want to watch over and over again.it definitely is worth seeing though,at least for nicholson fans</review_text>
Totally psychotic Wedding Dress designer kills his models to 'find himself', but his horrible wife has her own willpower to wield. Bava's direction parallels the edge of John's insatiable drive to Kill, an assaultive film experience. Low budget. Horrible sound, so play it loud! (6/7</review_text>
Not being a fan of Westerns, I figured I would watch ten minutes of this movie and move on.  The opening scene completely sucked me in, though, and the movie took off from there.  The movie opens with Eastwood being lynched by a band of nine men who incorrectly believed he had stolen their friend's cattle.  Eastwood is left to die, only rescued by a marshal who takes him to jail, where his story is verified by the judge, and Eastwood gets a job as a marshal.  His intention, of course, is to bring the nine men tried to take his life to justice.  The action in the movie consists of Eastwood kicking some major lawbreaker butt, all while looking ruggedly handsome with a trademark glare.The movie even manages to touch on moral issues, when Eastwood wants clemency for an outlaw who helped him out, but is denied by the judge.  The judge himself grapples with issues of having the ultimate power of law over the territory, not knowing the "right" action, and wishing for statehood so that he wouldn't have the power of God over criminals.The low point of the movie was Eastwood's romance with a beautiful, emotionally scarred blonde woman.  There is a painfully slow picnic and lovemaking scene, which drags on while the audience wants Eastwood to get back to his mission of rounding up outlaws.  Other than that, the movie is excellent.</review_text>
This episode embodies why I love this series. The bad guy is bad - and makes appearances throughout the series.And now, this episode offers some more understanding of the Wraith species and actually BEGS you to learn more of what initially seemed to be a barbaric bunch to kill at all costs.Now you really don't know what to think...except that today is a day of honor.I won't blow it for you. Watch this one FIRST if you're not sure about which episode to sample...and savor what makes this series a landmark in sci-fi adventures.</review_text>
I absolutely love Atlantis. From Ronon Dex, to Sheppard, and to all the faces. I'd cry if Atlantis was cancelled. Seriously though, Steve should have never have died, he should also have been put in command of SG1. Can you imagine that..."Why Steve, welcome to Earth...you're welcome to live out your life, if you only feed in self defense on enemies...'kay? Oh, you're also in charge of Sg1. :P" But seriously, the Wraith make this show so awesome. From Steve to Bob to Edward, to Gordon and Alexander, to Michael and Eric (by far James's best performance yet).The Wraith make this show what it is. But one thing??? Why don't we have Before I Sleep? Seriously, you have no idea how irked I am at that, since I began watching in S.2.12.Anyways, I think Atlantis totally pwns SG1</review_text>
The night of the twisters is a very good movie, even for all ages. My mom and dad liked it, my kids liked it and, my wife and I liked it. It has many turns and twists, and is unperdictable like a tornado. This movie has plenty of suspence and has tons of action. This was a remarkable movie and that's why I give it 5 stars</review_text>
After slogging through a number of these reviews it is clear that most cannot see that we Twenty-First Century Americans were not the intended audience for this movie. The movie was intended to be a unifying morale-builder for the National Socialist Party in Germany, which had been in power only about a year when this movie was made.From its loss of World War I until the NSDAP was elected to power in Germany in 1934, the people had suffered every kind of internecine mob warfare, illegal abuse and theft of whole portions of Germany at the hands of the French, and an economic catastrophe that made our American Depression look like a picnic by comparison.This movie sought to persuade Germans (GERMANS!) that this dreadful misery was finally over and that the criminal Bolshevik traitors responsible for Germany's defeat in World War I, and all the residual woes, would be defeated once and for all. It must have been a most welcome message because as you watch the film you certainly don't get the impression that anyone had to beg the many thousands of Germans who attended the NSDAP rallies to stand up and cheer their hearts out.If you speak and understand German, you'll have a much greater likelihood of being able to understand the impact of these rallies, and this film that celebrates them. For many who are not conversant in the German language or who know little about the actual history of the time besides what they were exposed to in American World War II films, the film is actually pretty boring after a while.You sit there and watch one group of soldiers, police, or workers after another, marching and marching and marching. This is interspersed with speeches by Hitler and the other Party officals. From time to time you'll see interesting-looking people doing everyday things, some in costume, but mostly they're just talking, walking, eating, brushing their teeth, and so on. Be advised -- for those of you who expect the whole thing to be a stirring, gigantic SS parade with weapons bristling, be prepared to be disappointed. The last group of soldiers on parade are indeed the SS Leibstandarte Adolph Hitler, and they're marching to what was reputedly Hitler's favorite piece -- "Der Badenweiler". Remember to notice that they aren't even carrying rifles or bayonets....Lastly, in my opinon, the commentary by "historian" Dr Anthony Santoro is mostly just another sarcastic, demeaning rant against the people in the film, so typical of those who pronounce judgement on the vanquished after every war.  The marching soliders and other Germans who reverberated such thrills of hope for their poor, beleagured country are all long dead, but Santoro must make fun of them for the amusement (?) of the American audience. Try to remember -- this movie was not made for YOU!</review_text>
There are buttered-up popcorn movies that entertain you, score a ticket to "Jurassic Park" and Spielberg for that, and there are films with gravitas, that move you, disturb you, drag you to the altar kicking and screaming, to consider circumstances you might not brave yourself.."Badlands," Terrence Malick's 1973 directorial debut, an overlooked jewel of a film, forcibly moves you, and takes an unsavory subject, the Charles Starkweather serial killings' crime spree, up in the vacated Badlands of South Dakota, and refines it til you posit, "How did we get here as a country? What went wrong?"..And then you appraise the challenges a film-maker overcomes to project the psychopathic wrath of two teenagers (Martin Sheen as Kit Carruthers, Sissy Spacek as Holly Sargis) on a thrill-killing "honeymoon", onto the silver screen and make it empathetic, palatable..Why would anyone care in the first place about two low-life, lost highway delinquents, who shoot a parent, assume they can get away consequence-free, and move on with their careless lives like nothing more infractious than cutting an afternoon civics class has occurred?..However, "Badlands" is rooted in unfortunate fact, these inexplicable events happened to a pedestrian populace in North America, and Malick lets you tag along in this teenage angst riddled odyssey, deeper and deadlier into an American wasteland..The film is palpable evil genuis, arguably a top ten American film classic, irrespective it was shot by a first time director, with an unknown cast.."Badlands" resonates with gritty authenticity, cinematic style, fierce inhumanity, and the most haunting musical score (Erik Satie's Gymnopedies 3) that underwrites a Sissy Spacek voice over narration, spoken in a lazy monotone like a detached schoolgirl explaining away her unexcused absence in the principal's office, when in fact Holly (Sissy Spacek) is the fractured other half of the Kit Carruthers' killing machine, a bossom buddy in crime..Some films are purposefully pure entertainment, escapist faire.."Badlands" on the other hand is rare art, belongs in a museum</review_text>
Kit and Holly are presented in this story by Terrence Malick as total innocents, living in a  prelapsarian state, completely unaware of right and wrong, good and evil, and ignorant of guilt or sin. They have minimal conception of the consequences of their actions; in effect, they appear almost totally to lack imagination or foresight, and can barely empathise with each other, let alone other people. Things just happen, as Holly sees it. Kit doesn't feel hostility to the people he kills: they are merely in his way. There is no remorse. He is only marginally conscious that the structured world outside his own will eventually catch up with him. These  kids are like Adam and Eve, with a limited knowledge of what is forbidden, but no real knowledge of the meaning of life and death. Holly throws out her sick catfish, showing no feeling. Her dog is shot as a punishment by her father, indicating he, too, is careless of death or pain. Kit stands on a dead cow, as though puzzled by its absence of life. Neither of the two seems to cry or laugh much.  In one way these characters might also be thought of as throwbacks to a prehistoric, animalistic past,  where the younger man simply eliminates the older, in order to secure a mate for himself. Just the way of nature, and beyond criticism.  Apparently, so I've read somewhere, this is the mindset of the criminal, who cannot see what he is doing wrong. He has to get by, somehow, and takes the easiest path. Why work, when you can steal?  If obstacles arise, eliminate them. People are OK, otherwise. Live now, die later. This is an extraordinary film, superbly acted</review_text>
Loved this DVD because it's useful on so many levels for my Spanish class.  Can use it for cultural discussions of music, social issues, history of Cuba, current policies toward Cuba, etc.  Most expecially, kids like music and the life stories of the musicians are quite moving.  Also, for the beginning student, many of the singers' dialogs are also not too hard for them to follow</review_text>
This movie is a highly enjoyable, somewhat erotic 70's era film that reflects Greek nightlife and lifestyles of adventurous, yet responsible young adults traveling abroad for a summer vacation. As Darryl Hannah's naked preview to "Splash", she can be found splashing around in clear blue Ionian waters with her boyfriend (played by handsome Peter Gallagher) and his new French, female lover who lives and works in Greece and becomes part of their existing relationship. (Yes, clearly liberal European values here, as all three of them also splash around in olive oil, champagne and the villa waterbed!)Beautiful scenery of the Greek Isles, local sights, and ruins, as well as examples of westernized post-hippie 70's culture of nightclubs and Greek social life. Romantic, dramatic, light-hearted and fun for most responsible young adults and older adults who just want to watch a culturally entertaining movie. There's even a surprise visit by the mother who comes to check up on her daughter during her own vacation to the Greek Isles, as she witnesses the residual existence of these strange, yet humorous behaviors.Cultural nuances and nudity; intense look at deep, yet adventurous relationships and positive ways to deal with deep feelings that rule many human sexual behaviors. Humor, adventure, beautiful scenery, romance, light drama, cultural intrigue... this movie has it all</review_text>
Firefly is a fantastic series.  My wife and I watched the DVD set from and found ourselves rationing the episodes towards the end, because we didn't want the series to be over.  Great cast, great plots, great music.  I really can't say enough about this series.  I have never enjoyed a season of any show more than I enjoyed Firefly, and everyone I've introduced to it has loved it as well</review_text>
This is the first episode where we really see the heart of Tony in his dealings with a teenager struggling with the horrible death of his father. A must see</review_text>
The best visual experience available...and the sound may still be the best part.  I've watched this over 20 times and still find elements new to me.  I have bought this as gifts and have recommended it to very many who want a high end visual show</review_text>
This movie is so stupid it is funny.  I saw it when it first came out and I still haven't forgotten it nor will I ever. This is what the writers of the Groove Tube, Saturday Night Live, and Second City Television are all about.  Watch this film and see a true comedy classic.  Individual skits like "Catholic High School Girls in Trouble" could have been made into a full length movie all to itself.  It was an era where one didn't have to be politically correct.  This is what comedy is all about.  Forget the garbage we see today.  Forget Martin Lawrence or Cedric the Entertainer.  See Kentucky Fried Movie and you will see what comedy is suppose to be or what it once was.  Oh, by the way, Stephen Bishop also has a cameo role in this film and he isn't singing "On and On"</review_text>
The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods</review_text>
This movie tugs at your heart strings in a completely honest way. The movie does not patronise or make pathetic the boy hero who has to endure. It is the very opposite of saccharine glop.It is a profoundly optimistic and yet realistic movie. The movie is peppered with memorable eccentric and kind characters.</review_text>
Sure the summary of the movie isn't eye catching to some, but its a movie that should be seen, damnit! I mean it. This is a story about a little boy named Ingemar whos relationship with his loving mother slowly falls apart due to her sickness.Ingemar is soon sent away to live with his uncle and aunt for the summer.This movie is charming and has a great cast of quirky charcters</review_text>
Okay, so we all know the story about how the Ducks come from behind to win and how Coach Bombay gets revenge on his old coach for many years of bad memories.Fair enough.As corny and as thin as the plot can be at times, it's still a great story with good morals.  It's definitely no Hoosiers or Rudy by a longshot, but it's Disney at it's best.  It's a classic Disney sports movie as well as a great family film.Now, the DVD.  Let's just say that I sure didn't buy this movie for the special features.  There's a menu screen with a chapter search and that's about it.Ohh, one more thing.  Whenever they re-released the film for DVD, I guess they must have inserted Queen's "We Are The Champions" and "We Will Rock You" into portions of the film and at the end credits.  One thing in particular that kinda bugged me is that fact that the original score by David Newman is replaced by Queen's "We Are The Champions" right at the part where Charlie scores the winning penalty shot.  It's not that Queen's song wouldn't be fitting here.  I just felt that the original score added a lot of emotion within the film.  Not a huge deal.  I just didn't remember that the last time I saw the movie on VHS.Ahh well.  I guess for $8 I really can't complain</review_text>
I think simply put, if you like Bob Dylan and just want to have fun with a movie, then you'll love it. The performances Bob gives are excellent, and it's great to see the ensemble of actors they lined up all together.If your not much of a Dylan fan, and like your movies high and mighty, better just pass it up..</review_text>
It's a beautifull movie. One of the bests to watch  with your girlfriend.Hghly recomended</review_text>
Scooby Doo rocks!  This was an awesome episode, and an awesome way to download some of the earlier episodes of Scooby.  Fun stuff, and an inexpensive download</review_text>
"The Spy Who Came In From The Cold" gets inside your veins like cold, bullying ice and by the end of the movie you feel numb.  Based on the famous novel by John Le Carre, director Martin Ritt seems determined to reveal the ugly reality of espionage (on both sides of the Iron Curtain) as it really was.Alec Leamas, the haunted British spy for the U.S. has nothing to do with James Bond.  Richard Burton gives such a phenomenal performance as this rancid, cranky, solitary alcoholic (he wasn't entirely acting) that one can't help but wonder why he didnt get the Oscar for Best Performance that year.  Leamas is, in his own words, "just a bloody man", tired of all the ideologies on both sides of the fence which lead to all the horrors and betrayals he has witnessed and been a full participant in.  His paradox is a painful one; rejecting "Karl Marx, God, and all the rest of it", he is also a man beginning to realize that his career in espionage is one of sheer immorality.Claire Bloom's Nan Perry is the catalyst for the tragic and unforgettable ending of the film.  A young woman Leamas meets while he works in a London library awaiting his next assignment from the charming and bone-chilling head of operations in Britan, George Smiley, she is also an avowed Communist.  When things come to a head and she is dragged into the brutal world Leamas inhabits, he tries desperately to communicate that she is only "a frustrated little girl from a crackpot library".But the most heinous betrayal here is Leamas' skillful befriending and cold use of real Communist Oskar Werner.  Leamas pretends to defect from the British Agency and stages a brawl with a grocer to increase his appearance of discontent.  Werner is the to whom he discloses fictitious "secrets" about American espionage, all the while having cynical and hilarious dialogues with him about the whole situation.At the end, with two victims of the dirty business he's involved himself in for some vague principle (protecting the "moronic masses"), Leamas cannot go on.  He is very much on the fence so to speak and ends up on the wrong one quite intentionally. A haunting, beautiful movie.</review_text>
The only reason I bought this movie, because it had Anitra Ford in it. Pam Grier plays the role of Blossom, Anitra Ford plays the role of Terry and Sid Haig plays the role of Djanglo. Terry is invite to go to a small tavern in town where Blossom is singing. While their Blossom and here thugs try to rob the place. Terry is taken hostage by Djanglo and thrown in a getaway car. When the local police catch up with the car Djanglo jumps over the bridge leaving Terry to fend for herself. Despite her innocents, Terry is sentence to life on a Government work farm known as the Big Bird Cage. When Blossom tries to take at the local politicians. She is also sentence to the work farm. There Blossom, Terry and Djanglo who's undercover as a Warden Guard get together one more time. How does one escape from the work farm? If you do escape, do you make out alive? I first saw Anitra Ford on the Price is Right Game Show as a model with those gorgeous long legs. As far as I'm concern Anitra does an excellent showing for herself. If you like Anitra Ford then you like this picture.</review_text>
I would have to say this was a brilliant movie. I was highly entertained from this Mr.Corman and Hill flick. Beautiful women getting roughed up, from the somewhat feminine guards. Pam Grier gets your full attention</review_text>
There are tons of women in prison films out there.  There are so many that often times they seem almost repetitive.  However, this film was very unique because it provided a great mix of comedy and action.  Pam Grier as  a tough revolutionary provided all the action as she ploted to free the  mistreated women from prison.  The comedy mostly came from the sexually  deprived women, who were full of one-liners and crazy notions.  But of  course the movie still contained all the things that make a good prison  explotation film....lots of nudity...violence...bad laguage and did I  mention lots of nudity. It's worth seeing!  If you like it also check out  THE BIG DOLL HOUSE</review_text>
Bird, is a film about the life of jazz great Charlie "the Bird" Parker. Forest Whitaker is doing a great job as Charlie Parker and the story is generally loyal to the real life, except one is lead to believe that "Chan" was his wife (in real life, she wasn't). One negative thing I felt was that the scenes were overly dark throughout the film. I think the director wanted to create an atmosphere of reality but in my opinion he overdid it to the point of annoyance. Another critisism is for a film about Charlie Parker, his talent on improvisation, his creativity could have been, and should have been emphasized more. There is a scene where he asks a friend to write a piece that he composed just that night and the friend wants to do it in the morning but by the next morning, Charlie doesn't even remember the piece, or even the conversation that took place. This is a good example but his creativity could have been emphasized with more examples like improvisation. In real life, Charlie Parker played the same piece of music differently almost every time, with some additions here and there, givin it a new mood, new angle, new taste. This could have been shown. However, despite these minor shortcomings, I think the film is a very good one. For Charlie Parker fans, I also strongly suggest the book "Bird Lives" by Ross Russell</review_text>
Having watched this DVD only once all i can say is it has lived up to the expectations i was expecting .The tour de force of Sondheims music is fun and the numbers are well executed.  The highlight for me was Carol Burnett and the hilarious performance of "Everyone needs a Maid" Only Carol could perform this number with a touch of mad humour.I do recommend this dvd  and I look forward to veiwing the disc again  on a cold wet night with a bottle of wine and a good fire going in the wood burner</review_text>
Of course this is not the best movie in the world, or even the best French movie. But it is entirely life-enhancing, and shows Truffaut's humanity and humane feeling. It's certainly a film to watch if you're feeling low and want to be cheered up.It's so clever in the way that Truffaut deals with himself: as actor playing the part of the director in the film, Ferrand, as director, and as, of course, director of the actual film.He gets wonderful performances from Jean-Pierre Leaud (his other self, here and in several previous films including Les Quatre Cents Coups), Nathalie Baye, and most especially the English actress Jacqueline Bissett (with whom he is supposed to have had an affair during the making of the film.Truffaut is one of the great letter-writers, up with Byron, Joyce and Virginia Woolf (Google the book), and both his letters and this film show  the virtues of Catholic atheism: he has not a shred of religious belief, but he is an extraordinarily kind and understanding man who yet can be entirely obsessive about film.Watch this if you are down, and pick yourself up with Trufo after: a master-work</review_text>
I really enjoyed this movie. At first I thought that her two husbands were Vadinho the gambler and drunk, and Vadinho the loving husband.  He was bascially two different people himself.  I would have left him if I was her, though but I understand that in that time women didn't leave their husbands.  Also in that time, it was not uncommon for men to have mistresses.  After Vadinho's death, I was happy that Doa Flor decided to remarry, but I thought that she could've found someone more interesting than Teodoro. He's a nice guy and all, but he's just so boring.  She was used to the wildlife with Vadinho, and it was a shock to her when she married Teodoro.  I think that's why she gave into Vadinho when his soul returned.  And since she was the only one who could see him, there was no harm in having realtions with him once again, and in the future. She was happy with both of them. She was getting the best of both worlds.  I highly recommend this movie to all movie goers</review_text>
Devotees of noir & period pieces probably will not be as pleased with this as will the rest of this, but Curtis Hanson apparently decided that putting together a coherent & well-crafted film was more important than remaining faithful to one particular genre or another.  Aside from specific historical references (Bloody Christmas, for example), it is quite easy to forget that this is set in 1950's Los Angeles.  One could regard this as a shortcoming (it is, nominally at least, supposed to be a period thriller) or as an asset (a really well-told story will trump all other details), depending on one's perspective.In any case, Hanson and a top-notch cast works with a pretty complex plot and manages to keep all of the balls in the air.  I always enjoy a movie where the audience figures out most of the twists before the characters do, because then we get to enjoy watching the unfolding of consequences of decisions made or avoided.  Spacey, Crowe & Pearce manage to give us wonderfully ambivalent & complex characters, all of whom are far from being beyond reproach and continue to have some dubious motives right up to the film's conclusion.  Personally, I always like a film that deliberately avoids a tidy ending and leaves the viewer knowing that, after the credits finish rolling, the other shoe will eventually have to drop.I agree with others that Kim Basinger's breathy whispery performances is simply annoying & that she is woefully miscast in this role.  Why she got an Oscar for this is almost as big a mystery as any portayed in this film.  However, it is not a glaring flaw and is obscured by the stellar performances of the rest of the cast.  Top notch from start to finish!</review_text>
I have watched most of the BS series and this is one that shows what is happening to many of our american organizations. Religious control</review_text>
Not since "Duel in the Sun" has there been so much passion and lust on the screen. The king is so totally obsessed with one of his subject's wives that he loses everything to possess her.The king nurses his beloved back to health when she developes smallpox. The king's tenderness and loving care in these scenes are absolutely precious. When the king is dying the object of his obsession realizes that she loves him. However, it is too late for both of  them. The movie is so erotic yet there is not any graphic depiction of sex. The sets and costumes are absolutely gorgeous.Golina is so voluptuous not one of these 90 pound anorexics with one of the roundest and best derrieres in film Timothy Dalton is absolutely great in this movie and should have received an Academy Award for his compelling portrait of how love can drive one senseless and mad. He continues to be one of the greatest actors but his work continues to be unappreciated by critics and audiences except the few intelligent movie fans than recognize his greatness. Additionally, Hollywood producers can not see that he has soul and what a fantastic actor he is. Dalton gives his all in every part. He receives roles in films that do not give him an opportunity to ultilize his amazing range of acting skills. Dalton is always convincing in every role that he plays. The audience always gets their money worth when he is on the screen. Dalton continues to be so charismatic, however, his parts are consistently supporting roles, unchallenging and/or too small. It is tragic that Dalton's magneticism and presence has gotten larger while Hollywood films having gotten smaller. Unfortunately, Hollywood films of today are "techno gimic" flicks or silly comedies that appeal to the theater going public that have minds of ten-year-olds</review_text>
The great thing about this "movie version" is that all the original voices of Clifford (John Ritter), Emily Elizabeth, Cleo, and T-Bone are exactly the same as the Clifford episodes on TV. Basically, it is a longer version of a regular Clifford episode but they've added a few new friends and some songs here and there. Speaking of, the songs are actually upbeat and a bit catchy.  But NOT so catchy to where I find the tunes stuck in my head for hours........unlike some other kid movies (i.e. - Thomas the Tank Engine) where they play the same droning chorus over and over and over again. This movie is a great compromise because my 2 and a 1/2 year old son LOVES it, and after watching it with him numerous times now, I still like it too.</review_text>
A great movie for everyone!  From my 2 yr old to my folks!</review_text>
In 1962 Elvis was given a script that would take full advantage of his flare for comedy and "fierce" timing,...the movie was "Follow That Dream,"...and he would never see this oppurtunity again for the rest of his career.Elvis deliver's a flawless "deadpan" comedic performance that is seamless from start to finish that will remind you of a young Andy Griffith.Through the innocent eyes of Toby Kwimper,..we see a different world,..a world not so harsh and positive to the touch.In the courtroom scene that would be the climatic event of the film Elvis deliver's one of the finest speeches I have ever seen on film,...and there is not a dry eye in the house.We see through this performance that Elvis the actor needed only a suitable script and then he would keep up his end of the bargain."Follow That Dream" is a wonderful motion picture that has an endearing cast of great actors who were among the best of their time,...and it shows.This was Elvis's crowning glory,..if that he had one.A finer performance by Elvis you will not find on film,..watch him shine</review_text>
Ah yes...Tarantino's first script entitled True Romance which he sold for 30,000 dollars is a genius effort of great proportion and the writing, you will notice in subsequent films and scripts,is common for him. Certain  terms will show up later on in other movies. And as for Reservoir Dogs,his  second greatest film ever,he used the money from True Romance's script to  make this ingenius mob classic complete with terms used in his other films  including one or two from True Romance</review_text>
This is a great movie! Wasabi is about a police detective (played by Reno) who has to travel to Tokyo in order to sort out his past when he learns that the only woman he has ever loved has died. If you are a big fan of Jean Reno you will really enjoy this movie. It has a great combination of action and humor and is a good addition to a movie collection. I highly recommend this film if you are looking for a mixture of action and fun, especially if you are a fan of anything by Jean Reno</review_text>
The 1950's Black Scorpion rocks,if you are a 1950's science fictionaholic. This one's got all the bells and whistles of the premo black & white science fiction era. It's fun, its campy, it's a classic</review_text>
I am so thrilled with this video. It has helped me tremendously not only with increased flexibility but with a more positive attitude. Dr. Maloof's voice I find so soothing and calming. The stretches cover all areas of the body. I just feel so relaxed and rejuvinated after I am done. I have definitely have made a commitment to myself to do this regularly. It makes me feel terrific!!</review_text>
as far as im concerned doris can do no wrong and this is one of those extra special films of the 60's that she did...probably better than if (dare i say) marilyn had done the movi</review_text>
One of the first of the great Ealing comedies, and a clear indication that their comedies would carry social and political weight as well. In this picture a run-down section of London discovers a horde of burried treasure when a bomb left over from WW II explodes accidentally, and the residents of Pimlico, London, learn that they actually are a part of Burgandy, as deeded by the King in the 1400s. This means they are a separate country right in the heart of London, and they decide to act like a separate country. Thus they conclude that the laws of England don't apply anymore - but likewise England cuts them off, and Pimlico is under siege.The craziness of the situation leapfrogs, with passports now required, services cut, people throwing food over the barbed-wire fence to help them survive. It's a great satire on government and sovereignty. It's also an interesting look at post-war London, with its burned-out buildings still plentiful and ration books still in use (England felt very much at the short end of the stick after the war, the last of the allied countries to be under wartime restrictions and shortages). The script is terrific (typical for Ealing productions), and Stanley Holloway is wonderful as the leader of Pimlico. Definitely worth a watch</review_text>
This arty quirky film about a New Years Eve gone wrong in the mid- 80s is one of my favorites. Was the first time I saw Kate Hudson and she is so sweet and funny in this one.Martha Plimpton is a riot as the overwrought hostess with a failed party on her hands.Ben Affleck is actually semi-funny for once- he is trying desperately to get into someone's pants- watch and see who he starts the new year with.Courtney Love and Paul Rudd are friends- she wants to be more but she scares him....Indy gal J. Garafolo is her dark and dismal chain smoking wisecracking self and fun again.Dave Chappel is the cabby who tells the tale.Fun! Romantic comedy a guy will like! --.</review_text>
A very funny and insightful examination of young adults all looking for love, happiness and meaning. The film takes place on new year's eve, 1981, and follows many different young people who somehow all eventually end up at the same party (which the hostess later wakes up to find she slept through.) Elvis Costello makes a cameo and provides a running joke in the last third. The soundtrack is great--all late 70's early 80's pop and new wave. And the one who steals the show is Dave Chappelle as the cab driver who manages to give a ride to practically every character at some point, dispensing equally silly and profound wisdom along the way, on everything from friendship and destiny to life before an afro and how to "get booty." (smiling at a girl is very important, as is avoiding talking about death--"Everyone knows they're gonna die someday, they just don't want to hear it from you.") Ben Affleck is very amusing as a clueless suitor. Oh, and Courtney Love was actually bearable. All in all, a very smart, enjoyable ride</review_text>
Once again, Fox has cancelled a brilliant show. While it is occasionally a bit off-color, the dialogue is brilliant, but apparently people couldn't follow the episodes, so no one watched this great show, and it was cancelled. I haven't tried the download option, but I highly recommend the show</review_text>
I am quite amazed that there are no recommendations or comments on this picture from folks once lived life of Malik in ex-Yugoslavia. "The boy's very being does (not) becomes an expression of natural defiance toward the coming communist regime under Tito and its spirit-crushing regime" (cited /re-worded from last comment) - he is just stepping out of his childhood.On June 28th. 1948 (what a coincidence - on a same date in 1389 Turk army defeated Serbian army on Kosovo field and on a same date Gavrilo Princip in 1914 committed Sarajevo assassination on Austrian prince Ferdinand - creating excuse for Germany to start 1st.(Great) World War) members of Stalin's Informbiro kicked Yugoslavia out of membership of Joint European Communist Party.That event gives birth to this movie.I would recommend much deeper research to interested party on happenings in Yugoslavia (1945-1948 USSR -Yugoslavia relations) in order for that party to get a real feel for Yugoslav society happenings after Resolution of Inforbiro (Bucharest 1948). Eastern block sanctions towards Yugoslavia, few 5 year plans to swim out of those sanctions and hostile breakout from East produced deviant political society of 50's Yugoslavia.Why am I writing all this historical rubbish?It is an attempt to make you watch this movie again with (now) seeing Malik as Yugoslavia, his dreams as the Yugoslavian nation dreams, his sick and dying (first love) girlfriend as USSR, his mother as Tito, his father as all innocent Yugoslav political prisoners from early 50's, his father's policeman jailer and friend as Informbiro (Stalin), his father's girlfriend as only good reason to spend some time in political prison....etc...etc... And then comment me back. Or ask me for more info.I am finding this movie context extremely complex. Being loaded with very hard to catch metaphors doesn't help its easy understanding.</review_text>
I enjoyed this series premier tremendously and am looking forward to watching the rest of the series.  Enterprise started before I had my PVR and was either on at a time I was unable to watch it or I never made time.  I watched one episode of Star Trek the Next Generation yesterday and it peaked my interest in watching some Star Trek episodes again.  Rather than watch episodes I've already seen, Enterprise looks like a great way to enjoy Star Trek episodes.As far as privacy concerns mentioned in other reviews, if you're paranoid, the internet isn't for you.  Keep your private things private, and not on networked computers.  Hopefully Amazon will remove reviews that do not at all pertain to the show they are attached to</review_text>
I have to say that I picked this one episode out of the many as an example of the talent of these two gentleman.  If you see comedy and want comedy that is more direct and honest in how it portrays different groups, this is the series.I enjoy their skits and think that it simply pokes fun without being mean.  That is hard to do.  The different characters they take on makes me think there is more than two guys, they are that good. In my humble opinion. You do not need to be an Anglophile for the series but it would really help to be an Anglophile Valley girl for the Vicky skit.</review_text>
This study of the intertwined lives of the sculptor Rodin and the artist who loved him with a fatal passion is quite extraordinary. Long a student of modern art, I learned a great deal from this film that had been unknown to me before. Furthermore the film is compelling as a work of art itself, and enormously important to the on-going study of women artists.This is a work all admirers of modern art should view</review_text>
This is a very enjoyable film in which everything, from the acting, to the music, to the costumes, is just right. It depicts an earlier, friendlier Los Angeles and makes one want to get into a time machine and go back.To an aviation nut such as myself, it is heaven, perfectly capturing the excitement of the golden age of aviation.The music fits the action so well. In fact, there is a performer on the air show circuit who does old time aerobatics and uses the the theme music from Rocketeer as his performance music. Most excellent! The joy and fun of this film carries beyond the actual watching of the film. I wish there were more movies like it</review_text>
When this movie came out and I saw it at the movietheater---You know the scene in the car where Tine finally gets enough and hit him back? Everyone in the theater started yelling and screaming, clapping their hands!! It was awesome and I will never forget it!</review_text>
There is a good reason you'd want to buy this from Amazon. The quality. Sure, you can watch it for free on CBS, but the quality isn't very good. It's streamed and the bitrate (quality) is low. Personally, I want to watch Survivor on my 50" plasma, not on my computer screen. So, I use Unbox + Windows Media Center to make that happen. Survivor from unbox is as good as getting the show directly from my cable provider.</review_text>
Doctor who materialised without his Tardis on this, my first timelord download in the amazon unbox, which is much larger on the inside than it appears on the outside.For a very reasonable sum, $1.99, my family and I were able to enjoy the first Third doctor adventure after his regeneration, where he encounters the Nestene Conciousness.The down load took only a few minutes although I had some considerable difficulty installing the microsoft program. thanks to the good people at amazon tech support I was able to obtain an alternative download from the gates empire itself which allowed me to enjoy our rental.a great experience and will not be the last. easy to navigate and fun for all the family. someone should tell the timelords on gallifrey about unbox and perhaps they could get rid of all the old type 40 tardis'</review_text>
This is an excellent documentary of Shangri-La and its elusive transcendental nature</review_text>
While this movie was filmed in the Coos Bay, Oregon area I got to be an extra in it. I had my doubts about it at the time. But now that I have seen it, I say it is well worth watching if you like humor and a feel good  movie. Some profanity and mild nudity. Not for the real youngins. BTW, I am  the guy in the blue baseball cap at the bar, the girl I was flirting with  is my sister</review_text>
I had previously seen Wong Kar Wai's two most recent full-length films (In The Mood For Love and 2046) and enjoyed them greatly. I just recently purchased the rest of his catalogue and have been viewing them in chronological order. Tonight I watched Chungking Express.This film, like all of his films, deals with isolation, loss, and missed connections. It contains two separate stories which, on the surface, are not related. The first story I found to be intriguing though not really so inspiring. The second (which comprises the bulk of the film) was simply amazing! WKW really has a way of placing you into the emotions of his characters! His is an extremely voyeuristic style to film-making. As the story progressed I started to feel uncomfortable as a result of one of the characters' behavior. Then the discomfort gave way to exuberance and I was smiling and even laughing along with this character. I began to sympathize and (god forbid!) even condone what was happening. When the character's game came to an end (as it had to do) I was scared for her but was relieved when her victim(?) also sympathized and condoned her behavior. Then, the story took a turn and it broke my heart in a most profound way. WKW's stories always break my heart, but this one REALLY HURT in a more personal way! I'm not really sure why. But after all the sadness and pain, this story turned around and put the pieces back together!Beware! This is not a film for mainstream junkies! If you enjoy challenging and thought-provoking movies, then this is a definite must-see! If you have primarily subsisted on a diet of mainstream Hollywood fare but are curious to see the treasures that are possible with daring film-making, then this movie is an excellent gateway drug</review_text>
"Breaking Away" is a true rarity: a feel-good movie that doesn't that isn't silly. Yes, there are plenty of laughs in it, but they're the result of great acting and writing, not the cheap, crude one-liners that litter so many of today's so-called "comedies." And while the movie will tug at your heartstrings, it never spills over into gooey sentimentality or empty pathos.But I also feel sort of sad whenever I watch "Breaking Away." The small-town downtown where the guys hang out is just a fading memory for most Americans. And are there any old swimming holes anymore, like the quarry that the characters visit? Or have they all been paved over, for "luxury" McMansion subdivisions?Shut me up! Just watch "Breaking Away" and enjoy it</review_text>
"You know, if anything happens to me you're in command," says Sergeant Kelly (Thomas Mitchell) to Corporal Colin Spence (Henry Fonda). They're lost in the Libyan desert with only three gallons of petrol left for their remaining armored car, almost no water and a busted compass. Sergeant Kelly started out with Corporal Spence and twelve other men on a routine patrol. Three German fighters changed things. Now there's only Sergeant Kelly, Spence and four others."Nothing's going to happen to you, sergeant," Spence says. "I mean, it can't.""It won't, lad, if I can help it. Still, if I stop a packet it's up to you to get this patrol back...and that's not an easy job.""But I'm no leader," Spence says. "I haven't had the experience to take up a command like this with other men's lives depending on me. I can carry out orders but I can't give them. I'm just a civilian with a couple of chevrons on my sleeve."The Immortal Sergeant tells us the story of Colin Spence, a small-town reporter from Canada in England, who is shy and not really able to accomplish the things he wants. Please note that while elements of the plot are discussed, the key elements are all described on the DVD case. It's obvious Valentine (Maureen O'Hara) loves him but he just can't seem to recognize the signals. Just before he enlists, she and Colin meet an old friend of Colin's at a party. Benedict (Reginald Gardner) is now a famous war correspondent. "Good old Colin. I tell you this lad has a head on his shoulders," says Benedict to Valentine. "I'm afraid he's a little bit too self-effacing for the times, though. You know, like the good old democracies. Nice, but a little bit too civilized for his own good, eh Colin?" Benedict smoothly moves in on Valentine and Colin can only look on.Spence keeps remembering Valentine while he and the rest of the patrol struggle through the desert. Now on foot, the sergeant leads the men in an attack on an isolated German armored car. They hope to find water and perhaps even capture the car and drive back to their own lines. The sergeant is clear about what they must do. "This war, like every other war, is going to be won by men on their feet with guns in their hands. And don't you forget it," he tells them. But the car is destroyed in the attack, the cans of German water with it, and two more men in the patrol die. The sergeant is one of them. Colin Spence has no choice but to take command now. And slowly, as he faces the reality of the situation, he becomes more forceful and more resourceful. The three other men, one a little reluctantly, accept his leadership. He knows he doesn't have the answers. He relies on his memory of Sergeant Kelly and his memory of Valentine to keep him moving forward. At the climax, he leads a desperate attack on an oasis guarded by three times the number of Germans. It is an attack which is bravely led and fought.Back in a Cairo hospital, Colin Spence sums it up. "I had to come all the way out here to meet a tough sergeant named Kelly who was born in a slum and educated in an army camp before I was fit for a woman like Valentine. He's dead now but he taught me one thing...if I ever want Valentine or anything else worthwhile in life I've got to fight for it. That's not a bad thing for a man to find out...or for a nation, either, for that matter...to fight."This is an appealing war-time movie with little of the bravado and obvious emotional string-pulling of most war movies. Thomas Mitchell gives a fine performance and Maureen O'Hara would be any man's dream of the woman waiting back home. What takes this movie out-of-the-ordinary is Henry Fonda. Did any major Hollywood star, before or after, combine so effectively almost naive honesty, decency and acting skill. We sympathize with Colin Spence's shyness; we sympathize with Spence's nervousness at the idea of being in charge if his sergeant is killed; we see and approve of Spence's taking on the responsibility of leading the remaining men of the patrol; and we come to admire his dedication to do the right thing, to fight against the odds for a good cause. The Immortal Sergeant is a film that with time sort of slipped between the cracks. DVD has brought it back and it's worth seeing.The DVD transfer is just fine. There are no significant extras.</review_text>
Let me be honest here...I'm not a big fan of either Nicole Kidman or Tom Cruise.  However, this movie is wonderful.  Great story, great characters.  The only reason I didn't give this movie five stars is the ending; I think it could have been better.  Great movie overall</review_text>
A wonderful version of Sinbad the Sailor. Great sets, costumes, and story line. Douglass Fairbanks is great in it</review_text>
This movie is the best b movie I have ever seen. I have seen a lot but this one has it all</review_text>
I have loved watching this movie through out the years on TV when offered. The original "Road Trip". Kevin Costner's best movie in my opinion</review_text>
I Love this story for my Boys. It is now a story I put on for my Grandson. It keeps their attention and there is always something going on. I do wish that the few Cuss words that were put in this movie had been ommitted. You should explain that this has nothing to do with your Religous Beliefs. It is really entertaining. I Love the Bird and I Love the Song Bright Eyes. I would recommed this for anyone 8 and up. I don't think girls care for it as much as boys.</review_text>
Prior to watching this, I expected something on par with "Striptease" or "Showgirls," which are films about stripping that also attempt to legitimize their titillation by tossing in dramatic subplots. Even with earnest intentions, films of this sort usually end up being clichd and disappointing. Adding to my trepidation was the fact I had never heard of this film, which was released in 2000, prior to 2006. I finally took a chance on it and gladly admit that it really drew me in and convinced me to care about the characters. Like most people, these women only want to find love and something real in life, yet have lost their centers. Indeed, it is the actresses' portrayals of these characters that make each disappointment and set-back so painful to watch. Sandra Oh really moved me with her performance as Jasmine, a would-be poet who sabotages her own happiness because she has come to believe she cannot trust anyone, including herself. Her performance as a sensitive, intelligent person is the most tragic among these lives because she lacks the confidence to escape her current situation, even though she easily could. As Angel, Darryl Hannah is wonderful as a helplessly dim and hopelessly optimistic dreamer. (She also looks unbelievably fit!)  Jennifer Tilly is also very good as the out of control Jo, a woman who tries desperately to win in a man's world, but comes to realize the playing field is not level. Charlotte Ayanna is remarkable as Jessie, an eager to please naf, who has not yet had her spirit crushed by the weight of the world. Come to think of it, it does all sound very clichd and there really isn't much of a plot to tie it all together, just several subplots. Nonetheless, the acting is exceptional, made all the more impressive by the fact much of it is improvised. (And yes, the ladies here all smoke, which would ostensibly account for their trim appearances) I enjoyed the entire two hours and would recommend it to anyone looking for a good character study without the hindrance of a plot. The DVD is quite decent, with a very good transfer, optional subtitles and some alternate scenes. This is a bargain for the price.</review_text>
i watched this film twice today, which is always what happens when a film touches me; i immediately want to watch it again. and i got to this site because i was looking for the ost, but anway, here's what i thought; the acting was perfection, the story a beautiful observation, the dancing seductive and melancholic and overall the film gave a very real potrayal of the difficult choices many women make for themselves, their consequences, and how they deal with these choices in light of both mudane everyday reality and the hyper reality of nightlife. i laughed, cried and all that stuff.  then i watched all the dvd extras. and then i watched it all again. it was well worth the guy in the video shop giving me a funny look at the checkout. any girl whose ever daydreamed about stripping (you know who you are)  should watch this film. not to change your mind, but just to have a look see. it'll give you a new empathy and sympathy for all women in the industry. and it'll make you want to work out for a tighter ass</review_text>
Vincent Price leads an all-star cast in this horror film. Price appears in all three segments. In the first, he plays a man named &quot;Locke&quot; who blames the death of his wife on his daughter who's just came back after 26 years. This is great, verbal horror sort of like a throwback to &quot;Night Gallery&quot; or other dramatic anthology shows, where the horror is in the character's personality and not in the graphics. only the final minutes does the story turn into what AIP movie goers expect. The second story, as has been voted by mostly all on here, is the stand-out. Peter Lorre and Joyce Jameson team up with Vincent in a re-telling of &quot;Cask of Amontillado&quot; but re-titled &quot;The Black Cat&quot;. If you've heard or read the story, you pretty much know what's going to happen...the wine tasting scene is hilarious. The final segment offers Basil Rathbone and Vincent although Rathbone has the most action as Price's character, Valdemar, is bed-ridden. Rathbone plays an evil mesmerist who mentally tortures Valdemar's wife and keeps Valdemar in suspended animation you could say in an effort to kill him and run off with the wife! The segment ends with a memorable scene that isn't really sick...but it's not for the squeamish, either! It's one of Rathbone's finest roles, aside from Sherlock Holmes and the hilarious nut-case character in &quot;Comedy of Terrors&quot;. This film came along in 1962. At 85 minutes in length, it's short for a feature-length film...but the material and the first-rate acting by everyone make it seem even SHORTER!</review_text>
Is there anyone out there (women included) who didn't develop a crush on the interminably cute Lori Loughlin after watching the 1985 film The New Kids?  Probably, but for me, it was different (yeah, that's what they all say)...Lori Loughlin looked so very much like a girl in my neighborhood, whom I also had a crush on, back when I was in my teenage years...seems to me crushes were a dime a dozen back then, as were broken hearts, but I digress (as usual).  Co-written by Stephen Gyllenhaal (father of actors Maggie and Jake) and Brian Taggert (Visiting Hours, Wanted: Dead or Alive), and directed by Sean S. Cunningham (Friday the 13th, DeepStar Six), the film features Shannon Presby ("Five Mile Creek"), Lori Loughlin (Amityville 3-D, Secret Admirer), and James Spader (Pretty in Pink, Less Than Zero, Stargate).  Also appearing is Eric Stoltz (The Wild Life, Mask, The Fly II), Eddie Jones (C.H.U.D., Invasion U.S.A.), John Philbin (The Return of the Living Dead, Point Break), Vince Grant (Timequest), Paige Lyn Price (All the Right Moves), and Tom Atkins (Halloween III: Season of the Witch, Creepshow).Loren (Presby) and Abby (Loughlin) McWilliams are teenaged siblings who face a difficult task of moving on after the untimely deaths of their parents.  Shortly after their parents are laid to rest, Uncle Charlie (Jones) shows up and offers to take the pair in, to which Loren and Abby accept and move to a jerkwater town in Florida.  On arriving they discover Uncle Charlie has just purchased a dilapidated amusement park called Santa's Funland, to which he plans on fixing up and making his fortune.  As kids begin to settle into their new lives, Abby finds some of the local boys have taken a shine to her, particularly that of Dutra (Spader), the creepy, wild eyed, albino leader of loose knit gang of rednecks whose hobbies include dogfights, shooting guns, using and selling drugs, and betting on who can nail the new girl...smooth move Dutra makes his play, but Abby, sensing what an obvious sleaze ball the guy really is, turns him down.  Well, Dutra doesn't accept rejection well, and he and his boys participate in a little vengeful vandalism and property damage.  Loren fights back, pretty effectively too, but Dutra isn't the type to let things go being all insane and such, and matters escalate to the point where Dutra and his cronies kidnap Abby during the big dance for a little after party get together...Abby manages to escape (with a few well placed groin kicks), but Dutra knows where she's going, and heads her off at the pass (the `pass' being the amusement park).  Soon enough Loren makes the scene and now the siblings find themselves running for their lives through the theme park, hunted by liquored up, drug-addled hillbillies sporting shotguns, vicious tempers, and murderous intent.I enjoyed this movie specifically for the fact it didn't try to be more than it was, which is a really well done, exploitive B film.  Yeah, I suppose having Lori Loughlin in it didn't hurt its chances with me, but since Ms. Loughlin refuses to return my calls or participate personally in my romantic visions of whimsy (have I somehow overestimated my animal magnetism?), any bias leanings I would have normally felt towards the film, or any of the projects she appears in, have leveled off since...the real highlight here, for me at least, is James Spader as Eddie Dutra, king sleaze in a group where that's one hell of an accomplishment.  Picture his character from Pretty in Pink, only with less money and a whole lot meaner...and ruthless...and violent...and with an odd southern drawl...and an albino.  Love that custom maroon boogie van he drives around in...it's always interesting to see someone still perpetrating a fad that long since seen its day, even in 1985 (`vanners' saw their heyday in the late 70s, despite the protest of a few of the more dedicated members).  He was just so slimy, so vile, so despicable, and so entertaining.  Look for the scene when Loren sneaks into Dutra's room in the middle of the night to collect on a debt.  The dcor of Dutra's room speaks volumes towards his character, a great example of fleshing out a character without wasting a lot of screen time.  There were some interesting characters in his little band of hoodlum rejects, but Dutra was, without a doubt, calling the shots.  Another aspect I liked was the fact that the characters of Loren and Abby weren't weakling types normally prone to victimization, but strong characters that stood up for themselves, even despite facing greater odds.  This was obviously a quality they got from their father (played by Atkins), who we saw a bit of near the beginning of the film.  The dialog works, as does the acting (for the most part), and the location shots are excellent.  Cunningham keeps the story moving along well, priming the audience for what they know is coming, in that of a final showdown, and what a confrontation it is...what makes the film so much fun, especially towards the end, is that the villains are so absolutely and completely rotten that when they do get their comeuppance, you can't help but let out a fulfilled cheer, much like I do when Chuck Bronson blasts a cap into a worthless punk in one of those Death Wish movies.  A couple of memorable sequences is when Loren rigs the Ferris wheel and takes Moonie for a ride (Dutra had planted Moonie on top of the Ferris wheel with a rifle), and when Loren is fighting with Gideon (Philbin) near the roller coaster...this scene gave new meaning to the phrase `a little off the top'...you have to see the film to understand the full extent of that comment.  And watch Abby get jiggy with a two by four...few things can get your point across like a good piece of lumber upside someone's head.  All in all this is a great little film, worth at least a rental if you enjoy the seedy side of cinema, and don't mind a little blood along with perceived violence towards animals (I do think the lopping of the chicken head was real), followed by a slightly predictable ending which I didn't see coming, but enjoyed nonetheless.The quality of the picture, presented in anamorphic widescreen (1.85:1), looks excellent, and the Dolby Digital Stereo comes through very well.  There aren't really any special features, but there are some unrelated trailers for other Columbia Tristar Home Video releases like Frankenfish (2004), Devour (2005), Vampires: The Turning (2005), and Kingdom Hospital (2004).Cookieman108If I learned anything from this film it's that dousing a woman with lighter fluid and then threatening to set her on fire does not make her more accepting towards intimate relations...</review_text>
i was so happy to recieve this movie,its very rarely shown on tv,i own my own thanks to amazon. the music in this movie is magnificent it's something to treasure for a life time .glen miller was a great composer ,one of my favorites is moonlight serenade ,they just cant make music like this any more ,this is a great movie to add to your collection. thank you amazo</review_text>
Herman Wouk's book `Winds of war' became a bestseller upon its publication, just like its sequel `War and Remembrance' a few years later. These thick books, joining the fictional and historical events during Second World War, provided the subject matter for one of the greatest achievements in the history of the TV miniseries. This 6-DVD set covers the first book, with an 18-hour series shot in 1983.The plot concerns a military family named Henry, scattered and absorbed by the winds of war. We follow the patriarch Victor `Pug Henry (Robert Mitchum), an experienced military officer who in the spring 1939 is appointed to be a military attach for the USA in Berlin. He is accompanied by his dotty and yet quite likable wife Rhoda (Polly Bergen). Their children include an oldest son, the flyboy Warren (Ben Murphy), another son Byron (Jan-Michael Vincent) who is in Italy and falls in love with a bit older Jewish girl Natalie (Ali McGraw), who is the niece of the famous American-Jewish writer dr. Aaron Jastrow (John Houseman). The daughter Madeleine (Lisa Eilbacher) is the youngest of the three and works as a radio girl. In Berlin Pugh gets the hint of the atmosphere in the Nazi Germany of that time (like the fact Jews are treated second-class) and predicts the upcoming pact between Hitler (Gnter Meisner) and Stalin, both of who he gets to meet during the series. Byron and Natalie witness the first days of war, being caught in the midst of Warsaw, where Natalie followed her fianc, the American diplomat Leslie Slote (David Dukes). The series mixes the lives of the Henrys with the historical events of the war (the occupations of Poland and France; the blitz in London; the Nazi invasion of the Soviet Union; the beginnings of the `Final Solution' behind the lines of the occupied Russian territory; the Japanese attack on Pearl Harbor to name a few). The last episode of this first part of the story ends with the aftermath of Pearl Harbor: The German offensive is halted on the outskirts of Moscow, Pug goes to command a battleship and fight in the war, unsure of his feelings for the beautiful daughter of an old friend (Victoria Tennant), Byron fights in the submarine, while in the meantime Natalie, who fell in love with Byron and bore him a son, is left onboard a ship in Naples which is awaiting to live for Palestine, since she and her uncle could not find their way out of Fascist Italy, due to his passport complications.The above is just the basic description of the series and despite of what it may seem, it is not a soap opera, but rather an interesting chronicle of the war and a family influenced by its impact. Pug Henry gets to meet all the important players of the war (Churchill, Hitler, Roosevelt, Stalin...) and in this respect is somewhat similar to young Indiana Jones. The war itself is shown from these two viewpoints: the Henrys and the rest of the fictional characters vs. the historical ones (Hitler and his generals etc.)There are many things that make this show one of the miniseries highlights of its time. One of them is the excellent casting. Robert Mitchum brings his renowned charisma for the character of Pug and he does it in an excellent way. Ali MacGraw's headstrong Natalie makes a fine contrast to Jan-Michael Vincent's younger Byron. The historical characters are done more than convincingly. Thusly Ralph Bellamy is the definite FDR  (a role he had an opportunity to play years before in the theatre) and Howard Lang makes a believable Churchill. One must make a special reference to Gnter Meisner and his portrayal of Adolf Hitler. As it will be seen in the sequel, the director and producer Dan Curtis wanted Hitler to be overplayed. The reasons remain unknown and one can only guess that he wanted to make it less human in this way. Gnter Meisner, the late German actor who played Hitler few times during his career, although a bit too old for the role, managed to keep things under control, so despite the fact his Fhrer is stiffed and not altogether perfect, he manages to give a hint of the evil personage Hitler was. This is important to note, since his successor to the role for `War and remembrance', the British actor Steven Berkoff, was awful, playing the character as a total one-dimensional yelling buffoon. The role of Hitler is a hard and yet manageable task for an actor who can make a character, as shown by Bruno Ganz in the recent movie `Downfall'.One of the other appeals of the show is the fact it was shot on location, with attention put to details that make the historical accuracy. Most scenes were shot in my hometown Zagreb, the capital of Croatia, then still part of ex-Yugoslavia. The producers managed to use Zagreb's past as one of the former Austro-Hungarian capitals to recreate Berlin, Lisbon, Warsaw, etc. The scenery and the costumes evoke the era perfectly, thus making the whole thing believable to the viewer. Other locations included USA, Italy and some more. But the greatest asset is without the doubt the interesting plot which doesn't let go for a moment.It is also noticeable that some of the mistakes that were made in the sequel, `War and Remembrance', (the narrow scope of the victims of the Holocaust being one of them) are not present here. One can only get a hint of some of the future slips here, for example, the subtle message that all the Germans are bad and all Americans good.This DVD collection of the series deserves A+. Seven DVDs come packed in a nice sleeve. Besides the series, there are several interesting extra features: through the interviews with the cast, crew and Herman Wouk we learn about the process of adaptation, casting, shooting and the problems they all encountered while making this epic peace. Some of the footage includes things shot during the work on location in Zagreb.For anyone enjoying modern history, an excellent miniseries with the interesting plot or is simply interested in Second World War, this is a must-have. Highly recommendable</review_text>
This movie rocks, man. I'm so happy that they finally produced a Stephen King script almost entirely true to the original story. More than that. It's about 99% accurate. They added some stuff like a new female character played by Julie Entwistle, that wasn't in the book, but it turned out to be integral to the enhanced ending. Normally I'm very critical of people who watch these movies without having read the books first, but this time I think I can confidently say that even non-readers should like this movie. It's a masterpiece of suspense and gore. Rent it, folks, and call him the "Night Flier.</review_text>
Excellent price, speed of delivery, and quality. I am very happy with this purchase</review_text>
I have a friend who looked for a year for this movie on dvd in brick and mortar stores, I ordered it for her and she had it in a week, and by the next week, she'd watched it ten times. Its a very good movie</review_text>
As others have noted, Arthur is a delightful comedy taken from the 1930s screwball "My Man Godfrey" genre. It is an effectively told, outlandish story that winds up succeeding despite some dodgy jokes and an overabundance of lukewarm sympathies.However, without Sir John Gielgud (a gentleman who truly deserved the knighthood), the film's faults would be much more apparent. He elevates every scene he is in with his impeccable refinement and a wit that is sharpened to perfection. He is the pillar in a film which desperately needed credibility.And the title song is a classic.</review_text>
This is a surprisingly good show. It manages to have 'a little' violence, sex, and language but not enough to be too offensive to watch with my kid, and it's still intelligent enough to be interesting, humorous and kind of addicting to an adult. A modern Nancy Drew, is Veronica Mars. I wish seasons 1 and 2 were here; I wish anything more were here and I'd get that as well. I'm really not even much of a whodunit kind of fan to be honest, I prefer science fiction but amazon ran out of decent TV to sell me in that genre so I bought VM season 3 just for kicks. I'm glad I did</review_text>
Early Louis Malle film based on the true life story of Per Jacques.  The film brings to life an understanding of true martyrdom.  This is the stuff of saints such as Maximilian Kolbe, Edith Stein, and Pere Jacques</review_text>
This is an amazing service! For only 2 bucks i can watch what i like for the moment. In this case it was HG WELLS. Great biography</review_text>
I showed this to my 6th grade English class, while we were reading Miracle Worker to give them a glimpse into contemporary deaf culture. They loved it, and really learned a lot about cochlear implants. I highly recommend it for teachers who are interested in giving students a broaded understanding of deaf culture and also something that will really spark classroom debate and interest</review_text>
with C.I. already except for Peter Artinian, the Father of Heather since 2003 and They have moved back to Long Island after 1 year in Maryland Deaf Community.  All of the kids are probably mainstreamed instead of institutionalized in a Residential School for the Deaf.  This happened after 3 yrs of watching the trends and etc.This Documentary is excellent insight into turmoil between CI and Culturally deaf community.  Nina and others appeared on ABC Good Morning America in 4/2003I also hear that Josh Aronson has released a follow up video of Sound and Fury.Anyway, this Sound and Fury video is a must see</review_text>
This is a chase movie, a kind of film-noir without the black and white. Here the ordinary man is Jeff Goldblum, a guy so so unhappy with his mundane job and cheating wife that he spends his nights driving the LA streets instead of sleeping. One night he finds himself in the wrong place at the right time. He interrupts the murder of a beautiful and mysterious Michelle Pfeifer and very shortly he finds himself her unwilling accomplice as both evade her ruthless pursuers. She warns him right up front that she is &quot;one of the bad guys&quot;, but he's hooked. The chase takes them to all of the &quot;mink-lined sewers&quot; of after dark LA and lets them encounter quirky and sometimes violent characters. This movie plays like a mix of dark comedy and thriller.It has a plot twist of sorts, but does not end darkly. The cameos will be interesting to film buffs, but not to anyone else. It's Goldblum, Pfeifer, and the chase that drives this movie. And thankfully, the story - though improbable - strings tightly together and does not involve stupid car chases, explosions, or wanton killing. In fact, the violence is tame by today's standards. There's the brief nudity seen in 80's movies and occasional mild profanity. A nice film to rent. I bought it</review_text>
I have loved this movie since seeing it upon its' initial theatrical release. Many sleepless nights (and views) later, I was able to begin to make some sense out what Jacob Singer was going through. As listed in the other reviews, this is not a movie for the 'casual' film-watcher, as it requires the viewers' full attention. The imagery is amazingly suggestive without being overt, and is one of my favorite elements---what you 'think' you see may sometimes be more psychologically terrifying than what you actually see...But, this is NOT a horror film in the strictest sense, although it is horrifying, considering what Jacob Singer experiences. I am amazed, even here in 2007 how well this movie holds up in story, cinematography, acting, and general flow. It works itself into your brain and sets off a bomb inside, making you "live" through the mind of the protagonist, feeling his "ascension"...If you've not seen this movie, then you've missed a real treat, but prepare yourself---don't watch it until you're mentally prepared, and certainly don't watch it if you're depressed already---this ain't no "feel good", "happy times" movie...And, if you've not seen it in several years, then watch it again and take your own climb...or descent???</review_text>
My Cousin recommended for me to watch this movie.  It will keep you on the edge of your set, like it did me.  This is one movie that you don't wanna miss, go out an buy or rent this</review_text>
I got the movie I wanted.  I saw it one summer many years ago and was never able to find it.  It was never played on tv that I saw.  It is a very touching movie and it is a true story.  I love watching true stories.My daughter orders from you a lot and this is the first time that I have did it and I got what I wanted.  Thanks so much......</review_text>
"Prom Night" Is another of my favorite early Slashers.I love the disco soundtrack and the whole late 70's feel of the movie. Ever since I saw Halloween I craved more Jamie lee Curtis and this gives you a healthy dose.The plot is pretty usual but the killer wasn't predictable like a lot of slasher movies.It's a horror/slasher classic,not much gore but still effective .Can I say as a woman I would never take a ride from a fat boy in a VAN~!!Jude~! what were you feelin girl?And in the 70's and 80's slashers the jocks usually didn't have any musclesBut the girls always had big [...]. go figure. ANYWAY..buy the movie it's slasher royalty.</review_text>
Nice actor  Clark Gable. And Doris Day is very charming actress. Story is comedy touch and Romantic. Picture is monocromatic ,but I feel flesh now. This DVD is really excellent and I love it</review_text>
This three-part television production by the BBC, released in 1999, is one of the finest films you'll see in a while.  The acting is brilliant, especially the performance by Lindsay Duncan, the direction is extraordinary, and the plot is most unusual (if improbable).  The production is flawed only by a weak musical score.The real question is: How did this superb film ever get made, in a media devoted to pleasing teenagers and adult sickos?  Don't miss it</review_text>
A very enjoyable retelling of Shakespeare's "Romeo and Juliet". "Valley Girl" may be an extremely outdated movie, but it still makes me laugh</review_text>
When I watched this classic documentary, I couldn't help but think that if we ever had to get back to the level of living portrayed here, we just wouldn't make it. What it took for Inuits to survive and the almost always smiling faces on them makes me think that despite our modern proclivity for shopping malls, body-piercing, Hummers and rap music, underneath it all is a heritage that is raw, rich and admirable; and thank god somebody was able to capture it to film before it was swallowed up. It would be interesting to produce Nanook II and show what goes on in this remote part of the world now.</review_text>
I like the story line of this movie, but most of all I remember watching it when I was a kid of seven. It was scary back then, even with limited special effects and no graphic details. Watching it now was very enjoyable I found myself going back in time. This film is in its own right a science fiction classic.</review_text>
In the mid-'50s, Columbia released a trio of nifty black-and-white "monster" movies:  It Came from Beneath the Sea, Earth Vs. the Flying Saucers and 20 Million Miles to Earth. Aimed squarely at the youth market, each of these films run less than an hour and a half, and are brave and spunky as they feature a human race that always survives and is better as a result of the battles with the monsters. Most importantly, each has spectacular special effects by the master, Ray Harryhausen. In the years before computer-generated graphics, monsters were either created by very sophisticated cartoons, or, in the case of Harryhausen, a technique called "stop action," in which models would be shot a frame at a time; natural movement was suggested by moving the figures slowly, frame by frame. This was time-consuming, painstaking arduous, and for non-fans, pretty cheesy.  But the cheesiness is, in a way, more than half the fun. Populated by such grade B through Z performers as Hugh Marlowe, Faith Domergue and William Hopper, these movies are a comfy as a pair of old slippers and a well-worn robe. These quick morality tales are a hoot and holler; a campy, yet and faintly embarrassing, art form that demands the clich "so bad that they're good."</review_text>
THIS IS A MOVIE I HAVE BEEN LOOKING FOR FOR A LONG TIME THIS IS AN EXCELLENT MOVIE FROM ELVIS I AM REALLY SATISFIED I RECOMMEND THIS MOVIE TO ALL ELVIS FANS.</review_text>
This is the first workout I attempted after the birth of my daughter. The first few times were a major challenge, but I have been doing it 3 times per week for 3 months now and, not only have i actually stuck with it, but I have my pre-pregnancy body back! I really don't feel I can say enough good things about this video. My boyfriend and I do this video together and we have both been very impressed. And the best part - as I get better I can focus more acutely on the relevant muscle group and maintain the difficulty of the workout. I highly recommend this video for all levels</review_text>
I love this DVD!  I took karate for awhile and was pleased to find that the correct form is really emphasized in the kicks and strikes.  Kathy Smith brings her enthusiasm and experience, and Keith Cooke and Kelley Roberts bring their knowledge of kickboxing in particular.  It's a great workout</review_text>
I think it is a great movie. I bought it for my grandson he loved it</review_text>
I am serious ! What is going on ? I look at myself now , and do not recognise the guy in the mirrow ... He likes baseball and football ( American football ), he eats hotdogs and humburgers ... Who is he ? Have no idea ... but the worse part - he loved this movie , and he fell in love with Ingrim Bergman for her unbeliavable performance in it . Forget Walter Matthau , forget Goldie Hawn - they allways good ! But the way ms. Bergman rediscover for us the story of love ... when you not 15 anymore ... she really touched my hart</review_text>
This movie hurt, hurt in its absorption, and hurt in its aftermath.  Much like "Betrayal", also starring Jeremy Irons, but far, far more devastating.  Jeremy Irons and Juliette Binoche were GOOD.  "Damage" all around.</review_text>
I really enjoyed this movie. The characters were believable and most of the actors did an excellent job. If you're looking for something heavy this is not for you. This is a lighthearted movie that west-indian people can relate to on many levels. It is true that young island women often find themselves with much older men that can offer them financial security in these hard times and it shows how mothers are sometimes willing to turn a blind eye to the situation around them. I have seen this alot. All in all this movie serves its purpose to entertain. There is good music, dance and jokes cant done. Latah</review_text>
Cagney's startling performance as Tommy Powers, in William Wellman's PUBLIC ENEMY, was to be expected. He was powerful when needed. Gentle, with his short jabs of affection. And his fast-talking wit, whether in anger or in good-spirits, was in amazing contrast to his relatively slower talking co-stars. Or was it to be expected in 1931? I didn't know until watching the commentaries around this film that co-star Edward Woods was supposed to be the lead, and that Cagney was to play Matt. At the last minute, in movie minutes, the roles were switched. And yet both actors were beyond comfortable with their new parts. (Edward Woods was incredibly underrated. Does anybody know why he quit making movies in 1938? He lived for decades after that.)I won't rehash the plot here but I must pay homage to every cast member. Jean Harlowe--what more can be said? Leslie Fenton as "Nails" Nathan was a study in polished brutality. Joan Blondell as Mamie was cute as a button with her wide-eyed perkiness, and sincere affection for her Matt. Donald Cook could not have been better cast as the brooding, righteous older brother to Tom. (At points, he's tougher than Cagney's Tommy.) Beryl Mercer as Ma gets away with being so sweet without being saccharine. British actor Murray Kinell is just slimy enough to deserve his end, as the Fagin-like Putty Nose. And last, but definitely not least, is Robert O'Connor as the paternal crime boss, Paddy Ryan, who is sincere in his care for his young apprentices. The uncredited child actors who played the young Tommy and Matt were priceless.Now can anyone tell me who Tony the waiter was: I loved his only line: "Pop! Bur-r-p! Pa-POP!"As for the DVD itself, well the sound was sometimes muddy, and the changes in film quality--where they restored previously edited material--are jarring. But so what? You can see and hear every word in this masterpiece better than films made ten years ago that were sloppily transferred to digital. And the Warner Night at the Movies (1931) was a brilliantly executed way to let us experience what it must have been like to go to the movies 75 years ago. This is a must-have disc for lovers of gangster movies or the classics</review_text>
So much is unknown about the valid attempts African-Americans made to build their own society's, during the 18th century, forward.  This story tells of how they were thwarted and destroyed for 'just trying to live in America as free, productive, people.'  My classes sat with eyes glued to the screen.  It was a horrific awakening for many of my students. They were fed the lies and propaganda throughout their educations and lives, that African-Americans were a useless species.  Well, they now know the truth.  African-Americans were very diligent in building businesses, places of worship, homes, etc., which frightened the Cacausion people of that era, so they were destroyed - and much hope with them.</review_text>
This movie shows the classic of Russian history. People interested in Russian culture should definately watch this movie. The plot of the story is really interesting</review_text>
Classic Walter Matthau film. I enjoyed it very much because of the easy & believeable relationship between Matthau & Hawn, the suppressed attraction between Bergman & Matthau & the sweet storyline. This film was made during a time where special effects didn't fill in for weak plots; instead the story actually makes its point.  Well done.As bachelor dentist Dr. Julian Winston, Matthau tries to convince his mistress, Toni, (Goldie Hawn) that he has a wife who won't divorce him because they have children.  Toni's had enough: she fires off a letter (yes, actually walks across the street in her nightgown to deposit the letter in a mailbox)to Julian, telling him she's committed suicide.  Her young writer-neighbor, Igor (Rick Lenz), smells gas in the apartment hallway, breaks in & saves Toni.When Julian receives the letter at his office, he storms off to Toni's apartment, only to find her alive & in the company of Igor.  This little stunt persuades Julian to ask Toni to marry him -- he'll get a divorce no matter what. The catch is now Toni wants to meet Julian's wife, she has to get to know her so that Julian's wife won't think of Toni as a home-wrecker. Enter Ingrid Bergman as Miss Stephanie Dickinson, Dr. Winston's long-suffering, never-married dental assistant.  Julian convinces Stephanie to pose as his wife for Toni.What ensues is a calamity of coincidences & misunderstandings that cause true feelings to be revealed.  Ingrid Bergman is such a joy to watch, she effortlessly steals the show.If you want light-hearted entertainment that will leave you with a smile on your face, this film is for you</review_text>
The combination of Grant and Kerr is wonderful on the screen. I loved the mix of British humor and civility. Adding the dash of American brashness in Robert Mitchum, one can enjoy watching the wheels fall off.  A very enjoyable movie</review_text>
great casting, dancings and performance. well, if you keep abusing yourself, nobody can save you. this so talented broadway genius simply couldn't himself to mess up many women's lives and stubbornly doing harm to himself, chain-smoking, addicting to prescriptioned drugs, sleeping around, hopping from one woman to another. he created so many personal disasters around himself, dedicated himself to broadway musicals but never took care of himself. burning his own life candle from both ends day and night. when the curtain in the theatre falls, it would go up again in the next evening, but when the curtain of your life decides to come down on you, it won't go up again. a wonderful movie with a hidden warning lesson to those who in the entertaining show biz</review_text>
I think this was a great spin off from stargate sg-1 which was starting to get stale even though I love watching it still.Love being able to download them all, just wish they'd get updated quicker!Honestly, when I left 2 weeks ago I saw the last episode available and I've missed the next 2</review_text>
I was very pleased with this motion picture.  The casting and script were well developed and the performance exquisite.  I found Pauling Collins to be a very credible and delightful personality in the story.  I give this rating 5 stars!Thank yo</review_text>
Shirley Valentine is brilliant!  An absolute must see, and must own.  I suspect millions of women around the world have tinkered with the idea of "Pulling a Shirley"..</review_text>
I really liked this film.  It's not a groundbreaking movie in any way, though.  It's about a bunch of underdog kids who aren't interested in football until a coach comes along and changes their minds.  Throughout the movie we see the kids working out and trying hard to prepare for the match against the other more talented (and unlikeable) team.   It's pretty much the same thing we've seen in the Mighty Ducks except now it's about football.It's just a typical family movie that sends the message to children that even if you're small and think you don't have any talent, you actually DO have the talent to play football, hockey, basketball, whatever.  One of the characters is a girl who doesn't know if she wants to play football with the boys or be a cheerleader like all the other girls.Rick Moranis once again plays that shy, quiet character he does so well in other films such as Honey I Shrunk the Kids.  It's hard to believe he's now a country singer (no, I'm not kidding).  Ed O'Neil doesn't quite play the jerk character you'd expect from the Married with Children show.  He's not really a nice guy either, though.I find it interesting that the team names are the Giants (the good guys) vs. the Cowboys (the bad guys) because the Monday Night Football game this week were those two teams facing each other (with the Giants winning)</review_text>
This movie is really great. I LOVED IT!! I won't give away any of it because it would probably give away too much. GO SEE IT!!!!!!!!!!! IT'S GREAT and FUNNY!!!!!! DEFINETLY A MUST SEE!!</review_text>
A Man Escaped is one of those films that improves with repeat viewings. Bresson makes a strange choice in omitting the opening chapter of the memoir the film is based on which deals with the hero's curiously distant emotional response to killing a collaborator, which does throw some light on the sudden apathy and inertia that paralyses him once he is on the brink of making his much-delayed escape, but in other respects it's a perfectly contained and executed movie.The performances are very strong (Bresson was still aiming for naturalistic performances at this time) and the Christian allegory - that we want redemption but instinctively back away from it - is not overstrained: although this time round I noticed a few more references to religion than I recalled, it's there if you want to see it but never at the cost of turning the movie into a sermon.New Yorker's source material is not especially good, but considering how bad most 35mm prints that go round the revival circuit are, it may well be a case of making the best of what material was available to them</review_text>
This is one of cinema's great achievements, a testament of the combination of elements (subject, visual style, photographic image, movement, sound, background music, character, montage) are perfectly blended into a unique experience.  The New Yorker print, however, is the worst copy of this film (16mm, 35mm, television screenings) I have ever seen.  This was a copy with a lack of contrast, extra noise on the track, looking like a dub.  If only there was a decent attempt to attain anything better would have begun to do the film justice.  As it is, enjoy what you're stuck with but know there's something better out there.Burt Shapir</review_text>
Firefly is imaginative exiting and heartfelt. It is simply the best sci-fi... no scratch that, The best TV I've scene scince the X Files. The acting is very good, the stoyline is compeling and by the last episode I felt like I was part of the crew. I cant believe they pulled it before they even had a chance, does that remind you of anything?. So here we are stuck with law and order svcipu and the so called reality garb when we could be watching something truly original. What happened to TV that makes us think. Dont get me wrong but, Saving lives and putting away pervs is all good but, ITS ALL THE SAME!  where is Capt Kirk, where is Moulder, where is River???  :(         Science fiction does'nt mean out of this world,  Firefly really hits home and holds a message for all of us right here in the 21st century. Watch the first episode and you'll be hooked, I was</review_text>
ONE OF MY ALL-TIME FAVORITE MOVIES.Great story - Great acting - Great casting - Directing superb.I cry everytime I watch it</review_text>
I have loved this movie ro years and was thrilled to find it on Amazon!  The story line is cute, the acting is witty, and if you have ever loved a musical, this is for you!  There's even an interlude with Tom and Jerry.   Fun movie</review_text>
It's flat out amazing -and utterly utterly unfair- that Mark Dacascos didn't become a huge star in 1993 when ONLY THE STRONG was released. It was released horrid reviews from leading critics (I'm looking at you Roger Ebert!!!!) and managed to amass only $2 million in domestice gross. And for reasons that fail to make sense on any level, CHARLIE'S ANGELS: FULL THROTTLE got to take in over $100 million. You must be joking.It's nice to see Capoeira, the Brazilian martial art, to get such nice treatment. Rarely do modern day kung fu movies specify the particular technique of the combatants, and Capoeira is certainly deserving of some attention.Like most martial arts movies, the story takes a backseat to the action, which is good in this case, since you wouldn't want any ditractions from Mark's many combat scenes, especially his duel with the evil Silverio (Paco Christian Prieto).Only the dumb would consider themselves a martial arts fan or Mark Dacascos fan if ONLY THE STRONG wasn't in their collection</review_text>
This movie is great fun.  I remember watching it quite a few times when I was a kid, and it is just as good now with this edition on DVD.Interviews with both Corey's let you know a lot about what happened between the two of them and how they became friends.  Only disappointment is that Corey Haim comes across as a real stuck-up snob type of person.  It makes you want to slap him because he seems so pompous.Corey Feldman was great to watch and he hasn't changed much in the last 18 years.  Still a great movie and I recommend it to anyone who enjoyed it when it was first released</review_text>
This is the first episode where we really see the heart of Tony in his dealings with a teenager struggling with the horrible death of his father. A must see</review_text>
I surprisingly enjoyed this movie.  It is a little choppy and hard to understand what is going on at first, but it is well worth the watch.  Especially if you are a werewolf movie fan</review_text>
This film is treated something like the lost child in the canon of director Woody Allen's career.  As if he would have to apologize for this instead of, say, "The Curse of the Jade Scorpion".  What Allen attempted here in his directorial debut is groundbreaking.  This is the first example I can recall of a director telling his film in mock-documentary style, later employed by Albert Brooks and perfected by Christopher Guest.  Allen proves himself to be not only a great comic visualist but there are great verbal puns here as well.  The conceit of the film is a gas.  We're supposed to believe that Allen's Virgil Starkwell, an inept dweeb of a criminal, if not among the FBI's most wanted does cause Mr. Hoover some sleepless nights.  The gags here are rapidfire but I wouldn't spoil it for those who are uninitiated.  My favorite being,though, is Virgil orchestrating a prison break with a gun he's fashioned out of soap during a rainstorm.  All this failed effort leaves him with is a hand full of soap lather.  Also, noteworthy in the cast is the late Janet Margolin as Virgil's faithful wife.  Margolin basically plays straight woman to Allen but it's a shame this gifted actress who was so good in "David and Lisa" didn't have a more substantial film career</review_text>
This movie is so stupid it is funny.  I saw it when it first came out and I still haven't forgotten it nor will I ever. This is what the writers of the Groove Tube, Saturday Night Live, and Second City Television are all about.  Watch this film and see a true comedy classic.  Individual skits like "Catholic High School Girls in Trouble" could have been made into a full length movie all to itself.  It was an era where one didn't have to be politically correct.  This is what comedy is all about.  Forget the garbage we see today.  Forget Martin Lawrence or Cedric the Entertainer.  See Kentucky Fried Movie and you will see what comedy is suppose to be or what it once was.  Oh, by the way, Stephen Bishop also has a cameo role in this film and he isn't singing "On and On"</review_text>
This DVD is great.  It brings back all the memories of the holidays as a young child.  It is hard to catch these shows on TV as they only air once during the holiday season.  My daughters love them and I love seeing their reaction to the shows.  Good buy</review_text>
Koreans honor their greatest military hero in this epic drama which takes place in the late 1500s. The career and tactics of this Admiral are still studied at the U.S. Naval Academy, and doubtless those of other nations. The screenplay is based on a couple of novels, so there is some fiction, but the life of Yi Soon Shin was well documented, so there's plenty of fact supporting the story.If you are not familiar with Korean Drama, it's good to keep in mind that  this is not a Hollywood product, but they do very well with special effects and such considering the non-Hollywood budgets involved, and it's easy to see past all that and enjoy the tale being told.It's a long series, but presents an epic with power, depth and dimension and well worth watching it unfold through each and every episode.It would be great also to see KBS make other dramas available for viewing through Amazon, such as "Seoul 1945".</review_text>
There is a good reason you'd want to buy this from Amazon. The quality. Sure, you can watch it for free on CBS, but the quality isn't very good. It's streamed and the bitrate (quality) is low. Personally, I want to watch Survivor on my 50" plasma, not on my computer screen. So, I use Unbox + Windows Media Center to make that happen. Survivor from unbox is as good as getting the show directly from my cable provider.</review_text>
"Koyaanisqatsi" took seven years to make, from 1975 to 1982. There is not a narration to tell you what to think. This is an art film, in my opinion, the value is up to the viewer: Is this film meaningful? Does it have value? As a viewer I say yes. This film is a fusion of music and image. In Koyaanisqatsi there are 17 pieces of music and five movements all have relative relationship to one another. The "Grid" is a polyrhythmic piece of music. There are 11 polyrhythimic structues going on at once, and it matches with the time lapsed photography that is occuring on screen. About 350,000 feet of film was shot. There definitely was a method to this madness: after the explosion of the Grid, these polyrhythmic structures settle the audience down and the film ends the way it began: a rocket ship taking off.Godfrey Reggio more than expected a negative reaction by some people when he made this film.What does this film mean? That is up to the viewer, like a piece of art work there may be a thousand or more interpretations related to this film. Is this film only for certain individuals? Probably. But I don't think there is any pretense in interpretating this films message. One does not have to pretend to like or dislike an art object; it has no intrisic meaning or value only what can be ascribed to it by the viewer.Godfrey stated that Koyaanisqatsi is related to Northern Hemisphere societies; super-sophisticated, hyper-industrial, technological grids that we call societies.To me this film is about how humans have become one with machines. And how we don't live with nature any longer. We have become not affected by technology so much more that we have become so engrained in it we can no longer see out of it. That technology becomes the host in which everything happens and in that way, we do not use technology, it is a way of life. But like the air we breath we can not distance ourselves, as we deny that we are separate from technology and instead of moving us toward control of nature it has alienated us instead. The norms of nature no longer fully exist; it is rather the norms of technology that do. And in so doing technology has become omnipresent. Personally I don't have to pretend to like this film or pretend it is important. In fact it is, as its message is perhaps even more significant today as the world moves even closer to a homogenized society at the expense of natural and human diversity.This film shows that homogenization is in this process of globalization</review_text>
We had the pleasure of seeing this the other night in San Francisco at the Castro Theater, in dual projection 3-D against a silver screen.  Flimsy little glasses were provided to help blend the images poppped out onto the screen by the twin projectors.  It must have cost a mint just to stage this show, but happily the event was packed with like minded Creature lovers and everyone cheered, ooeh and aahed as soon as the Brazilian diggers uncover, in a solid block of limestone, the skeletonized hand of a long dead Creature, its webbed fingers beckoning right out over the audience's heads!  It was a powerful punch to the solar plexus and a reminder that even archaeology has its thrills.The 3-D effects are more subtle than you'd think.  There's nothing else, for example, as in your face as the ping pong ball that jumps repeatedly off the screen in HOUSE OF WAX.  Here, director Jack Arnold seems to be trying really hard to give flesh and blood to his two pprotagonists, Richard Carlson and Richard Denning, showing them off as the brain and the emotions, while Julie Adams plays sensitively and sympathetically to both.  Is she sort of trying to figure out which side of the bread her butter's on?  The doctor tells her that she repaid any debt she owed Richard Carlson long ago--she doesn't owe him anything anymore her playing Pygmalion to her untutored Galatea.So in a way it's hard to tell upfront which man she's going to wind up with.  The Creature I found sympathetic in a way, but I think the performance must be docked a wee bit because of the different actors playing the part.  Up on top it's the sensitive, tortured Ben Chapman, while down below, Ricou Browning's frisky balletic style. like Harold Land underwater, makes him seem more fancy free.To top it off Julie Adams and Ben Chapman were there, discussing the complex dynamic of the "beauty and the beast" scenario producer William Alland dreamed up on a South American jaunt with Orson Welles.  Miss Adams has got to be in her 70s surely, and yet she is still heart-stoppingly gorgeous and lovely.  She spoke to anyone who approached her, seemingly grateful to the fans who have kept the "Creature from the Black Lagoon," and the woman he loved, alive in cultural memory for more than fifty years now.  It was an enchanted evening--in dual projection 3-D no less</review_text>
Another stop-motion Animagic hit from the holiday entertainers, of Rankin/Bass Studios, the kings of holiday TV specials. This 1 hour show was released for the first time on April 6, 1977 on ABC television network. The storyline is very similar to "Santa Claus is Coming to Town", from the same studio - and by that I meant that part of the story explains all the traditions of Easter and how they began, such as why we eat chocolate bunnies, or why we color eggs. The show opens with a newsreel showing kids asking these questions.  Fred Astaire reprises his role as the singing mailman S.D. Kluger and gives a great voice performance but he has a bigger role this time. He has traded in his snowmobile mail truck for "the little engine that could", voiced by Robert McFadden. In the story we go back in time to the beginning of the children's Easter traditions to answer these questions, to a hidden town called "Kidville". There is a scary bear named Gadzooks who hates holidays, and he is similar to the Winter Warlock character. A rabbit named "Sunny" grows up to be the Easter Bunny and bring joy to children, making great friends and allies along the way. He is voiced by Skip Hinnant, who voiced "Pogo" in a special from another studio. He befriends a lonely young King, named Bruce, who is being controlled and bullied by his tyrannical Aunt Longtooth.We have come to expect good music in these holiday specials and they did not disappoint. There are 6 songs total with music by Maury Laws and lyrics by Jules Bass including the catchy, "Someone's Got to be First", along with "Big Rock Candy Mountain", the inspiring "Somebody Will Love You, If You Do", and "The Easter Bunny is Coming to Town Today". Fred Astaire sings "All You Have to Do is - Think Can Do". There is a hilarious song by the Hendrew Sisters, "What Came First, the Chicken or the Egg?". This very colorful special has terrific character designs by Paul Coker, who did the same for most of the studios products. The look of the film is, well, very Easter... They just did a great job capturing what the visuals should be for the kids.This show is the 3rd and last of the Easter themed holiday shows made by the studio. In 1971 they made an hour long Animagic TV special for ABC, "Here Comes Peter Cottontail", about the selection contest for the Easter Bunny, and it actually travels through time to all the holidays. In 1976 they made a half hour traditional cel animation special "The First Easter Rabbit" for NBC. As you know, Rankin/Bass Studios brought us such beautiful holiday TV classics such as Rudolph the Red-nosed Reindeer, Year without a Santa Claus, `Twas the Night Before Christmas, Nestor the Long Eared Donkey, The Little Drummer Boy, Frosty the Snowman, Santa Claus is Comin' to Town, Mouse on the Mayflower, Cricket on the Hearth, the Stingiest Man in Town, Rudolph's Shiny New Year, and more. They also made non-holiday films such as the Hobbit, and Flight of Dragons. It is incredible that one company was responsible for all those TV specials, 95% of the ones we see every year. Their work includes traditional hand drawn cel animation, stop-motion Animagic, and live action. Little Golden Books Publishing owns the rights to almost every show the studio made, and have done a commendable job re-mastering them and releasing them on DVD. I hope this comes out on a restored DVD too; I have bought all the other Rankin/Bass that has been released on DVD.</review_text>
Dexter Gordon is Dale Turner, an ex-patriot jazz musician living in Paris and playing nightly at the Blue Note. (His character is based loosely on Lester Young and Bud Powell, but mainly it is all Dexter.) A young Frenchman (Francois Cluzet) idolizes him and later befriends him. Dex has problems, mainly booze, and between blowing gigs seems most concerned about how to get something to drink. The cliche of the self-tortured jazz musician who's got to find something new to say on his horn every night is, of course, the main focus of the film. (That this is the ONLY way to greatness for a jazzman is the great myth for the artform. But it sells.) Dex gets homesick for New York, returns, falls into his old habits, misses the flight back to Paris, and soon dies. The movie is overly long, but Gordon is mesmerizing. Dexter speaks slowly, as if from behind a veil (Gordon was ill at the time and living in obscurity in Mexico when he agreed to do the movie); he had much input on the film, creating his own dialogue and insuring accuracy. The picture has faults, to be sure, but it's a mighty achievement nonetheless. The music, of which there is plenty, is, of course, top-notch</review_text>
TRACK OF THE CAT is an obscure yet brilliant allegorical tale of a snowbound family whose distorted views on patrimony and perceived lascivious behavior, all shaped by the conniving matriarchal Beulah Bondi, come to a resounding climax after being set into motion by the perceived appearance of a mountain lion. Directed by William "Wild Bill" Wellman the word "perceived" literally describes the haunting images and ambiguous and double-edged dialogue that unfolds. Brothers Robert Mitchum and William Hopper pursue the unseen cat across treacherous snow covered mountainous terrain. Wellman filmed these scenes on location on Mount Rainier. Waiting in the cabin for their return are Tab Hunter (their younger brother), Teresa Wright (their sister), Diana Lynn (in pursuit of Hunter's love) and their parents (Philip Tonge and Bondi). Filmed in WarnerColor director Wellman had cinematographer William H. Clothier essentially film the images in a bleached out and colorless "black & white" effect where everything is shot against a white background. The exteriors of blinding white snow are counterbalanced by the interiors of the cabin whose walls and ceiling are painted bleach white. In contrast, the trees, horses, furniture and actors (all dressed in dark and/or white attire) all appear black against Clothier's white cinematic canvas. The effect is unsettling, unnerving and unforgettable if you have ever seen this film. The result is that of a nightmarish and haunting tale that eludes the viewer's sense of morality in a superficial and dreamlike world of black and white where black and white are constantly being juxtaposed redefining what is apparent just for the moment. The VHS copy is in Dolby Surround stereo</review_text>
One of the "must see" Christmas movies.  A family oriented movie that will rekindle the Christmas spirit in everyone.  We have this on VCR tape and have watched it so much that we purchased the DVD version. Enjoy</review_text>
Nice little video for my Zen during my long wait at the doctor's office.  Confucius overcame many difficulties</review_text>
The price on this is a bit steep, especially since the bonus materials are limited (though enjoyable). Nonetheless, I didn't regret spending the money. The Maysles brothers were such amazing and groundbreaking documentarians that anything of theirs that you can get your hands on is worth it. This film follows four very ordinary bible salesmen in the late 1960's as they ply their trade in the cold and snow of New England and then in the sunshine of Florida. The Maysles' focus in particular on one gentleman who clearly is not cut out for this work and is slowly but surely headed for the scrap pile. Despite the relative mundanity of the events, you find yourself transfixed as these men endure the high-powered mindwashing of their superiors and struggle to survive in a dying industry. Few films have ever so poignantly made the point that, though God may be good box office, no one really seems to give a damn about who buys or sells the tickets to the show</review_text>
Juliette Binoche is an amazing actress.  Since her Best Supporting Actress Oscar for "The English Patient" in 1996 and her nomination for "Chocolat," she's an actress whose films I seek.  "The Widow of Saint-Pierre" has a bit of irony to the title.  The opening frames show Binoche in black staring out of a window.  We then move into the flashback in which most of the film moves forward.  We learn that the "widow" is the guillotine that must be shipped by boat from France before the big execution can take place.  We see director Emir Kusturica in an acting role as the very large prisoner Neel whose rehabilitation Binoche's Madame La seeks.  We keep wondering if the black dress is saved for the prisoner.  Daniel Autereil who won a Cesar (French Oscar) for his work with director Patrice Leconte for "Ridicule" in 1996 plays the lovestruck Captain who is in charge of the execution.  Spurred on by his wild and unconditional love for his wife, he thwarts the town's sentence of death at every turn, refusing to allow his soldiers to help haul the widow ship to shore.  In the moment of ultimate irony, Neel volunteers to help bring the widow to shore, which is sure to result in his own execution.  The bloody resolution and the final shots of Binoche in black bring the story to its somber conclusion.  Patrice Leconte has a great reserve, shooting this excellent screenplay in period costume and letting the depth of his cast work its magic.  This is an incredibly tragic romance, one that works exquisitely.  Enjoy!</review_text>
So far La Strada is the only Fellini movie I have ever seen and I really think it's a superb movie! Magnificent! Anthony Quinn and Guilietta Masina splendid as Zampano and Gelsomina. I highly recommend this DVD though I wish that Criterion would lower the price of their DVDs</review_text>
Run time was 48 minutes.  A stellar documentary.  The download worked perfectly.  Hope the review was helpful.  ty</review_text>
This is an excellent documentary of Shangri-La and its elusive transcendental nature</review_text>
Despite it's cover "Strangeland" is not your typical horror movie. The violence and mutilation are certainly here but the story behind it is the true heart of the tale.  I would not reccommend this for the squeamish or for children under 12</review_text>
I loved it, the movie arrived so quickly it was awesome.  It has brought back a lot of memories from my past.  Thank you</review_text>
Charles Laughton is typically wonderful in his broadly-played role as England's King, Henry the Eigth, who infamously married six different queens, divorcing or executing them as circumstances warranted.  The script to this magnificent Alexander Korda production is a witty jab at English history buffs, touching only briefly on the supposed treachery of Ann Boleyn,  concentrating instead on the preposterous emotional life of the lusty, capacious King. Laughton, as ever, is a marvel, skillfully presenting Henry at first as a thinly-cariacatured lout, and gracefully embuing him with gradual shades of pathos and humanity.  Viewers who look to this film as historical drama are clearly missing the point: this is all about the cleverly-rendered script, which turns British schoolboy lessons on their heads, and on the classy ensemble acting, which admittedly may be hard to focus on with the lamentable quality of the current print (I'm writing in the year 2003; perhaps Criterion or some other class-act movie restoration company can correct this problem soon).  Still, fans of early British cinema will enjoy this film a lot</review_text>
I just finished watching Callie and Son. I got my copy from the Dollar Store and it has another movie (Power Passion and Murder) with Michelle Pfeiffer in it as well... It really wasn't that bad, considering the price I paid. Lindsay Wagner is actually the main character and I think she did a great job, as did most of the actors in this film. The only trouble is the movie lasted about a hour longer than it needed to. With a bit of editing and a bit better script, it would have been a great movie! The end was somewhat unexpected and horrifying... I'd recommend it for someone to watch once, but I wouldn't pay more than I did for it. The DVD quality is really poor, the sound fades in and out, but for what it was, a bargain bin cheapy, I was pleasantly surprised by how much I enjoyed it.</review_text>
I saw this movie when I was a student of Latin literature and thought it captured the spirt of Plautus's plays brilliantly.  Later, I saw a stage prodction which I liked as well.  But no one can replace Zero Mostel.  He is one of the most naturally funny men in the world.  This is vulgar and bawdy and even corny at times but it is lots of fun.  It is one of my favourite comedy movies of all time.</review_text>
We rented The Lorax because I realized I hadn't seen it since 1978 on a reel-to-reel tape in my elementary school library but I loved it. Somehow 27 years later I knew a lot of words to the songs, but was struck by how much the message of the movie is relevant today. If anything, these days this movie would not be shown in a public school or on television because the FCC would investigate its subversive message of enviromentalism, critique of consumerism, and caring for others.As for Pontoffel Pock & His Magic Piano - I have no memory of this movie, and I have to say that it is one of the most bizarre things I've ever seen. Let's just say Theodore Giesel meets Timothy Leary and Ken Kesey and keep it at that</review_text>
This movie not only has some creative fight scenes, it also has some very funny scenes as well.  Some scenes will have you laughing, and not like other kung fu movies that are stupidly funny, this one is on purpose.Recommended highly!</review_text>
Live From Las Vegas is fantastic!!! The best show ive ever seen... realy and i've been to a few!!! Even thought i didnt see her live in Las Vegas. I saw her in London in the UK, she was still preformed a Unbelievable show on DVD and was just like watchin her when i did in London. By the way, Britney does sing some songs live, like 'Baby One More Time', 'Not A Girl Not Yet A Women' and 'Sometimes' and the reason why she Occasionally does not sing live is because she jumps around and dances and would be out of breathe qucikly... so for that reason she can sing live!!!A realy excellent buy!!! would recommend to any Britney fans!!</review_text>
"In Old Chicago" was a blockbuster movie made in 1937, a box office smash which contributed significantly to the emergence of 20th Century Fox as a major studio. Seeing the roadshow version of this film makes one wonder why Fox bothered to put the shorter version on the DVD because you will never view it again.  All of a sudden, the dramatic portions of the film make better sense, with the smooth continuity of a Henry King directed film and notably missing from the shorter version.  All the principals' performances improve too because what seemed quite superficial now has more depth.  For example, instead of being told Don Ameche is an honest lawyer, we SEE him in action; instead of being told Tyrone Power is a crook, we SEE him offering bribes. Power, in particular, is very convincing as the charming Irish rogue.The story is a corny tale of the O'Leary family and has that hokey quality which undermined a lot of Fox's big productions. By the time you have heard for the third time that "We O'Learys are a strange tribe", you can almost hope that they suffer some unspeakable death when the fire starts! Alice Faye plays Belle Fawcett, the dance hall attraction whom the crooked Power marries.  This was Faye's bid for major stardom when she replaced Jean Harlow who died just before production began.  Faye is diffident at first but her confidence grows and the film was a great success for her.  Her version of "Carry Me Back to ol' Virginny" is memorable.  Alice Brady won a Best Supporting Actress Oscar for her role as Mrs O'Leary but there is nothing to warrant it except a good Irish brogue and the fact that she is playing a serious part for once instead of the screwball mothers for which she was typecast.The special effects which make up the last 20 minutes of the film are spectacular and really give the film the status it has retained. The DVD package contains a couple of short newsreels and a Biography program of Don Ameche but it would have benefited from a commentary for such an important film.</review_text>
Darkness (for those who wonder what the title film means) is not the only time of the day TENEBRE's would-be victims should be afraid of when a psychopath starts imitating the murders of one best-selling author's latest creation.  Before you can even say what the--, this 1982 horrorfest has already delivered the goods with style and flair.  Never has it been more fun to witness the untimely premise of its cast.  With a touch of ingenuity from its director and a killer-score to boost, TENEBRE is a strong and inspiring piece of film that is a definite must-see.  Undoubtedly one of the best efforts of Dario Argento's career.-----Martin Bouche</review_text>
This is a great picture that I think Grant Morrison was imitating in his first issue of &quot;The Invisibles&quot;. It has cinematography and acting that  repressed Hollywood wouldn't get away from for another few years.  Great ending that completely caught me off guard. A very complete film</review_text>
Take a brief look at the lives of some Jewish Hungarians during WW2 in Auschwitz concentration camp. I don't think any of us can even begin to imagine the hell these people went through. Watching thousands of your friends, families and neighbors being gassed to death and then loading their lifeless bodies into crematoriums until the only thing left are their ashes you are covered in. It just goes beyond anything I can fathom. These people did what they had to do to survive just one more day in the hell they were thrown into. Would I make the same choices they had? Would it be worth living one more day, doing what they had to do? I don't know, and I do not think any one of us have the right to judge their decisions. I do know this movie does an excellent job of showing how is might of been for those poor souls</review_text>
First of all I am a huge Beatles nut so any movie made by them or about them i love. With that out of the way I can say that this was a very good movie.For those expecting a movie like A Hard Days Night, it is nothing like that. This movie is about John Lennon's friend who was the bass player for the Beatles at the begginging  of their carrear. it shows how he lost his interst for music and fell in love wiht a German lady. I wont tell u the ending, but this is a true story.All in all i thought this was a great movie. You should defiently buy it</review_text>
After living with this film for 15 years, it seems to me that the best description of its theme comes in the words of the character Liz (Jane Birkin), who in context is speaking of the work of her husband, the painter Frenhofer.  According to her, it concerns something "shameful--it's not the body that is shameful, not the nudity, but something else . . ."That "something else" is a violation, existentially speaking, of the enigma of the painter's model.  Such a violation cannot be seen without the mediation of art.  In a cinematic context, it is the risk the direction takes whenever it approaches its subject frontally, and we can see Rivette's tendency to retreat to wide shots, to place events off-screen, or to circle behind his players. Is this a critique of Bresson, who insisted on calling his players "models" rather than "actors?"  (It is impossible not to recall the storied psychological scars Bresson's methods allegedly left on his players. )  It is clearly not that simple, for there are close-ups in NOISEUSE that seem to be as cruel to the actors as Frenhofer is to his model.This goes beyond Bresson in other ways: Rivette, always the reader, has patched together a thumping good story from literary sources ranging from Poe to Balzac to James, and in the process has created a true mystery thriller.  That the mystery hinges on four-minute shots of a hand scratching out a drawing makes it no less thrilling.  It tumbles forward toward a profoundly ironic ending worthy of the best James novels.The initial critical take on this film was that it was the most thorough document of the artistic process ever committed to film.  Well, yes and no.  It seems to be about the artistic process of a painter, but I think there may be a playful game of "bait-and-switch" afoot.  Watch Bart.  Watch, especially, Piccoli, who is a veritable encyclopedia of the actor's art, as mesmerizing in his scudding, absent-minded movements as he is in his sudden precision, always surprising.  Rivette's devotion to actors is clear in all his films: think of his sets, so resembling stages with their creaky boards, a sound "effect" in Rivette that more often than not takes the place of score.It may be that the artist of canvas, plaster, stone, or screen may reveal something secret, even  shameful, in his models.  It may even be that the unscrupulous artist is a thief of the soul.  But Rivette, for one, shows in LA BELLE NOISEUSE that he has given these things some serious thought.  And he is always generous to his actors.  The result is that the trust between artist and model demonstrated in this film amounts to a strong rebuke to the idea that film cannot show thought.  It can; it comes at a price, but in the hands of a master it can be as great a gift to the players as it is to the audience</review_text>
For those of you with endless episodes of Blue's Clues on your DVR or TiVo, this movie is the perfect addition to your collection...not to mention, it's nice to have something different to play.  My nearly 2 year old hated this movie at first - she didn't like Steve - but now she will ONLY watch Steve and absolutely adores this movie.  It's got everything that the 22 minute tv show has...just in an extended version.  We are constantly signing the songs from the movie, which started actually out of the blue (no pun) by my daughter.  I didn't even realize she knew them so well without the movie playing...but at dinner one night she just started signing "hey hey - shobadee ay - beep bop bay - hey hey".Anyway, it's a must have!!! [..</review_text>
Saturday Night and Sunday Morning is very good social realist film.  Finney is fantastic as rebellious youth Arthur Seaton. Having a sexual relationship with a married woman while also having a girlfriend portrays the sexual liberation of that time.  Sex before marriage was becoming more and more common, and this film represents this change in British society.  It was a well made film for the time and even today has an appealing quality</review_text>
while i recently called "ballad of cable hogue" my favorite sam peckinpah movie, this outre take on revenge is undoubtedly his best, and imho one of the best of the 1970s. for those who havent seen it, the setup is the daughter of (presumably) mexican land tycoon has been impregnated by one alfredo garcia; the angry dad offers a huge reward to whomever delivers to him the severed head of alfredo, and down on his luck bum warren oates (think a seedier version of bogart in "sierra madre") is hired by a pair of "entrepeneurs" (gig young and robert webber) to do the dirty work. the irony: alfredo is already dead in a car accident. and that is the setup for where the movie really takes off in a spin of revenge, justice, betrayals, love, &c -- all against the sight and smell of the deteriorating severed head rotting in 100 degree plus heat. oates was always an underappreciated actor, but here he gives his best performance, matched by mexican actress isela vega as his doomed girlfriend. not a movie you want to watch frequently, but it is a masterpiece.</review_text>
Movie way ahead of its time. The violence is cuttiing edge for its time, a peckinpaw trait, but is tame by today's standard. First rate movie I think and very underated. I like warren oates and the support acting roles are well done. I think well worth the money.--5 star</review_text>
Even now the quality of music in this musical movie is excellent.  This brings back memories from my childhood :)  Great version of a classic</review_text>
This movie is absolutely ridiculous!  I'm a super musical fan and I had a friend who kept telling me that Xanadu was a movie you couldn't turn away from whenever you caught it on tv.  Boy was he right!  The music, themes and special effects are totally 80s.  I was so pleased to see one of my all time favorites Gene Kelly as a starring character.  Olivia Newton John's love interest, Michael Beck was the guy from Warriors, another of my favorites.  This is a great movie</review_text>
I HAD BEEN SEARCHING FOR THIS DVD FOR SOME TIME--  I WAS HAPPY TO FIND IT HERE AND I AM VERY PLEASED WITH IT.  THE SOUND IS GREAT AND THE VIDEO IS VERY SHARP. I WOULD RECCOMEND IT</review_text>
This retelling of the SNOW WHITE AND THE SEVEN DWARFS was actually based on a script that Billy Wilder wrote before immigrating to the United States from Germany, but it was only after the success of the Disney version that a demand was created for it.  The enormously versatile Howard Hawks (quite literally the most versatile director in film history, the only director to have mastered and/or created five or six genres) took the script and turned it into one of the last great pre-WW II comedies.  The story is simple:  a group of monkish scholars living together in New York City are writing an encyclopedia.  One of them is writing about slang, but being unfamiliar with contemporary argot begins research his topic by talking to people outside his normal range of acquaintance.  He runs into gangster moll Sugarpuss O'Shea, who takes advantage of the scholars to move in with them in order to escape the police, who want to talk to her to implicate her guy Joe Lilac.  While hardly Snow White, she certainly managed to stir up their lives.The film is made wonderful by a number of things:  Wilder's clever script, Hawks typically deft direction, a solid performance by Gary Cooper, but most of all by a scintillating job by the overwhelmingly alluring Barbara Stanwyck and a stellar collection of veteran character actors playing the seven dwarves.  All the latter are great, but special mention has to be made of Richard Haydn (who excells even beside the others, with his extraordinary overpronounciation of everyday words), Oskar Homolka, and S.Z. Sakall.  There are few more delightful collections of character actors in any Hollywood comedy.  I personally prefer Barbara Stanwyck to any other actress in Hollywood history.  She possessed an emotional immediacy that no other actress could approximate, and while her skills were perhaps a tad below those of someone like Katherine Hepburn, the latter never managed to match her fire and passion.  And she is so sexy!  I grew up watching Stanwyck on THE BIG VALLEY, so when I first started seeing her great roles from the thirties, forties, and fifties, I was absolutely stunned at how sexy she could be.  She was attractive, yes, but sexier than she was attractive.  And she was never sexier than she was here, with the exception of her role the same year in THE LADY EVE.Another reason to see this film is the appearance of Gene Krupa in the early nightclub sequence.  Krupa had, of course, been with Benny Goodman throughout the thirties, so this was very early in his career as leader of his own band.</review_text>
This is a good entry in the Mr. Moto canon, which comprises 8 films made between 1937-39. It is not my favorite, however--Mr. Moto Takes a Vacation, with excellent performances by Lionel Atwill and Joseph Schildkraut, is the best of those I've seen. However, they have been very hard to find, and I've only seen about half of them. Lorre is wonderful as the mysterious Mr. Moto, and the films are great fun and skilfully made, with a host of terrific character actors--in addition to Atwill and Schildkraut, Leon Ames, Jean Hersholt, Keye Luke, John Carradine, George Sanders, Virginia Field, Ricardo Cortez, Maxie Rosenbloom,  and many others all turn in outstanding period performances. It is a real shame that more are not being made available--I know that art houses sometimes stage special showings, and I keep hoping that someone will release all eight on DVD. PLEASE</review_text>
Great movie and musical numbers courtesy of Quincy Jones and the wonderful cast.</review_text>
This is a classic in every sense of the word. And like any real classic, it gets better with age. "A Charlie Brown Christmas" is a sweet, simple show with a powerful message. Every aspect of this production is great.But the fact of the matter is that this is the kind of cartoon that doesn't get made anymore. Now it's all about the trash-talkin' Simpsons and their moronic kind. Also, because God plays a part in the message of this Christmas special, it could not be made today. It might offend believers in Allah, or hurt the sensitive feelings of atheists. Therefore, such a production could never get off the ground.It's just as well. There is really nothing that could suprass this masterpiece. Buy it and make it a part of your Christmas traditions through the years</review_text>
My 3 1/2 year old little girl saw the "Charlie Brown Christmas" on TV this year and loved it so much that I had to order it.  She watched it over and over and enjoyed it as much as I did over 40 years ago when I was a kid.  Just goes to show that some things never get old.  And, what a treat to be able to share it with her now.</review_text>
This is Definately not The Best Pink Panther film. It is not as good as the other ones that I've seen. I've only seen The Pink Panther {1964}, A Shot In The Dark, this one, and The Pink Panther {2006}. If you are into the Pink Panther series just for Peter Sellers, you won't like this one. This film has a great cast.Alan Arkin as Inspector Jacques Clouseau, Frank Finlay as Supt. Weaver, Barry Foster as Addison Steele, Patrick Cargill as Commisioner Sir Charles Braithwaite, Beryl Reid as the crazed Mrs. Weaver, Clive Francis as Johnny Rainbow, and introducing Delia Boccardo as Lt. Lisa Morrel. You will definately laugh hysterically. As Inspector Clouseau says, "There's a time for laughing and a time for not laughing- and this is not one of them!</review_text>
Russians and Yankees team up to save the world in "Meteor", one of the last gasps in the celebrity-disaster movies of the 1970s'.  (Like the "Airport" movies - you'd have a bunch of celebs tossed around for no other purpose than to have their headshots printed along a strip at the bottom of the movie poster.)In "Meteor", a huge chunk of an asteroid, blasted out of its benign orbit after by a wayward comet, is now heading towards earth.  Called "Orpheus", the chunk is 5 miles wide and promises to kick off a nuclear winter on arrival.  The only hope left are two space-based missile platforms lofted into orbit by NASA and the Soviet Union - each pointed at targets on Earth rather than into space.  (I don't remember if the platforms, named for Hercules and "Peter the Great" actually violated any treaties, but their owners sure seemed keen on keeping them secret.)  The Americans learn of the incoming asteroid first, having fatally positioned one of their spacecraft in the asteroid belt at the moment of the comet's collision.  They then learn that Hercules is "light" -they'll need extra missiles, and since they don't have any time to put new ones into space (and as Henry Fonda's president puts it memorably, they can't just "conjure some out of thin air") they'll have to go to the Russians for help.  Waiting for Orpheus to hit, the plot boils down to scenes of the scientists realigning their missile platforms away from Earth, and other scenes showing the devastation wrought by smaller "splinters".  (In an interesting move, there aren't any subtitles for the international targets.)Even if you find the special effects lame, the score annoying and the plot thin and holed as if it too was struck by a meteor, "Meteor" surprisingly gets some good mileage from its stars.  Sean Connery is great in a post-Bond role as the civilian designer of Hercules - a NASA fixture who resigned when his program was taken over by the military ("Hercules" was apparently designed just for this eventuality).  Brian Keith is also great as Dubov, Connery's Russian counterpart.  The script has most of the Yankees getting along with the Russians, so he's never a foil for Connery, but he gets some good scenes going from a genial to an enraged Soviet, improbably speaking all his lines in Russian.  Karl Malden also rises above what seems like an incredibly unnecessary role as a NASA bureaucrat - he's neither scientist, engineer or politician, but he keeps Connery's maverick in line.  Landau, a great actor, plays the thankless role of the cold-war hawk of a general who fears the Russians more than shooting stars.  The FX are actually pretty good for pre-CGI (mostly excelling in the space sequences).  The music seems repetitive, but Laurence Rosenthal's score is also evocative of the Russians and the oncoming Asteroid.  Much of the movie drags on and many sequences seem redundant. (Did they need all of the "splinter" scenes?  The "Avalanche" sequence is most ludicrous - the world is coming to an end, but there's no hint on any of the faces of those out skiing the alps in that sequence.)  That said, the plusses and minuses of this flick make it memorable, and the plusses make it worth watching.  The script places the control center for Hercules underneath the old AT&T bulding in TriBeCa, and I admit I can't pass the place without thinking of this movie</review_text>
This series has just a tad too much blood for my taste... it verges on horror, here and there, which bugs me; I even like super-violent action movies just fine, but the brutally slaughtered recent corpse thing (more 'personalized' violence than killing bad guys) is not my style. This is why I gave it 4 instead of 5 stars.Aside from that detail, I find this show totally addictive. The brothers make a 'buddy movie' effect, and the whole supernatural framework creates a sort of non-religious yet definitely spiritual effect (the big mystery being why these guys never ever are seen praying in the show; I have actually known people who had a lifestyle similar to what the show depicts, and that is central).Not to mention the young men being so passionate, powerful, strong, yet sensitive, darkly troubled from the past, sheer SEXY it's nearly intoxicating over the long run of many episodes. ;-)Anyway -- the show has an actual plot, it's well filmed and intelligently done and is well worth watching. I recommend it</review_text>
A film that centers on four friends who made a pact to leave their small town arrive at zero hour and must decide if they will go through with it. The story is simple enough, and not a whole lot happens. But there's no denying it, this movie is enjoyable and aesthetically pleasing in every way. It's a treat to see an intelligent movie where the main charachters are teenagers, and that the film doesn't have to resort too fart jokes for an audience. Not one charachter is stereotyped. They are human, and they'll probably remind you of people you know. I applaud this kind of a movie, and I wish there would be more of them</review_text>
I'm dumbfounded by some of the reviews this page...guess they just didn't "get" it.  This film is hilarious.  It's clever, witty and extremely entertaining.  Travolta is classic as the pathetic "gameshow-host wannabe" weather man.  The characters are so well defined and so sadly pathetic in their own ways - it's what makes the film such a classic comedy.  It's unbelievable that more people have not caught on to it.  If you liked the Big Lebowski, Orange County, the Cable Guy - any film with esoteric characterization, you will absolutely love this film.  It's a dark comedy people, get over it</review_text>
emotionally shattering true-life tale (well, sorta) based on an incident in director louis malles youth wherein the school in which he (played by the very beautiful gaspard vanesse who sadly did not continue acting) was enrolled served as a haven for jewish students hiding out from the nazis. what could have been merely a suspense tale or a coming of age movie (and it IS both, and splendid examples of each) instead resonates as a meditation on survival, betrayal, and accomodating and forgiving oneself. a great film, but only for mature audiences.</review_text>
A killer stalks a small community, and a high school student (Neve Campbell) who is facing the first anniversary of her mother's murder appears to be marked for death.  This is a very well-written, clever slasher film that takes great delight in poking fun at the genre of slasher films.  It's full of trivia and self-aware clichs as well as some genuine thrills and a well-planned surprise at the end.  The whole cast is very good, but Matthew Lillard as an obnoxious high school boy and David Arquette as a deputy sheriff stand out.  Director Wes Craven, who is responsible for some of the slasher films (most notably the first "Nightmare on Elm Street") that inspired Kevin Williamson's inventive screenplay, does the best work of his career here</review_text>
A very good WWII novel that in many ways is the literary bookend to the film 'Das Boot'.  Both take place in small warships which is conducive to revealing personalities and dynamic group psychology.  The reader sees the action primarily from the standpoint of Keith Lockhart, a former journalist who begins as a freshly minted volunteer reserve officer.  His character resembles the author, Nicholas Monsarrat, who was RNVR himself, served in and eventually rose to command both a corvette and frigate during the war.  Nearly uncontrollable bureaucratic forces at play as the war drags on leads to a greater impersonality as humanity seemingly loses out to weapons and toughness as they move from the 90 person crew of the corvette to the 170 of the larger, more capable frigate.</review_text>
Instead of watching a documentary Learning the history of Brittan & Ireland in an entertaining way</review_text>
This has got to be the BEST adaptation of Jane Eyre that I have ever seen. And Samantha Morton is the reason. She is positively delightful in the title role. She has grace and beauty just perfect for the roll. One of her lines of dialogue is incorrect. She says "I am not a beauty, I am Jane Eyre". Truthfully speaking, she IS a beauty! The story flows smoothly. It's not too long nor too short. My favorite used to be the Orson Wells, Joan Fontaine version. But after seeing this British version, I had to change. You will not go wrong buying it</review_text>
Nice little video for my Zen during my long wait at the doctor's office.  Confucius overcame many difficulties</review_text>
Legendary stars Billy Barty and Diana Rigg bring one of the world's most beloved fairy tales to life in the Cannon Movie Tale, "Snow White." Starring beautiful and charming Sarah Patterson (The Company of Wolves) in the title role as the princess who fled her wicked, jealous, and murderous stepmother's castle as a child, "Snow White" tells the tale of how the princess is taken in by seven kindly dwarfs living in a cottage in the forest. As the dwarfs go off to dig in their mines each day, Snow White cooks and keeps house for years, growing into a sweet and lovely young woman. But, as Snow White grows ever more beautiful, the evil queen grows ever more jealous. Consulting her magic mirror and book of spells for ways to terminate Snow White, the dwarfs must repeatedly undo her vicious magic. It seems the final spell is beyond even the dwarfs abilities to break though. Their only hope lies in a young prince who is returning home from a long journey still seeking a great discovery to satisfy the longing in his heart."Snow White" sits among the best of the nine wonderful Cannon Movie Tales, which are among the best live-action fairy tale films available to date. Sticking more closely to the original stories from the Brothers Grimm, "Snow White" and the other Cannon tales mix in simple but fun-filled songs with fantastic casts and writing that blends realism and fantasy seamlessly. "Snow White" features some of the best songs in the lot, and it's clear that Diana Rigg really has a ball with her villainous role. It's so terrific that these childhood favorites many of us remember from the Disney Channel's 1980's and early 90's glory are finally available on DVD (most of them at least). The DVDs include trailers (not sure if these films ran anywhere theatrically), and "Snow White" is the only one of the four that I currently own that is presented in a letterbox format (though not much of one). The Cannon Movie Tales are mostly family fun, though be warned that some can have their scary moments (for example, "Red Riding Hood," my favorite, is done as a werewolf story that at times may be a bit frightening). The other Cannon Movie Tales, all of which I highly recommend, are: Rumpelstiltskin, The Emperor's New Clothes, Red Riding Hood, Puss In Boots, Hansel and Gretel, Beauty and the Beast, The Frog Prince, and Sleeping Beauty. Those last two have not yet been released to DVD, and I have yet to see Rumpelstiltskin at any retail stores, though Amazon seems to carry it. I wish to get them all, but currently only own my favorites: Red Riding Hood, Snow White, Puss In Boots (starring Christopher Walken!), and Hansel and Gretel. Fairy tale fanatics should own all these films, and I also highly recommend my top favorites, the Disney animated versions. Also, for a scarier version of Snow White, pick up the outstanding, "Snow White: A Tale of Terror," starring the beautiful Monica Keena. More recommendations: Shelley Duvall's Faerie Tale Theatre collection (also best known from the Disney Channel airings), Shrek and Shrek 2, The Slipper and the Rose (for a live-action Cinderella), Ever After (another live-action Cinderella), The Adventures of Pinocchio (1996), Peter Pan (2003), The Wizard of Oz, Return to Oz, and Rodger's and Hammerstein's Cinderella (1965) among others!</review_text>
I had forgotten how awesome this movie is- even for a grown-up, like me. It could do without all the songs (it was made before Disney wisely decided to ditch all the cheesy singing,) but it's brisk, double-layered humor more than makes up for it. Kids will think the gags are sufficiently silly. Adults will pick up on the nearly-sarcastic, nearly risque dialog, so rare in Disney animated movies. Plus, Big Foot dancing to 'Stayin' Alive' is just freaking hilarious.Basically, it's just a Disney movie. But it's a *great (and severely under appreciated) Disney movie</review_text>
Great shows about Binky taking up cycling and learning to challenge himself. There's a cycling champion, Vance Legstrong, who inspires him to succeed (wonder who that character is modeled after). 'Operation DW' is about DW having surgery to get tubes put in her ears. Some really funny stuff in this one but that's pretty much par for the course with the DW based episodes</review_text>
After watching this video I examined the Bible and it is very close to the scriptures in accuracy.  It helps give the Bible life so that you can see the reality of creation, and vividly picture these true events that occured thousands of years ago in our history.  This is truly a video the whole family can enjoy together</review_text>
La Haine is basically a day in the lives of three guys from ghettos on the outskirts of Paris.  After an apparently race-motivated police beating/murder, the ghettos are rife with looters, rioters, and many bigoted and intrusive police(or pigs, as the characters fondly refer to them), suspicious of anyone not caucasian or under 30.  In its most reductive form, it's about a flawed society whose seams are bursting under the pressures of ignorance, intolerance, and various -isms.  In the movie itself, this tends to remain below the surface of the characters' existences, but for in a few moments (namely encounters with police and skinheads) and brought to the forefront with a bathroom scat anecdote and repeated reference to a (very bitter) joke involving society, man, and rabbit jumping off a building (the movie is frequently funny).  Although it takes place in France, where these issues are perhaps less closeted (what with Le Pen getting 15 percent of the vote...), any close examination of pretty much every "modern, 1st world" nation  will reveal just how ingrained these problems are in the present state of the world</review_text>
Nostalgia for my childhood recently caused me to buy and watch the Cheech and Chong movies (with the exception of The Coriscan Brothers).  Aside from realizing I shouldn't have been watching those movies in my pre-teen days, I realized how well done they are.  Most amazing to me was that they  held up one after the other, feeling not repetitive, though each of them is rather episodic. Most impressive was Chong's direction; he makes a number of interesting choices that elevate him beyond the status of writer/star who has enough power to direct; clearly, he took this role quite seriously.  The movies, of course, are not serious.  I rarely laugh out loud in movies these days, but I did at least a half dozen times in each of these.  The characters are not only given funny situations in which to work and funny lines to deliver, but each of them is presented with a kind of earnestness that makes them likeable, and the films all he more watchable.</review_text>
Dino made a number of Westerns, everything from the comic Western Pardners with Jerry Lewis, to a whodunit Western, Five Card Stud with Robert Mitchum, to playing an alcoholic lawman in Rio Bravo. But Martin had a field day playing the villain in Rough Night In Jericho, a hard-bitten, violent movie.Martin plays Jason Flood, an ex-lawman who has taken over the town of Jericho. George Peppard and John McIntire plays former lawmen as well, who have been contracted to provide a stage to Jean Simmons, who Flood is trying to force into going into business with him. Flood is also an ex of Simmons, which makes him even more determined not to let Peppard and McIntyre help her out.Things get increasingly violent until the final showdown, where the blood flows freely. Everyone is good in this film, fro mthe three leads to McIntire, who was always superb, particularly in Westerns, as well as the great Slim Pickens as one of Flood's henchmen. Rough Night In Jericho is overlooked, but it's very entertaining</review_text>
Being released as part of a two disc, dual layered dual sided Hammer Horror set from Universal in September, "Curse of the Werewolf" features a fine performance from a very young Oliver Reed. You'll need to use the ASIN below or the webpage to find it as it isn't listed (at present) under its own title but under "Phantom of the Opera". Set in Spain (although Guy Evans source novel is set in France) Reed Plays Leon who's mother died during child birth and whose father raped the girl. Born in Christmas Day, it's clear that Leon is cursed; the baptism water boils which is not a good sign to say the least. The boy is adopted by Don Alfredo Corledo (Clifford Evans). Early on it's clear things are amiss as livestock are routinely killed whenever the moon is full.As Leon grows into adulthood and he discovers the truth about his past and learns what he really becomes when the moon is full. Featuring a surprisingly good script by Anthony Hinds (writing as John Elder)and featuring a top flight cast "Curse of the Werewolf" is one of Fisher's best films. Like "Horror of Dracula", Fisher managed to put his stamp on the Hammer films he directed for the studio and his personality informs the film much as it did his other films.Go to:http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/tg/detail/-/B0009X770O/ref=cm_aya_asin.title/103-7994494-6895042?%5Fencoding=UTF8&v=glanceor:ASIN: B0009X770O  to order this fine film.</review_text>
This 1960 effort by famed Hammer Productions of London, England is one of their finest efforts, and the greatest werewolf film ever made.  Even by today's standards, the make-up for the werewolf is eye-opening and well  worth the wait to see.  The movie is filled with underlying themes and for  those who look, it may be filled with a number of messages that are not  readily apparent from the otherwise simple narrative.  Color photography,  normally a strong suit in Hammer Films anyway, is among their very best.  The performance by the young Oliver Reed as the werewolf is filled with  energy and passion.  A highlight of Director Terence Fisher's accomplished  career.  If you only can have one werewolf film, this is the one</review_text>
CSI is great and Downloading was very easy.  This is my fourth video, and I've only had problems with one, and Amazon quickly walked me through fixing it.  Gotta agree with A. Huck on the DSL, though.  While it's certainly useable the higher speed of cable would be great</review_text>
CSI is great and Downloading was very easy.  This is my fourth video, and I've only had problems with one, and Amazon quickly walked me through fixing it.  Gotta agree with A. Huck on the DSL, though.  While it's certainly useable the higher speed of cable would be great</review_text>
In the late 80's to early 90's, Mickey Rourke may as well have been a porn star. Hell, every movie Rourke was in he was playing the same character who got a different hot chick...They were big-screen soft core porn films. Problem is, Mickey Rourke is so good at playing these characters that the movies he's done aren't that bad. Here, Rourke plays Wheeler...Who won't really enter into the synopsis for a moment. Rourke's ex-wife Carre Otis plays Emily, a young International lawyer who recieves a job with a big firm in New York and is hastily sent to Rio De Janeiro. In Rio, with her boss Claudia (Jaqueline Bisset) away; Emily begins to come into contact with sex almost everywhere she goes. Then, she meets Wheeler. Wheeler is that odd, soft-spoken, rich, womanizer guy every guy wishes they could be. Wheeler is the guy who says stuff to women in movies that we would never be able to get away with, but onscreen it just looks so damned easy. Anyway, unlike "9 1/2 Weeks", Wheeler and Emily don't just begin having sex. In fact, the big sex payoff isn't until the final minutes of the movie. And let's face it, if you rent this movie...You're not renting it for the story. Truth is, the story's not even that intriguing or event good for that matter. The whole movie has a plot like a soft-core porn movie. Thing is, Otis and Rourke have enough charisma on screen to pull of a movie like this. So, even if you ignore the sex, the movie isn't that bad. I, personally, think it's better than 9 1/2 Weeks. Fact is, even if you don't give a damn about the story. Carre Otis is f**king hot, so check it out.GRADE: B+</review_text>
This is a good alternative to the bombard of Hollywood films. It potrays beutifully and naturally the meaning of love and the loneliness of the elderly. I live in one of the Asian countries where the famili members still have strong emotional bound to one another. Watching this film, I came to realize how lonely one's life can be when one grows old in the so called modern countries. Because things are so modernized, things have got so mechanical, human relation is no exception. This happens to the mother in this film. It is so touchy to see when the mother and the father come to visit her son's family, everybody is so busy with his/her business, everybody is in a rush and in the end the two of them have to stay in a quiet house with nobody around. Their visit is not strong enough to hold people from minding his/her business.Her being attracted to the young carpenter is a sign that she actually needs attention and that she is lonely rather than the raw 'love' between a man and a woman.I recommend this film to those who love to watch a film about love, family and relationship.</review_text>
"The Mother" is a provocative look at a scarcely filmed reality - a woman who isn't ready to stay home, watch "the telly," and vegetates after her husband of nearly three decades, and a controlling, dominating chap at that, packs it in with a massive heart attack.May (Anne Reid)  is strong in her resolve to both acknowledge her sexuality and expect, indeed demand, a future of happiness. But she is also inescapably vulnerable. She's fishing in uncharted emotional waters. Who controls her relationship with Darren and why are difficult issues for her to understand, much less resolve. In her sixties, she's still a work in progress."Something's Gotta Give" showcased mature sexuality but in an amusingly antiseptic way assuring no viewer would be discomfited. After all it's Jack Nicholson and the always beautiful Diane Keaton cavorting in the world of the rich. And to insure that no serious psycho-social issues were explored, Keaton's young girlfriend, Amanda Peet, daughter of Keaton, not only blesses the match but insures that the audience knows she and her old (er) would-be lover never hopped into the sack.Not on this film. People probably gasped when May writhed passionately in bed with her younger hunk lover, Darren (Daniel Craig)  or later saw sexually explicit drawings by May when this first came out on theaters. I doubt the audience was aghast at the nudity or the drawings' content as much as feeling uneasy at seeing a woman in her 60s rapturously enjoying sex. It's to be inspected that Anne Reid's inspired performance forces discomfort on some while drawing respect from others. I truly ejoyed this film last night and will never forget it.Kudos to director Roger Michell for tackling a fascinating story with verve and empathy.</review_text>
With the death of her infirmed husband, May, an older woman faces a future in an urban world that views her as invisible, dead from the neck down, and unwelcome in the pseudo- sophisticated yuppie homes of her son, Bobby and his shallow wife, Helen, and Paula, a self- absorbed, clinging, and minimally talented daughter. The central family is anything but warm, supportive, and understanding of her new and tragic stage in life with the death of her husband. The Mother is a quiet character study that points up how in some societies, the elder parent is both unwelcome and a burden to grown children whose careers and status seeking overshadow all else.As May comes to realize the world is still important to her, the lonely widow finds her libido reawakened and alive with her daughter's boyfriend, a carpenter and rough sort. May embarks on an uninhibited sexual affair with Darren whose character is sympathetic to her at first, but his flawed nature is quickly revealed through the pressures of the women who surround him.This is the kind of role Hollywood actresses of a certain age whine is never written for them, but they would never appear because of the frank and overt sexuality, unglamorous wardrobe, little makeup, and social commentary on the vapidness of the society most film industry women are involved. The performance by the lead actress, Anne Reid ranges from quiet to giddy and her interpretation blossoms on screen from the drab widow to a sexually alive and freed middle age woman without face-lift, hair extensions, and liposuction. She bares more than her soul for the screen.Daniel Craig is the enabling handyman, Derrek who beds both mother and daughter. He turns in another stellar performance that is at first sympathetic to the widow's situation, but in the end is without redemption as his true nature unfold and he is literally the rooster in a hen-house. His aimless character's inability to say no to the ex-wife, boring girlfriend, and her mother is blamed as the root of his ineffectual existence. While good with his hands at building a conservatory, he is unable to construct meaning in his life.One of the best films from Britain in years, it is simply adult in its storyline. The Mother is the rare kind of film that is perhaps too honest for American audiences to tolerate having no car chase, no bling, no rap soundtrack to drown out the cretin performances by TV starlets and buff studmuffins. The Mother reflects how the aging baby boomers are now disposable people that offspring are willing to overlook, send to the retirement home, and get out of the way. May doesn't know what to do as she is made alive by Darren, isn't willing to go to the old folks home, and finds her kids are more conservative than she ever was at their age</review_text>
Magic looks very nice on DVD. Solid clean picture quality with original basic mono soundtrack. A pleasant suprise from Dark Sky Films</review_text>
This is an excellent hour. I did not always like the spice girls, I fell in love with them when I read real life, real spice, their book; and found out they were real people. since then I have been really trying hard to get  to know them, which is real hard in the U.S.A. This hour of girl power  documents their early years, it includes full length vesions of  &quot;wannabe, mama, say you'll be there, 2 become 1, who do you think you  are&quot; also preformances in London,Tours in Hong Kong, New York,L.A. and  at the Brit awards. This video will help you catch up, with the best female  band of all time. The video also includes exclusive behind the scene  footage. It's the closest you can get to the spice girls without meeting  them.  Rock on Spice girls</review_text>
The Spice Girls are the best!and if you are a Spice Fan than this is the movie for you.I love i</review_text>
This is one of my all time favorite films.  Fosse only made 5 feature films in his career (Sweet Charity, Cabaret, Lenny, this one, and Star 80), but everyone is a masterpiece.  This is his best film.  It's an autobiographical film about a filmmaker/choreographer who's addicted to work, booze, pills, sex, work, booze, more pills, etc., etc..  It's definitely based of Fosse himself, and it's a rather painful portrait.  Fosse should be commended for admitting (for lack of a better term) that's he's not a great person.  There's no "closure" scenes here, where Joe Gideon (wonderfully played by Roy Scheider, Fosse's alter ego) realises the error of his ways, and makes peace with everyone.  Fosse shows warts and more warts, but in spite of that, the film is amazing.  Brilliantly edited, shot, acted, and choreographed, this is Fosse's best film, one that really defined him as an artist.  Fosse was not a prolific filmmaker, but when he did make a film, it was a masterpiece.  And this is his greatest one...</review_text>
this movie points out to us that which we are all capable of...a moving reminder of our own preciousness..</review_text>
I loved this quirky movie.  I am glad to have it on dvd.</review_text>
My first viewing of the campy film Secretary could not have been more ironic because I had been working as a secretary -- ahem, assistant -- for a solo practitioner for only two months. I recall leaving the theater feeling empowered despite knowing that the next day I would have to fetch whatever my boss wanted, when he wanted it. There are bosses, not just the lawyers, who long for the old-fashioned secretary.Bravo to the filmmaker for rendering Secretary's unflinching revelations about emotional pain as unsettling as its erotic depictions of the catharsis of that pain. I found, and still find, the film to be a surreal and vicarious pleasure. Not that what ensues between the boss and assistant in Secretary is unrealistic. Perhaps you know of a solo proprietor whose temp secretaries kept quitting but who now has a full-time assistant. Why is that assistant a perfect match?Intellectually, I admire the filmmaker's courage in commenting poetically upon the ways in which American society conditions women to be passive and to devalue themselves. Leave it to an art/indie film to expose how some (or many?) American women find themselves either stuck in a time warp of adolescent vanity or suffering through existential paralysis. Because American women are taught to identify and value themselves through their relationships with men, it is a total thrill in Secretary to watch the script flip the stereotype of the skirt-chasing boss on its head.In terms of casting, I cannot imagine anyone but Maggie Gyllenhaal in the title role. Her secretary is like the repressed alter ego of Elizabeth Taylor's Maggie the Cat on that hot tin roof -- full of angst but no less smoldering. Maggie G. appears to purr rather than speak. James Spader, who once upon a time seemed typecast as a snooty yuppie, gets the chance in Secretary to fully realize his erotic potential. While his character can be viewed as tongue-in-cheek, he delivers a genuinely quirky and sensitive performance.When you get down to it, the various vicarious experiences in Secretary will please some and repulse others. For me, I received instant motivation to strive for accuracy in transcribing my boss's future dictation</review_text>
This is a wonderful film. It has powerful messages.  There are numerous examples of how teamwork acheives something.  My favourite is the tale we are told in little scraps about how the kid sister got wounded driving a guy to the air base - so he could fly a fighter and shoot down some Japs.The film is emotionally very powerful.  It is designed to make you hate Japanese people, and to support bombing of enemy cities.There was a war on - there was a need to get people to support such policies.Since the official policy was to put Japanese Americans in concentration camps, the film justifies the policy.Similarly the film portrays the effectiveness of US military equipment such as bomb-sights in a positive way.  They were hardly going to portray it as hopeless.The film is not historically accurate.  It would not have been helpful to have produced a historically accurate film.  CNN reports about Kosovo in 1998-99 were just as inaccurate for the same reasons</review_text>
The legendary Howard Hawks directed this WWII classic about the Mary Ann, a B-17 bomber lead by Captain John Ridgely and featuring crew members Gig Young, Harey Carey, Arthur Kennedy, Charles Drake, George Tobias, Ray Montgomery, and John Garfield.  On a routine mission to Hawaii, the crew arrives just hours after the Pearl Harbor attack and find themselves thrust into war.  Other stops include Wake Island and the Philippines. Of course, one of the purposes of this film was to rally the American spirit, and it features some of the anti-Japanese dialogue you'd have to expect.  But the film succeeds beyond the propaganda value.  The action sequences are well filmed and exciting, with terrific aerial action and some good ground sequences, too.  The camraderie amongst the crew is credible.  Each member has his own small "back story" as you would expect, but these fine character actors make it all very believable (Harry Carey is a particular standout).  This film is a true WWII classic</review_text>
Here Comes Mr. Jordan is a delightful 1941 fantasy film that would later be remade with Warren Beatty (although not nearly as good) as Heaven Can Wait. Robert Montgomery, father of Elizabeth Montgomery of Bewitched fame, plays boxer Joe Pendleton, who is on the verge of fighting for the title. Joe is plucked out of his airplane just before it crashes by an inexperienced angel played by Edward Everett Horton who wanted to save him the pain of the crash. The Angel's Boss Mr. Jordan (Claude Rains) finds out that Joe isn't supposed to die for another 50 years and orders the over-eager Angel 7013 to put Joe back in his body. Unfortunately, Joe's body has been cremated by his boxing manager.Now Mr. Jordan, 7013, and Joe scour the world to find a new body for his spirit. But it has to be a body that is in perfect physical shape..."in the pink" as Joe keeps demanding. Joe is offered the wealthy body of Bruce Farnsworth who has just been murdered by his scheming wife and his male secretary. Joe at first refuses until he sees the beautiful Bette Logan who desperately needs Farnsworth's help to get her father out of jail. Joe agrees to take Farnsworth's body for just a short time to help Ms. Logan. His wife and secretary Tony Abbott are more than a little shocked to see Farnsworth come down the stairs after they thought they drowned him in his bath.Joe soon decides he wants to keep Farnsworth's body as he has fallen in love with Bette and thinks he can get Farnsworth's body into shape to resume his boxing career. But first he has to convince his skeptical manager, Max played by wonderful character actor James Gleason.Here Comes Mr. Jordan is a great feel-good, comedy fantasy with a fantastic cast. Montgomery is superb as the street-wise boxer, now in control of a vast fortune but still only concerned with his boxing career. The bickering between he and Edward Everett Horton is hilarious. Claude Rains really steals the show as the wise angel Mr. Jordan, always with a knowing, sly smile on his face. Vastly superior to its remakes, this is a great film.Reviewed by Tim Janson</review_text>
The msde was received by due date in excellent condition</review_text>
I love this movie. Maybe it's because it seemed so risque as a kid, or maybe it's because Jane hates it. Whatever, it's great fun. Sure the script leaves much to be desired. And yea, the special effects suck. It was 1968, what do you want? But that only adds to its charm. It's a funny movie, more on the silly side. This is true camp and if you like campy flicks, this one has to be in your collection</review_text>
This episode is a bit different than the others I have seen, although I have not yet seen all of season 2 yet.  Without giving anything away, this episode shows growth in 3 of characters as human beings.  Additionally, it has some inventive guest characters.  Finally, it presents some moral and ethical questions</review_text>
I really love Bones.  It has everything: suspense, drama, humor, pretty people, fun storylines.  I have yet to miss an episode, and even into Season 2 this is probably my favorite.  It adds depth to all of the characters.  Also, the winter holidays are my favorite time of year.  I like holidays that are about what is good in the world.  Bones is about people standing for the good in humanity even though they explore the very worst every day.  I cry through half this episode, but in a completely good way.  Buy, watch it, love it.  But watch it with a friend if you don't want to cry alone.  So moving, great performances by the whole cast.  Emily Deschanel was powerful in this one, she brings real vulnerability to Brennan here.  David Boreanaz, as always the perfect sympathetic hero, loveably old-fashioned. Cute, funny moments.  Touching, poignant moments.  This really is the best of what is great about Bones</review_text>
Funny that someone would produce a "chick flick" based on the relationship of Novalyne Price to author Robert E. Howard, creator of the sci-fi/fantasy character Conan. No doubt someone in Hollywood thought the irony of filming a romantic character study of the man who wrote the classic male-oriented action-thriller stories of the 1930s would be a good way to attract an unlikely mix of female romance fans and fans of the Conan books and comics.Well the ploy worked, as I got my husband (severely allergic to chick flicks) to sit down and watch this one with me. "You probably won't like this," I said, "but it does show two creative people, one of them is the guy [Robert E. Howard] who wrote the Conan books."Vincent D'Onofrio plays Robert E. Howard, a man who simultaneously looks sympathetic and psychopathic (his portrayal of Private  Pyle in "Full Metal Jacket" is one of film history's creepiest moments). That he actually resembles Howard as a bonus.Timeless beauty Rene Zellweger plays the intelligent Price, a local Texas school teacher who becomes romantically interested in Howard, a recluse that types his stories with extreme intensity in the privacy of his home while taking care of an ailingmother.My favorite scene is the one where where Renee's character is demonstrating how much she appreciates language in its ability to describe the scenery around them.  Robert E. Howard's response boils down to, "That's great, but what the hell happens?"  and he begins imagining an exciting adolescent heroic fantasy intruding into her peaceful meadow.  The scene almost makes you feel guilty for realizing that there are real reasons why Conan and other pulp fiction characters endure and outsell all but the very best of the more respectable stuff.  The film, as my brother (another Howard fan, who named his dog after Conan) notes, also didn't shy away from the fact that most of the best pulp work was based on insecure power trips written by and for arrested adolescents with real issues.Here is the difficulty Howard fans, such as my husband, who has written reams of what he has written, will have with the film. The story is told from his girlfriend Novalyn's  perspective so a very important aspect of Howard's life, the specifics and depth of his stories,  is largely skimmed over. The film sums up Howard's work by showing Price in a witty scene comparing her breast size with the bosoms of Howard's characters, and by showing the shock of people as he describes or acts out his work in public. There is some attempt at showing his desire to create the deeper more assertive female character Valeria in "Red Nails" but it is only a passing mention in conversation.Howard is depicted as resting on the edge of insanity at times, which is believable considering his tragic end. He doesn't just write, he becomes his characters.Price, an aspiring writer herself, hopes to learn from Howard but is put off by his erratic behavior and a more romantic interest in him that wishes he'd write nicer stories with more pleasant sympathetic characters. This void between them prevents the viewers ... or should I say Howard fans from knowing which stories he was working on at what time in the plot."The Devil in Iron" is the only one mentioned by name and others are hinted at including a boxing story, "Queen of the Black Coast," and his last masterpiece "Red Nails," which many fans regard as his finest story (or yarn as Robert calls them in the film). As my husband has read all of his books and many different comic adaptations he was able to pick out some of the works from his ramblings behind the typewriter, but his work is treated as a distracting  sideshow  by the film, in spite of the Price character's attempts to be non-judgmental and open-minded about his topics. The real story of the film is a battle between Price and Howard's mother for his attention.This may be an accurate dramatization of Price's feelings but to a Howard fan its a little bit like treating Michaelangelo's David or the Sistine Chapel as incidental in the story of his life.A talented artist will live their work, become their characters, the events will be in their heads almost as if it is reality. The work is hardly incidental, it is their life. The film dramatizes this but omits the actual stories.To sum it up, "The Whole Wide World" is an engaging romance that will keep the attention of both men and women watching at home, but in the end may disappoint Howard fans (but not too much). My husband has stacked five of his Conan paperbacks by my desk for me to read, all as a result of making him watch this DVD with me.By the way, if you are wondering about the title, it's based on Howard shouting to Novalyn that he wants to be the best writer "in the whole wide world.</review_text>
I bought this DVD for my kids because they love the story of Goodnight Moon, and the cost was too low to pass up.  This video has exceded our expectations.  The kids ask to watch it every night before bed.  They love that there are other kids telling stories and talking about bedtime.  In addition, there are several other well known stories, songs, lullabies, etc.  This is definitely worth the money, and makes a great gift for toddlers</review_text>
I LOVE this DVD, in fact I purchased 5 to give as Baby Shower Extras!I originally taped it from HBO, and my 3 Grandchildren almost wore it out!I was delighted to see it available on DVD, so I bought 5, and am keeping one in my DVD Library for my Great-Grandchildren some day to enjoy!</review_text>
the pang of lost chances and the breakup of friendships made during shared experiences...whether it be high school, college, or any specific period of life.  Everytime I see Fandango, the experience and emotions of finishing college and leaving friends made during that time hits me all over again.  As other reviewers have noted, the soundtrack is especially masterful (the use of Pat Metheny during the wedding sequence is a particular favorite</review_text>
Dr Smith and the Robot go hog wild, switching personalities and swapping insults.  This is a great episode</review_text>
This was my first download and it was "free".  The download performed well.  "The Mystery of Edgar Allan Poe" was informative.  It ran up to 50 minutes. This was a Unbox Video Download. It started with the typical intro and ended with the credits. Some individuals did not get a complete download so i included my experience with the Unbox download.  i hope the review was helpful. ty</review_text>
This was my favorite episode as a kid.  I was so happy to see I could download it to watch with my kids</review_text>
Nostalgia for my childhood recently caused me to buy and watch the Cheech and Chong movies (with the exception of The Coriscan Brothers).  Aside from realizing I shouldn't have been watching those movies in my pre-teen days, I realized how well done they are.  Most amazing to me was that they  held up one after the other, feeling not repetitive, though each of them is rather episodic. Most impressive was Chong's direction; he makes a number of interesting choices that elevate him beyond the status of writer/star who has enough power to direct; clearly, he took this role quite seriously.  The movies, of course, are not serious.  I rarely laugh out loud in movies these days, but I did at least a half dozen times in each of these.  The characters are not only given funny situations in which to work and funny lines to deliver, but each of them is presented with a kind of earnestness that makes them likeable, and the films all he more watchable.</review_text>
This was a great movie.  While not my favorite John Wayne movie, it is still a good one!  I always laugh at the scenes where his character is getting jealous about his friend being with Angel.  Nobody does it like John Wayne.  Love the song too!</review_text>
This episode is a bit different than the others I have seen, although I have not yet seen all of season 2 yet.  Without giving anything away, this episode shows growth in 3 of characters as human beings.  Additionally, it has some inventive guest characters.  Finally, it presents some moral and ethical questions</review_text>
Juliette Binoche is an amazing actress.  Since her Best Supporting Actress Oscar for "The English Patient" in 1996 and her nomination for "Chocolat," she's an actress whose films I seek.  "The Widow of Saint-Pierre" has a bit of irony to the title.  The opening frames show Binoche in black staring out of a window.  We then move into the flashback in which most of the film moves forward.  We learn that the "widow" is the guillotine that must be shipped by boat from France before the big execution can take place.  We see director Emir Kusturica in an acting role as the very large prisoner Neel whose rehabilitation Binoche's Madame La seeks.  We keep wondering if the black dress is saved for the prisoner.  Daniel Autereil who won a Cesar (French Oscar) for his work with director Patrice Leconte for "Ridicule" in 1996 plays the lovestruck Captain who is in charge of the execution.  Spurred on by his wild and unconditional love for his wife, he thwarts the town's sentence of death at every turn, refusing to allow his soldiers to help haul the widow ship to shore.  In the moment of ultimate irony, Neel volunteers to help bring the widow to shore, which is sure to result in his own execution.  The bloody resolution and the final shots of Binoche in black bring the story to its somber conclusion.  Patrice Leconte has a great reserve, shooting this excellent screenplay in period costume and letting the depth of his cast work its magic.  This is an incredibly tragic romance, one that works exquisitely.  Enjoy!</review_text>
Great film. Steve Martin, Goldie Hawn and Dana Delany are fantastic in this enjoyable, fun moview.  Both Steve and Goldie are hard for any others to match. They easily switch from comedians to serious.  A film you'll enjoy watching repeatedly</review_text>
"Never Say Never Again" is a fantastic action thriller directed by Irvin Kershner. It is the remake of "Thunderball". However, it is still an enjoyable action packed adventure movie.Sean Connery plays his role brilliantly, despite his age (53). This is vintage Sean Connery, an older, wiser and audacious man. He has not lost his touch with ladies. Kim gives a good performance as the bad guy's pal. Barbara Carrera performs her role as the sexy, clever and wicked Fatima Blush very well. Klaus Maria Brandauer is also a remarkable villain while Irvin Kershner's direction is commendable. Rowan Atkinson makes an interesting and amusing appearance.Among some of my unforgettable scenes are the opening war-game teaser, the battle with Lippe at Shrublands, and a great motorcycle chase. Despite his age, Connery is surprisingly very fast, agile and very witty.The plot is sound and interesting. A SPECTRE agent under the command of Ernst Blofeld infiltrates a US Air Force base located in the United Kingdom and steals two Tomahawk cruise missiles. James Bond must find them before they are detonated. The characterization is superb and I liked the ending.</review_text>
Life imitates art.  The main character in this movie may have seemed over the top when it was released.  But today, this movie seems almost like a documentary.  This is a true horror classic.  It's among the best of this particular genre.  Do NOT watch in on a full stomach</review_text>
"To Live," does not hold the same appeal for me as it once did in the past. However, I do recommend viewers to at least take a look at this film. The films narrative deals with the lives of Fugui and Jiazhen, a husband and wife with two children, as well as Fugui's mother. The time period is from the 1940s up to the 1980s. Because Fugui has a gambling problem the family loses everything: house and possessions, which splits the family apart. It is a time when the Chinese Nationalist's and Communist's are battling for control of China. Further, the film deals with the social upheaval that is afffecting the lives of many Chinese. Although the film never criticizes the changes incurred by Mao Tse Tung, just the view of the how people's lives were affected accomplishes this task very well.And although this film does not look deeply enough at the changes taking place in China in the chaotic 40s, 50s, and 60s with Mao's reforms and its affects on the people; I don't think that this is what the director had in mind. Especially regarding the films main protagonists. On later viewings I realized that there was much missing in the film which could have made this a truly great film. As the viewer, one witnesses the changes occuring in China, but the real horror of Mao's reforms are put on the backburner. There is social upheaval occuring, but it appears tame in comparison to actual events. However, Fugui and his pregnant wife are the films main protagonists, and the film is about their life in this new China. With poverty now a way of life, Fugui decides to work at a puppet troupe. After the birth of their first child [a son] Jiazhen returns to Fugui, however, civil war has broken out causing Fugui to leave for the fight. The rise of Mao changes everything for these two individuals in the films narrative.And even though they have suffered [as many other did too] they never complain. The film never throws Mao at the viewer, but he is left in the background of the film. However, this was a very clever use of directing in order to tell the story of these two individuals. This is a decent film of human tragedy, which I only feel could have been so much more. I recommend the film to those viewers [rent it first] who are not familiar with this period in Chinese history. This is not a propaganda film, but a film about those caught in the unheaval of turbulent times. Recommended. [Stars: 4.5</review_text>
"The Last Picture Show" is a film of great artistry without being artsy.  Director Peter Bogdanovich imbues the film with deep texture but there is a context for this.  In other words, this is a film with great style and substance.  I don't know if the studios would bankroll such a film today.  It's not a film that can easily be described but once you experience it you'll be forever haunted by it.  Some would say the film is a litany of disparate vignettes but these episodes when taken as a whole cohere.  What is amazing is that there are many characters here but all are allowed to develope.  It would be fruitless to cite any over the other because it is a true ensemble effort.  What's interesting is that Ben Johnson and Cloris Leachman won Oscars for their work here.  In both cases these are not showy performances but works of great understatement and subtlety.  Though not unworthy of such accolades, I'm amazed that the Academy would recognize these performances because they don't detract from any others in the film</review_text>
Comparisons to the 1937 classic are inevitable. Story-wise, there is little difference except for the colonization of the remake. Many of the frames are carbon copies of each other. This reviewer feels that the b&amp;w format of the original added to the suspense. The original cast is clearly superior especially the male leads of Ronald Coleman, David Niven and C. Aubrey Smith. Also, Douglas Fairbanks Jr. outshines James Mason as Rupert of Hentzau, the main bad guy. (I wonder if a stunt man performed that high dive.) A nice gesture is the cameo role of Lewis Stone,  the star of the 1922 SILENT version. It is the 1952 female leads who compare most favorably: Deborah Kerr comes very close to equaling Madeleine Carroll as the lovely Queen Flavia, with her strong (!) sense of duty. And Jane Greer probably surpasses Mary Astor's 1937 role. Both Mary and Jane are key to the plot. Watch them closely! Blessedly, despite the many frame similarities, the remake does not carbon copy the 1937 fadeout, with Ronald Coleman's gallant wave of farewell. On its' own merits, the 1952 version is a very credible adventure story indeed. It only suffers from comparison to an original classic it cannot possibly surpass</review_text>
Loved this movie! Eddie is in his element; this movie will leave you cheering on the edge of your seat. Both Eddie and director Robert M. Young are magical</review_text>
This has got to be the funniest, most warped show on cable today.  It's the ultimate show about nothing - a group of morally-deficient 20-somethings who own an Irish pub in Philadelphia.  They care about nothing but outdoing each other for attention and money.  They constantly argue over the dumbest things and come from families more dysfunctional than anyone can imagine.To give you an idea of the show's themes:  there are episodes that revolve around one of the characters trolling for dates at an abortion rally; another in which the gang tries to outdo each other by pretending to be crippled, just to see who can get the most attention and sympathy from strangers; and an episode in which the gang charges people to view a "vision" of the Virgin Mary (actually a water stain in the bar).  The dialogue is made up of all the things people are thinking but won't say.  No tender or sappy moments here, these are episodes you would NEVER see on the Hallmark Channel or Lifetime.One of the most unique comedies on tv, and by far one of the best.  I look forward to many more new seasons of "It's Always Sunny..." and am hopeful it does not lose its edge or pursue milktoast or nonoffensive story lines.</review_text>
"Grave Of The Fireflies" was one of the hardest-watching movies I've ever seen, and one I wouldn't have missed for the world.  Taking place in Japan during the latter parts of World War II (though it could be any country in any war), it's the story of two children, Seita and Setsuko, who are left on their own when their mother dies in the destruction of a small town, and are left to attempt to survive on their own.  Seita, the brother, is the older of the two and it falls to him to guard and care for his sister Setsuko, who's little more than a toddler.  The two  hold out hope that their father, a member of the Japanese navy, will eventually return for them.  Seita and Setsuko are wonderful and captivating characters who seem uncannily real, making their plight all the more terrifying and heartbreaking.What's perhaps most horrifying about the whole experience is not just the brutalities of war, because that was to be expected; but the terribly callous nature of many of the 'ordinary people' the children encounter during their ordeal.  During the darkest days of the war, when logically one would think the survivors would be pulling together, the case was often anything but.  Even the family of Setsuko and Seita's mother does not want to be 'burdened' with them.  Although examples of people who react differently do crop up later, for the bulk of the time the children are on their own as ruin befalls the world around them.  The children, and the fireflies that Setsuko finds, and keeps in a jar, talking to them and feeding them, and releasing them at night to fly about the makeshift shelter Seita has constructed.  Abandoned by humanity, the little glowing insects are the only living creatures the children find companionship with.There are bright and tender, even humorous, moments amidst the tragedy - some of them are overt, others occur in places where the meaning is subject to interpretation.  But it remains a harrowing movie, one of the most crushing ever made.  Extremely haunting, extremely powerful, and, in an odd way, extremely rewarding.  There are glimmers and whispers of possibility flitting, firefly-like, through the darkness, and the effect is truly eerie.  I'll refrain from hinting at the ending, but there are certainly a host of moments that sear themselves into one's heart.  If this movie doesn't leave you shaken, nothing's ever going to</review_text>
This is the type of story that scares me: where seemingly innocuous decisions propel characters toward a devastating fate.  The characters, portrayed by Claire Danes and Kate Beckinsale, are going to be friends for life even if they slowly, eventually drift apart.  For a final trip together they decide not to go the safe, routine route of going to Hawaii, again, and want something different, perhaps a little adventurous, so they decide on Thailand.  While there they meet a charismatic, only slightly mysterious man on their trip and are both immediately enamored with him; and the jealousy starts to seep in.  In the midst of this subtle, female power struggle they are both conned and subsequently accused of smuggling narcotics and sent to jail. One poor decision after another and they are spinning helplessly down the drain.  It's always the more realistic tales of decent people caught up and tossed about by circumstance that are more frightening to me than the Hollywood horror-fests with aliens and gore.  There are many intense scenes throughout this film that had me caring about the principle actors and how were they ever going to get out of this horrible and unfair situation.  Claire Danes deserves top billing as she plays an average girl trapped in an unthinkable scenario, whereas everyone watching can relate to her emotional state at any given time.  She is truly a talent.  Kate Beckinsale nearly reaches the same level of intensity playing the all-American daddy's girl caught up in the chaos.  For that matter, when the two leads are playing off one another the chemistry is equally excellent.  Bill Pullman makes his presence felt with a conscience-stricken, kind-hearted turn as their lawyer.  There are even a handful of supporting characters that are memorable which makes this a veritable feast of character actors.  This is a movie worth watching over and again, and it is easy to recommend</review_text>
I reluctantly gave this superb film 5 stars not because of any shortcomings in the script or the acting-both are unbelievebly good-but because of what the studio had done to the movie.It was originally released at over 3 hours in lenght. When exhibitors demanded that it be shortened Warner's obliged by cutting it to 154 minutes. In the early 1980s the studio realized what it really had, and set about reconstructing and restoring the movie.Because of initial sloppiness (footage being thrown out), it became impossible to fully reconstruct the film. The result is that there is a segment of some 7 minutes of stills about one hour into the picture trying to restore some of the lost scenes. Gone, too, apparently. is Vicki Lester's screen test.All of this aside, what the viewer sees on the 1999 digitally restored DVD is superb. The color correction of the nearly 20 minutes it was possible to restore is excellent. The actors' performances are outstanding. Not only is Garland a superb singer and dancer,but the close intimate scenes with Mason radiate a warmth and tenderness rarely captured on film. Mason, too, is superb as Norman Maine. When drunk, his character is absolutely dispicable-becoming phisical and violent. Great, too, is the supporting cast.Jack Carson as the studio publicist Libby plays the role with much more profesionalialism and less corniness than his counterpart Lionel Streater did in 1937.This is, by far, the best version of the film and well worth owning and viewing- dispite the minor shortcomings of its reconstruction.There is not one corny word of dialog in the Moss Hart script</review_text>
Bones is one of my favorite TV series. This one episode I missed so I had to get it to keep on track. Great show even if you have never seen it from the begining</review_text>
This is not a shoot-em-up Western. If that is what you are after, stop reading right here. What this is, is a real heartfelt tribute to the cowboy. The genuine article cowboy. In particular, it charts a group of cowboys through the decline of the golden age of the cowboy, near the end of the 19th Century. Almost the whole of the first half of the movie, there is no plot to speak of, just character exposition building up the picture of the life and character that these men had. Nothing is rushed, and yet it is never dull, thanks to an intelligent script. There are humorous moments and great lines, but plenty of pathos and melancholy too, as the characters all deal with the end of an era in their own ways. We see the cowboy-turned-outlaw, the cowboy-turned-storekeeper, the cowboy-turned-floor sweeper... but most of all we see the cowboy turned into legend. As the plot kicks in, there is nothing contrived about it, but it all feeds into the central idea of examining what men do when their purpose is taken away from them.The movie benefits from some great performances from some classic character actors such as William Devane and Barry Corbin, as well as a brilliant star turn from Tom Selleck who has never been better. It also benefits from the stunning scenery - ironically not in Wyoming as the movie suggests, but shot in Canada. The sweeping vistas, free of any trace of civilization, set against a backdrop of the Rockies, are stunning and superbly photographed.What pulls this above it's TV-movie-of-the-week origins is the sincerity poured into it by all concerned, and not least by the prolific director Simon Wincer (Lonesome Dove, Quigley Down Under... and Crocodile Dundee in Los Angeles! ) and executive producer Tom Selleck. This fills the movie with those little, almost subliminal moments which make it feel real.The result is no classic big screen film, but a perfectly judged and understated homage to a bygone era. It leaves us with the notion, that though the golden age is over, there will always be real cowboys.</review_text>
Funny and Witty, this movie will keep you going, especially if you love the play by Oscar Wild</review_text>
A scientist is held captive.  He is to perfect the missile.  Only the  scientist knows what to do.  If he is not to do it.  His wife will be  executed.  Also in sub-plot.  A assassin is hired to kill the scientist so  he can not finish his work.  The IMF team has a gaget that might work.  Wil   they rescue the scientist in time.     EN</review_text>
My wife had been fed up with all of the legal dramas I was maknig her watch.  Being a third year law student she always netpicks the details.  But the story in this fil overrides the legal fallacies, making True Believer a great drama that centers around a lawsuit</review_text>
Love that era of movies.Acting was grea</review_text>
Make no mistake; "Chato's Land" is a sprawling, unforgiving environment that offers little water and no reward.  The blistering, sprawling landscape of rock and sagebrush, however, is but a backdrop in this story that shows man at his most ugly of moments.Charles Bronson stars as Pardon Chato, a half Apache Indian who is enjoying a drink in a saloon when he is antagonized by an arrogant sheriff.  Chato goes against the sheriff's wishes to leave because of his heritage, and lets his actions speak for themselves, leaving the mouthy lawman dead on the floorboards.  A posse is soon rounded up with a variety of area men, many of them farmers and ranchers.  They embark on a trip to find Chato and avenge the death in town, as well as feed some of their own continual hatred towards the Indians in general.  Greed, Hate and Perseverance battle Logic, Pride and Tolerance as the group soon start battling each other over what they think is right and wrong when it comes to avenging the death of the lawman.A great western film from 1971, Chato's land offers a solid and stoic storyline that is wrought with irony as well as themes of loyalty and revenge.  Charles Bronson aside, a superb supporting cast is experienced as well.  Victor French (later of "Little House" and "Highway to Heaven" stardom) graces the screen as one of the posse members, and with Jack Palance and James Whitmore in tow, its a well rounded cast that never lacks quality in acting despite a somewhat linear storyline.Palance plays the part of Quincy Whitmore, a war veteran who understands, and sometimes even respects the Apache's actions more than most.  His arch-nemesis is Jubal Hooker (played by Simon Oakland) who has the "fever" of wanting to see the Apache man hang, even if it costs them lives which could end up coming down to the last man.  Jubal is excellently played by Oakland as a man who is consumed with his own destiny of vengeance.  Loyalties loved and lost, a large part of the movie is very emotional in power and prestige as we experience the dismay of the men as they deal with the battles that rage within their very own camp, and minds.With Bronson portraying a cunning, intelligent and yes even ruthless Apache warrior, Chato's Land is a western that is filled with buzzards drinking blood, the dark side of man, and the notion that if you go to battle with someone in their own back yard, you better think twice about who has the best odds, regardless of how many men you bring with you.The scenic landscape and the shots taken at night as well as during the scorching hot days are excellent, and the sound quality of this DVD in my opinion is very good if not perfect.  If you want a western that gets dirty but portrays a deep story within, see "Chato's Land"</review_text>
If someone asked me to choose one episode of &quot;Maverick&quot; that superbly illustrates my favorite television series' strengths, this might be it.  James Garner's fascinatingly complex character Bret Maverick is on  full display and Diane Brewster as Samantha Crawford, Maverick's primary  female nemesis, is introduced in this episode in all her slipperiness and  duplicity in a plot that revolves around a New Orleans riverboat gambling  contest that hinges on an obscure poker rule of the day. The principals  later segue by stagecoach to a western town with a crooked casino, where  they encounter Leo Gordon as Mike McComb, Maverick's strapping Irish ally.   Jodie Foster's character in the recent Mel Gibson movie version was based  on Samantha, and Ms. Brewster's performance is a revelation, forcing the  viewer to bemoan the policy of that period preventing most television  actors from moving into theatricals.  Warners' unsung but mesmerizing  stable of character actors are peppered throughout the show to good effect,  as is always the case with this series, and this episode has a classic  feel, with lustrous lighting and photography and fascinatingly nuanced  performances.  This is one to watch repeatedly and serves as a superior  companion to the movie version</review_text>
We all love George Lucas for creating the Star Wars Universe and introducing us to some of the best characters in movie history but lets face reality here, the man cannot write dialogue to save his life.  In the OT it wasn't as noticeable because the plot was not very complicated and the scenes were very straightforward, the foundation was already there.  The PT has to lay that foundation which George Lucas fails at.So ignoring the wooden dialouge which produced stilted acting, it is a great movie nonetheless.  The plot gives the audience an idea how the Empire was created in the first place and gives you a glimpse into the dark side of Anakin and sets the audience up very nicely from his ultimate turn from the good side.  Also for a hopeless romantic such as myself I get to watch a couple fall in love when they're not supposed to and not let rules and regulations stand in their way.  Yes, romance is where GL fails miserably but its the story that counts.Overall, in this movie as in TPM, there is a lot story and symbolism here which makes it stand out.  So my advice is to see the movie, and pay more attention to the story being told.  If nothing else, you'll get to hear some really beautiful music, see some cool special effects and see some cool costumes that you wish you had</review_text>
the best.not exacley a shaRK MOVIE not very many people die.lots of action and your in suspense not cause of the shark. cause of the people you dont now who to trust.good movie see it see if youl like it</review_text>
it was 13 years ago when i frist saw this movie and i simply loved it to death, then as said in the song &quot;little jackie paper found time for other things and came no more&quot; it was then last week when i herd the song on a local radio station and it all came back to me, i had to see this movie again. memroys came running back from my childhood came running back. this is a great movie for all</review_text>
'The Curse of the Grebes' is sort of a tribute to the Red Sox return to World Series glory with cameos by Damon, Timlin and Renteria. Timlin actually does a great acting job and even recites a poem by Emily Dickinson with remarkable aplomb. 'Arthur Changes Gears' is also great, he gets a bike he's been coveting for a while but when he finally gets it he's so worried about getting it dirty that he won't ride it</review_text>
This is an ideal movie for home theatre.  I grew up on a working ranch and Richard Farnsworth, James Caan and Jane Fonda are totally convincing as  cowboys and cowgirl. Jason Robards is utterly evil in this movie. I've  liked them all in several other movies but none are as good as this one.   The breathtaking backdrop and a really well written story combined with an  excellent array of talent makes this one of the treasures of my western  collection</review_text>
Ok, I'll admt it. When I first saw this movie, I was only 6 or 7. I thought it dumb and pointless.I also thought 'OMFG! What was that teacup thing for? it was soooooo pointless. This movie is stupid.' Now I am 13, and i saw it again on ABC family. Then, I thought 'WOW!' this movie is so cool! I then understood what theteacups represented and everything. I thought it was a great movie. Truely hilarious too. Of course, it does teach a sort of lesson about surviving in the world. But I never found it until now. This is a very cute movie and I really think anyone can enjoy it</review_text>
Boasting three shuddery tales ranging from gorgeous Michelle Mercier's steamy telephone love triangle, to Boris Karloff in top form as an eerie Russian vampire, to a sublimely creepy drop of water, this is one of the scariest horror films ever made. The great Mario Bava outdid himself with this superbly atmospheric 1963 film, which was recut, rescored, and dubbed by AIP in such a way that the film as a whole, and "The Telephone" segment in particular, was drastically altered from the original version presented here. It's a pleasure to finally enjoy this film as Bava intended it to be seen. This DVD version has only the original Italian soundtrack with English subtitles, which is a shame since some of the actors are clearly speaking English on screen. A dubbed English soundtrack would have been a anice extra, along with Les Baxter's excellent US musical score, but even so, what's here is worth every penny. The extra scenes of Karloff in the studio are a treat, and once seen, the restless corpse from "The Drop of Water" is never forgotten. I have left this review deliberately vague on plot points so as not to spoil the movie for those who have not yet seen it, but suffice to say that Black Sabbath is a masterwork that belongs in every horror fan's collection</review_text>
This is the first episode where we really see the heart of Tony in his dealings with a teenager struggling with the horrible death of his father. A must see</review_text>
THIS MOVIE IS A CLASSIC, 10 STAR MOVIE WITH ALL THE GREAT COMEDIANS OF THEIR TIME AND EVEN TO LATTER GENERATIONS.  THE EDITOR FOR THIS MOVIE CRITIQUE SAID THAT "THIS MOVIE IS NOT ORIGINAL??"   HELLOOOO THIS WAS MADE IN THE '70S! OF COURSE THIS MOVIE AND IT'S MATERIAL IS ORIGINAL, KIND OF A NOO BRAINER AND WHOMEVER GAVE THAT CRITIC HER JOB SHOULD CTIQUE THEMSELVES ON WHY IN THEE WORLD THEY GAVE HER THE POSITION.SOMEONE SHOULD TELL THAT CRITIC, PAULA SELF-CHECK  OR WHATEVER, THAT SHE HAS NO IDEA AS TO WHAT SHE IS TALKING ABOUT AND IF PEOPLE ALL OVER BELIEVE CRITICS LIKE HER, THAT SUCH TIMELESS MASTERPIECES SUCH AS THIS MOVIE "IS NO GOOD," EXCELLENT OR EVEN A DECENT MOVIE FOR THAT MATTER, NO MOVIE WORTH WATCHING WOULD GET ANY ATTENTION SO JUDGING FOR YOURSELF WOULD BE "THEE" BEST OPTION</review_text>
I purchased this dvd for my very passionate son's 11th birthday.  When he opened it his eyes filled with tears.  He has loved gorillas, chimps, and all primates since he was very young.  I watched the movie before and was a little concerned about his reaction to Digit's murder.  It was as I expected, he cried in my arms.  His dream is to grow up and move to Africa to help in the survival of this extraordinary species.  The movie was given to him for encouragment from Ms. Fossey with all her beliefs and struggles.  We as the human race have a responsibility for all species on Earth.  This movie will open your eyes and make you realize how vain and selfish humans can be and it also shows that one person can make a difference and is still making a difference years after her death.What strikes me about Mrs. Weaver is that she was also touched by Fossey's accomplishments and she is an honorary chair person for the Dian Fossey Gorilla International Fund.Dian Fossey wrote this passage in her journal, "When you realize the value of all life, you dwell less on what is past and concentrate on the preservation of the future."I hope this review helps you decide whether to buy the movie or not and brings at least one more person to acknowledge we must all do our part.</review_text>
Were scenes added to the DVD.  If yes, what scenes?  For example, did Dave ever talk to Katarina after she slapped him, in the original release</review_text>
*** Spoiler Warning - this review might reveal surprises in the movie ***First off for a frame of reference, I'm a 30-year old male and a sucker for Disney movies in general.When this movie came and went to the theatres in a flash, I heard so much bad about it, how it was the worst Disney movie ever, that I actually didn't go see it in the theatre. I regret that now. First time I actually saw this movie was on a 14-hour flight from Los Angeles to London, and I fell heads over heels in love with it!I adored the original Novel "Treasure Island", and I believe that Treasure Planet lives up to it. The central theme of Treasure Planet, in my mind, is the boy, Jim, who grows up with only a vague recollection of his father who in the movie appears like a shadow in Jim's faded childhood memories.I think this particular "flashback" scene was very powerful, it featured the absolutely brilliant "I'm still here" track by Johnny Rzesnik, and led the viewer to fully understand Jim's childhood, and to share his teenage frustration and delinquency that stems from his father abandoning the young Jim and his mother. Possibly, I might a bit biased in this respect, since I can strongly identify with this situation as my own father was "married to the sea" when I grew up, and i can admit that i blubbered like a baby during the flashback sequence.This is right in line with the core message of the film. A young, reckless and frustrated boy who is taken under the wing of the Old Salt, who becomes his new father figure. He learns how to take orders, work hard, grow, face adversity, and eventually become a man by making tough choices. An excellent message in this day and age, if you ask me.I also loved the theme the producers chose. A type of anachronistic retro-futuristic design, where we in the future still use old, creaking, wooden, pirate ships, but with ultra futuristic systems. The movie also suspends the viewer from reality in many flavorful ways - for instance when the spaceship travels through the universe, it encounters a pod of whales. Or how Jim takes a dhingy "comet surfing".I think this film provides excellent entertainment, suspense and has a great message for kids. But as an adult, I think I also got a kick out of this GREAT and CLEARLY UNDERRATED Disney flick.SEE IT</review_text>
This is a neat little movie about a 12-year-old boy (Anton Glanzelius) who tries to make sense of his mother's terminal illness, death in general, and a world full of change. He tries to cheer his mother up as best he can, but she is too far gone to really notice or care. His fondest memories are times spent at the beach with her when she was healthier and their times together were better. As a coming-of-age movie, sex plays an important (and confusing) part for the boy, from the old bedridden man in the upstairs apartment who likes him to read the lingerie ads to him, to the tomboy who is the best soccer player on his team and keeps trying to show him her breasts. The movie is full of wonderful, insightful touches. Glanzelius is marvelous. A real gem of a movie</review_text>
My grandson loved the movie. I also like the Pokemon series of movies.</review_text>
I really like the pokemon movies and I was not dissapointed with this one. I have watched it about 7 times over the past several years. Team Rocket never plays as big of arole as in the t.v show though</review_text>
Can watching paint dry be riveting, interesting, and compelling? Can looking at a beautiful woman who is naked for almost three of four hours long movie be not erotic? Is it possible to watch the movie where an Artist creates sketch after sketch of his model in preparation for a painting and many scenes run in real time and not become bored but instead be totally absorbed by the painter on the screen and how he was progressing with his work? Jacques Rivette's "Le Belle Noiseuse" is certainly not for every taste but I found it immensely rewarding. It is one of very few films where creative process with all its tension, uncertainty, selfishness and self-centering of an artist who once he began working is nearly oblivious not only to his model's discomfort but to the feelings of the ones close to him have been shown on the screen with such truthful passion, technical excellence, and tremendous acting. Michel Piccoli as an aging painter Edouard Frenhofer, once famous and productive, Jane Birkin (Liz)- his much younger wife and a former favorite model, and Emmanuelle Bart as Marianne, the young, bright, and intensely intelligent woman whose presence awakened Frenhofer from semi-lethargy and made him want to paint again were unforgettable.The film also explores a vital for any artist subject - what is more important, the process of creating a work of art or the result?</review_text>
A MAGICAL  , SURREAL  JOURNEY INTO " THE MYSTICAL  THIRD  REICH  "  HITLER'S  DREAMS  AND HIS HOPES  FOR A  " GREATER GERMANIA "   YOU'LL LOVE THIS MOVIE !!!  ONE OF THE BEST WWII MOVIES SINCE... " NIGHT OF THE GENERALS " .</review_text>
I was never a Richard Burton fan until I discovered this movie.Richard Burton's acting in this movie is top notch.Burton is able to pull you into his character of British agent Alec Leamas and make it all believable.Thankfully the movie is in black and white,because it adds to the overall suspense and mood of the film.The dvd transfer and digital 5.1 sound are excellent.It's hard to believe a movie from 1965 with no fancy gadgets or special computer effect's could be so entertaining,but it is.The question is will Alec come in from the cold or does he have one more mission in him</review_text>
This has always been one of my alltime cinema favorites and I was happy to see it available on DVD.  The story, the script, the direction, and the acting are superb.</review_text>
Probably one of Steve McQueens greatest movies. Only this one can happen</review_text>
Hey, I won't pretend to write anything better than "Chris Kent" did below in March of 2003.  Just read his excellent review that not only captures the film's qualities, but also the era in which the film was released</review_text>
If you like movies as I do, this DVD set should satisfy any film fanatic with over 21 (that's right) extra features--clearly a prototype of what we film fans want in our DVD sets.To see producer Irwin Allen in his Rolls Royce and a pink polyester leisure suit (complete with white shoes) discussing the finer points of 'The Poseidon Adventure" and "Towering Inferno" as he takes us on a tour through 20th Century Fox is as informative as it is funny.Commentaries by film historian F.X. Feeney and SFX director, Mike Vezina, add another dimension to understanding this interesting film.Much has already been written about this film itself by the other Amazon critics here, suffice to say the acting in this motion picture (save for the two little brats in Jennifer Jones' charge) is quite good with Newman as the architect and and McQueen as the fire captain, both excellently cast.  Then again, when have these actors ever disappointed audiences in their respective roles?Veterans Faye Dunaway and Bill Holden rarely disappoint, Richard Chamberlain is downright creepy, and even Fred Astaire (at 80 years of age when this was made) manages to inject some needed satire here and there as he tries to woo Jennifer Jones. For those from the SF Bay Area, the setting for this movie was San Francisco and the distinctive lobby of the Hyatt Regency at Embarcadero was used for many of the scenes in the first half of the movie.Ok, this is not going to be a long review, and the film does not really impart any substantial revelations about life and death. I could get very deep and argue that the film is a metaphor to man's vanity and ego dedicated to the capitalistic excesses of power, wealth and greed, but let's get real--it's just one damn exciting movie with excellent special effects (Academy Awards for Cinematography and Editing), reasonably good acting all around, and edge-of-your-seat entertainment.I just hope they don't make another remake a la "The Poseidon Adventure" for this film--Irwin Allen's rendition will do just fine.</review_text>
Some of the best lighting I have ever seen on face of that hunk C. Tommy.  John Peters is a genius</review_text>
Be forewarned those who may be driving in the desert at night on some dark, deserted piece of highway. Stop for hitchhikers at your own risk. Also avoid the urge of trying to be too helpful to fellow motorist stranded along the way. Remember things are not always what they appear to be.This was quite a well-constructed, coherent storyline from beginning to end. You are never left in the dark with this plot. Everything is explained at the appropriate time, the history of this particular vampire sect, how they happened to show up in Midwest America, how the vampire virius works in the body, its telepathic properties and what must be done to cure yourself from the curse of "The Forsaken." All this infomation was nicely worked into the script in such a way as not to bog down the viewer with too much substance, hence detracting from what the average movie fan is looking for, gore and violence.A brief comment for any young girls who may get struck watching this with a boyfriend. While you may not enjoy the horror elements in the movie you might enjoy the male members of the cast which includes; Brendan Fehr (Roswell), Kerr Smith (Dawson's Creek, Final Destination) and Johnathon Schaech (That Thing You Do) as the head vampire.Brendan Fehr was terrific as the young, wise beyond his years vampire hunter roaming the highways and byways in search of the vampire that infected him with the virius. My favorite scene in the movie is when Nick (Brendan Fehr) and Sean (Kerr Smith) stop at a roadside diner for a bite to eat. A two-way conversation quickly turns into a monologue when Nick begins to compare the aspirations and hopes of his generation with those of the last. It's not only hilarious, but absolutely true. Without giving away too much of the ending, I'll just say a perfect opening was provided for a sequel. While I'm not generally a fan of sequels, I would've liked to see Brendan Fehr reprise his role of vampire hunter at least one more time.Simply the most enjoyable vampire film since "The Lost Boys."</review_text>
From the moment she glimpses her idol on Broadway, Eve Harrington (Anne Baxter) strives relentlessly to upstage Margo Channing (Bette Davis).  Cunningly, Eve steals Margo's role, smashes Margo's best friend, Karen Richards' (Celeste Holm) marriage, and becomes the toast of Broadway!  Great performances all around with some of the juiciest, wittiest, and oh so quotable ("Fasten your seatbelts, it's going to be a bumpy night") dialogue ever!  I don't know if the film would have worked as well without the suave and sophisticated performance by George Sanders (Rebecca (1939), he is truly remarkable as the story's narrator and Broadway critic, Addison DeWitt.  This film also marks the screen debut of legendary beauty, Marilyn Monroe, who plays a bit part as Addison's lovely date at Bill's welcome home party.  Even here Marilyn's astonishing screen presence and simmering sensuality (of which she would later ride to fame on) is clearly evident."All About Eve" has been hailed as "One of the smartest pictures of all time....a picture for any era" by the L.A. Times, and Variety put it simply best as "Captivating!"  It's interesting to see Bette Davis and co-starring romantic lead, Gary Merrill (who play's Margo's lover Bill Sampson) play out their scenes together, for in real life they actually marry and similar odds ends their relationship.  It's all told in the included Special Feature, AMC's "Backstory" telling all about "All About Eve."  Anne Baxter and Celeste Holm are featured in the interviews and give some interesting insights on the film and it's "behind the scenes" antics.  Bette Davis and Gary Merrill should also not be missed in the 1952 suspense classic, "Another Man's Poison."  A new dvd release of this picture would be much appreciated, for the current release is discontinued.Also included in the Special Features is the film's Gala Premiere footage / 1951 Academy Award footage, in which "All About Eve" won 1950's Best Picture / Theatrical trailer for "All About Eve," "Gentlemen's Agreement," and "How Green Was My Valley," are also included.If you're a classic movie buff, you don't need to be told anything about "All About Eve," you will have already discovered it a long time ago.  I don't have to tell you how essential it is to add it to your dvd library, for you either have it already or have placed it on order -click "add to cart" NOW!</review_text>
I have to admit that good writing or not this is one of my favorite escape movies and I wish it would come out in DVD.  My liking it has something to do with John's use of the typewriter and his ability to change the  direction of the characters through the machine.  Once he damages the  typewriter he needs to make a technical sevice call to get it going again.   You can't beat that.  We even get to see a perplexed Robert Wagner and the  rest of a great cast</review_text>
Kickboxer 2 The Road Back Deals With David Sloan. The brother of  Kurt &amp; Eric Sloan David is running his brothers kickboxer school tung po killed off van damme's charcter for the first kickboxer I say good sasha mitchell is a lot better tung po can only regain his honor by fighting david since kurt is dead so david vs. tung po with glue and glass is a bloody battle great movie the best in the series</review_text>
Masterful, simply masterful.  There is no other word that can adequately convey the quality of this movie.  Every time I notice it on cable, I immediately stop whatever I am doing and follow it to conclusion.  I can think of no other Shakespearean film that echoes it except possibly, "The Tragedy of Julius Caesar" (Marlon Brando as Marc Anthony).  A commanding performance by Kenneth Branaugh, who should be knighted as a peer of the realm in my opinion, before another title is handed over to a Rolling Stone.  This film is the sole reason I still have VHS.  If anyone enjoyed this movie, I highly recommend the Brando version of Julius Caesar and Henry the Fifth 1989 - Kenneth Branaugh and see if you notice a young Christian Bale - the boy who would be Batman.  I have had many lively discussions with respected elders regarding the better Shakespearean actor - Olivier or Branaugh.  My money's on Branaugh</review_text>
However, noone has commented on one interesting fact..Theres a episode MISSING!The orginal miniseries is 10 hours long.. theres 2 hours missing.. and the part where they attack the processing plant is "too soon".. unfortunately, I don't remember whats missing.. but it seems that it belongs before the first ep presented on this DVD set!</review_text>
Being a fan of the better CG and graphics of Sci-Fi such as Star Trek (the newer ones)  I was greatly surpised at how good the V series was.  V: The Final Battle is the second installment of the saga, so make sure to buy V: The Miniseries first.  The storyline is good, and characters are likeable and three-dimensional.  I highly recommend it for any Sci-Fi fan.  For old hands it is a fun movie, and for newcomers to both the series and the genre it is a good introduction</review_text>
I've never seen a movie with a more accurate depiction of life in the USSR from late-40s to early-50s.  What people had to live with psychologically far outweighed anything physical for the average person.  Buy this film to understand</review_text>
This is my favorite cardio video right now.  Because the video is only 30 minutes long, I can easily fit it into my day.  I found the choreography fun and uncomplicated.  I especially love the addition of plyometric moves and core conditioning to the cardio.  I can feel those "assets" tightening up</review_text>
Wild Orchid.  Most people think its some smut movie with no plot.  No one ever looks between the lines.  It may have sex, and some crazy acting, and even a bogus plot, but the theme of it is important.  True love.  Call me sentimental and a hopeless romantic, but this movie touched me.  Emily and Wheeler, opposites in every way, somehow find love, together.  I wish everyone was as lucky.  To find happiness where you least expect it.  I wish I could be as happy as those two.  Look around you.  Do you see people with this kind of passion and love?  It's sad, too, because we know what happened to the actors who played these lovers.  I hope that someone out there has a relationship like this so that we have more to cling to then fiction.  It may not have been the best movie, but it had an important message:  When you find true love grab it with both hands and never let go.</review_text>
I have owned Wild Orchid for quite a few years and from the beginning thought it was a bit out there. Some of it doesn't fit, some of it doesn't make sense and some of it is just plain dumb. The reason I gave it 4 stars is because I like Mickey Rourke. Even though he does look at bit beat up in this movie and kind of scary looking at first with the slicked down hair he is practically oozing sex. Carre Otis's character, Emily, seems a bit aloof and childlike. She is bombarded by scenes of people having sex in an abandoned building, watching 2 people have sex in a limo. Wheeler (Mickey Rourke) almost seems to enjoy watching Emily squirm a bit. Wheeler is sort of detached, but wanting someone he can trust. Its tough to make sense of this movie because honestly the best part is the end. Now I have the unrated version so it shows more than the R-rating (for a movie like this one - unrated or NC-17 is the way to go)-the part where Wheeler and Emily make love finally. It is very arousing to say the least. I must give it to Zalman King. He knows how far to go to where the movie gets into your mind, but yet he doesn't go for the gratuitous sex. I suggest Delta of Venus, which is another Zalman King experience</review_text>
I urge everyone out there to download this episode!  This one totally rocks! Shep, a Wraith and Kolya all in one episode!  Any episode with Shep (Joe Flannigan) and Kolya are well worth watching!  Download this and download every other Stargate SG1 and Stargate Atlantis episode!</review_text>
I think this was a great spin off from stargate sg-1 which was starting to get stale even though I love watching it still.Love being able to download them all, just wish they'd get updated quicker!Honestly, when I left 2 weeks ago I saw the last episode available and I've missed the next 2</review_text>
One of the best films of the seventies in my opioin, Charles Bronson plays a Professinal Killer who is doublecrossed by powerful mob boss who wants Bronson to join his "Family" Simple, straightforward action that never lets up. The ending also proves memorable when Bronson realizes [...]. Bronson means business in this film the guy can portray this type of chracter better than anyone else and has proved it time and time again over the years</review_text>
This is an excellent documentary of Shangri-La and its elusive transcendental nature</review_text>
Some of the best lighting I have ever seen on face of that hunk C. Tommy.  John Peters is a genius</review_text>
This is a real rarity--a cinematic adaptation of a literary work that is just as good as the original novella from which the film came. Filmmaker Gary Walkow (he co-wrote the screenplay, executive produced, and directed the film) has created a real gem in this brilliant translation of the best known short work by Dostoevsky into film.The casting is pitch perfect. Henry Czerny--perhaps best known for his portrayal of the weaselly Fed in the Harrison Ford blockbuster Clear and Present Danger--is the right choice to play the underground man, someone who despises himself so much that almost every interaction he has with another human being is full of rancor, bitterness, cynicism, and/or outright loathing. Sheryl Lee is the prostitute whom he "befriends" and ultimately and violently rejects from his life. Jon Favreau is the pompous rich guy who humiliates the underground man and merely laughs when the latter tries to humiliate him back.The alternation of present (shown, effectively, with a blue filter as the underground man video records himself) with the past (shown in full color--signifying time gone by including a fantasy of what could have been) is also extremely effective.The extras included on the disk are superior. There are not one but two commentaries--one by Walkow and Czerny, and the other by Professor Joseph Frank of Princeton University. Professor Frank also provides a commentary independent of the film itself which is accompanied by stills from the film; this is an abridged version of the full-length commentary. There is also a full-length essay by Professor Deborah Martin of Columbia University, analyzing the film sequence by sequence.This makes for a truly rewarding cinematic experience and one, I am sure, that is a good fit for university instruction in Dostoevsky. It's fitting, perhaps, that the last sequence of the film pulls back from the blue-lensed perspective of the underground man filming himself so that we see a group of students watching him on several monitors. This is a very clever cinematic trick by Walkow, but is not done just to be clever; it provides an insightful view of the theme of the work itself--egoism and how it traps us inside ourselves. By offering a view from outside, the filmmaker is indicating, perhaps, that we can view someone caught up in his own egoism and maybe learn from his experience.On the other hand, it could mean that since here we are, students--and by extension, viewers at home--watching the underground man rant about his own shortcomings--we're essentially caught in the same egoistic trap he's in. The difference is--he rants about it. We just sit and watch him.Highly recommended</review_text>
I have always been a fan.  I really can't say much more.  If you find a picture you can watch over and over again and it still remains fresh and new then there is no other option than to own that picture until you wear out the DVD</review_text>
Nice little video for my Zen during my long wait at the doctor's office.  Confucius overcame many difficulties</review_text>
"When a man knows he is to be hanged in a fortnight, it concentrates his mind wonderfully" - Samuel JohnsonMichael Keaton gives an effective and heart-felt performance as Bob Jones, a young, successful PR executive married to a beautiful woman (Nicole Kidman) who is expecting their first child.  The bottom falls out of his life when he is diagnosed with a fatal illness, and only given months to live.  He is forced to exam his life that he's really just been rushing through.  Bob Jones not only has never stopped to smell the roses; he hasn't even noticed that they are there at all.'My Life' is a realistic portrayl of what must go through one's mind when one is brought up short by such stunning news.  Although the topic is certainly depressing, it is something we will all one day face.  This is how one man deals with the terribly bad hand he has been delt.  Especially poignant is the fact that not only won't he probably be around to help raise his child, but he might not even make it long enough to see his child born.  Heart-wrenching.In several pivotal scenes, Jones decides to hope for a miracle, and visits an Asian healer (Haing Ngor who starred in 'The Killing Fields')who tells him that he has too much anger and hurt in him.  Jones resists the whole notion of exploring how he got to where he is, at least for a while.  His anger at his family is one point of anger he must struggle with.Keaton does an excellent job here.  We see flashes of the actor we saw in 'Mr. Mom' and earlier movies, sort of a lovable, good-hearted guy with a funny edge to him.  His Bob Jones evolves slowly and realistically from a man who is stunned and angry, to a man determined to let his child know who he is.  Ngor also plays the right note as a practioner who can't cure his patient, but perhaps can help him in his last journey.A potentially maudlin, down-beat subject is handled with just the right amount of empathy and gentleness and with a light touch.Highly recommended.  Very highly recommended if you've had such a scare, are living with a terminal illness, or have had a loved one deal with such issues</review_text>
Just got done watching the show and it was awesome. Of course I had to download the tool, how else do you get started? Once it downloaded it worked very well and the video was right there to watch when I was ready. Note to self get cable, DSL is a slow download but it worked great and the picture quality was awesome. No commercials!I didn't have any troubles installing it on my computer and the help tool walked me through it.</review_text>
Dr Smith and the Robot go hog wild, switching personalities and swapping insults.  This is a great episode</review_text>
I much prefer irony to tragedy, and after Blue I was not sure what to look forward to with White. I wound up liking White a lot. Movies about "the human condition" are, for me, almost invariably obvious. While this movie does quite a bit of exploring about how a man reacts to love and the withdrawing of love, impotence and the power of performance, revenge and a circling back to love, I thought it was handled with such off-hand, dead-pan humor as to be a very sweet film. In a way, it struck me as an amuse-bouche, one of those unexpected treats that a first-rate chef will surprise a good customer with at the start of a meal or sometimes in between courses. The movie has that quality of freshness and unexpectedness.Zbigniew Zamachowski does a masterful job as Karol, a sad sack if there ever was one, who gradually shows determination as well as obsession. I suppose one must just accept obsession as an unexplainable plot device in a movie, but Dominique got off to a very unsympathetic start. She'd wilt most men. Karol's obsession with her seemed a bit unreal. I found Karol developing into a resourceful, intelligent guy whom I began to admire. Dominique, though, didn't seem to change much. After all she put Karol through -- unnecessarily cruel most of the time -- I couldn't empathize much with Karol, but simply accepted things as the reason why I was enjoying the movie. I couldn't help thinking that if Karol had just had a few Viagra handy, none of his troubles would have begun. But then I thought about Dominique's essential characteristics, and I think that Karol would be better off with somebody new. I don't see a future for them.One of the things I liked a lot about this movie is that it kept me guessing. Was it going to be a romantic comedy, or a black comedy or some kind of excruciatingly dull exploration of sexual inadequacy? Was Karol really just a sad loser when he seemed sort of resourceful in a sad, funny way? What was he trying to do with his property purchase? Where did Dominque fit in or was this just a cameo with Delpy? Was something sad going to happen after I'd figured out it seemed to be a combination black/romantic comedy? I like a movie that I can't quite see the end to.People have said that this movie is the equality part of the trio. I saw this movie as a clever, bittersweet struggle for dominance, not equality, and laced with a little revenge. I thought it was a sweet, bittersweet, clever movie</review_text>
I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out</review_text>
This movie was my all-time favorite when I was little. And Robin Hood was definitely my all-time favorite Disney character. I remember how I'd sit at the kitchen table and draw countless pictures of Robin Hood, and how I'd sit in front of our family computer and write stories involving Robin Hood.Today, I have other Disney favorites, but I still love Robin Hood. And I still watch the movie from time to time. I'm hoping they'll release a 2-disc special edition fairly soon.Robin Hood makes a dashing outlaw, and I love his oversized sidekick Little John. The villain, Prince John, seems more comical than intimidating. I love the scene where he cries for his "mommy" and sucks on his thumb while holding his ear at the same time. Seems like a childish thing for a royal prince to do, don't you agree?If you don't have this movie, then go purchase a copy of it, or at least rent it from a movie store. You won't be disappointed.</review_text>
TANGLED IS ACTUALLY A REALLY GOOD MOVIE. YOU HAVE TO PAY ATTENTION OR YOU'LL GET LOST IN THE PLOT BUT OTHER THAN THAT IT WAS A GREAT MOVIE</review_text>
I enjoyed this movie. Some of the reviewers don't understand this was not a documentary on the Bambino. This was a movie. The fine gentlemen P. B. Pereira attempt to dismiss John Goodman as a somewhat successful star from the late 80's is idiotic and off the mark. You sir are taking the whole movie too seriously. Babe's rough and tumble upbringing left its mark on him. Goodman is terrific throughout the movie,& I really fell for the lovely Trini Alvarado who plays Babe's first wife, she is stunning. As far as the would have, could ofs and other wild speculation on how good Babe would have been, think about this. Babe didn't use illegal steroids like today's ball players, he rode a train not a jet, fitness equipment did not exist. In addition the old ball parks tended to have greater distances from the plate to the fence. I highly recommend this movie, if for just the "pull my finger" line</review_text>
A consortium of business types gathers in a Manhattan penthouse and sneers at the little people, a slightly overdrawn look at capitalism.  These guys are so awful they make the capitalists in a Lars Von Trier film like MANDERLAY or DOGVILLE look like Albert Schweitzers.  The fattest cat is John R. Frost, played by Eugene Pallette in an extremely broad mode, almost as though he were Tony Soprano as a hillbilly.  He makes an unlikely financier!Deanna Durbin has a tough part here, she's always in center stage but most of the time she just has to bug Stokowski until he finally relents, and you can sympathize with him, for she takes what we now call "stalking" to new lows.  The two of them are equally good at acting, and Stokowski in particular is a surprise.  He could have been a major screen actor on the model of, say, Claude Rains.  His huge mop of white hair alone commands attention, and he speaks beautifully, losing dignity only (strangely enough) when he's conducting!  As my pal Mac McGinnes points out, "When Oscar Levant was asked what great moment in musical history he wished he had witnessed he said, 'The day Leopold Stokowski discovered he had beautiful hands.'"Durbin will wring tears from a stone when she is forced to retreat home without getting her way from the great conductor.  She sits on her magnificent bed (looks very grand for a poor street urchin, with great golden rods forming a unique bedstead) and cries her heart out, insisting that Adolphe Menjou her dad deserves a job, he deserves "a fur collar on his coat, and, and, turkey on his birthday--instead of BEANS," she sobs, her pretty face contorting in what looks like real anguish.  She is an rivetting performer</review_text>
100 Men and a Girl is the story of a group of musicians who are out of work. They seem to be led by one man (Adolph Menjou) whose energetic daughter Patsy (Deanna Durbin) will stop at nothing to see her father and their friends find work. She decides to bother famed conductor Leopold Stokowski for help, but he only becomes annoyed. Instead, she finds a rich woman who promises nonchalantly to sponsor an orchestra if it existed. Patsy proceeds to gain hope and organizes the orchestra only to find that the woman has left for Europe. Patsy decides that her only choice is to berate the woman's husband and Stokowski for support, ensuing great comedy.Deanna Durbin is still a little girl in this film, bright and cheerful. She has a great sense of comic timing and displays her usual charm. The songs she sings "It's Raining Sunbeams," "A Heart That's Free," "Hallelujah in F Major," and "Traviata" are operatic but well sung.Mischa Auer plays Michael, one of the musicians, and a very funny one at that. He adds plenty of laughs to the film.There are a few spots where a black box rims the film during montage sequences. This is a bit distracting, but otherwise, the camerawork is excellent. One notable scene is where the unemployed orchestra congregates on a staircase to play the "Second Hungarian Rhapsody," photographed artistically and beautifully</review_text>
100 Men and a Girl is Rank Sentimentality with a Great Sound Track.  It deserves to be on DVD for the sound track alone.  Durbin's rendition of the Mozart Alleluia sends chllls down the spine</review_text>
First of all, I would have to say is I am deeply moved my this movie. Let me tell all of your Lonesome Dove fans something, DON'T LISTEN TO THERE INSULTS ABOUT THIS MOVIE!!!!!!!!!!!!! Okay, first of all, we don't have TLJ nor Angelica Houston. Those two characters were the major characters in LD next to Gus. But, there is Jon Voight to play Call. Voight may not be the one born for Call like TLJ, but he still does an excelent job and no one except TLJ could have played it better. Barbara Hershey plays Clara. I think she captured the essence of Clara and she did a good job. Rick Shroeder is back and he does a truly unforgetable job as Newt. July Johnson is back along with Pea Eeye. There are some new characters like former texas ranger Gideon Walker, Gus's daughter Agostina Vega, the villian Cheeroke Jack, and a man named Isom who resembles the role of "deets". Although people say that this plot is the same, they are right, but that doesn't make it a bad movie. Just because Mcmurty doesn't write doesn't mean it sucks. It captured the essence that the origianl caught. It had the same beautiful background music. There was a lot of action and adventure and the best part was, the story continued right after Call buried Gus. If you want to have an accurate depiction on what happens to the characters in the original, RTLD definitly shows it. Streets of Laredo is nothing compared to this. This is the true sequel because it delivers the same joy to your heart just like the original. I reccomend this movie to anyone who loves LD and wants to know the continuation of the story. This movie is truly a western. THE EPIC AS BIG AS THE WEST CONTINUES!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
I saw this several times as a kid and it always stuck in my head.  It's a beautiful English production that has a definite melancholy, bittersweet flavor that's missing from other adaptations.  Really worth seeing.  It is a kid-friendly version?  Not really but smart teens may enjoy it.  Great performances from Ralph Richardson, Peter Sellers and Fiona Fullerton as Alice</review_text>
SELLER WAS VERY TIMELY IN SENDING THE DVD AND THE QUALITY WAS AS DESCRIBED</review_text>
The Deep End is one of my top ten favourite films of 2001. This moody, suspenseful and very intelligent suspense drama about a mother who finds herself in a terrifying situation with a couple of blackmailers is told with great subtletly and superb style.Criticised by some as being logic free, I dont disagree that some plot turns are flawed (eg anyone disposing of a body would not do so in such shallow water. Why did the blackmailers presume that the main character could come up with $50,000.00 in less than 24 hours? etc)but the taut, effortless direction, inspired casting, elegant cinematography and surprising emotional depth make The Deep End a superior and absorbing tale with characters who are truly complex and interesting to watch.The terrific performances only enhance the enjoyment as Tilda Swinton gives a masterly, fresh portrayal as Margaret Hall,  a good, dedicated mother who will do anything for her children and Goran Visnijic who adds a real humanity to his role of Alex Spera, a initially cold hearted blackmailer whose conscious starts to kick in when he fully realises what he is doing to Margaret and her family. Supporting actors are also solid and Raymond Barry is convincingly menacing in his two scenes as Spera's more vicious crime partner.Oh, and Lake Tahoe looks absolutely stunning, a unique and extremely effective backdrop for this film' story. Excellent.</review_text>
Haha, now, all the other reviews say this movie is cheesey, now, maybe its cause i get scared really easily, but this movie just had something about it that scared the crap out of me.....i couldnt even finnish i</review_text>
The more historically accurate the film, the more it tends to drag.  The Molly Maguires certainly passes this test!  Still, it presents a fascinating account of an oppressed people and a wrong-headed response which brought them into conflict with the Church</review_text>
James Wong Howe's cinematography looks beautiful on the restored DVD version of this underrated film, an unearthly intervention which brings us the actual physicality of the 19th century in light and radiance.  It was an era in which electric light was just being invented and candles and gaslight were still the norm, that is, among people with the money to afford them.  The unwashed faces of the coal miners and the families they supported form a canvas from Brueghel, but even the whole weight of the mining companies cannot extinguish the inner spark in their eyes.Filmed by the Left-leaning director Martin Ritt, freed up from the blacklist that crippled the earlier part of his career, THE MOLLY MAGUIRES finds Ritt at a curious place, picking at the ugly scab of US history that the scandalous MOLLY MAGUIRES represents.  Indeed historians argue whether or not there was ever a conspiracy among Fenians to bring down the oligarchy of the oppressive coal mining companies through so-called "shillelagh law."  Ritt was able to attract not only Richard Harris but top-billed Sean Connery to this project; for each of them a commercial risk.  Indeed the movie, re-edited at the studio by nervous bosses, probably doesn't represent the script that Connery and Harris read.  Samantha Eggar, one of the loveliest of 60s screen actresses, took the leading women's role which was turned down by Anjanette (LOVED ONE) Comer.  Oddly enough, thirty years later, Comer took the minor part of "Sue" in TV's recreation of the nine miners in Pennsylvania who were rescued from the Quecreek cave-in in the summer of 2002.Yes, the film is depressing.  Yes, it is slow-moving, sparked by moments of intense brutality.  But give it a chance and savor its unique blend of 1870s locations and 1970 radical filmmaking</review_text>
ok this is like so many other sci-fi movies of the 80's(and the second of three underwater action movies that year)that you always feel like you have seen it before. the story is about miners on the ocean floor who find a sunken russian ship near them. after checking it out the find a video tape and a flask of booze.as two crew members drink from it they get very sick,and why not ,it has a drug that changes you into a blood craveing monster.not the greatest,but i had fun watching it and if gore and f/x's are your thing you'll love it</review_text>
If you were a teenager in the mid-'90s (and enjoyed it), you will probably love this movie and relate to it.  It really captures the feel of the grunge era well.If, however, you're one of those people who hates grunge music because it's dark/depressing, you probably can't relate.Since I was in high school from '94-'98, I love Girl.  I happened upon it by accident (someone recommended Girl when he actually meant Party Girl), and I was so happy that I did.  But I know the time period has a bad reputation.  If you loathe Nirvana, Pearl Jam, Candlebox, My So-Called Life, and dyed hair, this movie probably isn't for you.All that said, I'm making my assessment of the movie without having read the book, so if you want a book/movie comparison you'll have to look at other reviews</review_text>
In the sequel to "John Carpenter's Vampires", Derek Bliss (Jon Bon Jovi, who takes James Woods place) is a professional vampire killer who has been assigned to terminate The Vampire Queen in Mexico Uma (Arly Jover).  Along the way he assembles what terns out to be the most montley of crews in vampire hunting history.  Zoey (Natasha Wagner), a girl who is strung out on vamp blood.  A priest who hasn't quiet taken his vows yet.  And last but not least a black redneck mercenaery.  Guys, this is what it is.  Actually it isn't too bad.  Bon Jovi is not the world's greatest thespian (his antics in concert are amazing though).  Don't quit your day job, Jon.  But he still has a certain charm thaat gets you through the film's rough spots.  Arly Jover was cast because she looks good naked, period.  This is a low budget film, but vet horror director Tommy Lee Wallace knows how to make it streach and give us a good time.  Just don't be looking for high atr</review_text>
I love Anakin Skywalk</review_text>
What an amazing concert. Paul Simon and a 17-piece backup band supported by a 10-piece Brazilian percussion unit for all of the "Rhythm of the Saints" stuff. This is from 1991, so the content is primarily derived from "Rhythm of the Saints" and "Graceland" plus a smattering of the greatest of his earlier songs, and it's live and energetic and beautiful and for crying out loud there's seriously something like 750,000 people there. A crowd that big is usually reserved for, you know, the Pope or somebody. It's a stirring spectacle.Fortunately, except for the occasional wide shot, the footage focuses mostly on the band, rather than on the most exuberant of Simon enthusiasts mugging for the cameras. Simon himself is not exactly Mick Jagger as far as stage presence goes, but his voice carries charisma in ways that wild stage theatrics couldn't, and the rest of the band is hopping anyway so it doesn't matter. Simon's weakness is his occasional tendency to drift towards lite, keyboard-based adult rock and that happens here a bit, but not nearly often enough to really complain about. The emotional climaxes of this show are a massive percussive jam session at the end of "Diamonds on the Souls of Her Shoes" and stripped-down, powerfully moving renditions of "America" and "The Boxer," which draw wild cheers from the Central Park crowd at every passing reference to New York. While there is also a CD of this concert available (a very good one, I should add), audio alone cannot capture the raw excitement of the accordion opening to "The Boy in the Bubble." This is a concert for the ages</review_text>
Love Sam Elliott; even when the material isn't tops, He is!  This one is really good</review_text>
This is the best of the best.  Hands down this is one of the best broadway concerts you will EVER see.  Colm Wilkinson, Lea Salonga, Michael Ball are all amazing.  Fabulous talent, great singing</review_text>
Wow there are so many parts of this movie i just simply did not remember. But still a great movie, especially with the deleted scenes. They are not up to scratch but i am not holding it against afterall the movie is 18 years old. But still allot of fun to watch</review_text>
There is a good reason you'd want to buy this from Amazon. The quality. Sure, you can watch it for free on CBS, but the quality isn't very good. It's streamed and the bitrate (quality) is low. Personally, I want to watch Survivor on my 50" plasma, not on my computer screen. So, I use Unbox + Windows Media Center to make that happen. Survivor from unbox is as good as getting the show directly from my cable provider.</review_text>
SERIOUSLY, One of my favorite movies of all time. Thank goodness for 1980's rewinds. Kate Hudson's character is ridiculous, in the absolute best sense of the word. Oh, and, Martha Plimpton never ages...she's a freak of nature. Now get off the computer and let's go party Risa Garcia style. F*** yeah</review_text>
Truly a great film by Sam Peckinpah with Warren Oates performing masterfully. It starts out somewhat slow and builds the plot til Oates is out for revenge in Peckinpah fashion! Look for Kris Kristofferson as a bad guy biker who gets his just deserves; also Gig Young and Robert Webber as a couple cold ruthless hitmen out to get the prize for their boss. Note that the Mexican land baron is the same fellow who played the general in Peckinpah's "Wild Bunch". All in all a great film full of action and revenge as only Sam Peckinpah could do it! I saw this as a teenager on "Telecinema" in the 70's (the original pay-per-view!) and it is just as powerful now as ever. They don't make movies like this anymore</review_text>
My favorite Peckinpah film. Yeah, you heard me right. This is the one where we can clearly perceive Sam flying of the deep end, and yet it is still some kind of graceful ugly crazy masterpiece. There are jarring deliberate shifts in tone from lyrical to brutal and ugly to downright surreal. It's willfully sloppy at times, with some shots that don't match at all and some of the worst day for night you've ever seen at one point (that may actually be the fault of MGM's DVD - I don't know). None of that matters a whit. This is a surprisingly heartfelt pitch black comedy with an outstanding squirrelly performance by Warren Oates - and Isela Vega is awesome. "Alfredo" is a road movie from Hell - funny, horrifying and totally captivating. And I don't just mean so-bad-its-good - this is an important film and I love every stinkin' minute of it.But if you have pedestrian tastes, stay away. This is probably the fullest cinematic expression of the bitter and abrasive side of Peckinpah's personality that is so well documented. Most people don't seem to know how to take it. Take it as a beautiful reckless personal horror film that is laceratingly funny one minute and just lacerating the next.The final image says it all.P.S. The scene between Kristofferson and Vega seems to confuse a lot of people, as it should. But you might want to listen to the words of the song Kristofferson's partner is singing to Oates in the background as this scene plays out. There is a possible reading of this scene that I think a lot of people might not have picked up on. It's also interesting in light of the particular paranoia that made it hard for any woman to be in a relationship with Sam...</review_text>
GREAT MOVIE EXCELLENT CONDITION AND AS ALWAYS SHIPPED QUICKLY AND IN GOOD SHAPE</review_text>
I saw this movie when I was about 15 or 16 and that was a long time ago.  I ordered a copy through Amazon and when I watched it I remembered everything in the film especially Queenie hiding in the woods. I like this as it was directed by Charles Kaufman, brother of Lloyd Kaufman who made the Toxic Avenger. I give this film a rating of 5 stars and as it is a Troma Inc. release, this is one of the best Troma films I have seen</review_text>
The Fly is fantastic and well worth a watch.  Goldblum's performance is also just outstanding.  For a really cool, creepy, interesting and engaging film, this is the one.Fly 2, not so good.  So dont bother.The extras and presentation on the DVD is also great, adding to the package here.Definately worthwhile if a little Cronenberg splat isnt gonna offend and watching what could have been a really tacky, cheap project done really, really well sounds good.  And if it doesnt, get over yourself, cause it is</review_text>
I have seen many historical war dramas from Far East (mainly China's) and most of them are not only historically inaccurate but have a strong bias toward the enemy.Yi Soon Shin, however, is a rare exception.  Not only is the drama very historically accurate but it is also very comprehensive in detailing the meticulous battle planning of the admiral that leads to each victory but also the political in-fighting between the Chosun political factions (and the second-guessing nature of the king) which causes his eventual death.Also, the special effects are great.  The battle scenes (whether on sea or land) are realisitic and of outstanding quality.The only problem that I can find is that the DVD has not placed sufficient focus on the contribution of the Ming China.  Then again, this is not unexpected since this is a Korean drama focusing on the great admiral.Also, the entire selection should have 104 episodes.  I don't know why it stops at 101.If you want to have a more comprehensive knowledge on the subject, try Samuel Hawley's Imjin War (which portrays Yi Soon Shin more accurately by quoting original sources).Any who is only intered in the fighting may also want to check out Stephen Turnbull's Samurai Invasion (which has more colorful maps and detailed description of battles from the Japanese perspective).Lastly, anyone who is a fan of samurai warfare may want to check out Shogun:Total War by Creative Assembly (now in Gold version).</review_text>
This movie really surprised me the first time I saw it...there is much more depth to the story than you would think.  Martin Short is very funny, Nick Nolte is great, and the little girl is adorable.  I highly recommend it</review_text>
I bought it on Amazon a few days ago (I saw the movie a long time ago but just now bought it) and got it today. The movie is awesome. Nick Nolte and Martin Short make an awesome team. The story is probably the best part of the entire movie. It's about an ex-con named Lucas (Nick Nolte) who just gets out of jail and immediately gets involved in a bank robbery commited by Ned (Martin Short). There are so many funny scenes on here. Here are the funniest ones:1. They think Ned (Martin Short) is giving birth (he stuck a teddy bear up his shirt to make it look like he was pregneant)2. When Doctor Horvath (Kenneth McMillan) gives his story about Lucas (Nick Nolte) (tells about the "hunting accident")And there are a few more. There is even a bit of Drama in the movie, most of it involving Ned's daughter, Meg (Sarah Rowland Doroff). This movie is perfect. I recommend it to everyone. If you haven't seen it yet, you must see it now. Because if you don't, you're missing out</review_text>
This film really shows the versatility of Peter Sellers and the truly magical nature of his acting. This is a light hearted comedy and a treasure to watch. The quality of the film is superb even though it is based on a black and white source. Frankly you forget that it is  in black and white format</review_text>
I first saw this movie on TV in the mid 60's.  My wife and I laughed and snickered through the whole thing.  Then I saw it again, a few years later, while in VietNam.  That was a real hoot with a bunch of guys watching and reacting.  Some 35 or more years later, I remembered it and just had to have a copy for myself.  The entire movie, about how to cheat on your wife and not get caught, is chock full of cameos by readily recognizable stars acting out little scenarios as Robert Morse explains how to go about things to Walter Matthau.  It's a light no-brainer, full of amusing surprises, for aspiring cheats who will have no clue what happens at the very end</review_text>
Heh!  I'm joking.  Everybody has a right to an opinion.Turns out this film has held up well.  I'd seen it in the 80s and have always wanted to give it another go.  The material, involving a young naturalist leaving his family and big city life behind to live in the Canadian countryside, is most appealing to me.  I imagine it wouldn't be the most desirable plan to kids of today; but you never know.I'll admit the young actor his bares a striking resembance to the "Home Alone" actor, but not so much as the cover suggests.  I mean, he doesn't exactly make friends with the bear either.  Just an attempt to sell it to kids.Anyway, I thoroughly enjoyed seeing this film again and was quite happy with the image quality. Well done Paramount!</review_text>
My Side of the Mountain is a terrific and educational movie. I can't agree with some of the negative reviews here. This is an interesting movie the whole family can watch together. Little Sam Gribley is a walking encyclopedia. This movie would be good for classrooms. Watch it and learn! I'm going for the novel.</review_text>
I don't have television, haven't for 11 years. When I learned CBS was allowing free viewing over the internet I checked it out and started watching episodes of CSI, CSI NY, CSI Miami, and NCIS. I found NCIS to be my favorite and this particular show Dead And Unburied is my favorite so far. I enjoy the light-heartedness of NCIS. So I decided to download this episode from Amazon Unbox.I really wish Amazon Unbox would allow me to burn shows I've purchased. As it is they are restricted to viewing on my computer. When Unbox expands this service to allow me to burn DVDs I will likely purchase many more shows this way. I like selecting individual shows</review_text>
BUY this DVD today.  Be sure to purchase the boxset as it is the only way to get the RICHARD PRYOR SPECIAL? and Mudbone bonus footage.  This groundbreaking series paved the way for not only (the obvious) IN LIVING COLOR and CHAPPELLES SHOW, but other subversive TV like South Park which attempt to inject social commentary while challenging the censors.  It not only captures Pryor at his comedic peak, but gives us early glimpses of folks like Robin Williams, Sandra Berhard, Marsha Warfield and John Witherspoon.  This show has never been available on home video and has basically been out of circulation since its initial run, thus it is a jewel to behold.  Watching Pryor as &quot;The &quot;Mojo&quot;, &quot;the First Black President&quot; and &quot;Rev. White&quot;--who has his own way to drum up &quot;the big bucks&quot;-- will have you laffing for hours.  But  Pryor also presents scketches that weren't designed to be laugh out loud funny, but challenge you in other ways, like the wino sketch that turns into a Maya Angelo performance. Or the &quot;Satin Doll&quot;  sketch, which has no laughs at all, but aims to capture the feeling of post WWII Black america with a fantastic song-and-dance number starring Paula Kelly (choreographed by Michael Peters.)  I seriously doubt these five hours of television would have come out the same if the NBC censors had been completely undertanding, sensitive and supportive of Mr. Pryor's vision.  The Special is an extension of Mr. Pryor's hosting of SNL. The  subsequent series itself reminds me of Marvin Gaye's HERE, MY DEAR. While it is not Marvin's most listenable or even best work, through pain he finds beauty and truth.  This boxset is a must-have for fans of TV comedy and shoud be copped by any means necessary</review_text>
with a well crafted script, good actors at the heights of their powers and brisk no nonsense direction. Emma Thompson has done better work since but Kenneth Branagh hasn't unfortunately.Too bad really.  Branagh may still be a pretty good director but I think working with Emma is what lent him an appeal and warmth on screen that he has not been able to recapture. His Hamlet was glossy, chilly, unpleasant and too old.  Nevertheless, I'm grateful that we at least have this, as well as his Henry V and Much Ado About Nothing</review_text>
The amazing thing about commentaries is that you get to discover things you never thought you would, for instance... why the screenwriter used the title  DEAD AGAIN: its based on a story he read about a woman saying she was pregnant with her reincarnated husband.Anyways, enough of trivia.This film is a great ride.Branagh is so skilled in acting and crafting of film, theatre  etc, that he had to come into mainstream films at some stage. So, he was working hard in theatre, and he ( and his wife) discover a script about a murder that gives rise to events recurring years later.This film's  cast is superb. If you listen to Kenneth Branagh's  commentary, you will discover the most amazing connections. And throughout, they talk of this as a noir  film, well, I have no idea what that is, but this film is a great entertaining piece, and it is in no small part to Branagh, Emma Thompson, Derek Jacobi ( brought in 3 days  before he was asked to start, a last minute call), and others who made a wonderful film, and a solid entertaining piece.The DVD  extras are just the commentaries, but for this  type of film, thats fine, since that is complex  enough.ENJO</review_text>
This is one of the great "unknowns" in the movie world: a great film seen by very few people. I'm still waiting for the DVD but not holding my breath. Thankfully, my VHS is still good. But like anything good, we'd like to share this with others and most people have never heard of this movie.For those sensitive souls who enjoy a fascinating portrait of an unusual person or persons that is both sad and uplifting, this is your ticket. It has both, in spades.....a haunting film you can't forget. It's a tragic tale yet has a happy ending of sorts and leaves you feeling satisfied.What it is, and I can't remember if it is based on real-life situation, is the story of a woman who has a dwarf for a son and what happens to the two of them, beginning in France, moving to Ireland, over to the United States and then back to Ireland.Along the way, the mother, played so sadly by French actress Anne Parillaud (the original La Femme Nikita), gets involved with two men: Gabriel Byrne and Matt Dillon. All three of these adults are really interesting, likable people, but nothing like the dwarf, who is played magnificently by two actors. Alan Pentony plays "Frankie" has a child and a more lovable kid would be hard to find. Corbin Walker does a great job of playing the adult "Frankie." Trust me: you will not forget either of them.Walker narrates the film, telling it mostly in flashback style, from his best-selling book. In addition to his mom and the two father-figures in his life, is a short story of Frankie's love affair with astronomy and the stars, hence "Frankie Starlight."The only profane character in the movie is the book publisher who has two short scenes. That, and two quick sex scenes, give it the "R" rating. Otherwise, this is wonderful old-fashioned storytelling, the kind that makes you really care about the characters.</review_text>
I have watched this movie probably 50-60 times, and each time I watch it I love it more.  I think this is Woody at his best, with a great cast and an amazing performance by Nick "Apollo" Forte.  Except for his "earlier, funny" films, which are in a class by themselves, this film has the perfect balance of comedy, drama, dry wit, "suspense", larger-than-life characters....reminds me of "Raging Bull"...but that's a whole 'nuther genre.  As much as I LOVE "Annie Hall", sometimes it seems dated and hard to watch....but "BDR" is timeless.  Do like I did, if you can't decide whether to put down the cash right off the bat...rent it, watch it, and buy it.  I know you will.  Bravo, Woody!  Now, what happened to the rest of your films...??</review_text>
Hello world,Wowee zowee, very "wacky" little gem. Remember seeing the cover when my Dad took me into the video store, I was around 6 or 7 and it stuck in my mind. When I was about 21 or 22 one of my friends flat buddies had it on Beta tape, so I borrowed it cause I still have a Beta(really shouldn't have mentioned that). A true slasher basher not for the timid, truly written and directed by booby hatch patients, and were they found the actors is beyond me! Filmed in georgeous New Jersey of course not far from the original Friday the 13th. Its a real winner!!! Creepiest Mom ever. Love her old dodge or plymouth?</review_text>
I dont remember watching He Man growing up, but I think I saw this movie. I watched this movie without thinking it would be anything speical, and I was wrong. The preview really drew me into the movie before I watched it. It was pure fun, and an excellent sci fi movie. Dolph Lundgreen was the main source for finding this movie, thanks Dolph! Where the heck are you these days? I didnt check all reviews but at the very, very end of the movie Skeltor comes on and says "I'll be back". Ha! Guess that movie never happened.</review_text>
I used to love this movie as a child, now my Goddaughter and I watch it together. This dvd has 3 different shows on it, all with a great moral</review_text>
The classic comes to the screen and is reincarnated as a classic film.  The film gives just the right touches of a dark moodiness.  Welles is excellent as Edward Rochester, the tormented master of the house.  Joan Fountaine is wonderful as Jane.  Look for a very young Elizabeth Taylor in one of her earliest roles.  This material has been done many times but watch this version</review_text>
I have the VHS tape of JANE EYRE, starring Joan Fontaine and Orson Welles. Felt both characters were well-cast, with the quiet and sensitive Fontaine as Jane Eyre, and the brooding, inscrutable Orson Welles as her employer, Mr. Edward Rochester. The black-and-white movie is more suitable for this genre, in my opinion, than the color version, as it depicts more accurately the brooding and eerie qualities of Thornfield Hall, the Rochester residence where his mad wife (of whom Jane knows nothing) is shut up in one of the towers in an unused part of the house with her "keeper" Grace Poole.  I felt the acting as well as the cinematic quality of this movie accurately reflect the atmosphere that Charlotte Bronte was trying to portray in her novel.</review_text>
The cancellation of this short lived but highly acclaimed series is perhaps the biggest mistake made by a network. Ever.Fox executives broadcast the series out of order, it was preempted several times for baseball...it didn't have a chance.*The DVD box set of Firefly has been in the top 20 boxed sets in Amazon sales since its release in 2003. Not too shabby for a series that was limited to 14 episodes. Must be something to it, huh?Give this series the chance it deserves. Download #1 Serenity and try it on for size. It's space westerny goodness all around.If you find you are drawn to this series, come visit us at fireflyfans.net. We'll be waiting for you with Mudder's Milk and Strawberries.</review_text>
This is an inspiring movie to ALL Americans at this stage of the war vs Japan...in reality, 4 of the captured USAAF crew were beheaded, others tortured unmercifuly...3 survived  at war's end...with the release of, "The Purple Heart" at Christmas time [1944] well after the Gen Doolittle raid in April 1942, it hit home and in our hearts to the heroics of our courageous United States Army Air Force and Naval Forces in harm's way...this movie depicts Japan for all of her quick grabs in the Pacific War; yet, Japan was wide open and vunerable to air attack...it helped lift our morale to perservere, sacrifice and no more surrenders, ultimately paving the way for Japan's unconditional surrender forevermore in Aug/1945...it was NOT a propaganda movie; conversely, a cornerstone film for total victory over Japan who was our most formidable and cunning enemy we ever faced on the sea and on the land...Dana Andrews stirring lecture to that Japanese judge rang true as the "USAAF will blackened your skies, day and nite we'll come to burn your cities to the ground and wipe your dirty little Empire off the face of the earth"...that was a TRUISM and justly so...sadly, today's liberal Americans can't relate or comprehend to just what a UNITED effort it took to bring the Japanese Militarists to extinction in Aug/1945...the Japanese got what they readily deserved with A-Bomb interest...this movie was a harbinger of what was to come to the home-islands of Japan...WW2 was a great American lesson to America's enemies...I loved this wartime 1944 film about wartime April/1942....SSGT CHRIS SARNO-USMC FM</review_text>
The movie is a bit dramatic at times, but those who have studied the Doolittle raid and the treatment of the 8 men captured know it does not tell the American public enough about the terrible way humans treat other humans. If the Americans had been able to know how badly their prisoners were being treated, the Japanese Island might not be there today. Read Four Came Home for the best view, or study other exerpts of various items on the internet. I am writing about Dean Edward Hallmark, a graduate of Paris Junior College and one of the three who were executed</review_text>
this is a classic gangster movie already, anyone whos into the whole block scene should add this to their collection</review_text>
The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods</review_text>
Veronica Mars is my favorite show currently on television. Although the show has been focusing more on Veronica's romantic relationship than in the past, the mystery aspect is still front and center each episode. The writers incorporate smart dialoge and clever plot twists to create a genuinely funny and suspenseful show. The acting for the most part is top notch, and Kristen Bell, who plays Veronica, is amazing. I especially enjoyed Episode 9, Spit and Eggs, in which Veronica figures out who has raped her fried Parker and at least two other women on her campus.</review_text>
Don't get me wrong...I'm as likely as anyone else looking for a "chick flick" to watch the latest Meg Ryan movie with the cute leading man....but this movie adds something extra. Instead of just dishing out the same old blather that most romantic comedies spout (girl & guy meet, girl & guy go through some conflict, but eventually guy & girl get together and live happily ever after) this movie actually takes the time to explore what makes a relationship between two people special and unique, whether that relationship is between two friends, lovers, or family members.This movie is also great because it expounds upon the HUGE role that a person's mind plays when it comes to love and sex.Kate Capshaw's character, Helen, is great for audience members who still haven't figured out that women are sexual beings and that it's OKAY for them to enjoy sex! (Even with a much younger man!)All the characters remind us that even though we may not have everything figured out, you can always learn some new tricks, no matter what your age.If you're in the mood for mindless entertainment, I wouldn't recommend this movie. However, if you're ready for a touching and romantic but still lighthearted flick, this is a good one!</review_text>
in a small, quaint bookshop, in which the paint is peeling from the mismatched bookcases, and the view of the sea below is as crisp and clear as it possibly can be from the wavy, leaded glass windows.  Now picture coming back to this town every summer, visiting old friends, spending your Fourth of July evening at the local park.  This movie is more about mood to me than anything.  I watch it over and over every summer, wishing I could be a bookseller in Loblolly-by-the-Sea.  I can almost smell the salty air and taste the lobster in the local restaurant.  This film is a love letter to the romantic in all of us who wishes to spend time curled up with a good book (or movie) on a lazy summer day.Capshaw is a perfect Helen.  DeGeneres, a perfectly hilarious best friend.  And Selleck is wonderful in this film, capturing the sensitive George.  It makes me wonder why he doesn't take on more roles.The only fault I find with this film is in the casting of Thomas Everett Scott ("That Thing You Do") as Johnny.  He's a bit too mature-looking to play Helen's impetuous summer fling.  No matter how many times I watch this movie, I'm never thorougly convinced he's right as the young college student.Anyway, enjoy the film, soak up the mood, and I'll bet you'll come back again and again.</review_text>
Where are the DVDs?  I'm STILL waiting!  I want it all, but especially the second season.I'd rather not have them done on both sides of the disc.  I want good quality discs, not too many episodes on each, please.  However, I'll take what I can get.  Just put it on DVD, PLEASE!</review_text>
WHAT MOST PEOPLE FAIL TO REALIZE IS THAT MOST LIFE STORY MOVIES ARE NOT MADE FOR THE PURPOSE OF GLORIFICATION TO THE VIEWER, BUT TO LET THEM KNOW OF THE REAL LIFE TRIALS AND TRIBULATIONS OF THAT PERSON. HOW CAN YOU CRITICISE SOMEONES LIFE STORY? TO GO THREW WHAT THEY WENT THREW TO SEE WHAT THEY SAW, AND TO EXPERIENCE LIFE THREW TIMES WHEN LIFE WAS ALMOST IMPOSSIBLE TO GRASP? I THINK JOSEPHINE BAKER WAS A VERY GREAT PERSON REGARDLESS OF HER NATIONALITY ANYONE WITH THE GUTS TO LIVE LIFE TO THE FULLEST AND OVERCOME IMPOSSIBLE BARRIERS DESERVES MUCH PRAISE</review_text>
This is a surprisingly good show. It manages to have 'a little' violence, sex, and language but not enough to be too offensive to watch with my kid, and it's still intelligent enough to be interesting, humorous and kind of addicting to an adult. A modern Nancy Drew, is Veronica Mars. I wish seasons 1 and 2 were here; I wish anything more were here and I'd get that as well. I'm really not even much of a whodunit kind of fan to be honest, I prefer science fiction but amazon ran out of decent TV to sell me in that genre so I bought VM season 3 just for kicks. I'm glad I did</review_text>
This is a traditional telling of the life of Jesus, from before his birth to the resurrection.The cinematography is breathtaking, the color, the costuming, the writing aided by Carl Sandberg is flawless and inspired and the scene of Jesus weeping and then raising Lazarus from the dead is awe inspiring. It was this scene which motivated me to write this review.Rather than showing us a thunderous awakening from the dead within the tomb, Stevens has Jesus lift the hem of his toga and make the difficult climb up a rocky bluff, puffing all the way to the tomb on top of a hill. Once there, Jesus strikes a pose made popular by the style of Ivan Mestrovic and the French bronze sculptors of the mid twentieth century. When Jesus reaches the high tomb, Stevens and Sandberg compose a masterpiece of prayer to the God of life before Jesus calls out, "LAZARUS! COME FORTH!"  But in striking juxtaposition, Stevens pulls back the camera, hundreds of feet from the tomb showing Jesus, the Son of the Almighty, as a mere speck against the infinity of the countryside, let alone the universe, much as the fist fight between Charlton Heston and Gregory Peck in BIG COUNTRY, shows the scale of man to God's work. However, as Jesus calls-out Lazarus instead of seeing him rise, we see the wonderment, the bewilderment, the fear and love of men at the prospect of one man raising another from the abyss. We see in the crowd, as the camera dollies, rolls and scans, the faces of the believers, the unbelievers, the doubters and the ever faithful, their reactions to a man dead three days, reawakened by an act of God, brought forth by a human being, favored by God.How much more effective was this direction? Rather than a straw man of seeing the dead rise, we see instead how people like us would react to such a thing, the awe, the tears of joy, the fear, the love, the attempts to reconcile with reality, the unbelievable. There was no better way to show the spectacle and that scene alone is a must-see for an aspiring  artist or film director. My only complaint about the film is a nitpicky one, Jesus' (Max Von Sydow) hair is too short.If you believe, clap your hands, and even if you don't, its worth the 199 minutes of your time. I saw the film with friends when it came out in 1965 and own the VHS and DVD, and watched it with a group, one of which was a self-proclaimed atheist-he had tears in his eyes at the Lazarus scene.4.75 Star</review_text>
Vincent Price at his best!!! I was amazed at his interpretation of Usher. It was very much like the hyper sensitive fellow of Poe's tale!!! The ending was shocking. I recommend this item to everybody. Good acting, very good indeed</review_text>
Eyewitnesses are given too much credibility and are notoriously inaccurate. Conspiracy buffs have fashioned an industry out of events told and retold but this footage is the best witness. It is also horrific to watch. I had heard the Parkland surgeons all talk about a head wound behind the President's right ear. They should know, they were there right? The film shows otherwise. If there is a conspiracy it is a well kept secret, show me someone who can keep a secret. If the US government is hiding evidence why is this footage available? No one can tell where a shot came from by the target's movement. The answer to where JFK's missing brain is here, the third shot pulverized it, turning it into a red mist. Had this film never existed the conspiracy people would have made millions more but the answers to their questions are in this footage. This is history which cannot be retold by bad historians or knuckleheads. See for yourself</review_text>
See the digital rendition of the historical Zapruder film from November of 1963. There's NO WAY it could have been only ONE gunman</review_text>
Jane Fonda plays a washed up has been actress in this movie with a very bad drinking problem. She wakes up one morning next to a guy with a knife in his chest and she can't remember what happened the night before. Then she is on the run when she meets a sympathetic young man played by Jeff Bridges.Unlike Hitchcock movies when the violins start to screetch on the soundtrack then you knw something VERY BAD is going to happen. The violins in this movie play pretty loud but nothing happens. I figured out "Whodunnit" in the first 30 minutes of this film and then spent the next hour trying to figure out if Fonda's hair was a wig or did she get her own hair bleached blonde?I give this movie 5 stars because I liked the look of the loft where the dead guy lives</review_text>
I first encountered this film on Bravo . . . and after a few minutes, I knew I had to buy the DVD (simply because it was clear the our great country had grossly edited the film for a 1:00AM showing).Cemetery Man is one of those genre defying films that surprises at every turn. It is amusing, thought-provoking, and borrows inspiration from the surrealists (in fact, consider the scene where Francesco and his love are passionately engaged under the sheet in the mausoleum . . . this is actually inspired by Magritte's "The Lovers II.") Moreover, strains of Kubrick can be noted as Francesco ventures on a killing spree to "An die Freude." Soavi aligns himself with the greats and proves, that in many respects, he belongs there.Not a mainstream fan, this was my first experience with Everett. His acting was absolutely impeccable. Franceso's ennui reflects our own ennui. Likewise, Franois Hadji-Lazaro showcases his enormous range with his portrayal of Gnaghi (a seemingly simple-minded "idiot-child" who harbors a reserve brilliance). The dynamic between these two actors is rare. Their exchanges are both humorous and tender.The plot has been rehashed here over a hundred times, so there is no need for me to elaborate. Simply allow me to say, if you are looking for a zombie film similar to Romero's work, do not bother. You will be frustrated. In many ways, the zombies are incidental to this film . . . they shamble around the edges, but have no real role. The actual story is one of desire (and the inherent dangers of desire). So, if you have IFC blocked, think Bravo is too "artsy," or find Sundance pretentious, BY ALL MEANS, do not try this film. Furthermore, if the thought of voluntary male-castration has you running for the hills, visit a more pleasant page. But if you are intellectually curious, buy this film today.Five stars for superb acting, gorgeous cinematography, and unparalleled writing.</review_text>
The art of farming is by far the oldest, most time-honored tradition. It is the ideal way to make an honest living, raise your family away from the madness of the city and gain self-satisfaction by doing something that really matters. "The River" effectivly portrays the plight experienced by many American farmers during the 1980's economical recession. Flooding, forclosure and overdue bills were just a part of life for those most discouraging and undeniably frightning of years. Farm-friendly legislation has been passed in recent years so farmers can apply for disaster relief, equipment loans and bankrupcy loans. The goal is to keep the Family Farm as part of American culture. "The River" was shot in Northwestern Tennessee near Kingsport, Bristol and Johnson City and also in Birmingham, Alabama. A 400-acre parcel of land alongside the Holston River, in Tennessee was cleared and turned into a real working farm in just four weeks. The flood scenes were produced in conjunction with the Tennessee Valley Authority using a dam upriver which was slated for repairs. The scenery in the movie is absolutly breathtaking. The mountains, fields and river all seem to blend into one big beautiful picture. "The River" was the third in a trio of farming-based movies that year. The other two are "Country", with Jessica Lange and "Places In the Heart" with Sally Field</review_text>
I enjoy watching this movie over and over again with my family and friends.  Best purchase I ever made</review_text>
I think this movie goes right to the heart of the philosophical question of what art and artists are supposed to be and do: are they merely to present facts/ideas/personalities/images with no comment, no moralizing, no personal ulterior motives (leaving all those things to the viewer), or do they need to state clearly a moral purpose and certain direction (which the viewer can then accept or reject)?Martin Sheen is Kit, a garbageman working in South Dakota; he becomes friends with 15-year-old Holly (Sissy Spacek). When her father tells Sheen he doesn't want him near his daughter again, Sheen kills him. The two run off together, living for a while in the woods like two "innocents" of some primitive society. But then they're discovered by three men and Sheen kills them, too.They now head for Montana, Sheen committing more murders along the way. He is empty inside, nothing fazes him; he imagines he's like James Dean - misunderstood, alienated. But he doesn't have a clue what he should be alienated against, and as far as being misunderstood, he never once gives the least hint there is anything there TO understand. We finish watching the movie feeling as empty as Sheen. I also felt a little angry at Malick's attempt to con me into thinking there is more to Sheen's vapid character than there really is: he truly is just a non-entity who kills half a score of innocent people.So back to my first paragraph. Malick obviously works from the perspective of the first half of my question posed (a view that became an obsession, I think, with artists, writers, film-makers, etc. beginning in the late 1960s); I tend toward believing the second half. Suum cuique</review_text>
Words cannot express how glad I am the Adventures in Motion Pictures company made available Matthew Bourne's Swan Lake on DVD. The clich thing to say is it's "amazing", "genius", "sexy", "masterful"... but it is all those things and more. You've never see anything like this.To me this "modern" Swan Lake is now the definitive classic of a classic--I can't nor do I want to imagine the swan roles as anything but manly now. The leads Adam Cooper and Scott Ambler are not only great dancers, they are great actors. Their chemistry is enjoyable to behold--and just as believable as the chemistry the traditional Swan Lake man/woman pair conveys. In fact, a male swan is more provocative *because* it's not the typical sad, delicate princess from all other versions. Instead we see something new and wonderful--a true creature of beauty, power and majesty who utterly captivates the Prince (and the audience) in every way. The male duets and solos in this show are just...wow.I brought this DVD to my best friend's house and I was unsure what she would think, she'd never seen any ballet let alone one so un-traditional as this. My fears were put to rest in Act II. Once the Swan appeared she didn't take her eyes away the rest of the night. We both watched in silence as if mesmerized. It was a fantasitc feeling to watch it with someone else and see them be amazed. The music helped too, Swan Lake has by far some of the best music ever written for the stage. Surely many people who aren't normally ballet watchers would appreciate this show--its humor, universal themes of forbidden love, the unique way the swans look and act like real birds, and above all else powerful manly dancing--definitely something for everyone! Share this with someone you love, quick!!</review_text>
This arty quirky film about a New Years Eve gone wrong in the mid- 80s is one of my favorites. Was the first time I saw Kate Hudson and she is so sweet and funny in this one.Martha Plimpton is a riot as the overwrought hostess with a failed party on her hands.Ben Affleck is actually semi-funny for once- he is trying desperately to get into someone's pants- watch and see who he starts the new year with.Courtney Love and Paul Rudd are friends- she wants to be more but she scares him....Indy gal J. Garafolo is her dark and dismal chain smoking wisecracking self and fun again.Dave Chappel is the cabby who tells the tale.Fun! Romantic comedy a guy will like! --.</review_text>
Madonna gives a stunning performance...Explicit similated sex and graphic language...We really enjoyed the concert...This is defininatly one of her best...Now if we can get the blond ambition tour from japan and the usa, i would be very happy...5 star rated. i own this disc</review_text>
CSI is great and Downloading was very easy.  This is my fourth video, and I've only had problems with one, and Amazon quickly walked me through fixing it.  Gotta agree with A. Huck on the DSL, though.  While it's certainly useable the higher speed of cable would be great</review_text>
Just got done watching the show and it was awesome. Of course I had to download the tool, how else do you get started? Once it downloaded it worked very well and the video was right there to watch when I was ready. Note to self get cable, DSL is a slow download but it worked great and the picture quality was awesome. No commercials!I didn't have any troubles installing it on my computer and the help tool walked me through it.</review_text>
If you are interested in knowing what challenges monarches and other powerful people face, this movie is a great beginning. You may or may not be interested in Russian history or even world history, but this particular story greatly encapsulates the emotional, physical and political issues faced by two powerfully-born adults and their children. Other reviews at this site are terrific for their critical perceptions of this movie and its strengths and weaknesses, so I will not go into too much detail to "sell" anybody on the action or dialogue, or historical accuracy. Suffice to say this movie -- in its unedited version (crucial for DVD) does in fact tell it like it is (or was). Nicholas and Alexandra were two human beings who happened to be born into the Western dynastic system still prevalent at the turn of the 20th century. They were responsible, in an almost Biblical sense, for the destiny of Humanity, only they opted out, and were then executed. This would be considered "romantic" if Humanity did not have such an overwhelming need for Leadership by designated heroes. The DVD version is critical to see the full relationship between Alexandria and Rasputin as a surrendering of power, and also to see Rasputin in his full decadent expression (which must be positively repulsive to Russian history revisionists.) It is also necessary, in an emotional and historic context, to see the "failure" of Nicholas -- that he could no longer carry the responsibility of the godhead. It is also relevant to see the execution of Rasputin at the hands of the two hop-head fairies who were also in line to inherit this godhead, and that they themselves had dreams of American incorporation. Alexia (Nicholas and Alexandra's only son, who also happened to be a hemophiliac) hates his persecutors with a very personal, adult hatred -- those who persecuted the Romanov dynasty were people who hated themselves and took that hatred out on the leaders they loved and despised. They loved their leaders, and despised their need for leaders. If you purchase this movie, whatever your reason or interest, please buy the DVD so that it is unedited (meaning uncensored) so thatyou may judge for yourself</review_text>
Absolutely delightful. Robson Green and cast are right on their marks.  Great escapist fare.</review_text>
Tales from the crypt as you might know is the popular horror series that was on HBO during the early ninties so this film is the first movie to be made from that series. The film is absolutley fantastic and has alot of gore, nudity and humor in it unfortunately the sequal that was released after this was terrible and wasn't even worth it anyway the film starts of with a small segment where the cryptkeeper is directing a horror film then tells his usual stuff like some lame jokes then the real film starts with a car chase and offcourse Billy Zane as the collector was fantastic in his role he was hillarious and scary at the same time, William Sadler plays Brayker who is a drifter that stumbles upon a motel and its inhabitants and is trying to hide from the collector who happens to want a medalion that Brayker has, the collecter also summons up some demons from hell in a very cool scene so he could create alot of havoc, the film was also an homage to older horror films like the evil dead and night of the living dead as you'll see later when the characters are all stuck in this motel surrounded by demons. All the characters were great in this film and you also get a bit of background with each one of them which is rare especialy in a gory horror film like this. The film also stars Jada Pinket Smith, CCH Pounder who gets her arm ripped off in this film and Thomas Haden Church who plays the obnoxious jerk and some other actors that I don't recognise all this makes for a great and enjoyable horror film that I highly recomend that you watch</review_text>
Bones is one of my favorite TV series. This one episode I missed so I had to get it to keep on track. Great show even if you have never seen it from the begining</review_text>
This episode is a bit different than the others I have seen, although I have not yet seen all of season 2 yet.  Without giving anything away, this episode shows growth in 3 of characters as human beings.  Additionally, it has some inventive guest characters.  Finally, it presents some moral and ethical questions</review_text>
But it's the core 25%, and if you look at this as its own piece, then you'll be satisfied.  The visuals are great, Gary Cooper is great, and Ayn Rand's premise is all here.And for those of you picking apart Rand's philosophy and its role in architecture: yes, the movie is an exaggeration.  The book is too.  That's the point.</review_text>
I recently read The Fountainhead and Atlas Shrugged for the first time and found this version of The Fountainhead to be the best old movie I've seen.  Granted, I don't watch a tremendous number of old movies, but I really enjoyed and recommend this movie</review_text>
I've been waiting for this movie to come out on DVD to ad to my collection.  Again, if you like Bill Murray you'll like this movie.  Also, Randy Quaid is hilarious.  Murphys Law at it's best!  Cracks me up just thinking about it</review_text>
Many people, when they think of Buddhism, think of blissful meditation and serene contemplation. This movie graphically depicts the other side of Buddhism;i.e., hard work in the real world, in the real transformation of oneself and in one's efforts to help other beings, no matter how difficult or horrific the circumstances.The film concerns a Japanese soldier separated from his unit in Burma, at the very end of WW II and its immediate aftermath. As he journeys to find his unit in a POW camp, he is confronted, at every turn in this wasteland of war, with dead and unburied fellow Japanese soldiers. At first, he disguises himself as a Buddhist monk (knowing that the Burmese respect and feed their monks). When he comes across British hospital staff burying an unknown Japanese soldier, with a formal Christian burial service and great respect, he is transformed. He recalls the hundreds of dead and unburied Japanese soldiers he had seen in his journey, he becomes a true Buddhist monk, and makes a singular and difficult vow; he will not return to Japan until he has buried all of the corpses he had seen. So he goes back, and begins his work.Hardly blissful meditation, this. But he personifies what the Buddha taught; the purpose of Life is to be happy, but true happiness can only come from serving others. This soldier/monk, in devoting his life to active, difficult and gruesome work, is more a true fulfillment of the Buddha's teachings than is one who meditates on the weekend and wears prayer beads because it is "cool."Sorry to sermonize, but this movie is not only a wonderful work of cinema, it is a Buddhist teaching in itself. Compassion MUST be coupled with the very difficult work of serving others.</review_text>
I LOVE IT SOOOOO MUCH IT'S THE BIG NEW THING ... CAN'T WAIT 4 THE NEXT EPISODE..</review_text>
Sophia Loren is without arugment the most beautiful and sexy foreign actress in movie history. Beginning in the mid-1950's she did a string of Italian films and became the first foreign-born actress to come to Hollywood and make the crossover in mainstream American movies, starting with "The Pride and the Passion" in 1957 (it was this film and "Houseboat" that Loren began her close relationship with Cary Grant) and at the same time, blew fellow Italian bella Gina Lollobridga out of the water as the best actress to come out of Italy. In 1960, Loren went back to Italy to film the World War II film "Two Women." A year and a half later, to everybody's surprise she won the Oscar for Best Actress and became the first foreigner of that era to win the Academy Award. But if there was one film that summed up just how damn sexy Sophia Loren was, it came with "Yesterday, Today, and Tomorrow." The scene in which she strips in front of Marcello Mastronini's character has to be considered the greatest strip scene in film history and also the most sexiest in film history too (Hope PREMIERE magazine does a list like it someday). And that is the scene in which you say to everybody, "This is Sophia Loren." In my opinion, Loren may have been the first actress in movie history to be on-screen in their lingerie. There is a shirt that says, "Italians Do it Better." Could 'it' be referring to sex? if so, we can give thanks to Sophia Loren.</review_text>
This film's predecessor,"Ginger Snaps 2--Unleashed," was a competent but uninspired effort: a typical sequel.  In contrast, "Ginger Snaps Back" is a significant film--but hardly a sequel at all.The first two "Ginger Snaps" installments took place in contemporary Canada, mainly in suburbs and city; but "Ginger Snaps Back" is set in the Canadian frontier wilderness of nearly 200 years ago.  Furthermore, in the earlier films (particularly the first) the two sisters Brigitte and Ginger share a complex relationship--loving but mutually antagonistic: Ginger's cynical death wish keeps her at odds with Brigitte who would stay alive (and human!) at any cost.  In "Ginger Snaps Back," however, the girls have been simplified: they've become fairy tale orphans wandering through a monster-infested forest.Early on in the film, the sisters find shelter in a militaristic fort/outpost run by some very hard guys--misfit toughs who resemble ogres just waiting for victims to approach their lonely castle!  Significantly, it's in this dubious refuge that Ginger is infected with lycanthropy.  Thus with monsters lurking outside the gates as well as within, the film plunges toward a fiery but despairing climax.Overall, "Ginger Snaps Back" conveys a thrilling atmosphere of folklore and legends--an ancient eeriness more easily felt than described.  Even the film's snow-covered forests radiate a sense of centuries-old Indian myths; appropriately, the film's Indian characters, including a larger-than-life hunter/warrior, identify the werewolves with the wendigo.As a work of folklore or fairy tale, "Ginger Snaps Back" tends to be less verbal, but more visionary than the preceding films in this trilogy.  Startling, beautiful images abound in this movie.  Just one example: lovely Ginger in her black hooded cloak, with vamp fangs and raptor claws, flinging open the gates of the fort to admit the besieging werewolves.  As the creatures surge forward and around her, Ginger stands as an icon of demonic ecstasy--comparable to the robot doppelganger in Fritz Lang's great "Metropolis"!  Of course, that comparison alone should indicate the imaginative power flowing through "Ginger Snaps Back.</review_text>
All bow down to the producers at Criterion, who have done an outstanding job of bringing to DVD one of the best Rock films ever made, GIMME SHELTER.  The film itself has been reviewed to death over the past thirty years, so I won't do that here.  I will, however, let 'cha know that beyond Criterion's beautiful, vibrant, remixed, remastered presentation lies a world of wonderful extras: 1) commentary by filmmakers Albert Maysles and Charlotte Zwerin, 2) audio material from the four-hour day-after program  broadcast by KSAN on December 7, 1969, 3) three different trailers for the film, 4) trailers for other Maysles Brothers films, 5) 5.1, 2.0 stereo and DTS sound mixes, 6) outtake footage including performances of "Oh, Carol" and a nice acoustic "Prodigal Son", 7) a studio mixing session with the band for "Little Queenie", 8) an extensive stills gallery, 9) a HUGE book with much material on the film and the filming, and lots more.  GIMME SHELTER is a must-own for your video Rock library.  Thank you, Criterion</review_text>
Ohhhhhhhhhh my my my, what can I say about this one?  By the time it entered home video on vhs in late 1987, I was not familiar with Freddy at all except for the fact that I knew the premise....he can kill in your dreams and goes after kids and teens.  The fact that I was at that time only goin on age 15 did not help.  I was terrified of anything related to horror.  In my mind Freddy was the worst.  As a scared 15 year old kid, Freddy was the last thing I wanted to view.  I was watching films like, Raiders of the Lost Ark and The Empire Strikes Back.  Those I could handle.  However, in late summer of 1987, a friend of mine rang me up and told me to come over because he had a new movie he had rented that he wanted me to watch.  I asked him what it was and he wouldnt tell me.  All he said was that id be surprised and that id really like it.  So, I went over and he wouldnt let me see the title on the box.  He just slid it into the slot of the VCR.  Folks, I saw the New Line Cinema Logo and then this graphic,  "Sleep, those little slices of death.  How I loathe them....Edgar Allan Poe"  My mind started to reel but I had not yet realized what this film was; and then I saw the title, "A NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET 3: DREAM WARRIORS."  Now mind you the closest I ever came to seeing this film was the wonderfully cool Dokken Video on MTV called, Dream Warriors.  I even had a hard time viewing the visage of Freddy in that MTV video.  Hilarious huh??  Anyway, when I saw the title come up, I grabbed my coat and I was getting the hell out of there and quickly.  However, my buddy begged me to give it a chance, he said its not as bad as I was thinkin and that id actually find certain parts of it actually funny.  Now I thought he was pullin my leg with that statement.  Even his mother told me id like it.  She had already seen it in the theatres and so had my buddy.  So, once I heard her reassure me as well, I decided to give it a chance.  As the opening of the film carried on I viewed the front cover on the box.  A vicious looking cover with Freddy's face leering over several teens facing him, appearing to stand on his out-stretched knives with a tagline that I find today to be one of the most creative taglines ever!!!  "If you think you'll get out alive, you must be dreaming."  Anyhow, suffice it to say, after experiencing dream warriors, I was instantly relieved and I was also an instant fan!!  I couldnt believe it actually because id sworn this character off.  I was terrified of him.  I suppose id have to thank my buddy Mike C. for that.  Thank you Mike for opening the door to this series for me.  Ive loved it ever since.  Ive seen all of them.  Many argue and argue over which film is the best, but Dream Warriors will always hold a special place in my heart because it was my first Nightmare and the first time I had to get ready for Freddy!!  :)  Hope you enjoyed my review.   By the way, I did laugh during my first viewing, and I also feel that poster art was the best of all of them</review_text>
I have THREE FUGITIVES on LASERDISC And I bought The dvd too, A MUST SEE For Martin Short's Fans :</review_text>
This movie is a classic.  We owned it on VHS and the tape finally fell apart, so I ordered it for our family for Christmas.  Good for all ages, nice night of entertainment for all of us</review_text>
Great movie! Pretty funny, and it has a  wonderful moral to it, but I won't give it away! Watch the movie! You'll love it</review_text>
This episode embodies why I love this series. The bad guy is bad - and makes appearances throughout the series.And now, this episode offers some more understanding of the Wraith species and actually BEGS you to learn more of what initially seemed to be a barbaric bunch to kill at all costs.Now you really don't know what to think...except that today is a day of honor.I won't blow it for you. Watch this one FIRST if you're not sure about which episode to sample...and savor what makes this series a landmark in sci-fi adventures.</review_text>
This movie has all the best comedians in it!   Remember  Norm Macdonalds  character from Saturday Night Live News...  "note to self.." and his tape recorder? This movie is his saturday night live parable.   Chris Farley, Adam Sandler ( guest appearnce)  even   little Gary Coleman.   Its hiliarious and  quotable</review_text>
I originally saw this as a lad growing up in 1966 when I went with family to the theater. It was very funny than and it is just as refreshing today.This is the story about a Russian sub-Captain who decides to breach the 25 mile coastal barrier of the United States at a time when we were deeply in the cold war and the Russians were all citizens of the glorious Soviet Union or so they called it often. They were at the time, enemies bent on the destruction of the United States of America, in place of their brand of communism (something that works on paper, but not in practice). Anyhow they get so close to the United States shores of a New England Island community that their submarine became stuck on a sand bar. That was the first act of war against the United States. The Captain than sends a group of crew members (lead by Russian speaking Alan Arkin) ashore. They are in uniform, that is the second act of war on the United States. But they are not only in uniform. They have machine guns, a third act of war against the United States of America.They soon find a family with a father who is a nervous wreck, Carl Reiner, In his own respect a longtime great actor (the real life father of meathead-Rob Reiner) and a boy who spots the Russians and wants to do the right thing and shoot them. So throughout the movie, the kid when we see him is being held back, but in a funny sort of way.The family is soon overcome and the group takes their car, lead by a hilarious and persistent Alan Arkin, but they leave a blonde (machine gun toting) guy behind to guard the family. In a distraction and struggle the father (of meathead) gains the upper hand and chases blondie off, or so they figure. With the car gone, he soon takes a bicycle towards town while the family waits.The Sheriff of the town played by Brian Keith A great actor we all miss dearly these days, and the Deputy, played by an always funny Jonathon Winters fall into their own chaos amongst panicked (understandably) townsfolk. The idea of the group of Russian's going into town is to steal a large motor boat to tow the sub off the sand bar. Will they succeed in all the madness that pursues, amongst other subplots like a love story? I can tell you this has a great ending, and its well worth watching. Its almost a timeless movie you can watch over and over again</review_text>
Monkey Business is one of the cutest movies I have ever seen and it's just so funny to see Cary Grant and Ginger Rogers take the youth serum and act like children and they were great and also the monkey were absolutely adorable!This movie is recommended highly</review_text>
JLO finds out that she cant run forever from her abusive husband. So she learns Krav Maga and gives him a a*s kicking to remember.</review_text>
I thought this was an excellent movie. It kept me on the edge of my seat the whole time. I just couldn't stop watching it. It has an excellent plot that I think a lot of people can understand. It gives you an idea of what goes on when a husband becomes violent with his wife and starts to abuse her</review_text>
